
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-50 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000015994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-036--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  SPOTLIGHT ON JAPAN ASSOCIATION OF DEFENSE INDUSTRY </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     Japan Association of Defense Industry (JADI), existing in its 
present form since 1988 and tracing its origin back to 1951, is an 
industry association under the supervision of the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI) and the Japan Defense Agency 
(JDA).  JADI promotes the development of Japanese defense technology 
and equipment, monitors foreign technology, lobbies on behalf of its 
corporate members for government defense spending, and cooperates 
with the government on export controls. 

   ASSOCIATION OVERVIEW 

   JADI (Nihon boei sobi kogyokai), an industry association (shadan 
hojin) of over 130 corporations, promotes the development of a 
strong Japanese defense industry.  According to the latest edition 
of the annual guide to MITI's public corporations (TSUSHOSANGYOSHO 
KANKEI KOEKI HOJIN BENAAN 1993 May 93), JADI seeks to "work towards 
the sound development of the defense equipment industry and, in so 
doing, contribute to the establishment of Japan's defense base" by 
promoting research and development of defense equipment and 
improving production technology.  The association's stated 
activities regarding defense equipment are as follows:  conducting 
surveys and research; gathering and disseminating information, 
supporting R&amp;D; offering proposals on modernization, greater 
efficiency, and support for Japan's defense production base; hosting 
seminars; cooperating with other organizations related to the 
defense industry; carrying out contract research, helping devise 
Standards; and cooperating with the government's export control 
Policies.  Central to the association's activities is the promotion 
of R&amp;D and Japan's independent development of defense technology and 

product ion capacity (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 3 Jun 87, NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 1O Jan 87). 

   CLOSE TIES TO GOVERNMENT 

   The association has existed at three different levels of 
organization, each successively closer to the government.  In 
October 1951, five steel companies led the way in establishing the 
Japan Technology Production Association (Nihon gijutsu seisan 
kyoryokukai), a private company (kabushiki kaisha).  In October 
1953, the organization changed its name to the Japan Weapons 
Industry Association (Nihon heiki kogyokai) and became a voluntary 
association (nini dantai) (YOMIURI SHIMBUN 26 Sep 88). 

   In September 1988, the organization assumed its present name and 
status as an industry association under joint MITI and JDA 
administration.  One month prior to the change, NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN (4 Aug 88) reported that the organization had experienced 
"difficulties" as a voluntary organization in securing long-term 
loans and government subsidies.  YOMIURI SHIMBUN (26 Sep 88) 
reported that the organization would now receive government 
subsidies due to its "upgrading" to the status of a legal entity 
(hojin). 

   Along with the Promotion in status came enhanced government 
supervision.  Chairman Kosaku Inaba, president of Ishikawajima- 
Harima Heavy Industries (IHI), and the three vice chairmen, all 
corporate executives, retained their positions.  But the insertion 
of three members of the government "old boy" network signalled 
JADI's closer ties to the government (ASAHI SHIMBUN 17 Sep 88, 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 17 Sep 88, YOMIURI SHIMBUN 26 Sep 88). 
Tomoyoshi Kabaya, a former MITI official who headed the JDA 
Equipment Bureau, assumed the newly created post of JADI director- 
general.  Takeshi Moriyama, former chief of JDA's Central 
Procurement Office, assumed office under him as executive director. 
Both Kabaya and Moriyama continue to hold those positions, according 
to the latest edition of TSUSHOSANGYOSHO KANKEI KOEKI HOJIN BENRAN 
1993 (May 93).  In contrast, IHI's Inaba and the three corporate 
executives under him vacated their seats after serving out their 
two-year terms. 

   JADI's chairmen and vice chairmen are drawn from the top ranks of 
Japan's defense industry.  Yotaro Iida, chairman of Mitsubishi Heavy 
Industries (MHI), has chaired JADI since June 1992 (NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 28 May 92).  IHI Vice President Kunio Minamizaki, Fujitsu 
Vice President Kimio Otsuki, and Asahi Chemical Industry Chairman 
Nobuo Yamaguchi are listed as the current vice chairmen 
(TSUSHOSANGYOSHO KANKEI KOEKI HOJIN BENRAN 1993 May 93).  The 
association's chairmen have been chosen from among Japan's top seven 
defense companies:  MHI, Kawasaki Heavy Industries (KHI), IHI, 
Mitsubishi Electric, NEC, Toshiba, and Japan Steel Works (NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 12, 28 May 92).  Preceding Iida as JADI chairman were 
KHI President Hiroshi Oba (199O-92) and IHI President Kosaku Inaba 
(1988-9O).  The association's top post has also rotated among 
companies according to three categories of defense equipment: 
firearms/special vehicles, ammunition/missiles, and electronics 
(NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 May 9O, ASAHI SHIMBUN 3O May 87, NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 2O Mar 85). 

   MONITORING U.S. TECHNOLOGY 

   The association has been monitoring U.S. defense technology as 
part of its mission to gather and disseminate information on foreign 
developments.  For example, Washington and Tokyo reached an 
agreement in July 1987 for Japanese corporations to participate in 
the U.S. Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI).  JADI's predecessor 
organization joined the Keidanren's Defense Production Committee and 
the Society of Japanese Aerospace Companies (SJAC) in a joint 
conference to learn the details of Japanese corporate partici- 
pation in SDI research from MITI, the "point of contact" for 
Japanese companies interested in the project (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 4 
Aug 87).  The association was also to join SJAC and Keidanren's 
Defense Production Committee in an "SDI Information Center" slated 
to begin operations in early 1988.  The association would cooperate 
in gathering information, primarily open-source documents in the 
United States, on SDI-related technology (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 17 
Nov 87).  Moreover, at a New Year's party in January 1988, 
association chairman Kosaka Inaba and JDA Equipment Bureau Director- 
General Masaji Yamamoto gave speeches on Japanese corporate 
participation in SDI, stressing that companies study the technology 
involved and maintain liaison with the Japanese Government (NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 9 Jan 88). 

   LOBBYING GOVERNMENT 

   JADI also lobbies government officials and politicians.  Chairman 
Iida joined SJAC's chief and other representatives of defense- 
related organizations in an October 1993 "round table discussion" on 
the Mid-Term Defense Plan (1991-95) with then-JDA Director-General 
Keisuke Nakanishi.  JADI joined the call for increased defense R&amp;D 
sPending to sustain the employment and expertise of JaPanese 
researchers and engineers in the field (ASAHI SHIMBUN 19 Oct 93). 
During the Liberal Democratic Party's (LDP) years in power (1955- 
93), JADI kePt channels of communication to the succession of JDA 
chiefs and LDP defense experts.  Among the guests at the 
association's annual New Year's party, for example, have been then- 
JDA Director-General Koichi Kato (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 10 Jan 86). 

   (AUTHOR:  MERCADO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
PACIFIC RIM BRANCH AT (703) 733-6346) 
GIG/21MAR/TECHTF/MILF/TID/ta 22/1916z mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-51 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-22Mar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      RTV Blasts Yakovlev, Poltoranin </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                        On 16 March Russian Television's (RTV) primetime edition of its 
Vesti news program launched a scathing attack on media bigwigs, 
including Aleksandr Yakovlev, head of both the Federal Service of 
Russia for Television and Radio Broadcasting and the Ostankino 
Television and Radio Broadcasting Company, and Mikhail 
Poltoranin, head of the State Duma Committee for Information 
Policy and Communications.  Showing video of the two taking in 
the performance of an exotic dancer at a club for media elite, 
the program juxtaposed the officials' expensive and decadent 
perquisites with state television's acute shortage of operating 
funds. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Newscaster Svetlana Sorokina began the report by highlighting the 
continuing financial difficulties Plaguing state television.  She 
noted that Anatoliy Nazeykin, chairman of the Central Committee 
of the Russian Federation Trade Union of Communications Workers, 
had recently warned that communications workers may again go on 
strike, as they did in February, if state television companies 
continue to fall behind in payments to communications enterprise5 
for broadcasting state programming.  The report then noted that 
the "media chiefs" had just attended a meeting of the Russian 
Union of Journalists where participant5 discussed state 
televisions financial crisis, and had stopped off at an 
"elitist" and "bourgeoi"  journalists' club on returning from the 
meeting.  Accompanying video showed Yakovlev and Poltoranin 
conversing at a table and then cut to shots of an "exotic" dancer 
performing a strip-tease to Western jazz music.  The reporter 
said that the club's patrons, largely bankers and entrepreneurs 
selected according to "CPSU principles," came to enjoy "expensive 
foreign drinks" and to experience "Western culture," which is 
"foreign" to Russians.  He concluded the report by noting that 
the proceeds from the club were supposed to support state 
television and questioning whether the government would also 
help.  Sorokina then closed the broadcast by sardonically 
assuring viewers that, "as soon as we learn," Vesti would inform 
viewers "whom the government will help and how." 
   Implications 
   Coming in the wake of a major media reorganizati0n and statements 
by Yeltsin on the need to maintain two state television 
companies, this brash attack may indicate that decision-makers at 
RTV see Yeltsin himself as their patron and do not fear 
antagonizing Yakovlev or media officialdom in general.  It may be 
particularly embarrassing for Yakovlev, who himself has recently 
expressed his opposition to excessive sex and violence in Western 
television programming aired on Russian television.  The attack, 
however, plays into the hands of Yeltsin's hardline opponents, 
who often decry the alleged influence and decadence of the West. 
Finally, by simultaneously titillating viewers with salacious 
television footage and embarrassing Yakovlev, head of RTV's main 
rival, Ostankino, the report may indicate that competition 
between the two major television companie5 for viewers and 
advertising rubles is heating up. 
(AUTHOR:  CRIMMINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH  cka 23/0145z  mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-52 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-037--EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL 
<H3> <TI>      EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL HIGH-TECH INDUSTRY HIGHLIGHTS </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Table     of Contents 
   FEATURE: 
   France: National Debate On Research Policy 
   POLICY ISSUES 
   Germany Launches New Laser Research Program 
   French Report on Critical Defense Technologies 
   Finnish Support for R&amp;D 
   CORPORATE STRATEGIES 
   DASA, China Sign Telecommunications Satellite Agreement 
   Swedish Research on Hybrid Vehicles 
   Honda Reacts to Sale of Rover 
   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 
   FRANCE: NATIONAL DEBATE ON RESEARCH POLICY 
   In recent statements to the press Minister of Higher Education 
and Research Francois Fillon confirmed that the French Government 
intends to make research a national priority and that it is relying 
heavily on major debates now taking place to define the broad 
outlines of a national policy by June 1994. 
   The national debate on research policy officially got under way 
on 1 February, when Robert Daulray of the Atomic Energy Commission 
(CEA) presented to Fillon the "Report on the Trends in Major Aims of 
French Research."  The 60-page document, which the research minister 
commissioned last September, will be circulated to about 30,000 
members of the research community, who will use it as the basis for 
a  major national consultation. "  The consultation exercise will be 
based on six thematic conferences to be held in different regions of 
the country through mid-March.  The results of these conferences 
will be included in a national debate in Paris on 9 April, to be 
followed by the drafting in May of a final summary document, which 
will serve as the framework for parliamentary discussions on the 
future of French research in June (LE FIGARO).  The conferences will 
address topics such as research and innovation in small and medium- 
sized enterprises, competitiveness-oriented research and the private 
sector, basic research, advanced education and research 
organizations, and international research (AFS SCIENCES). 
   Fillon told LE FIGARO on 2 February that he considers a thorough 
assessment of the French scientific community indispensable   This 
has not been done for 10 years despite the major changes that have 
occurred during that time.  Fillon considers it important for France 
to have a more accurate perception of its scientific resources and 
of the steps it needs to take during the next few years to remain a 
major player in the global S&amp;T arena. 
   According to Fillon, French research policy over the past five 
years has failed to define the kind of strong priorities that would 
encourage "pump-priming" programs to stimulate research in a changed 
national and international context or that would launch basic 
research programs today to lay the groundwork for the applied 
research companies will need tomorrow.  AFP SCIENCES has quoted 
Fillon as saying that France is the only European country whose 
research budget is increasing, but Fillon asserted in LE FIGARO 
that, having relinquished much of its leadership role to become 
merely a source of funding, the French' Government now needs to find 
a way to target research instead of being satisfied to finance it 
without having any authority over it.  The government needs to be 
able to make selective decisions, such as supporting a particular 
laboratory that has achieved a major breakthrough in a field 
important to France, Fillon said.  He hopes the current national 
debate will result in a policy that will allow researchers the 
flexibility to assess needs accurately and allocate efforts 
appropriately.  Fillon told AFP SCIENCES he supports proposal5 for a 
five-year plan or a programming law like that of the Ministry of 
Defense. (AFP SCIENCES 6 Jan 94; LE FIGARO 2 Feb 94) SW 
   POLICY ISSUES 
   Germany Launches New Laser Research Program--According to 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE, the German Ministry of Research is launching 
the "Laser 2000" program to promote the development of semiconductor 
lasers.  A total of 270 million marks ($159 million) is to be made 
available by 1997.  The program is open to small and medium-sized 
companies and includes the newly created laser institutes in Berlin- 
Adlershof and Dresden, as well as existing research institutes in 
Dresden, Jena, Halle, and Rostock. 
   The program is Particularly aimed at aiding the transition from 
tube lasers to modern Semiconductor lasers.  Germany is two years 
behind Japan and the United States in building more powerful 
Semiconductor lasers.  For example, one can already buy 100 watt 
diode lasers in the United States, whereas in Germany only 
laboratory samples exist.  Applications are seen especially in 
medicine, for destroying kidney stones and gallstones, or in the 
diagnosis and treatment of tumors.  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER 
ALLGEMEINE in German 26 Jan 94) BC 
   French Report on Critical Defense Technologies--Faced with 
shrinking markets and major job cuts in the defense sector, the 
French Government has published a report on "the future of defenses 
related industries" that prioritizes 24 technologies considered 
critical, according to ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO.  The report 
states that France will not be able to remain Self-Sufficient in all 
areas of equipmens development and will have to enter into 
cooperative agreements with its European partners but it 
specifically recommends that funding for basic defense research be 
maintained at present levels or even increased. The report also 
suggests that a special budget be created for evaluation and 
acquisition of foreign technologies 
   The 24 technologies identified in the report are divided into 
three categories: those that need to be totally independent at a 
French or European level and whose Proliferation would constitute a 
risk, those that have intermediate Priority, and those whose 
specifically dual-use nature makes them "less sensitive."  The first 
category includes nuclear technology, microelectronic and 
nanoelectronic components for equipment and Subassemblies, 
navigation equipment, Sensors and signal Processing equipment, 
Signature-recogniion expertise, and Stealth-related technologies 
The second category consists of technologie5 such as modular 
electronic architectures, optical and optronic devices, 
telecommunications hardware and networks, advanced computer 
hardware, artificial intelligence and neural networks, sof tware 
engineering, and advanced computational codes.  The technologies 
identified as dual-use include production software and industrial 
production systems as well as hardware and software used for 
security of equipment and weapons systems. (ELECTRONIQUE 
INTERNATIONAL HEBDO 13 Jan 94) SW 
   Finnish Support for R&amp;D--TEKES, the Technology Development 
Center,  distributed 1.4 billion markkas ($254 million) in 1993 to 
firms for 108 research and development projects.  The total sum in 
grants and loans was the largest amount ever given in one year. 
TEKES, which operates with government funding, distributed more than 
half of the grants to small and medium-sized companies.  Projects 
receiving the most support were those dealing with information 
technology, process technology, manufacturing automation, 
construction and Space technology.  Many of the technological 
development projects dealt Specifically with improving the 
environment. (Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT 10 Feb 94) RB 
   CORPORATE STRATEGIES 
   DASA, China Sign Telecommunications Satellite Agreement--In 
November 1993, Germany's Deutsche Aerospace (DASA) signed a 
cooperation treaty with the China Aerospace Corporation (CASC) for 
the development, manufacture, and sale of telecommunications, 
meteorological, and earth-observation Satellites and ground 
stations.  The agreement calls for development of an estimated 20 
telecommunications Satellites over 8 to 10 years for a total worth 
of about 1 billion marks ($580 million).  Initial projects will 
include: (1) development of new modules for China's DFH-3 
telecommunications satellite (which DASA helped build as part of a 
previous agreement), scheduled for launch in mid-1994, and (2) 
design of a new-generation telecommunications Satellite (DFH-4) 
during 1994 for launch in 1997.  In addition, a jointly owned (50-50 
percent) company with capital assets of DM 20 million ($11.6 
million) will be established, with headquarters in Munich and a 
liaison office in Peking.  Finally, a study will examine the 
feasibility of setting up a joint Satellite-operations service 
agency.  The DASA/China treaty will be in direct competition with 
the Alliance--the industrial association formed in 1992 by DASA, 
France's Aerospatiale and Alcatel Espace, and Italy's Alenia Spazio 
for the construction of civil and military Satellites, in particular 
telecommunications Satellites--and may deal it a fatal blow, since 
China can manufacture satellites and launchers at prices lower than 
those of its European competitors. (Paris AIR &amp; COSMOS/AVIATION 
INTERNATIONAL 22/28 Nov 93) AM 
   Swedish Research on Hybrid Vehicles--The Swedish Government 
intends to spend a total of 120 million kronor ($15 million) on 
research concerning electric and hybrid (electric and gas powered) 
vehicles.  The project will last until 1997 and cover more than 120 
vehicles.  Research will be concentrated on hybrid vehicles. 
(Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER 11 Jan 94) RB 
   Honda Reacts to Sale of Rover--On 31 January, British Aerospace 
announced the sale of Rover to BMW for close to $1.2 billion, 
although Honda, which held a 20 percent share of Rover, was 
considered to have been the most likely Purchaser.  After the failed 
Renault-Volvo merger, the deal marked a new stage in the effort to 
restructure the European automobile industry, according to LE MONDE. 
   The Honda-Rover alliance was concluded in 1979.  The Japanese 
side Specifically aimed at using this relationship to get Honda 
automobiles into the European markets. Subsequently, most Rover 
models became Simply "Europeanized" Hondas, while the British 
company acquired 20 percent capital of Honda U.K., the Japanese 
company's manufacturing subsidiary in Great Britain. The Honda CEO, 
who was informed about the deal only on January 28, expressed his 
disappointment, saying that this alliance "will negate both Honda's 
and Rover's efforts to provide a solid future for Rover as a 
British--and independent--company", according to LE MONDE.  By 
affirming that the deal with BMW should not adversely affect Honda's 
policies in Europe, Mr. Kawamoto, in fact, expressed his 
reservations on the future of his company's collaboration with 
Rover, according to LE MONDE. Honda apparently intends to continue 
its participati0n in the British company unchanged, with the goal of 
establishing a viable foothold in Europe. However, the attitude of 
BMW may well determine either the Success or failure of the Japanese 
plans. (Paris LE MONDE 2 Feb 94) IM 
   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 
   Copies of the annual reports listed below are available upon 
request for a period of six months from the date of this Foreign 
Media Note from  Cathy Grant at (703) 482-4182. 
   *Aerospatiale 1992 annual report, 90 pages, in English. 
   *ASEA Brown Boveri 1992 annual report, 68 pages in English. 
   *Bofors 1992 annual report, 44 pages, in English. 
   *BT 1992/93 annual review, 28 pages, in English. 
   *Bull 1992 annual report, 40 pages, in French. 
   *Carl Zeiss 1991/92 annual report, 87 pages, in English. 
   *CASA 1992 annual report, 51 pages, in English. 
   *CEA 1992 annual report, 72 pages, in French. 
   *Daimler-Benz 1992 annual report, 90 pages, in English. 
   *Dassault Aviation 1992 annual report, 67 pages, in French. 
   *Delft Instruments 1992 annual report, 46 pages, in Dutch. 
   *Dornier (Deutsche Aerospace) 1992 annual report, 59 pages, 
in English. 
   *Ericsson 1992 annual report, 65 pages, in English. 
   *IFREMER 1992 annual report, 80 pages, in English. 
   *Incentive 1992 annual report, 80 pages, in English. 
   *Intertechnique 1992 annual report, 85 pages, in French. 
   *Kockums Group 1992 annual report, 23 pages, in English. 
   *Olivetti Group 1992 consolidated financial Statements, 
110 pages, in English. 
   *Philips 1992 annual report, 76 pages, in English. 
   *Rheinmetall 1992 annual report, 78 pages, in English. 
   *S.A.B.C.A. 1992 annual report, 24 pages, in French and Dutch. 
   *SAT (Societe Anonyme de Telecommuncations) 1992 annual report, 
in French. 
   *Simrad Optronics 1992 annual report, in Norwegian/Engli5h. 
   *SNECMA 1992 annual report, 71 pages, in French. 
   *SNPE 1992 annual report, 49 pages, in French. 
   *Teldix GmbH, 1992 annual report, 11 pages, in English. 
   *Volvo 1992 annual report, 69 pages, in English. 
   (AUTHOR:  COX.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
EUROPE BRANCH AT (703) 733-6337) 
GIG/22MAR/ECONF/TID  cka 23/0141z  mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-53 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23MAR94-CHINA-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Rejects U.S. Stance on Human Rights </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                           In a move having potentially serious implications for the future 
of Sino-U.S. relations, Chinese leaders made it clear during U.S. 
Secretary of State Warren Christopher's 11-14 March visit that 
Beijing will not meet U.S. demands on human rights, even under 
the continuing threat of loss of its most-favored-nation (MFN) 
trading status.  Despite the apparent finality of this rejection 
of linkage between human rights and trade--a position provoked in 
part by internal political pressures--Beijing indicated that it 
is willing to move forward on a number of issues of concern to 
Washington, including the emigration and prison labor questions, 
and hopes to reach an accommodation that will prevent the loss of 
MFN and lead to the continued development of Sino-U.S. ties. 
                     END SUMMARY 

   Using unusually candid language during more than 12 hours of 
meetings with the Secretary, PRC Foreign Minister Qian Qichen, 
Premier Li Peng, and Chinese Communist Party General Secretary 
Jiang Zemin conveyed this apparent hardening of Beijing's 
position on human rights, rejecting U.S. demands that Beijing 
improve its record on human rights as a condition for renewal of 
China's MFN trading status.  According to Xinhua accounts, Qian 
went beyond China's usual criticisms of the U.S. human rights 
position in talks on 12 and 14 March and bluntly told Secretary 
Christopher that U.S. laws and the U.S. President's Executive 
Order, which was issued last year detailing Washington's 
conditions for the renewal of China's MFN status, are "not 
applicable" to China and that Beijing has "no obligation" to 
implement them.  China, he stressed, "can only do what Chinese 
law permits" (Xinhua, 12, 14 March).  Qian went on to declare 
that Washington and Beijing will continue to have ''differences 
over human rights for a "long time to come," warning that it is 
"futile and harmful" to pressure China on this issue.  Turning to 
the question of the renewal of China's MFN status, Qian suggested 
that Beijing is prepared to forego this benefit.  Pointing out 
that China "will not become another United States, the foreign 
minister rhetorically asked how China can be expected to "accept 
the American way of doing things for the sake of trade." 
   Judging by the Xinhua accounts of their meetings with Secretary 
Christopher, Li and Jiang were equally brusque in expressing 
Beijing's shift to a harder line on U.S. human rights demands. 
Like Qian, Li, in his meeting on 12 March, told Secretary 
Christopher that it is "not fair" for the United States to try to 
"impose" its concepts on Beijing and vowed that China will "never 
accept" them.  Pointing to the "historic opportunity" for 
expanding Sino-U.S. economic and trade ties, Li went on to 
reiterate China's willingness to accept the loss of its MFN 
status, saying that while Beijing will incur "losses" if 
Washington revokes its MFN trading status, China "relies mainly 
on its internal market and has a strong capability of self- 
reliance."   Underscoring the determination of China's leaders in 
this regard, Li said that the "existence of disputes" between the 
two countries is a "reality" and warned that these problems will 
only become "more complicated" if Washington attempts to "exert 
pressure unilaterally" (Xinhua, 12 March). 

   For his part, Jiang reiterated these warnings expressed by Qian 
and Li, telling Secretary Christopher, in their meeting on 13 
March, that Sino-U.S. relations can only "move forward" so long 
as both sides view them from the "world perspective" (Xinhua, 
March 13).  Alluding to the detention of Chinese dissidents on 
the eve of the Secretary's visit, widely reported in Western 
media but barely touched on in PRC media, he went on to defend 
China's actions against what he called "a small number of people 
attempting to subvert the Chinese Government," saying that it is 
not a question of "human rights" but a "political and legal" 
issue.  He stressed that the "government of every country" has 
the "responsibility and obligation of upholding law and order and 
maintaining political stability." 

Negative Media Treatment of Visit 

   Reflecting these continuing tensions in Sino-U.S. relations, 
Chinese media portrayed the Secretary's visit in largely negative 
terms, underscoring the differences between the two sides and 
noting the failure of the talks to achieve expected results. 
Xinhua accounts of Secretary Christopher's talks with Chinese 
leaders, for example, used formulations customarily used to 
denote disagreement.  Thus, Qian's talks with the Secretary on 12 
and 14 March were described as "frank (tanshuai) and businesslike 
(renzhen)," while the talks with Jiang on the 13th were portrayed 
as "frank and candid."  Qian also portrayed the visit in a 
negative light at his press conference on 16 March, reportedly 
stating that the visit had not produced as "many results as 
expected" (Xinhua, 16 March).  He went on to take issue with 
Secretary Christopher's claim that the visit had "narrowed 
differences" on human rights issues, pointing out that it "can 
hardly be said" that the two sides have "narrowed their 
differences in their fundamental viewpoints on human rights." 

   The PRC-owned Hong Kong media went even further in portraying the 
visit in a negative light.  A signed commentary carried by the 
PRC-owned Hong Kong based wire service Zhongguo Tongxun She on 14 
March, for example, castigated Washington for not "respecting" 
Chinese law and complained that the United States "automatically" 
views laws in other countries that contradict U.S. laws as "wrong 
or in some way not perfect."  Washington's continued 
"interference" in China's human rights, the commentary concluded, 
only shows that the United States "still has a hegemonic 
mentality."  A 14 March editorial in the PRC-owned Hong Kong 
daily Wen Wei Po took a slightly different tack in criticizing 
the Secretary's visit, portraying China as having soundly 
rebuffed U.S. efforts to "wield the human rights club."   It went 
on to suggest that Secretary Christopher had thrown away a 
golden opportunity to promote" trade and economic relations and 
had left China with "empty hands" because he failed to adhere to 
the strategy of taking the "long view" of Sino-U.S. ties. 

   Suggesting that the hardening of Beijing's line may have as much 
to do with internal events in China over the past several weeks 
as with U.S. policy, China's decision to cast the Secretary's 
visit in a negative light stands in stark contrast to Beijing's 
efforts in recent months to put a positive gloss on Sino-U.S. 
relations.  Beijing was, for example, upbeat in portraying the 
November meeting between U.S. President Bill Clinton and Jiang 
Zemin at the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation Conference, 
calling the meetings "positive and constructive."  Beijing also 
cast Qian's talks in late January with Secretary Christopher in a 
more positive light, even though they dealt with the same topics- 
-bilateral relations, disarmament, nonproliferation, and human 
rights--that were raised during the March visit (Xinhua, 24 
January).  PRC media described the January talks as "positive and 
constructive" and claimed that they had maintained the "momentum 
of improved Sino-U.S. relations." 

Reemergence of Hardline Themes 

   Perhaps reflecting a reassertion of hardline influence in the 
leadership and pressures on reformers to demonstrate their 
resolve to tighten social control as inflation, social 
discontent, and dissident activity have increased in recent 
weeks, less authoritative central media commentary has featured 
highly nationalistic rhetoric that undercuts this positive 
treatment of Sino-U.S. relations before Secretary Christopher's 
visit.  A 21 February article in Beijing's reformist current 
affairs weekly Liaowang, for example, pointed to alleged beatings 
of Chinese citizens in Beijing by foreigners to denigrate those 
who have "doted on foreigners" and do not "dare to stand upright" 
in the face of foreign pressure.  This xenophobic line was also 
evident in a signed article in Renmin Ribao on 2 March which was 
pegged to an incident at the recent Olympics involving an 
altercation between a Chinese speed skater and an American 
competitor.  Underscoring the need to stand up to foreign 
pressure, the article pointedly noted that the Chinese people, 
because of their past experiences, realize that "concessions do 
not win understanding and sympathy but result in endless 
bullying." 

   Signs of this harsh line were also prominent in both domestic 
Chinese media and in the PRC-owned Hong Kong press just prior to 
Secretary Christopher's visit.  A PRC Foreign Ministry spokesman 
on 10 March, for example, in commenting on the defeat of an anti- 
China resolution at the UN Human Rights Commission meeting in 
Geneva, warned that the "days when China was subjected to willful 
bullying and humiliation and outside interference are gone" 
(Xinhua, 10 March).  Similarly Minister of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation Wu Yi was quoted by the PRC-owned Hong Kong 
daily Hsin Wan Pao on the eve of the Secretary's arrival in China 
as saying that Beijing "simply cannot accept the human rights 
question being raised" (10 March).  A 7 March Ta Kung Pao 
editorial which blasted Washington for using "human rights 
diplomacy" to interfere in China's internal affairs was typical 
of the barrage of anti-U.S. rhetoric that appeared in the the 
PRC-owned Hong Kong press on the eve of Secretary Christopher's 
visit predicting that such an approach would be rebuffed. 

Prospects for Bilateral Ties 

   Despite its blunt rejection of U.S. demands on human rights, 
Beijing has not portrayed its position as necessarily leading to 
a further souring of Sino-U.S. ties at this time, but has 
stressed that the future of Sino-U.S. relations depends heavily 
on Washington's decision later this year on renewing China's MFN 
trading status.  Sounding an optimistic note about the future at 
his press conference on 16 March, Qian said that if differences 
between the two sides are approached in a "realistic" manner they 
can be solved.  In addition, he indicated that, although China is 
not "obliged" to fulfill the conditions of the President's 
Executive Order to gain renewal of its MFN status this year, one 
of the order's requirements--the question of Chinese exports of 
goods made with prison labor--"has been settled," and another- 
-the emigration issue--"is not a problem as far as the Chinese 
are concerned." 

   Premier Li Peng was also upbeat in assessing the prospects for 
Sino-U.S. ties in remarks at a reception on 22 March, saying that 
he did not feel "pessimistic" about the prospects for bilateral 
ties (Xinhua, 22 March).  Underscoring Beijing's commitment to 
the continued development of relations, Li went on to stress 
that, while China "will never make a deal by sacrificing 
principles," the PRC will continue to make "great efforts" to 
improve ties. 

   At the same time, although Chinese leaders clearly desire to 
preserve Sino-U.S. ties, they have stressed that the future of 
the relationship will be determined by Washington's decision on 
China's MFN status.  Speaking at the press conference on 16 
March, Qian for example, said that "trade can hardly be carried 
on  if MFN is not renewed (Xinhua, 16 March).  In addition, he 
suggested that the "deterioration" (ehua) in economic relations, 
which would follow the loss of MFN, would also cause a 
"deterioration" (ehua) in political ties.  Four days earlier 
Xinhua had reported that Qian, in his talks with the Secretary on 
the 12th, had predicted that the loss of MFN status would have an 
even stronger, albeit more limited, effect on Sino-U.S. ties, 
"ruining (duan song) the prospects of Sino-U.S. trade relations." 

   Jiang and Li also claimed to see the loss of MFN as having an 
effect on bilateral relations.  For his part, Jiang, according to 
Xinhua, told Secretary Christopher that bilateral ties would meet 
with "difficulties (kunnan) and setbacks (cuozhe)" if Washington 
failed to view Sino-U.S. ties from a "world-wide perspective and 
to "transcend their differences in ideology."  Li went even 
further in outlining the consequences of the loss of MFN status 
in his meeting with Secretary Christopher on the 12th.  Pointedly 
noting that the United States is a "strong power" in areas that 
China has identified as "priorities" for  development--transport, 
energy, and communications--Li said that the United States will 
"lose a vast market" if it fails to handle the MFN issue 
properly. 

Implications 

   Despite its tough position on human rights, Beijing has signaled 
its desire to prevent the human rights issue from scuttling 
relations with the United States.  While asserting that it is 
willing to accept the loss of its MFN status, if need be, Beijing 
appears to have confidence in the likelihood of MFN renewal, 
given the growing economic and trade ties between the two 
countries and Washington's desire to gain Chinese support on the 
North Korean nuclear issue and other international problems. 
Internal political pressures stemming from renewed dissident 
activity, economic dislocations resulting from economic reform, 
and the potential for social unrest against the backdrop of the 
leadership struggle to succeed senior leader Deng Xiaoping make 
it unlikely that Beijing will back away from its uncompromising 
position on human rights. 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEIPLE/DEW 23/1520Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-54 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-038--ALGERIA 
<H3> <TI>      ALGERIA:  Press Abstracts, No. 5 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     issue focuses on recent reporting in the Algiers and Paris 
French-language press on the Armed Islamic Group (GIA). 

   Slain GIA Members Identified 

   The 28 February edition of EL WATAN reported that GIA leader Si 
Ahmed Mourad, known as El-Afghani, and IO GIA members were killed by 
police forces in Bouzareah.  According to EL WATAN, among the GIA 
members killed were Rachid Djabri, Beraf ta Aissa, Daas, and 
Lounici; the others have not yet been identified.  (LIBERTE of 28 
February reported that Aissa's death has not yet been confirmed.) 

   EL WATAN reported the following biographical information on the 
GIA members: 

   Si Ahmed Mourad, a 29-year-old Afghan veteran living in Kouba, 
had been condemned to death in absentia by the Algier's Special 
Court.  Mourad was reportedly responsible for several 
assassinations, as well as numerous crimes attributed to the GIA. 
Mourad, Beraf ta Aissa, Rachid Djabri, and Buezmir Mohamed were said 
to have been behind the October kidnapping of three French Consulate 
employees.  Five GIA members were killed in the operation, although 
Mourad, Aissa, Djabri, and Mohamed escaped.  Mohamed was later 
killed by police.  (According to the 1 March edition of LIBERTE, 
Mourad was also known as "Seif Ellah" ("Sayf Allah").) 

   Berafta Aissa, 35, and Rachid Djabri, 29, were both residents of 
Algiers.  An arrest warrant had been issued for their involvement in 
several murders and other crimes in the Algiers region.  Daas had 
reportedly been GIA head in Bouzareah and was wanted for several 
murders. 

   Reaction to Slaying of GIA Members 

   According to an article in EL WATAN of 28 February, the slaying 
of the GIA members on 27 February was not only "a brilliant success 
for the forces of order but also a significant blow to the 
organization and structure of the terrorist groups."  The deaths of 
El-Afghani and his followers, considered "the bloodiest and the most 
radical of the fundamentalist armed groups within the terrorist 
movement," was viewed as a "decisive turning point" in a three-year 
struggle against "terrorism."  According to EL WATAN, it is 
"reasonable to think that a considerable slakening" in GIA activity 
can be expected, although the paper did not rule out retaliatory 
acts by surviving group members.  El-Afghani's refusal to support 
dialogue between the Islamic Salvation Front (FIS) and the 
government made his wing of the GIA a "serious barrier to dialogue." 
Now, according to EL WATAN, "his disappearance should logically open 
channels for dialogue."  Given the GIA's threats under El-Afghani to 
kill all Islamists who engaged in any kind of negotiations with the 
government, EL WATAN asserted that his death was probably a priority 
and a prerequisite for any negotiations between the FIS and the 
government. 

   An article in the 28 February LIBERTE interpreted the police 
operation as an indication that Algerian President Liamine Zeroual 
is "determined" to combat violence:  "The successful attack 
demonstrated that the authorities not only had the intention of not 
easing up on armed groups, but when necessary also had the means to 
attack 'terrorism'."  According to the article, the incident will 
"have a great effect on government-FIS negotiations," given El- 
Afghani's resistence to dialogue.  However, the LIBERTE article also 
predicted that the government would harden its position that 
eradicating violence is of primary importance.  The article also 
speculates that the government is still in the process of "getting 
back on its feet" after having recently appointed a new president. 

   New GIA Leadership; Organizational Structure 

   Sayah Attia has replaced Mourad Si Ahmed as chief of the GIA, 
according to Paris daily LE FIGARO of 9 March.  Algiers daily EL 
WATAN of 1 March reported that Attia's group is one of three 
operating outside of Algiers under the name of the "Armed Islamic 
Group." 

   Sayah Attia, the son of a "Harki", operates in Medea, Ksar El 
Boukhari, and Tissemsilt, according to EL WATAN.  The newspaper 
calls him a "bloodthirsty" individual who prefers hand-to-hand 
fighting.  He reportedly leads a "commando" of armed criminals, 
which is said to have committed over 200 "savage" terrorist acts. 
Attia is reportedly responsible for 132 assassinations, and 283 acts 
of aggression and vandalism.  Security services have identified him 
as the ringleader in the killing of 12 Croats in December, as well 
as an attack on an official motorcade in Tissemsilt that killed 10 
and a 1993 attack on the Boughezoul military barracks.  ALGER 
REPUBLICAIN of 8 March reported that Attia returned to Afghanistan 
in 1989 with Saudi assistance.  After staying in Afghanistan three 
years, he re-entered Algeria clandestinely in November 1992.  Attia 
is the father of six children, and recently took a 14-year-old as 
his second wife. 

   Khaled Sehili heads the second "Armed Islamic Group" which 
operates in Blida, El-Affroun, Chrea, and Boufarik, according to EL 
WATAN.  Sehili is reportedly responsible for the slaying of at least 
SO police officers and nearly 150 acts of sabotage.  He is also 
reportedly responsible for an ambush which killed about 12 military 
personnel last September in Chrea. 

   Kada Benchiha, also the son of a "Harki", heads the third "Armed 
Islamic Group" which operates in Sidi Bel-Abbes.  The group is 
composed of about 20 "elements" who reportedly easily slip through 
police blockades and escape from police sweeps in the region. 
Benchiha is reportedly responsible for the assassination of two 
French surveyors last September and for a fire at ENIE in Sidi Bel- 
Abbes last August. 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/23 Mar/POLCHF/TOTF/NEASA Division/DEW 23/1932Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-55 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U. S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23MAR94-SLOVAKIA 
<H3> <TI>      Meciar's Ouster Sets Stage for Early Elections </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     ouster of Prime Minister Vladimir Meciar by five diverse 
opposition parties has led to the establishment of an interim 
government with no program beyond acting as a caretaker 
government until early parliamentary elections, scheduled for 31 
September and 1 October.  Meciar, whose ouster was preceded by a 
series of defections from his Movement for a Democratic Slovakia 
(HZDS) and its partner, the Slovak National Party (SNS), has 
begun his election campaign by portraying himself as the main 
protector of the country's independence and deriding his 
opponents in the new government as traitors to Slovakia. 
   Suggesting that substantive changes prior to the fall elections 
are likely to be minimal, members of the new cabinet have 
indicated that the heterogenous coalition's main goal is simply 
to keep Meciar out of office and have emphasized the temporary 
nature of the governing coalition.  Introducing his cabinet 
members to parliament, new Prime Minister Jozef Moravcik, a 
former foreign minister and erstwhile Meciar ally, admitted that 
not all of the government's objectives "can be fulfilled in the 
time available" and that its main goal is "to get Slovakia to 
early elections" (Bratislava Radio, 17 March).  Moravcik also 
said the formation of the new government was part of an effort to 
"unite very divergent and disunited entities" in order to "lay 
the foundations for a new political culture" (Narodna Obroda, 16 
March).  More pointedly, the government, in its "statement of 
intent," described itself as a coalition of "people with 
different political opinions" united by the "need to overcome the 
authoritarian way of ruling" practiced by the Meciar government 
and to "create conditions for respect, tolerance, and cooperation 
among citizens" (Bratislava TV, 16 March). 

   At the same time, the coalition parties appear to be coalescing 
in their efforts to prevent Meciar from making yet another 
comeback, while calling for a preelection truce among themselves. 
Peter Weiss, the leader of the former communist Party of the 
Democratic Left (SDL), said that in order to defeat Meciar, the 
coalition must "convince the electorate" that it is possible to 
govern "by means of cooperation and reasonable compromises" (CTK, 
22 March).  Likewise, Christian Democratic Party (KDH) leader Jan 
Carnogursky said that despite "different views within the 
government" all of the coalition parties have a "joint objective" 
and "know what is at stake" (Vienna Kurier, 16 March). 
   It is far from certain that the coalition parties can be held 
together until the elections solely by their common perception of 
the dangers of Meciar's return to power.  In the past, leaders of 
the coalition parties frequently clashed over programatic and 
personal differences.  For example, during Carnogursky's tenure 
as Slovak prime minister in 1991, Weiss accused him of being 
"blind to problems, deaf to criticism, and asocial when it comes 
to people"  (Zemedelski Noviny, 19 December 1991).  In addition, 
three current ministers -- including the prime minister, a deputy 
prime minister, and the finance minister -- were leading HZDS 
members in March 1992, when the HZDS accused Carnogursky's 
brother of collaboration with the former communist secret police 
(Mlada Fronta Dnes, 26 March). 

   In ousting Meciar now, the opposition parties--galvanized by 
President Michal Kovac's parliamentary speech accusing Meciar of 
corruption (Bratislava Radio, 9 March)--appeared to be reacting 
to reports that Meciar was rapidly selling off state enterprises 
to political cronies  (Narodna Obroda, 15 March).  After Kovac's 
speech, the former communist Party of the Democratic Left (SDL) 
agreed to join the Christian Democratic Movement (KDH), along 
with three new parties  consisting of former HZDS and SNS members 
voted to dismiss Meciar and to form a new governing coalition. 
The coalition agreed to give the SDL seven cabinet seats, the KDH 
six seats, and the "Center Bloc" of former "Meciarites" five 
seats, including the prime ministership.  Calling for an 
investigation into the rapid sell-off of state firms during 
Meciar's last weeks in office, new Privatization Minister Milan 
Janicina called the privatization spree a "form of political 
corruption," comparing it to "when William the Conqueror invaded 
Britain and handed out property to his beloved Normans" 
(Bratislava Radio, 17 March).  Likewise, Finance Minister Rudolf 
Filkus, a founding member of the HZDS who was expelled from the 
party in September 1993, announced that one of the government's 
first acts will be to "depoliticize the privatization process," 
which he contended had "become a tool for the political 
concentration of power" under Meciar (CTK, 16 March). 
   Meciar's Strategy 
   Using what is likely to be the main theme of his election 
campaign, Meciar reacted to his ouster by portraying himself as 
indispensable for Slovak independence.  In a parliamentary speech 
just prior to the no-confidence vote, Meciar asserted that by 
leading the country to independence he has "managed to achieve 
what no Slovak has succeeded in achieving in several decades or 
even centuries" (Bratislava Radio, 11 March).  Meciar also 
contended that as prime minister he frequently had to rectify 
foreign policy mistakes made by President Kovac, such as 
attempting to sell arms to Croatia, almost provoking an 
"international crisis" with China by proposing the recognition of 
Taiwan, and "wasting an opportunity" to improve relations with 
the United States during President Clinton's January visit to 
Prague.  The day before his ouster, Meciar also claimed that by 
confronting the chief of the Czechoslovak Army's General Staff in 
late 1992, he and Czech Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus had prevented 
a possible "attack against Slovakia" by the Army (CTK, 11 March). 

   In addition, Meciar and the pro-Meciar daily Republika have also 
suggested that the new government represents a threat to Slovak 
sovereignty.  After his ouster, Meciar said that the new 
government and the puppet government installed by Nazi Germany in 
1939 "might be similar" (Bratislava Radio, 14 March).  Republika 
chief editor Jan Smolec, a Meciar stalwart, called the prime 
minister's ouster a "Czechoslovakist, communist, and Hungarian 
conspiracy" (Republika, 12 March)--a reference to the KDH's past 
opposition to the split of Czechoslovakia, the presence of the 
SDL in the coalition, and the tacit support of the Hungarian 
minority deputies for the new coalition.  Emphasizing the 
communist past of Moravcik and the SDL, a front-page article in 
Republika on 16 March accused the new prime minister of grabbing 
the "post that he was modestly longing for around the Leninist 
campfire" as a member of the communist "Leninist Spark" 
organization in 1989, compared the formation of the new cabinet 
to the communist takeover of Czechoslovakia in 1948, and charged 
that SDL leader Peter Weiss "hides badly his longing for the 
renewal of communist power." 

Outlook 
   While the opposition parties may have managed to thwart Meciar's 
attempts to consolidate his power in newly-privatized firms, the 
new coalition's gains will be short-lived if the HZDS, which 
continues to top public opinion polls (CTK, 22 March), improves 
on its June 1992 performance.  Freed from the burdens of 
governing, Meciar may have more success campaigning as an 
opposition figure rather than as a defender of the country's 
flagging economy, and his bloc of 65 deputies--56 HZDS deputies 
and nine SNS seats--in the 150-member parliament may prevent 
passage of any substantial reform legislation before the 
elections.  Operating against Meciar, however, is the possibility 
of further defections from his party, the apparent decline in 
popularity of the SNS, and the limited possibility of the HZDS 
forming a postelection coalition with the parties that 
participated in his ouster.  Although the HZDS will likely end up 
with a larger share of seats than it currently holds, having 
suffered the defection of 18 of its deputies in the last year, if 
Meciar is to regain and maintain the prime ministership, the HZDS 
will have to capture a solid majority of the seats in parliament- 
-something it did not achieve in June 1992 when it fell one 
deputy shy of a parliamentary majority.  If the HZDS again falls 
short, the other parties may find themselves in an awkward 
marriage of convenience, united only over the danger posed by 
Meciar, while he attacks them from his opposition seat in 
parliament. 
   (AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, ELAG, (703) 733-6120) 
ELAG/GILISON/DEW 23/2005Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-56 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23MAR94-HUNGARY 
<H3> <TI>      Csurka-Engineered Radio Dismissals Put MDF on Defensive </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     recent dismissal of 129 employees from the state-controlled 
radio network appears to have been engineered not by the 
government but by the extreme right, which was expelled from the 
governing Hungarian Democratic Forum (MDF) last June. 
Nevertheless, the government's apparent acquiescence to the 
dismissals makes it vulnerable to charges that it shares 
responsibility.  While the dismissals may well have a chilling 
effect on press freedom, fears that they signal the return of 
centrally controlled media in Hungary appear to be exaggerated. 

   The announcement by government-appointed acting radio president 
Laszlo Csucs on 4 March that he was dismissing 129 employees- 
-including many of the radio's most prominent reporters--provoked 
widespread outrage among journalists and the parliamentary 
opposition, and dismay even among many in the MDF's own ranks. 
In a stormy session of parliament, Ivan Peto, the chairman of the 
Alliance of Free Democrats (SZDSZ)--the largest opposition party 
in parliament--denounced the dismissals as politically motivated 
"cleansing" that "surpasses . . . even the dismissals following 
the 1956 uprising."  The leader of the Hungarian Socialist Party 
(MSZP), Zoltan Gal, accused the government of wanting to 
transform the public service media into its own "mouthpiece," 
while a spokesman of the Federation of Young Democrats (Fidesz)- 
-the opposition party that has been most amenable to cooperation 
with the MDF--declared that the move "annulled the hope of a 
clean election campaign" and was clearly an attempt "to divert 
the public's attention" from the "inglorious details" of the 
government's record (MTI, 7 March).  At a protest outside the 
radio building organized by the Independent Union of Radio 
Broadcasters, which was attended by "thousands," speakers 
assailed the move as an attack on press freedom and asserted that 
the dismissed "have the sympathy of many colleagues" remaining at 
the radio (MTI, 10 March). 

   Government Ambivalence 

   The government's reaction to the development appeared equivocal. 
On the one hand, Prime Minister Peter Boross said that charges of 
government complicity in the affair were "ungrounded and false" 
(MTI, 7 March), and Defense Minister and MDF Chairman Lajos Fur 
denied "most firmly" that the government was behind it (Magyar 
Hirlap, 14 March).  On the other hand, government officials 
ignored demands that Csucs be replaced, and while they bemoaned 
the likelihood that the dismissals would hurt the government 
parties in the coming elections, they did not condemn the move 
without qualification.  Tamas Katona, political state secretary 
in the prime minister's office and a key player in past media 
negotiations, said the dismissals were the "right step at the 
wrong time" (Nepszabadsag, 8 March).  Similarly, while expressing 
dismay at the impact on his party, MDF parliamentary group leader 
Ferenc Kulin said that the dismissals may have been justified by 
"ethical" considerations and overstaffing (Kossuth radio, 4 
March).  He argued that the government has "no right" to 
investigate the dismissals because the radio network is an 
independent entity (Kossuth radio, 4 March), even though Csucs's 
appointment in 1992 as radio vice president had been widely 
viewed as a political move and was made in the face of opposition 
objections.  Kulin also tried to shift blame to the opposition, 
saying the media situation would not have become so "hopeless" if 
the opposition had not, in his view, obstructed government 
efforts to pass a law regulating the media (MTI, 7 March). 

   Despite the government's reluctance to condemn the dismissals 
unequivocally--and thus by implication criticize its appointee, 
Csucs--it appears that Csucs's move overstepped the tolerance of 
a significant number of government supporters: 

-- Even though the directors of Duna Television are widely 
considered to be government sympathizers--the opposition has 
charged that the board of trustees of the foundation running Duna 
"consists exclusively of the ruling party's politicians" (Magyar 
Hirlap, 7 April 1993)--its 15 March news program on speeches 
given at commemorations of Hungary's national holiday focused on 
those speakers who were clearly critical of the dismissals.  The 
program highlighted clips from the speeches of President Arpad 
Goncz and Budapest Mayor Gabor Demszky--both SZDSZ politicians- 
-who issued strong warnings on the threats to freedom of the 
press.  Moreover, the announcer drew attention to the fact that 
the main television channels' news program failed to report on 
Demszky's speech.  Duna Television is the specialized satellite 
channel that in effect is Budapest's third source of television 
news, even though it was set up to reach minority Hungarians in 
surrounding countries. 

-- Sandor Csoori, a prominent intellectual who is known to be 
close to the government, refused to let his recorded interview be 
broadcast on the 168 Hours radio program after he learned that 
the program's editor --well-known radio personality Akos Mester- 
-had been dismissed.  Because of Csoori's refusal and because 
several remaining journalists refused to work on the program out 
of sympathy with Mester, the 5 March program had to be cancelled 
(Nepszabadsag, 7 March). 

-- The pro-government dailies showed signs of sympathy for the 
purged radio journalists.  On 5 March Uj Magyarorszag featured an 
interview in which Mester's replacement as 168 Hours editor 
praised Mester as "an accomplished and excellent" journalist. 
Moreover, a Pesti Hirlap journalist showed considerable hostility 
to Csucs in an interview published in the 5-6 March issue, 
expressing his opinion that some of the dismissed were "star 
reporters who are highly regarded professionals with extensive 
experience." 

Csurka's Role 

   The widespread dismay in government circles over the dismissals 
suggests that despite the government's frequent complaints that 
an anti-government bias dominates the media, it was not the 
government but right wing extremist Istvan Csurka who engineered 
the move.  Although the dismissals may have been abetted in some 
government quarters--as pointed out in the press, someone in the 
government had authorized severance pay for the ousted employees, 
without which they could not have been fired (Nepszabadsag, 5 
March)--it is Csurka who has led the demands for political 
changes in the electronic media and who has been the strongest 
advocate of the current acting presidents of radio and 
television, who both seem to be his protegees.  Despite, or 
perhaps because of, opposition demands, the government failed to 
remove these Csurka supporters from the electronic media even 
after Csurka was expelled from the MDF last June, leaving them in 
a position to act on Csurka's conviction that holdovers from the 
communist era should be forced out.  Csurka has made this demand 
even though he has apparently been more than tolerant of other 
former Communist journalists who have refrained from criticizing 
him and the extreme right.  Thus, Csurka's candidate for 
television president was Alajos Chrudinak, a prominent broadcast 
journalist of the Kadar era, while Mester's replacement at 168 
Hours had served at the communist radio since 1971 (Uj 
Magyarorszag, 5 March). 

   There are ample indications that Csucs is Csurka's man and 
follows a Csurka-approved agenda.  Csurka's weekly, Magyar Forum, 
has lauded Csucs numerous times, including on 28 October when it 
praised him for taking the "brave" step of terminating an 
alternative news program, saying it had been a "Communist-liberal 
...agit prop" operation that enabled the "bolsheviks" to save 
themselves.  Csurka's party supports Csucs's candidacy for 
parliament (Nepszabadsag, 5 March), and Csurka appears to be the 
only prominent politician who unequivocally praised Csucs's 
recent move, telling parliament that "the good of the nation can 
be served by politically motivated dismissals . . . those 
dismissed told many lies and did damage to the country" (Kossuth 
radio, 7 March).  Moreover, although ousted broadcaster Akos 
Mester has often been critical of the government, he indicated 
that it was not the government that was behind the dismissals, 
declaring that the radio was taken over "not by the right, but 
the far right" (Nepszabadsag, 7 March).  Before the dismissals, 
Mester had made clear that by the far right he meant Csurka, 
indicating in the March issue of the monthly Kritika that Csurka 
was able to continue dominating the radio through Csucs even 
after his expulsion from the MDF.  The government had a "very 
hard time realizing" that the situation endangered its own 
interests, said Mester, adding, "By the time they wake up, it 
will be too late." 

Radio Coverage 

Despite charges that the dismissals were an attempt to restrict 
opposition access to the public as the elections approach, 
Hungarian radio has continued to broadcast opposition opinions. 
Possibly in response to pressure behind the scenes from the 
government to counter the negative publicity surrounding the 
dismissals, the radio has appeared eager to demonstrate that it 
remains an unbiased medium. 

-- The radio gave full coverage to the parliamentary debate on 
the crisis over the firings, giving the opposition's views 
extensive coverage.  In fact, the broadcast gave the last word to 
opposition leader Peto, who countered Boross's claim that the 
"international reaction to the affair is one-sidedly critical of 
the country" with the charge that "it is the affair itself that 
is denigrating the country" (Kossuth radio, 7 March). 

-- The radio's reporting on the Democratic Charter's 
demonstration for press freedom on 14 March--far from aligning 
itself with its director, Csucs--seemed to go beyond objective 
reporting to adopt a sympathetic tone toward the demonstrators, 
saying that "at least 15-20,000 people with torches demanded a 
free press and free radio," that "many" people wore blue ribbons 
to show solidarity with the "sacked journalists," and that, 
citing the "danger" to press freedom, the demonstrators  gathered 
at monuments that symbolize both "grief" and "eternal renewal." 

-- The radio has also broadcast some opposition interviews on 
other subjects, including a long, hard-hitting interview on 9 
March with SZDSZ politician Imre Mecs, who harshly criticized a 
recently passed law on communist-era informers, accusing the 
government of "hypocrisy" and "morally very objectionable 
behavior" and alluding--although without mentioning his name--to 
Csurka's confession of his own informer past. 

Implications 

Even if, as seems likely, the government did not approve the 
ousters, it is likely to be the major loser in the affair, since 
it is vulnerable to charges that it shares responsibility for the 
media crisis due to its reluctance to break completely with 
Csurka and his camp.  Despite numerous indications that the split 
between Csurka and the government mainstream is becoming ever 
wider--even Csurka's longtime friend, Defense Minister Fur, has 
declared that he has no contact with Csurka and his party because 
he finds their political behavior "shocking" (Magyar Hirlap, 14 
March)--the government will probably have to pay a price for not 
moving forcefully to remove all traces of its past association 
with Csurka. 

   At the same time, despite the assault on the national radio, 
there appears to be little danger that Hungarian voters will be 
denied ample access to uncensored information as Hungary 
approaches the election.  There is no sign that the Hungarian 
print media have been intimidated into moderating their 
overwhelmingly critical attitude toward the government. 
According to poll data, 61 percent of adult Hungarians read at 
least one newspaper a day, and the readership of the papers which 
sympathize with the opposition overwhelmingly outnumbers the 
readership of the progovernment papers, with the socialist daily 
Nepszabadsag alone having over a million readers and the pro- 
government paper Uj Magyarorszag trailing at the end of the 
readership list (Heti Vilaggazdasag, 11 July 1992).  Moreover, 
the obvious unease of many government politicians with the radio 
dismissals indicates that they too recognize the importance of 
media independence and will try to limit further blatant attacks 
on the electronic media. 

(AUTHOR.  BARCZAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST/ELAG, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/DEW 23/2202Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-57 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23MAR94-GERMANY-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Germany Positive But Cautious on Jobs Conference </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                     Reflecting Bonn's preference for structural reforms and 
opposition to economic stimulus measures, the German 
participants' positive evaluation of the 14-15 March G-7 jobs 
conference in Detroit focused on the conference proposals for 
education and labor market reforms but rejected U.S. suggestions 
that Germany stimulate domestic growth by reducing taxes and 
lowering interest rates.  German officials were also cool to U.S. 
proposals for setting up new institutions to deal with the issues 
of unemployment, technology policy, and education, preferring 
instead to work through the existing OECD framework or through 
bilateral ties. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Germany's finance, economic, and labor ministers, all of whom 
participated in the jobs conference, seemed to devote virtually 
all their attention to the conference recommendations to promote 
economic growth through international trade, technological 
innovation and private enterprise and to achieve structural 
reforms through education, greater flexibility of the labor 
force, lower costs, and deregulation.  Anticipating U.S. efforts 
to make the Bundesbank's interest rate policy a central issue, 
Bonn officials sought even before the conference to focus 
attention on structural issues and to avoid discussion of 
stimulus measures (Die Welt 14 March).  They also rejected U.S. 
proposals for setting up new groups to study technology policy 
and employment and for creating a new institution to exchange 
ideas about education, suggesting instead that existing 
institutions and bilateral relations were better suited for 
dealing with these issues (Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March). 
   No New Stimulus Measures 
   Both Finance Minister Theo Waigel and Economics Minister Guenter 
Rexrodt rejected the U.S. call for Germany to reduce its taxes 
and interest rates to stimulate domestic growth.  Citing 
Germany's budget deficit, Waigel repeated Bonn's position that 
Germany's unemployment is a structural problem and that a 
cyclical recovery will not automatically solve the problem 
(Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March).  According to Rexrodt, since 
new programs to "stimulate the economy" do not offer a way out of 
the German labor market crisis, efforts must focus on "structural 
changes" (DPA, 14 March). 
   Structural Measures, Domestic Solutions 
   German conference participants stressed the need to reform 
Germany's economic structures and, while welcoming cooperation on 
common concerns, rejected proposals to create additional G-7 
institutions: 
   --Indicating that he saw the jobs conference largely as a 
confirmation of the German government's plans for improving 
Germany's competitiveness, Rexrodt said he would take away from 
the conference ideas on "labor market flexibility, trade 
liberalization, deregulation," and lower wage costs, and said 
Germany must "learn from U.S. technological and innovation 
successes."  He did not favor U.S. proposals for new study groups 
for technology policy and employment statistics, however, saying 
that the OECD framework already dealt with such issues, and he 
opposed creating a new institution for exchanges on educational 
issues, saying he preferred bilateral arrangements (Frankfurter 
Allgemeine, 15 March). 
   --Similarly, Waigel stated that there is no "miracle cure " -- 
each 
country "must find its own solutions" and, for Germany, 
"structural reforms" will make its labor markets "better equipped 
for the challenges of the future" (Handelsblatt, 17 March). 
   --Bluem, on the other hand, appeared to see more room for 
international cooperation, saying that the jobs conference had 
"clearly improved conditions for harmonizing labor market 
initiatives."  Because of current practices of multinational 
corporations, he said, job developments can "no longer be an 
exclusively national task" (Sueddeutsche Zeitung 17 March).  He 
cautioned against an "uncritical acceptance" of the U.S. model, 
however, saying that the drastic cost reductions have not led to 
the expected rises in profits (Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March). 
   Press Reaction 
   Press reaction echoed the largely positive official reaction, 
with several papers welcoming President Clinton's initiative, the 
G-7's focus on people's concerns rather than on macroeconomic 
issues, and the opportunity for international cooperation on 
employment issues.  Most media supported the Government's stance 
against stimulative measures: 
   --Frankfurter Allgemeine's Washington correspondent Carola Kaps 
on 16 March called it "remarkable" that a G-7 conference had 
focused not on "interest rates and exchange rates" but on the 
"well-being of the average citizen."  She defended Germany's 
stance against stimulus measures, however, saying that the "nasty 
and trite" controversy over German interest rates shows that the 
"special German situation" is still being largely "ignored." 
Nevertheless, she said hopefully that the U.S. administration now 
"seems to understand" that Germany's current conditions "do not 
permit an additional stimulation" of demand. 
   --The leading business daily Handelsblatt of 17 March, citing 
Clinton's observation that job losses in one country lead to 
higher unemployment in neighboring and partner countries, said 
that "no country" can fight unemployment with domestic means 
alone in a world economy that is increasingly interdependent. 
   --Sueddeutsche Zeitung's chief editor Josef Jof fe also saw 
increased international cooperation resulting from the jobs 
conference, saying that such issues as "unemployment, health 
insurance, immigration" have become "international politics" and 
politicians now realize that domestic policy problems "cannot be 
solved exclusively" by a single country.  He praised President 
Clinton's "initiative" for highlighting the "necessary shift in 
awareness" (16 March). 
   --The left-of-center Frankfurter Rundschau presented one of the 
few negative reactions to the conference outcome, regretting the 
conference's failure to adopt new stimulus measures.  "Any plans 
President Clinton may have had" for preparing a plan for 
coordination at the Naples G-7 Summit, it said, were "destroyed" 
with Rexrodt's "unmistakable rejection" of "any type of Keynesian 
economic program" (16 March). 
   (AUTHOR: SHAVER. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, ELAG, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/SM 24/0109Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-58 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-06-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 23 MARCH 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Retention of Large Retail 
Store Law Criticized; FEATURE:  Food Agency Under Severe Criticism 
Over Rice Panic; IBJ Capital Investment Survey Reveals 6.1 Percent 
Decline 

   Financial Issues - Chinese Provinces Urge Japanese Banks To Set 
Up Branches; China To Authorize Japanese Banks To Use Yuan; MOF Sale 
of 90 Tons of Gold Likely To Affect International Market; BOT 
Concludes Investment Agreement With Colombia 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - MALAYSIA:  Daiken, Itochu To Set 
Up Company To Manufacture Fiberboard; Mitsubishi Materials 
Establishes Ceramic Parts Subsidiary; Ichikoh Industries Expanding 
Production Operations 

   NORTH KOREA:  Japanese Hijacker Heads Firm Promoting Trade With 
Japan 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE: MT Companies Strengthening 
International Ties; Fanuc Pulls Robot-Programming Software Off the 
Market; Firm Develops New Machine To Process Aircraft Engine Parts 

   Petroleum/Energy - Firms To Participate in Indonesian Coal Mining 
Project 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC, Samsung To 
Cooperate in 256M DRAM Research; Canon, NAL To Research Parallel 
Processing Technologies; JEOL Sets Up Semiconductor Equipment Sales 
Office in South Korea 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  MPT-NTT Maneuvering on 
Next-Generation Communications; Communications Companies Begin 
Testing 'Personal Handy Phones 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Guangzhou's 1993 Economic Growth 
Maintains Double-Digit Increase; Outlook for Auto Industry in 1994; 
Shenzhen SEZ Plans To Establish Auto Industry; Guizhou Defense 
Enterprises Support Rural Enterprises; Guangzhou Per Capita GDP 
Highest in PRC; Guangxi Regional Airline Set for 28 March Launch 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - FEATURE:  Shanghai's Successes, 
Efforts in Attracting Foreign Investments; Anhui Increases Foreign 
Investment, Enterprises in 1993; Shenzhen Foreign Trade Authority 
Announces New Tilt in Nine Policies; PRC-Funded Firms Boost Booming 
Hong Kong Real Estate Market; Hong Kong Investment Funds Created for 
PRC Investment; Hong Kong Dominates Foreign Investment in Beijing; 
Wholesale Grain, Oil Markets Show Rapid Development; Golden 
Resources Sets Up Rice Processing Venture in Vietnam; Guangdong 
Governor Wants More Foreign Banks, Cites Funds Shortage; South 
African Bank Opens Representative Office in Beijing; Shandong 
Reports Use of Foreign Government Loans; Danish Company Plans 
Investment in Tianjin Development Zone; Tianjin Plans To Build Four 
Projects With Singapore; Taiwan Shipping Giant To Invest in Mainland 
Facilities; Taiwan Company Invests in Fujian, Shanghai; Guangxi's 
Beihai City To Set Up Industrial City With Singapore Help; Shenzhen 
Reaches Agreement With South Korean Firm on Oil Refinery; 
Heilongjiang Imports Telephone Switchboards From Australia; 
Heilongjiang Uses German Loan To Upgrade Switchboards; Tianjin Signs 
First Joint-Venture Agreement With Poland; Hutchison To Build 12- 
Billion-Yuan Power Plant in Shenzhen; Fujian's Fuzhou City Uses 
Foreign Funds For Agricultural Development 

   Taiwan:  Taiwan's 1993 Mainland Investment Trend Outlined; 
Companies Planning To Invest in Mainland's Hainan Province; Minister 
of Economic Affairs Warns Taipei To Avoid Super 301; Plans To Export 
Arms, Planes, Missiles; Exports to United States Reverse Course, 
Increase in Dec 93, Jan 94; Competitive Edge in U.S., Japan 
Deteriorates; National Council Views Impact of Entry Into GATT on 
Local Industries; Profit Rate of Manufacturing Sector Declines 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  DPRK's Interest in 'Chinese-Style 
Economic Reforms' Noted; Efforts Marking Beginning of 'Adjustment 
Period' Reported 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Trade Ministry Announces New China 
Policy; FEATURE:  ROK Announces Decision on Mid-Size Aircraft; 
FEATURE:  South Korea Building Two New Research Institutes; ROK 
Advertises for Expatriate, Foreign Scientists; Steel Firm Imports 
North Korean Scrap Iron; Car Makers Consider New Production Method 
To Raise Productivity; China's Currency, Tax Reforms To Be 'Direct 
Blow' to ROK Exports; South Korea To Set Up 'KORNET'--Korea 
Internet; Government To Regulate Transport of Industrial Waste; 
Hyundai Motors To Market 'Fully Indigenous' Automobile; Sunkyong 
Industries Develops Biodegradable Film; Yukong Enters Power 
Generation, Liquefied Gas Business; Real Estate Company Becomes 
First Private Owner of Public Firm; Goldstar Signs Multimedia Deal 
With U.S. Company; Daewoo Electronics To Export Computer Monitors to 
U.S. Firm; Koryo Zinc To Develop Lead, Zinc Mines in Canada; Daewoo 
Motors Enters Partnership With Japan's Honda; Sambo To Export 
Personal Computers to Japan; Goldstar To Build Television Plant in 
Vietnam; Daewoo To Export Forklifts to United States; Korea Nambang 
Development To Advance Into PRC, Indonesia; Daewoo To Build Joint 
Venture Auto Plant in PRC; Il-yang, Chinese Firm To Build 
Pharmaceutical Factory in Jiangsu; Inchon Steel Receives Order From 
Indonesia; Dongbu Steel To Transfer Silicon Technology to German 
Firm; Daewoo Car Audio Plant in Tianjin Begins Operations 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA - Paiton Electric Power Agreement 
Signed; Increased Competition Expected in LNG Market; Batam Island 
To Be 'Center' for Taiwanese Investments; P.T. Pindad To Shift 
Production, Marketing Focus; State-Owned Gas Company To Receive 
$424-Million Loan; Increase in Trade With Taiwan Expected 

   LAOS: French Firm To Build Hydropower Station 

   MALAYSIA:  Mahathir Outlines Strategy for Space Industry; Telekom 
Malaysia To Provide Services in India 

   PHILIPPINES:  FEATURE:  Davao Focusing on Economic Growth; 
Consortium To Undertake Water Project; Increase in Money Supply 
Noted; Decrease in Foreign Investment Reported 
   SINGAPORE:  OCBC Launches Fund for Investment in China; Company 
To Build Oil Terminal in Nigeria 

   THAILAND:  Norwegian Company To Invest in Gas Venture 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-06) 

   VIETNAM:  Joint Venture With Daewoo To Assemble Trucks, Buses, 
Vans; Malaysian Company To Build Industrial Compound in Dong Nai; 
Interior Ministry Firm Forms Venture With Hong Kong Firm; Venture 
With Russian Company To Produce Tractor Parts; Cardphone Company 
Inaugurates Center in Ho Chi Minh City; Industrial Output Increases 
to $1.9 Billion in 1993; Electricity Output Increases Reported; 
Export, Import Figures for 1993 Reported; Haiphong Tops Hanoi, Ho 
Chi Minh City in Industrial Growth; GDP Figures for 1993 Reported; 
Korean Oil Company Reports Offshore Discovery; Hanoi Airport 
Expressway Opens; Norwegian Company Discovers Natural Gas Offshore 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Retention of Large Retail 
Store Law Criticized -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of International 
Trade and Industry (MITI) will revise the Large Retail Store Law to 
ease some restrictions while maintaining the basic framework of the 
law, according to press reports.  Several articles note that the law 
has survived because the U.S. Government did not pressure Japan to 
abolish it.  The positions of small retailers, who initially 
supported the law, and the large supermarket chains, which opposed 
it, now have been reversed. 

   Writing in the 22 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), 
editorial staff writer Sumikazu Asakawa questions the Hosokawa 
Government's determination to promote deregulation and criticizes 
the recent draft revision of the Large Retail Store Law for "not 
even returning to the level of the original law" enacted in 1974. 
According to Asakawa, large retail stores with a floor space of up 
to 1,000 square meters--double the provisions of the current law- 
-will be able to open without restrictions under the revised law. 
But this change "is still far from deregulation," he notes, since 
stores with a floor space of up to 1,500 square meters were "free of 
restriction" under the original 1974 law.  The law was 
"strengthened" in the following 10 years. 

   Asakawa argues that the Hosokawa Government's retail store 
policies ought to respond to consumer needs by promoting the 
expansion of large discount stores, such as the American retailing 
chain "Toys R Us."  He notes that discount stores have increased 
their annual sales by almost 10 percent and thus have contributed to 
increasing personal consumption.  In contrast, overall sales by all 
other retail stores, including department stores and large 
supermarkets, have dropped.  While discount stores with a floor 
space of about 1,000 square meters specializing in men's clothing 
and liquor are increasing, Asakawa writes, there is an increasing 
need for factory outlet stores and home improvement centers that 
require more than 3,000 square meters of floor space.  He concludes 
that the Large Retail Store Law "continues to block the 
introduction" of these types of large stores, which consumers want. 

   Writing in the 6 March NIKKEI, Sueaki Takaoka, chairman of Seiyu, 
a large supermarket chain, notes that in addition to the Large 
Retail Store Law, there are many local ordinances that have been 
"added on top of the law" by local governments to further strengthen 
restrictions.  Takaoka notes that MITI began guiding local 
governments to repeal some local rules in 1992, when the revised 
store law was enacted.  But he states that without a national law, 
which generally takes precedence over local ordinances, large stores 
are concerned about how local ordinances will be enforced. 

   At MITI's direction, a joint commission of the Industrial 
Structure Council's Distribution Subcommittee and the Distribution 
Subcommittee of the Small and Medium Enterprise Policymaking Council 
has submitted a report recommending easing some restrictions while 
maintaining the framework" of the Large Retail Store Law, according 
to the 1 February NIKKEI.  A bill revising the law, based on this 
recommendation, will be submitted to the Diet in March, and the 
revision is expected to take effect in April 1994. 

   Law Has Survived Because No Foreign Pressure Exerted - In an 
article in the 6 March NIKKEI, Keio University Professor Atsushi 
Kusano observes that the Large Retail Store Law has survived 
"because of the lack of foreign pressure."  Kusano states that 
should U.S. pressure be stepped up," as was the case in the 
previous revision of the law following the 1990 Structural 
Impediments Initiative (SII) talks, the joint commission would have 
come to a "considerably different" conclusion.  He points out that 
the 1992 revision of the law was possible because of the SII talks, 
in which the Japanese Government accepted the U.S. demand to revise 
the law, and therefore the joint commission "automatically approved" 
the revision.  Thus, Kusano argues, the law could possibly be 
abolished "if the U.S. Government demands it." 

   Kusano's view is shared by NIKKEI editorial staff writer Asakawa 
in his 22 February NIKKEI article.  He notes that without foreign 
pressure, Japanese discount stores will continue to follow MITI, 
which wants to avoid any "disturbance" or change in the industry. 

   Seiyu Chairman Takaoka, who was an industry representative on the 
50-member joint commission, in his 6 March NIKKEI article notes that 
if a vote had been taken, "the majority of joint commission members 
would have agreed to abolish the law," since the commission included 
journalists, consumer group representatives, and labor union 
officials, all of whom were in favor of abolition.  However, Takaoka 
notes, since the joint commission must reach a unanimous consensus- 
-giving each member veto power--"only marginal revisions are 
possible."  NIKKEI editorial staff writer Asakawa writes that he was 
"shocked" that after discussions by the 50 commission members over 
three months, "the majority opinion was not reflected in the 
recommendation. 

   MITI Wants To Retain Law So It Can 'Control' Distribution Sector 
- According to the 7 February NIKKEI BUSINESS, MITI wanted to keep 
revisions within the existing framework of the law to protect 
"MITI's interests."  The article claims the law is an instrument 
giving MITI influence over the distribution sector.  MITI can 
"control" the opening of new stores--one of the most important 
concerns of retailers--" through its regional bureaus and local 
chambers of commerce" throughout Japan. 

   According to the article, before the joint commission began 
discussing revision of the law in November 1993, eleven 
organizations of small- and medium-sized retail stores held a rally 
in front of the Diet Building urging that no changes be made.  About 
20 Diet members from both the ruling coalition and opposition 
parties attended the rally.  The article quotes a senior member of a 
retail store organization as saying that MITI "organized the rally 
and asked Diet members to participate." 

   The article also quotes a member of the Hiraiwa Commission on 
governmental reform, who asserts that MITI "pressured" the 
commission to delete a recommendation "to abolish the law" from an 
early draft of the Hiraiwa Commission's report that recommended 
overall deregulation. 

   Reversed Positions of Small Retailers, Large Supermarkets - A 
"strange reversal" in the positions of small retailers and large 
supermarket chains has occurred concerning revision of the law, 
according to the NIKKEI BUSINESS article.  Because of sluggish 
economic conditions, small retailers are hurting and seek to survive 
in association with a large store or shopping center by inviting a 
department store or large supermarket to be the core of a large 
store complex or shopping center.  Therefore, the article maintains, 
"although small retailers want to abolish the law, they have to 
support it" because the law is their only "political bargaining 
chip."  Consequently, the small retailers do not want to "completely 
discourage" large stores from opening new outlets. 

   The article notes that the supermarket chains are also 
experiencing difficulties because of the recession and the 
increasing number of discount stores.  Under such conditions, the 
chains are inclined to feel that their interests are best protected 
"if no new large stores are permitted."  Thus, the large supermarket 
chains, which formerly were "the champions of deregulation," are now 
reluctant to abolish the store law and want protection under "MITI's 
umbrella."  The article quotes Isao Nakauchi, chairman of Daiei 
Store, a large supermarket chain, and chairman of the Japan Chain 
Stores Association, as stating: "It would be better to retain the 
law, or otherwise conflicts with local small retailers will 
increase."  NIKKEI BUSINESS observes that Nakauchi was one of the 
officials who helped then MITI Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone pass the 
original law in 1974. 

   FEATURE:  Food Agency Under Severe Criticism Over Rice Panic - 
SUMMARY:  In response to "panic buying" stemming from Japan's 
shortage of domestically-grown rice,, the Food Agency has issued 
"guidance" that imported Thai rice must be blended or sold packaged 
with domestic rice, according to press reports.  Japan's largest 
rice trading firm has criticized this policy as promoting the sale 
of black market rice.  Consumers are critical of the agency for 
denying their right to choose which rice to buy.  Also, press 
editorials have criticized the agency's policy of continued control 
of rice distribution and selling imported foreign rice at 
"considerably higher" prices to generate profits sufficient to 
compensate farmers who had poor rice crops last summer. 

   According to the 8 March issues of major Japanese newspapers, on 
the evening of 7 March the Food Agency urgently issued "guidance," 
based on Japan's Food Control Law, to Japan's rice retailers that 
domestic rice must be blended with at least 20 percent of imported 
Thai rice before sale.  The guidance is in response to "panic 
buying" that began in early March--with long lines of people forming 
every day at rice retail shops and supermarkets to buy whatever 
domestic rice that is available.  Japan's poor harvest in 1993 after 
unusually cold summer weather has triggered fears of a serious 
shortage.  The 8 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN attributes the rice shortage 
to Food Agency delays in importing Chinese rice, hoarding of 
domestic rice by farmers and some wholesalers waiting for prices to 
rise, and stockpiling by consumers worried about further shortages. 

   The 10 March NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN reports the Food Agency plans 
to allow rice retailers to package a bag of domestic rice together 
with a bag of imported rice and sell it for one price.  Despite the 
possible violation of a Fair Trade Commission rule prohibiting 
retailers from forcing consumers to buy unwanted products by 
"bundling" popular and unpopular products together, the Food Agency 
considers this necessary to sell the imported rice.  It is concerned 
that consumers will buy only domestic rice or California and Chinese 
medium and short-grain rice, which are close to Japanese rice. 
Japanese consumers consider Thai long-grain rice, the taste of which 
is generally disliked, as "unsafe" and having a "unique smell," 
according to the 6 March ASAHI SHIMBUN.  The Food Agency reportedly 
fears that the outcome will be a rice shortage in the midst of a 
glut of unsold Thai rice.  By forcing consumers to buy blended rice, 
ASAHI maintains, the Food Agency wants to make sure that all 
imported Thai rice is sold.  In an apparent public relations effort, 
the Imperial Household Agency announced that the imperial family 
will also eat blended rice (70 percent foreign and 30 percent 
domestic rice), the 9 March ASAHI reports. 

   Food Agency's Policy Raises Price of Black Market Rice - Seizo 
Yamazaki, chairman of Yamatane Corp., Japan's largest rice trading 
firm, comments in the 9 March YOMIURI SHIMBUN that "forcing 
consumers to buy blended rice is a policy to promote the sale of 
black market rice" (also called "free market rice," the sale of 
which is illegal).  Yamazaki asserts that prices of black market 
rice will surely rise, because the black market is the only place 
consumers can buy domestic rice not blended with Thai rice.  "Given 
the fact that the Food Agency has left black market rice merchants 
unregulated in the past," Yamazaki continues, it now has "no 
effective way to regulate them."  However, Yamazaki anticipates that 
the situation will improve beginning in April, when imported Chinese 
rice begins to arrive in Japan.  Also, the weather turns hot in May 
and farmers and black market rice merchants will have problems 
maintaining the quality of stored rice.  The situation will ease 
further in June when the new crop of Australian rice will come on 
the market. 

   According to statistics from the Rice and Grain Data Bank, cited 
in the 9 March SANKEI SHIMBUN, Japan's 1993 domestic rice harvest 
was 7.8 million tons (its annual consumption is 10 million tons), of 
which 4 million tons was collected and sold by the Food Agency, 
while 3.8 million tons presumably is being held by farmers or has 
been sold directly to black market rice dealers.  Of this 3.8 
million tons, 1.3 million tons will be consumed by farmers 
themselves, while 2.5 million tons already has been or will be sold 
on the black market.  The data bank estimates that at least 1 
million tons is currently being held by farmers and black market 
rice traders in anticipation of further increases in prices.  The 
data bank notes that the black market price of the best brand 
domestic rice has already jumped to 15,000 yen ($143) per 10 
kilograms, twice the 1993 price and triple the current price of 
imported California short-grain rice.  It warns that the tighter the 
Food Agency controls rice, the more rice will be channeled into the 
black market. 

   Consumers Criticize Food Agency's Guidance on Blended Rice - 
Consumers are critical of Food Agency guidance to blend domestic and 
imported rice, because it leaves them "with no choice," according to 
the 9 March SANKEI SHIMBUN.  According to a mid?February consumer 
                                              ? 
survey conducted by Seiyu, a large supermarket chain, 55.2 percent 
of consumers preferred "1O0 percent imported rice" over a "blend of 
domestic and imported rice."  Consumers want each type of imported 
rice sold separately so that they can cook each variety according to 
its characteristics. 

   Editorials in all major Tokyo newspapers on 9 March criticize the 
Food Agency's guidance.  For example, the NIKKEI editorial asserts 
that consumers have the right to choose which rice to buy, and is 
critical of the Food Agency's policy of selling imported rice at a 
"considerably higher price" to generate profits large enough to 
compensate farmers.  NIKKEI asserts that the market ought to 
determine the price of each variety of imported rice, and if Thai 
rice is unpopular, its price should be lowered.  MAINICHI's 
editorial asks the Food Agency to stop controlling rice distribution 
and leave it to market forces--after consumers use up all the 
domestic rice, they will eat imported rice, and if they do not like 
it, "they will eat bread and noodles instead."  ASAHI's editorial 
warns that if the Food Agency continues to insist on its policy of 
blending domestic and imported rice, despite strong opposition, it 
will only bring about further increases in the price of black market 
rice. 

   Consumers, Cooperatives Attempt To Secure Rice - As one 
indication of how far Japanese consumers will go to secure palatable 
rice, NHK Television in its 9:00 pm evening news program on 15 March 
shows Japanese tourists bringing South Korean rice, which is similar 
to Japanese rice, into the country aboard ferry boats running from 
Pusan to Shimonoseki, the closest Japanese port city to South Korea. 
The announcer states that some tourists are bringing in as much as 
50 kilograms of rice per person; Japanese citizens are permitted to 
bring in a total of 100 kilograms of foreign rice per year. 
Consequently, the amount of rice that has been seized and 
quarantined in Shimonoseki--normallY about 100 kilograms per month 
on average--increased to 18,000 kilograms in the first ten days of 
March.  Despite the seizures, the Customs Service states there is no 
way to keep track of how much rice is brought back by each tourist, 
the NHK announcer reports. 

   The 10 March NIKKEI notes that large consumer cooperatives, which 
earlier announced they would not sell imported rice because of 
"uncertainty concerning the safety of imported rice," have changed 
their position and have begun selling imported rice in response to 
widespread requests from their members.  While selling both imported 
rice and blended rice, the cooperatives are already taking measures 
to secure domestic rice for the next crop year.  They have begun 
talks with agricultural cooperatives from around Japan, which are 
authorized to sell a certain volume of rice at their discretion, 
about "direct contracts" for rice.  The consumer cooperatives also 
have had to diversify the regions from which they will buy rice next 
year.  Previously, they bought rice only from the Tohoku region, the 
area that produces the most famous rice varieties but which was hit 
hardest by last summer's cold weather. 

   IBJ Capital Investment Survey Reveals 6.1 Percent Decline - 
According to an Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ) survey of private 
sector investment plans for FY94, private sector capital investment 
is expected to decrease by 6.1 percent from FY93.  Consequently, 
Japan's capital investment will likely decline for the third 
consecutive year.  While capital investment by manufacturing 
industries is expected to improve gradually, capital investment by 
nonmanufacturing industries, excluding the electric power companies, 
is expected to decline further.  The IBJ also projects that surplus 
production capacity on the part of manufacturing industries is 
unlikely to fall to the level of demand during FY94.  If the yen 
appreciates further, the IBJ concludes, company capital investment 
plans might be lowered even further. 

   According to the survey results, capital investment by 
manufacturing industries will decrease 10.3 percent, an 
"improvement" from the estimated 17.7 percent drop of FY93.  Among 
manufacturing sectors, capital investment by assembly and processing 
industries will decrease "only" 4 percent, a "large improvement" 
from the estimated 17.9 percent decrease of FY93.  Reasons for this 
improvement include:  1) most electronics firms are planning to 
increase capital investment for liquid crystal displays (LCD) and 
semiconductors; 2) one automaker is planning model changes in FY94, 
and therefore needs to invest in new production lines; and 3) 
general machinery companies are planning to increase production 
capacity slightly in response to steady, large demand stemming from 
public works projects. 

   Capital investment by nonmanufacturing industries, other than 
electric power companies, will decrease 7 percent, an accelerated 
drop from the estimated 5 percent decrease of FY93.  The primary 
reasons for the decrease are the glut of office buildings and 
stagnant personal consumption, which has caused department stores 
and large supermarket chains to shelve plans to construct new 
stores. 

   Electronics--Most electronics companies are planning to increase 
their capital investment in FY94, resulting in an overall 4.5 
percent increase. Investment will be concentrated in the LCD and 
semiconductor sectors.  Toshiba will spend 150 billion yen ($1.43 
billion), a slight increase from FY93, to increase production 
capacity for 4 and 16 megabit (M) dynamic random access (DRAM) 
chips.  NEC and Hitachi plan to increase their capital investment 
slightly, from their FY93 totals of 160 billion yen ($1.52 billion) 
and 170 billion yen ($1.62 billion) respectively. 

   Automobiles--Toyota Motor is planning capital investment totaling 
to 240 billion yen ($2.29 billion), a 25 billion yen ($238 million) 
increase from FY93, largely to finance model changes for its Corolla 
and Crown models.  Nissan Motor, on the other hand, plans to 
decrease capital investment in FY94, limiting it only to new car 
development.  In response to the recession, other automakers, 
especially truck manufacturers, plan to decrease capital investment 
in FY94. 

   Steel--All steel manufacturers are planning to hold down capital 
investment in FY94 because of the slump in sales and poor prospects 
for an early economic recovery.  Steel manufacturers have surplus 
capacity, especially to meet the needs of automakers.  Nippon Steel 
plans a "drastic" decrease from the 170 billion yen ($1.62 billion) 
level of FY93.  NKK Corp. plans to cut total capital investment from 
FY93 through FY95 by 40 percent from total capital investment level 
of the FY90-FY92 period.  Kobe Steel's plans are similar to those of 
NKK.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Financial Issues - Chinese Provinces Urge Japanese Banks To Set 
Up Branches -- Provincial and municipal governments in China's 
interior areas have requested that Japan's major commercial banks, 
such as Sanwa and Sumitomo, establish branches and representative 
offices in their jurisdictions, according to the 10 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  In the past, Japanese banks have focused on China's 
coastal areas, where Japanese companies have made conspicuous 
inroads, but now they are responding to requests made by city and 
provincial governments in inland areas and are seriously looking 
into setting up offices there.  The major commercial banks have been 
"ardently" approached by the governments of Liaoning Province, 
Shenyang City, Jiangsu Province, Nanjing Municipality, Hubei 
Province, Wuhan City, Shaanxi Province, Xian City, Sichuan Province, 
and Chongging City, and others. 

   In their pursuit of economic growth, the local governments have 
been competing to attract foreign investment.  Their overtures to 
Japanese banks are thought to be part of their attempt to garner 
cooperation in capital financing from foreign financial 
institutions, not just from foreign investors in manufacturing and 
production.  Despite the fact that investment by Japanese companies 
in these regions is still rather limited, the banks are now 
seriously considering where to set up offices in China's interior 
areas. 

   Meanwhile, according to the 2 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, five 
Japanese banks--Sumitomo, Sanwa, Industrial Bank of Japan, Bank of 
Tokyo, and Mitsubishi--are vying for permission to establish 
branches in Beijing.  The Chinese Government is moving toward 
allowing a few foreign banks to open branches in Beijing, but 
because only one or two will be Japanese banks, the competition is 
intense.  Sumitomo Bank is Offering seminars to financial 
institutions in Beijing to enhance its presence there, while the 
presidents of the Bank of Tokyo and Mitsubishi Bank recently visited 
China and  appealed to the mayor of Beijing for authorization to 
establish branches. 

   China To Authorize Japanese Banks To Use Yuan - Japanese banks 
will be authorized to use the Chinese yuan, but initially only for 
deposit-taking functions, according to the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN.  The People's Bank of China has not specified how deposits 
will be obtained or precisely when the deposit-taking functions will 
begin, but major Japanese commercial banks understand from 
discussions with the People's Bank that they will be able to start 
taking yuan-based deposits sometime in the spring or summer of 1994. 

   The Ministry of Finance has continued to press the Chinese 
Government to authorize Japanese banks to use the Chinese currency 
because the recent change in China's foreign exchange system is 
having an adverse effect on Japanese banks doing business there, 
according the 4 February NIKKEI KINYU.  Under the revision, foreign 
banks can only make loans and conduct foreign exchange transactions 
in dollars or yen, while foreign companies operating there can only 
use yuan.  When a Japanese company operating in China sells yuan and 
buys a foreign currency, it must first transfer the money to the 
People's Bank of China, where the Japanese bank has an account, 
thereby making it more troublesome for the company to use a Japanese 
rather than a Chinese bank.  According to the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU, 
some people assert that authorization to use the yuan is a "matter 
of life or death" for Japanese banks in China, and the recent 
indication that the yuan can be used for deposit-taking functions is 
being interpreted by Japanese banks as the "first step" toward full 
banking operations. 

   MOF Sale of 90 Tons of Gold Likely To Affect International Market 
- The Ministry of Finance (MOF) on 7 March announced that it will 
sell 90 tons of gold on the market during FY94, from which it 
expects to realize 120 billion yen ($1.14 billion).  This amount 
will help compensate for the shortfall in Japan's tax revenues.  The 
MOF will melt down 4 million 100,000-yen ($952) commemorative gold 
coins that have been returned to the Bank of Japan into 90 tons of 
gold.  The total face value of the coins is 400 billion yen ($3.8 
billion), but the book value of gold contained in the coins is only 
119.7 billion yen ($1.14 billion).  although the MOF is studying 
appropriate ways to sell gold so that market prices are not unduly 
affected, sale of such a large quantity of gold by Japan, a gold- 
consuming country, "is likely to affect the gold market." 

   The MOF issued 11 million 100,000-yen gold coins in 1986 to 
commemorate the 60th anniversary of Emperor Showa's accession to the 
throne.  Despite their low gold content, the coins were so popular 
that 50 million lottery tickets were issued to people who wanted to 
buy the coins.  However, because of the prolonged recession and poor 
prospects for appreciation in the coin's value as a collectible, 
"people have begun spending the gold coins in stores."  (Tokyo 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 1) 

   BOT Concludes Investment Agreement With Colombia - The Bank of 
Tokyo (BOT) has concluded an investment-promotion agreement with the 
Invest in Colombia Corporation (Coinvertir, or ICC) to encourage 
Japanese investment in Colombia.  ICC is a joint government-private 
sector organization established by the president of Colombia.  This 
is the third such agreement the BOT has concluded with a south or 
Central American country, but is the first such agreement by any 
Japanese bank with Colombia.  The BOT's previous agreements were a 
1990 agreement with the National Finance Bank of Mexico and a 1991 
agreement with the Chilean Foreign Investment Committee. 
   Under the agreement, the BOT will introduce Japanese companies 
planning to enter Colombia's markets to the ICC and will hold 
investment-promotion seminars for them, while the ICC and the BOT 
will also jointly establish a forum for periodic information 
exchange. 

   Although Japanese banks shied away from investment in South and 
Central America in the first half of the 1980s because of the debt 
crisis there, the BOT now has decided to step up its activities in 
Colombia.  It sees South and Central America as "replete with 
potential for growth," especially with the implementation of trade 
agreements like the North American Free Trade Agreement.  (Tokyo 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 14 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - MALAYSIA:  Daiken, Itochu To Set 
Up Company To Manufacture Fiberboard -- Daiken Corp., a manufacturer 
of wood and mineral fiberboard, together with the general trading 
company Itochu Corp. and other firms, will establish a company in 
Malaysia's Sarawak State to manufacture medium-density fiberboard 
(MDF), a plywood substitute manufactured from scrap wood.  The new 
company, Daiken Sarawak, will begin operations in the spring of 
1996.  0f the total 2.5 billion yen ($23.8 million) required for the 
new company, Daiken will contribute 50 percent; Itochu, 20 percent; 
Sarawak Timber Industry Development, a forestry development 
corporation operated by the Sarawak state governments 15 percent; 
Proexcel, 10 percent; and Linbang Trading, 5 percent. 

   MDF production is projected at 100,000 cubic meters per year, all 
of which will be exported to Japan.  MDF has gained popularity 
because it can be used as a substitute for plywood, the supply of 
which has become unstable due to increased efforts to protect 
tropical rainforests.  The interests of both Daiken and the 
Malaysian Government will be served through establishment of the new 
company--Daiken is seeking to ensure a stable supply of raw 
materials, while the government seeks the efficient use of its wood 
resources. (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 19 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Mitsubishi Materials Establishes Ceramic Parts Subsidiary - 
Mitsubishi Materials Corp. (MMC) has established a wholly-owned 
Malaysian subsidiary, MMC Electronics Malaysia, to produce ceramic 
electronic parts.  Mitsubishi's total investment in the subsidiary 
will be 2.9 billion yen ($27.6 million).  The new subsidiary will 
serve as Mitsubishi Materials' production base in Southeast Asia, 
supplying Japanese manufacturers of home electronics equipment that 
have shifted their production to the region. 

   MMC Electronics Malaysia will build a 6,000-square meter plant on 
a site adjacent to Kamaya Electric Malaysia on the outskirts of 
Ipoh, where its production equipment will be housed until the plant 
is complete.  The new company, which will employ 300 workers, will 
begin operations in April with the anticipated production of 1 
million temperature sensors for air conditioners and 300 million 
laminated ceramic chip capacitors for videotape recorders and 
television sets per month.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Feb 94 p 
15) 

   Ichikoh Industries Expanding Production Operations - Ichikoh 
Industries, Japan's second largest manufacturer of automotive 
lighting equipment, is increasing production in Malaysia to meet 
increased demand from Japanese auto manufacturers who have started 
operations in Malaysia to counter the effects of yen appreciation. 
Ichikoh Malaysia, its local subsidiary, is 90 percent owned by 
Ichikoh Industries and 10 percent by the general trading company 
Nissho Iwai. 

   Currently, Ichikoh Malaysia produces about 600 million yen ($5.7 
million) worth of interior lights for export to Japan.  However, 
over the next two to three years the firm plans to invest just under 
1 billion yen ($9.5 million) to begin the production of exterior 
lights and to increase the output of interior lights.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 8) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Japanese Hijacker Heads Firm promoting Trade With 
Japan - According to an article in the 12 February SHUKAN GENDAI by 
freelance journalist Koji Takazawa, who visited Pyongyang in 
December 1993, the North Korean trading firm "Project 21" is 
"steadily" promoting trade with Japan, even though Japan-North Korea 
normalization talks are at a standstill.  According to Takazawa, 
"Project 21," which was formerly named "21 Planning" ("21 Kikaku"), 
was founded in Pyongyang in April 1990 by Takahiro Konishi, one of 
the Japanese Red Army group that hijacked a Japan Air Lines jetliner 
and forced it to fly to Pyongyang in April 1970.  Konishi had been 
working as a Japanese instructor and translator in Pyongyang before 
he founded the company. 

   According to Takazawa, Konishi is particularly interested in 
negotiating contracts with Japanese firms to serve as their 
Pyongyang representative to promote trade between the two countries. 
To date about fifteen small Japanese companies have signed contracts 
with Project 21.  Konishi reportedly hopes to conclude contracts 
with larger Japanese firms in the future. 

   According to Takazawa, Project 21 is a general trading company 
with several dozen employees and annual sales of 1 billion yen ($9.5 
million).  It is housed in a six-story office building, which it 
owns, in downtown Pyongyang.  Takazawa reports that the firm, which 
initially exported only foodstuffs and ginseng tea to Japan, now 
trades in more than 30 products-- including construction materials, 
steel, cement, automobiles, and agricultural products--with Japan, 
China, and some Southeast Asian and European countries. 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE: MT Companies Strengthening 
International Ties -- SUMMARY:  According to press reports, some 
Japanese machine tool (MT) companies have been expanding their 
international activities, including overseas production, increased 
exports, and service activities.  At the same time, some foreign 
firms are expanding their activities in Japan's MT market. 

   Activities in the United States - Mitsubishi Heavy Industries 
(MHI) plans to increase its annual sales of MT products in the 
United States by 20 percent to more than 200 machines, according to 
the 1 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  In 1993 MHI sold about 180 MT 
products tools in the U.S. market--120 were made at its U.S. 
subsidiary and the remainder were imported from Japan.  MHI will 
fill some of the expected increase in orders with machines built at 
its Hiroshima MT Plant and sell them through its U.S. subsidiary, 
MHI Machine Tool, located in Hopkinsville, Kentucky.  MHI Officials 
state "it has become possible to combine increased exports from 
Japan with local production in the United States" with the lifting 
of the voluntary restraint agreement covering Japanese MT exports at 
the end of 1993.  NIKKEI SANGYO adds that to enable MHI Machine Tool 
to increase production of machining centers, computer numerically 
controlled (CNC) lathes, and CNC cylindrical grinders, MHI will ship 
a large, five-surface processing machine from Japan to its 
Subsidiary. 

   Ingersoll Milling Machine, a major U.S. MT manufacturer based in 
Illinois, will drop a Swiss trading company as its sales agent in 
Japan and will begin dealing directly with its Japanese customers 
through its subsidiary, Ingersoll Japan, according to the 14 
February NIKKEI SANGYO.  By eliminating the middleman, Ingersoll 
Japan expects to reduce distribution costs and to be able to gather 
information directly from customers.  Ingersoll Japan anticipates 
that sales for its first fiscal year will be 1 billion yen ($9.5 
million).  Ingersoll, whose specialty is large, five-surface 
processing machines, has sold aircraft parts processing machines to 
MHI in the past.  NIKKEI SANGYO characterizes Ingersoll's move as 
"threatening the very core of Japanese companies, which are pursuing 
the time-consuming recessionary countermeasure of expanding the 
volume production of high value-added general purpose machines." 

   Cooperative Ventures in Europe - Two German MT manufacturers, 
Waldrich Siegin and Waldrich Coburg, both of which belonging to the 
Ingersoll Group, have contracted with Okura and Company, a medium- 
size trading company, to become their MT sales agent in Japan, 
according to the 9 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  Previously both 
Siegin and Coburg used a Swiss company as its sales agent, but the 
two companies switched to Okura "because they plan to enter new 
product areas."  Siegin makes MT equipment primarily for steel and 
aluminum producers and manufacturers of paper and heavy electrical 
machinery, while Coburg makes MT equipment and extrusion molding 
machines for companies that process large parts.  Okura expects 
first fiscal year sales to reach 500 million yen ($4.76 million), 
according to NIKAAN KOGYO. 

   Okuramech, a company affiliated with the Okura Group, has 
contracted with the Swiss MT firm Fritz Suchard to be its sales 
agent in Japan to market Suchard's large 0.3-micron precision 
granite-bed cylindrical grinders, according to the 14 February 
NIKKEI SANGYO.  Okura anticipates demand for the large grinder in 
the metal processing, auto parts, and aerospace industries, NIKKEI 
SANGYO notes. 

   Fanuc, Japan's largest manufacturer of CNC equipment, and 
Charmilles Technologies, a leading Swiss manufacturer of electrical 
discharge machines (EDM), will expand their cooperative relationship 
to include die-cutting EDMs as well as wire EDMs, according to the 
14 February NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  Currently Charmilles uses Fanuc 
CNC equipment on all its wire EDMs.  In the near future Fanuc will 
begin assembling Charmilles' latest wire EDM series, the "Robofile," 
at its Tsukuba plant.  This plant now assembles only CNC equipment, 
but Fanuc President Seiuemon Inaba states that "it also will be 
possible for us to carry out knockdown production of entire 
machines" at the plant.  Fanuc plans to make its Tsukuba plant "a 
production base for Charmilles in Asia." 

   In addition, Charmilles Fanuc, a joint venture company formed by 
the two companies three years ago, but which has been "inactive" 
until now, will soon begin operating, NIKKAN KOGYO reports.  A 
special unit will be activated to handle the administrative and 
process-control work required for operations to attach CNC equipment 
to EDMs. 

   Previous cooperation between Fanuc and Charmilles included 
Fanuc's original equipment manufacturing production of Charmilles' 
"Robocut Alpha-OA" and "Alpha-IA" wire EDM machines.  Charmilles has 
sold these machines in Great Britain, France, and Italy, while Fanuc 
supplied them for other markets.  Some types of wire EDMs which 
Charmilles' Japanese subsidiary, Charmilles Japan, sold in Asia were 
"mated" with CNC equipment at Fanuc's headquarters systems plant, 
NIKKAN KOGYO notes. 

   South Korean, East Asian Markets - Citizen Watch will begin 
exporting to South Korea small precision CNC lathes through G. Boley 
GmbH, the German MT company it bought in 1992, in response to 
changes in South Korea's import regulations, according to the 22 
February NIKKEI SANGYO.  In January 1994 South Korea eased 
restrictions on imports by reducing the number of products subject 
to its "Importers Diversification List." These changes covered 
numerically controlled horizontal lathes capable of speeds over 
12,000 rpm, including Citizen's "Shincom L" series.  However, 
because of the way import authorization procedures are handled, 
exports of high-speed lathes from Japan have became "impossible," 
thereby "wiping out in a single stroke" the South Korean market for 
Citizen's MT equipment. 

   In response, Citizen will export lathes made by G. Boley to South 
Korea.  Some parts for these lathes will be shipped from Japan to G. 
Boley and then exported from Germany marked "Shincom Made in 
Germany."  G. Boley already manufactures Citizen's lathes on 
consignment for the European market, NIKKEI SANGYO observes. 

   Mitsubishi Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading 
companies, will establish a South Korean corporation, Hanguk MC 
Shoji, to export South Korean "machinery," according to the 24 
February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Mitsubishi could obtain 
permission from the Korean Government in March and begin operations 
as early as 1 May.  The wholly owned subsidiary will be capitalized 
at $4.5 million.  Mitsubishi anticipates sales of $30 million during 
the firm's first fiscal year.  Mitsubishi is the second of major 
Japanese trading company to establish a firm in South Korea, NIKKEI 
notes. 

   Toshiba Machine, one of Japan's largest MT companies, will 
establish an Asian network for after-sales service for MT equipment 
separate from its network of sales agents, according to the 28 
February NIKKEI SANGYO.  Toshiba Machine already has locally 
incorporated sales companies in Thailand, Taiwan, and Singapore, in 
addition to business offices in Hong Kong and Beijing.  However, the 
company determined that since this network could not adequately 
serve growing customer needs for maintenance and service, it would 
establish a separate network of locally incorporated service offices 
that will be directly managed from Tokyo.  Toshiba Machine has 
already opened service offices in Singapore and in Kuala Lumpur and 
Penang, Malaysia, and has plans for offices in Shanghai and 
Kaohsiung, Taiwan. 

   Exports are becoming more important for Toshiba Machine, the 
NIKKEI SANGYO article notes.  In the first half of FY93 (April 
through September 1993) Toshiba's ratio of exports to total sales 
reached 35 percent, up almost 10 percent from the same period in 
1992.  Exports of injection-molding equipment and machine tools rose 
30 percent.  China accounts for "just under 70 percent" of Toshiba's 
exports, NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 

   Fanuc Pulls Robot-Programming Software Off the Market - Fanuc, 
the world's largest producer of numerically-controlled equipment for 
machine tools and a leading manufacturer of industrial robots, has 
decided to stop selling FAST, its internally developed off-line 
robot-programming software, and replace it with Robcad, the robot- 
simulation software marketed by the Israeli firm Technomatix 
Technologies.  Fanuc will continue developing FAST for use in the 
development of intelligent robots and for intelligent manufacturing 
system (IMS) applications. 

   Fanuc's U.S. subsidiary, Fanuc Robotech, has signed a contract 
with Technomatix for rights to market Robcad in North America and 
Japan.  Robcad, characterized as "powerful" robot-simulation 
software, is used to verify a robot's movements and for off-line 
robot training.  This software is also used by Nachi-Fujikoshi, 
Komatsu, and Mitsubishi Electric Co., which also manufacture robots. 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Jan 94 p 11) 

   Firm Develops New Machine To Process Aircraft Engine Parts - Fuji 
Machine Manufacturing, a leading manufacturer of machine tools and 
specialized machinery, together with Daido Steel Co. has developed a 
spinning processing machine to process titanium and ultra-high 
temperature alloy parts, such as engine casings and compressors used 
in the high-temperature, high-pressure section of aircraft engines. 
To date these types of complex cylindrically-shaped parts have been 
formed by milling, but this method is time consuming because of the 
hardness of the materials. 

   The new machine processes and finishes parts by forming them on 
spinning rollers under a maximum pressure of 50 tons, while the 
parts are heated to a maximum temperature of 1,200 degrees.  This 
method reduces processing time to about one-third that previously 
required and reduces the areas requiring milling to one-fifth that 
necessitated by the old method.  (Nagoya CHUNICHI SHIMBUN 1 Mar 94 p 
11) 

   Petroleum/Energy - Firms To Participate in Indonesian Coal Mining 
Project -- Nichimen Corp., a general trading company, and Mitsui 
Matsushima Co., a Kyushu-based coal-marketing company, will 
participate in developing a 98,000-hectare strip coal mining project 
in central Sumatra together with the Indonesian firm PT Riau 
Baraharum.  Coal reserves in the area are estimated at 25 million 
tons, and Riau Baraharum plans to complete studies to confirm this 
figure by the end of 1994.  Commercial production will begin in 
1996, and from 1997 production is planned at a level of 1 million 
tons per year. 

   Costs for the project are estimated at $2.5 million for 
exploration and $25 million for development.  Nichimen and Mitsui 
Matsushima will equally divide their $1.5 million share of the 
exploration costs and $15 million in development costs.  In return 
for providing project financing, the companies will receive priority 
in purchasing the coal mined, which they will sell to Japanese 
electric power companies at a level of 800,000 tons per year.  Their 
goal is to ensure a supply base for the Japan market, where demand 
for coal from the electric power industry is expected to increase 
from the current 33 million tons per year to 72 million tons by the 
year 2000.  (Tokyo NIH0N KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC, Samsung To 
Cooperate in 256M DRAM Research -- SUMMARY:  NEC, Japan's largest 
semiconductor company, and South Korea's Samsung Electronics Co. 
have agreed to share the results of their research on next- 
generation 256-megabit (M) dynamic random-access memory (DRAM) 
chips, according to press reports.  Although cooperative relations 
between Japanese and South Korean semiconductor manufacturers have 
been increasing, this is the first relationship involving 256M DRAM 
chips.  In addition, NEC and Samsung are discussing possible 
cooperation in the actual production of the chip. 

   At a 1 March press conference, NEC officials announced they had 
reached agreement with Samsung Electronics to exchange information 
on 256M DRAM chips, according to the 2 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  The two companies are also proceeding with negotiations 
on joint development of the chip.  Although Samsung Electronics is a 
leading manufacturer of DRAMS, the company may have decided to 
cooperate with NEC because the estimated 100 billion yen ($950 
million) investment needed to develop the next-generation chip is 
big a burden for one company to bear alone.  The 2 March NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN notes that this is the first time Japanese and South 
Korean companies have agreed to cooperate concerning 256M DRAM 
chips. 

   The 2 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN observes that by cooperating, the 
companies hope to be the first to make 256M DRAMs, and "thus have it 
be the world standard."  The 2 March ASAHI SHIMBUN notes that NEC 
would like to begin mass production of 256M DRAMs from 1995, but the 
1 March YOMIURI SHIMBUN estimates that actual mass production will 
not take place "until 1998 or 1999." 

   Closer Relationships Between Japanese, South Korean Firms - 
According to the 2 March NIKKEI, the relationship between Japanese 
and South Korean semiconductor manufacturers "has shifted from one 
of Korean companies trying to catch up with Japanese companies to 
one of a system of cooperation."  This is illustrated by the growing 
number of agreements between semiconductor manufacturers of both 
countries.  Hitachi has provided 1M, 4M, and 16M DRAM technology to 
Goldstar Electron Co. in exchange for semiconductor products. 
Fujitsu and South Korea's Hyundai Electronics reached an agreement 
in October 1993 to produce 4M and 16M DRAMs under a reciprocal 
original equipment manufacturing basis.  Samsung Electronics is also 
cooperating with Toshiba on flash memory chips and with Mitsubishi 
Electric Corp. and Oki Electric Industry concerning high-speed 
memory devices. 

   The 2 March NIKKEI SANGYO asserts that such cooperation is not 
without some risk.  Cooperation like that between NEC and Samsung 
could be a "double-edged sword," because Japanese and South Korean 
companies have focused on DRAM chip production, whereas American and 
Japanese companies have differing areas of specialization and "thus 
are not in such a competitive situation."  There is a danger, the 
paper notes, that if Japanese companies cooperate with their South 
Korean counterparts, any benefit from this "could be turned into a 
weapon" that might be used against them later in their "competitive 
struggle." 

   Canon, NAL To Research Parallel Processing Technologies - Canon 
Supercomputing S.I., a wholly owned subsidiary of Canon Sales Co., 
has begun a joint research program in fluid analysis parallel- 
processing technologies with the National Aerospace Laboratory 
(NAL).  The NAL, an organ of Japan's Science and Technology Agency, 
is a "major user" of supercomputers, and parallel processing 
supercomputers are being more widely used.  By using software 
developed by the NAL, the program is expected to find a more 
efficient way of using parallel processing systems and "improve 
technological capabilities." 

   Technicians from Canon and NAL will use a "KSR1" parallel- 
processing supercomputer purchased by Canon from the U.S. firm 
Kendall Square Research (KSR).  The researchers will evaluate the 
system's efficiency using a "miscellaneous fluid analysis program" 
developed by NAL, and also will conduct research into the most 
suitable parallel processing technologies for the software. 

   The NAL already uses supercomputers made by Fujitsu and the U.S. 
firm Intel, but is looking forward to conducting research on the KSR 
parallel-processing machine.  For its part, Cannon Supercomputing 
hopes this research will strengthen sales of both supercomputer 
hardware and software.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 7) 

   JEOL Sets Up Semiconductor Equipment Sales Office in South Korea 
- JEOL Ltd., a maker of semiconductor manufacturing equipment (SME) 
and Japan's largest producer of electron microscopes, has 
established a joint-venture sales and service subsidiary in Seoul. 
Since South Korea is becoming a "large market" for electron 
microscopes and semiconductor manufacturing equipment, JEOL decided 
that it was necessary to strengthen its local sales ability and 
develop an after-sales service system.  JEOL, a member of the 
Mitsubishi Group, is the latest of a number of Japanese SME firms 
"advancing" into South Korea to take advantage of robust capital 
investments being made by Korean semiconductor makers. 
   The new company, "JEOL Korea," is a joint venture capitalized at 
300 million won ($380,000) of which 30 percent was provided by JEOL 
and the remaining 70 percent JEOL's Korean sales representative. 
They are aiming to expand sales of a wide variety of equipment 
including electron microscopes, photomask manufacturing equipment, 
and related medical and analytical equipment. 

   A number of major SME manufacturers, including Canon and Tokyo 
Electron, have already established service subsidiaries in South 
Korea.  Lasertec, another maker of photomask-related equipment, set 
up operations in February.  Korean semiconductor makers are 
continuing to invest to expand production capacity.  Consequently, 
Japanese SME makers are realizing that a strengthened presence in 
Korea has become "indispensable."  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 
March 94 p 9) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  MPT-NTT Maneuvering on 
Next-Generation Communications -- SUMMARY:  According to press 
reports, the Telecommunications Council, an advisory group to the 
Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT), which has been 
deliberating issues concerning Japan's next-generation 
communications network for nearly a year, has "suddenly" decided to 
delay release of its final report from March until May.  The MPT 
explains that "things have changed" since Nippon Telegraph and 
Telephone (NTT) initiated its multimedia activities.  However, the 
press notes that the new report date "coincides" with a June 
decision on whether NTT President Masashi Kojima will be appointed 
to a third term, or whether Shigeo Sawada, NTT's senior vice 
president and a former MPT administrative vice minister, will be 
made NTT's new president. 

   According to the 4 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the 
Telecommunications Council's final report has been a matter of great 
interest within the communications and broadcasting sectors from the 
early stages of its deliberations, because its recommendations will 
determine the future direction of Japan's next-generation 
communications infrastructure. 

   Specifically, industry sectors are interested whether NTT or an 
MPT public corporation will be responsible for developing the next- 
generation communications infrastructure, according to NIKKEI 
SANGYO.  Executives of cable television companies have also been 
"looking forward" to the council's final report in March because the 
council has been deliberating on deregulating this industry.  NIKKEI 
SANGYO notes that people in the industry feel they are "the victims 
of evasive action" in having to accept the delay in the report, and 
feel they have been treated "unreasonably." 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, the MPT's explanation is that 
"multimedia activities are moving ahead very quickly," and it would 
like to study the current situation more "before presenting any 
conclusions."  The view in industry circles is that MPT's 
explanation may be "officially true," but that the ministry "is 
probably quarreling with NTT management."  The MPT reportedly had 
Shigeo Sawada, a former MPT administrative vice minister, "planted" 
in NTT as senior vice president and number-one candidate to succeed 
Masashi Kojima as NTT president when his current term expires in 
June.  By delaying the council's report until May, the MPT can use 
the report as a "bargaining chip" to acquire the NTT presidency for 
Sawada, NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 

   NTT Supporting Kojima For Third Term - The Osaka edition of the 
10 March MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that NTT President Kojima 
expressed his desire for another term at a 9 March press conference. 
According to Kojima, "it would be inconvenient if I just suddenly 
abandoned the presidency."  He adds, however, that "this is 
something which is not decided by my desires but by society, which 
includes Nagata-cho (the Diet), the bureaucrats, and the 
corporation."  MAINICHI notes that in terms of a formal decision, 
all that remains is a consensus at NTT's shareholders meeting and 
approval from the MPT. 

   The 10 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN notes that NTT is supporting 
Kojima in his desire to continue as president because NTT needs to 
establish "superiority" over the MPT as a "precondition" to block 
possible MPT measures to further break up NTT as part of an its 
review of NTT operations slated for 1995.  On the other hand, 
according to the 6 March SANKEI SHIMBUN, the MPT has been "pressing" 
to have Sawada, an MPT "old boy," replace Kojima as president in 
conjunction with the upcoming MPT review.  Reportedly, this has 
resulted in growing support from within NTT for Kojima to continue 
as president for another term to "block" the MPT's "breakup 
efforts." 

   It also appears that NTT has planned another strategy to keep 
Kojima as president by carefully timing the submission of its 
application to raise local telephone calling rates for March, the 10 
March NIKKEI SANGYO notes.  In this way, the MPT would have to make 
a decision on the rate hike before its April or May decision on the 
next NTT president.  If the application is not approved, this could 
be the "springboard" for Kojima to stay on.  NTT executives, 
according to NIKKEI SANGYO, feel that Kojima's next term is "100 
percent guaranteed," because certain target objectives have already 
been established for solving pending issues at NTT. 

   MPT Not Actively Pushing Sawada's Candidacy - Kojima asserts 
"there have been considerable developments" in terms of a decision, 
but that he did not want to "reveal the details," according to the 
NIKKEI SANGYO article.   It states that there usually is a "flurry 
of maneuvering" within political and financial circles at the 
beginning of the year in which an incumbent NTT president's term 
expires, but that matters to date have been "especially dull" 
concerning NTT's case.  The MPT minister, who usually plays an 
active role in this maneuvering, thus far has been "inactive." 
According to NIKKEI SANGYO, it appears that the MPT continues to be 
"so involved with issues," such as U.S.-Japan trade friction over 
cellular telephones, that it does not have the time to "wrestle" 
with NTT's executive management. 

   Communications Companies Begin Testing 'Personal Handy Phones' - 
Tokyo Telecommunications Network (TTNet), Tokyo Electric Power Co., 
Mitsui and Co., and Mitsubishi Corp. began testing "personal handy 
phones" (PHP), the next-generation cellular telephone, for the first 
time in the Tokyo metropolitan area on 1 March.  The companies are 
collecting data on various performance factors, including functions, 
sound quality, and the efficiency of frequency utilization, by 
having 300 current TTNet customers use PHPs until March 1995 in a 
test area around the Marunouchi and Shimbashi train stations.  The 
test area is supported by TTNet's fiber optic network and about 90 
base stations set up by Tokyo Electric.  The data collected from the 
testing activities will be used to determine future PHP-related 
business activities.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 1 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Long-Distance Telephone Companies Begin Testing Activities - 
Japan Telecom and Kokusai Denshin Denwa (KDD) have also decided to 
team up to begin PHP testing activities from 30 March.  Japan 
Telecom and KDD will conduct testing activities in an area near 
Japan Railway's Sapporo station in Hokkaido.  The two companies will 
set up about 20 base stations in the area and lease PHP units to 
about 100 "monitors," who will test their performance over a period 
of six months.  While Japan Telecom and KDD will be testing the same 
performance factors as other companies involved in the ongoing 
testing activities, "they will also test PHPs on international 
service networks." 

   People in the industry are pressing to commercialize PHP 
services, and much "pulling and hauling" behind the scenes is 
expected between the service providers, who are involved in the 
testing activities, and equipment manufacturers in anticipation of 
future markets.  The new carrier companies, which offer long- 
distance telephone services, find PHP commercialization efforts 
"attractive" because once the PHP service networks are built, the 
new carrier companies will be able to independently own and control 
intra-city communications lines instead of having to rely on Nippon 
Telegraph and Telephone's (NTT) network, as they currently do. 

   However, many PHP issues have not been clarified, such as how 
many operator licenses the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications 
(MPT) will approve and how the MPT will define standards for service 
options and service fees.  The MPT is expected to use the results 
gained from the PHP testing activities in its deliberations on these 
issues.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 6) 

   DDI, U.S. West To Cooperate in U.S.-Based PHP Testing - Beginning 
in April, Dainidenden (DDI) will cooperate with U.S. West by 
providing technical support for testing the communications system 
DDI developed to support PHP services.  The tests, to be conducted 
in Washington, D.C., are part of an effort led by U.S. West to test 
various PHP-compatible communications systems.  This cooperative 
testing effort resulted from an earlier venture between DDI and a 
U.S. West affiliate which involved renting analog-based portable 
telephones to DDI customers in Japan for use in the United States. 

   DDI's system may be considered in future cellular telephone 
commercialization efforts in the United States.  In Japan, both DDI 
and NTT have developed communications systems, but DDI's system 
covers a broader service area than NTT's, and DDI's ground stations 
have a higher transmission capacity--500 milliwatts--compared to the 
20-milliwatt capacity of NTT's ground stations.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 3 Mar 94 p 6) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Guangzhou's 1993 Economic Growth 
Maintains Double-Digit Increase -- Guangzhou City continued its 
rapid economic development in 1993 with the "overwhelming majority" 
of its principal aggregate production quotas achieving double-digit 
growth, thus overfulfilling the city's annual plan. 

   In 1993, Guangzhou City's total output value was 23 percent more 
than in 1992, reaching a total of 710 million yuan.  Of this total 
amount, the secondary industry (light industry) share increased by 
28 percent and the tertiary industry (service industry) share 
increased by 22 percent compared to 1992.  Guangzhou City's per 
capita gross domestic product (GDP) value exceeded 10,000 yuan for 
the first time, reaching 11,490 yuan, a 21 percent increase compared 
to the year before. 

   Guangzhou City's total amount of social commodity and retail was 
3.073 million yuan, an increase of 41.14 percent compared to 1992. 
Its bank deposit surplus by financial organizations reached 99.462 
billion yuan with a surplus loan value of 71.03 billion yuan. 
Guangzhou area's total freight volume via land, sea, and air reached 
11,900 tons and passenger volume was 9,656 persons, an increase of 
5.76 percent and 27.86 percent respectively. 

   The readjustment of the city's economic structure apparently 
resulted in higher economic benefits.  The composite index of 
industry and business economic profit by the village and above- 
village independent accounting entities was 133 percent, 22.8 
percent more than 1992.  The commodity selling rate increased 0.7 
percent to 97.84 percent, with a total realized profit tax of 10.175 
billion yuan, an increase of 50.35 percent.  The number of 
businesses suffering losses was reduced by 52 percent. 

   The economic and enterprise reforms and the opening up to the 
outside world have also resulted in new breakthroughs.  Of the 640 
enterprises in the city that have already opened up, 37 of these 
were set up as limited-liability companies with six of these issuing 
stocks.  The actual foreign capital used jumped to $1.464 billion, 
an increase of 32.63 percent compared to 1992.  The total commodity 
export value in foreign trade reached $3.263 billion, 32.34 percent 
more than in 1992. 

   The standard of living of the people of Guangzhou City has also 
continued to rise.  Per capita worker's wages annually were 6,272 
yuan in 1993, per capita city resident's annual income increased to 
4,984 yuan, and per capita farmer's annual income were 2,653 yuan, 
accounting for increases of 30.88 percent, 7.13 percent, and 23.24 
percent respectively.  (Guangzhou NANFANG RIBAO 13 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Outlook for Auto Industry in 1994 - China produced 1,280,000 cars 
in 1993, fulfilling 116.4 percent of the annual plan.  The gross 
value of industrial output was 130 billion yuan, sales income 
exceeded 150 billion yuan, and taxes and profits were 18 billion 
yuan and 12 billion yuan respectively. 

   Auto demand for 1994 will be about 1.3-1.4 million.  The 1994 
auto demand estimates are based on the following assumptions:  1. 
In 1994 the national economy will maintain a growth of 9 percent, 
industry 15 percent, investment in fixed assets 13 percent, and if 
several national construction projects begin operating this year 
demand for autos will be slightly higher than 1993.  2.  It will be 
difficult to alleviate the railroad transport capability problems 
before 1996, and automobile shipment will continue to be problematic 
in 1994.  However, because of an increase in railroad branch lines 
and highway improvements, demand for highway transport vehicles, 
especially heavy and medium-size freight cars, will increase.  3. 
The development of a car rental industry, a flourishing tourist 
industry, and prospering individual passenger transport businesses 
will increase the demand for minivans, limousines, and tourist 
buses.  4.  At present, tertiary industry accounts for 30 percent of 
the national economy and is a major auto consumer.  Expanding rural 
enterprises maintain a stable demand for heavy and light trucks.  5. 
At the end of 1993, China possessed 8,200,000 vehicles, but about 1 
million old vehicles need to be scrapped or replaced.  China plans 
to replace 250,000 vehicles in 1994, mainly mid-size freight cars 
and sedans.  6.  China has adopted severe measures to crack down on 
car smuggling, reorganize border and barter trade, and limit 
imports.  In addition, implementation of a guidance price policy 
will stimulate domestic sedan sales. 

   Based on regional, departmental, and enterprise production plans, 
domestic supply will be about 1.5 million, of which 850,000 will be 
freight cars, 320,000 buses, and 330,000 sedans.  The No. 1 Auto 
Group will supply 180,000 vehicles, the Dongfeng Group 210,000, the 
Heavy Vehicle Group 20,000, China Automobile Company 80,000, the 
Beijing Company 130,000, the Tianjin Company 110,000, the Shanghai 
Company 110,000, the Jinbei Company 40,000, and converted defense 
enterprises 140,000.  These enterprises account for about three- 
fourths of output.  In 1994 supply will exceed demand. 

   Factors restricting auto production are:  1.  Foreign exchange 
shortages.  Although domestic sedan production has rapidly 
developed, rising prices for foreign spare parts and steel has 
greatly increased the amount of foreign exchange used by the auto 
industry.  2.  Changes in the renminbi foreign exchange rates have 
increased production costs.  Production enterprises and consumers 
will share the increased costs.  Increased prices will dampen 
consumer demand, and the share absorbed by enterprises will restrict 
the volume of imports.  3.  Fund shortages are another factor 
restricting the auto market.  Major consumers are government and 
commercial offices, and their funds to purchase vehicles come from 
public funds.  In the last half of 1993 defaults on loans increased 
and funds diminished, which will restrict demand.  (Beijing JIDIAN 
RIBAO 1 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Shenzhen SEZ Plans To Establish Auto Industry - Shenzhen Special 
Economic Zone, Guangdong Province, has announced ambitious plans to 
develop an automobile industry from scratch by establishing a 1 
million square meter "auto town."  About 90 percent of the land will 
be used to build plants and the rest as residential areas to 
accommodate workers.  Negotiations are currently under way with 
several South Korean and Japanese auto makers to set up the 
necessary plants.  Baoan Automobile Services and Shenzhen Automobile 
Industry and Trading will take the lead in developing the area.  The 
target is an annual production capacity of 5,000 specialized 
vehicles for industrial, firefighting, and other purposes; 10,000 
medium-sized buses; and 50,000 cars.  A Korean company is to set up 
a plant to produce brake systems and Japan's two largest specialized 
automakers intend setting up assembly lines.  Chinese auto makers, 
including First Automobile Works and Second Automobile Works, have 
also been invited to set up assembly plants.  Officials say $2.5 
billion will be invested in infrastructure this year, up from last 
year's $2.1 billion.  Some 25 major construction projects include: 
An international passenger terminal and second runway at Shenzhen 
Airport; two major power stations; an oil refinery; four highways; 
and a large-scale integrated circuit manufacturing base.  (Hong Kong 
SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 16 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Guizhou Defense Enterprises Support Rural Enterprises - Rural 
enterprises in Guizhou Province have set their sights on the 
personnel, technology, equipment, products, and market superiority 
of defense enterprises.  At present, 38 counties in seven 
prefectures and cities are using defense enterprises funds, 
equipment and technology, and have set up over 130 economic lateral 
associations.  Rural enterprises have become the financial pillar of 
these counties.  Rural enterprises in all areas have greatly raised 
their overall level by absorbing over 300 defense S and T 
achievements and new technology.  Defense enterprises have 
transferred spare parts and auxiliary equipment for a number of 
products, including refrigerators, cars, and TV satellite stations, 
to rural enterprises.  The Jiangnan Space Industrial Enterprise 
Group alone has transferred over 170 auto spare parts to support the 
specialization of rural enterprises.  The Jiangnan Enterprise Group 
has invested over 100 million yuan to set up seven rural 
enterprises, and has invested over 60 million yuan to set up four 
branch plants of the Jiangnan Machinery and Electronics Plant in 
Zunyi City.  (Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO 6 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Guangzhou Per Capita GDP Highest in PRC - Guangzhou City's per 
capita GDP in 1993 was 11,490 renminbi, leading the country for the 
second successive year.  Total GDP was 71 billion renminbi, an 
increase of 23 percent over the 1992 level.  Average annual growth 
in the city in recent years has reached 21 percent, greatly 
surpassing the original goal of 11.8 percent set for the 15 years to 
the turn of the century.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0811 GMT 5 
Mar 94) 

   Guangxi Regional Airline Set for 28 March Launch - Guangxi 
Province plans to establish a new regional airline company, Guangxi 
Airline Co. Ltd., a joint venture between Guangzhou-based China 
Southern Airline and the Nanning-based Guangxi Zhizhuang Holding 
Co., beginning operations 28 March.  The new airline will have a 
fleet of 10 Boeing aircraft and will initially operate regular local 
air services to and from Nanning, Guilin, and Beihai.  These 
operations will later be expanded to include 23 Chinese cities and 
regular flight services to Hong Kong and Thailand.  In the first 
year of operation the airline will operate 100 flights per week with 
a passenger volume of 6,000.  (Hong Kong AFP 0524 GMT 11 Mar 94) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - FEATURE:  Shanghai's Successes, 
Efforts in Attracting Foreign Investments -- SUMMARY:  Attracting 
foreign investment has been an important objective in Shanghai's 
economic agenda.  The city has already succeeded in attracting a 
number of large international companies to establish businesses and 
is continuing to make strong efforts to attract new foreign 
investment. 

   According to the Shanghai WEN HUI BAO of 17 January, Shanghai 
Mayor Huang Ju stated that in 1993 Shanghai had actually received 
one-third of the $7 billion contracted foreign investments either in 
cash or equipment - a realization rate higher than the national 
average. 

   The SHANGHAI JINGJI BA0 of 18 January reported that in 1993 
Shanghai approved 3,650 new foreign investment projects, with 205 of 
them involving capital of over $10 million each.  So far, 54 
countries/areas have invested in Shanghai and 25 of the world's 100 
largest international conglomerates have set up businesses there. 
In addition, the authority to approve foreign investment projects 
under $10 million has been granted to district, county, and bureau 
authorities to improve efficiency.  In 1993, some 2,352 investment 
projects in Shanghai (excluding Pudong), or 64 percent of the total, 
were approved at the lower levels. 

   SHANGHAI JINGJIBAO also reported that foreign investment has 
expanded into the finance, real estate, commerce, food, and trade 
sectors.  Shanghai now has 26 foreign financial companies, the 
largest number in China.  Forty four of China's 500 joint ventures 
with the highest sales volumes are located in Shanghai.  The Beijing 
JINGJI CANKAO BAO of 13 February reports that Shanghai plans to 
allow foreign financial companies to engage in renminbi business on 
a limited basis.  Under the current conditions, foreign companies 
will first be allowed to conduct renminbi deposit and loan business 
with foreign-invested enterprises and those state enterprises that 
receive supplementary renminbi loans along with foreign loans. 
Statistics show that so far, Shanghai has approved over 6,000 
foreign investment projects and has already attracted over $13 
billion in foreign capital. 

   JINGJI CANKAO BAO also reported that this year, Shanghai plans to 
open approximately 100 industrial projects of over 10 million each 
in petro-chemical, metallurgy, power station, communications, tire, 
computer, and bearing sectors to attract foreign investors.  In 
addition to joint ventures, new methods of cooperation will be 
adopted.  The city plans to cooperate with foreign firms in retail, 
wholesale, capital goods, and trade businesses and will promulgate 
preferential policies to attract international finance companies to 
establish offices there. 

   Individual districts in Shanghai have also taken their own 
initiatives to attract foreign investments.  The Shanghai WEN HUI 
BAO of 1 February reported that the government has greatly lowered 
development costs in Shanghai's Nanshi District so that foreign 
investors can enjoy a good return.  In addition to holding weekly 
receptions for foreign investors, the approval period for foreign 
investment projects in Nanshi is being reduced from 62 to 40 days. 
   The WEN HUI BAO of 29 January reported that Shanghai's Hongkou 
District has also made major breakthroughs in foreign investment. 
Real estate renovation through land leasing--tearing down old houses 
and constructing skyscrapers--has become a major project.  In 1994, 
Hongkou plans to open a new section to attract foreign 
participation. 

   The SHANGHAI JINGJI BAO of 25 January reported Shanghai's Pudong 
New District further accelerated the pace of foreign investment in 
1993 and attracted 924 new foreign enterprises along with $3.125 
billion in capital.  Of these enterprises, 43.5 percent are engaged 
in production and 56.5 percent in service industries (now extending 
to over 30 different fields).  Sixty nine percent out of the 140 
export-oriented foreign enterprises approved in 1993 have already 
started to show a profit. 

   Anhui Increases Foreign Investment, Enterprises in 1993 - In 
1993, Anhui Province approved 1,039 new joint ventures, a 50 percent 
increase over 1992.  The total investment was $1.98 billion, and 
registered capital was $1.36 billion.  Foreign businessmen increased 
investment in energy and transportation projects, and the tertiary 
industry.  In 1993, joint ventures earned over $80 million in 
foreign exchange from exports, a 90 percent increase over 1992. 
Joint venture exports accounted for 8 percent of all exports, 
compared to 5.6 percent in 1992.  (Hefei ANHUI RIBAO 8 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Shenzhen Foreign Trade Authority Announces New Tilt in Nine 
Policies - In order to make more progress in Shenzhen City's foreign 
trade work and to carry out the  more export, more foreign exchange" 
policy promulgated by the State Council, Shenzhen City's Bureau of 
Trade and Development is promoting nine "tilt policies." 

   First, the tax rebate procedure will be simplified and unified 
state tax rebate policy will be implemented.  The tax rebate 
procedure will require only one invoice and one certificate instead 
of two invoices and two certificates as in 1992.  The audit and 
review process will also be strengthened. 

   Secondly, a loan policy favoring the expansion of exports will be 
introduced.  All banks will guarantee loans on the priority basis 
needed by export businesses and must favorably support the loan 
repayment and the use of foreign exchange from the foreign-owned 
projects in energy, communication, transportation, and the service 
industry. 

   The third policy calls for reducing the burden on export 
businesses and encouraging their competitiveness.  Starting in 1994, 
the regulation on taking back 0.05 yuan for every U.S. dollar that 
these businesses export will be cancelled. 

   The fourth policy is designed to encourage export businesses to 
better use and manage their regulating fund and to develop ocean 
shipping markets.  The Shenzhen city government will borrow 30 
million yuan from its financial revenue and, through the State 
Administration of Trade Development, give it to the export 
businesses to use for these purposes. 

   The fifth policy mandates public bidding on the distribution of 
permits and quota commodities and the creation of fair competitive 
environment. 

   The sixth policy seeks to reduce the export businesses' tax 
burden within the scope of financial policies and to lend support to 
them in developing export enterprises. 

   The seventh policy encourages the active development of import 
processing and re-exports operations and business operations that 
process imported raw materials.  Under the new system, export 
businesses will be allowed to sign contracts with each side deciding 
on its own prices. 

   The eighth policy is designed to relax restrictions on export 
businesses' scope of operations.  Under the new guidelines, except 
for the commodities covered by quota permits as stipulated by state 
regulation, all other commodities can be exported. 

   Finally, the process of evaluating import/export rights will be 
improved. Those businesses that do not meet the standards of exports 
and earning foreign exchange will have their export operating rights 
rescinded and tax refund privileges confiscated.  (Shenzhen SHENZHEN 
TEQU BAO 29 Jan 94 p 1) 

   PRC-Funded Firms Boost Booming Hong Kong Real Estate Market - As 
Hong Kong office and residential real estate prices reach further 
heights, with the territory projected to overtake Tokyo as the most 
expensive business center in the world, two Chinese officials have 
voiced concerns over the activities of PRC-funded enterprises in the 
Hong Kong real estate market. 

   On 17 March, EASTERN EXPRESS reports on page 26 that a new study 
by realtor Jones Lang Wootton points to further rent rises and 
rising capital values in all areas of the Hong Kong real estate 
market.  The study states that with chronic shortages of Grade-A 
office space, especially in Central district, and an equally serious 
supply crunch in terms of high-end accommodation to house incoming 
executives, office and residential rents are set to surpass Tokyo. 
The study says commercial and office rents rose 40 percent in 1993 
and rose another 10 percent in the first two months of 1994. 
Residential rents also surged, with rents rising by between 30 and 
70 percent depending on the quality and location of the 
accommodation.  The study credits mainland-backed investors with a 
23.2- percent share of the HK$57.5 billion of identifiable real 
estate transactions in 1993. 

   The role of PRC-funded firms in stoking the Hong Kong real estate 
market has attracted the scrutiny of Chen Yuan, vice president of 
the People's Bank of China and son of elder leader Chen Yun.  A 
report by the Beijing-based press agency ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE at 1442 
GMT on 17 March cites Chen Yuan declaring his opposition to 
speculative activities in the market by PRC-funded organizations. 
Highlighting concerns that badly needed capital is being diverted 
from China to earn quick profits in Hong Kong, Chen Yuan stated that 
China faced a shortage of foreign exchange and construction capital, 
and he had a "disapproving attitude" towards PRC-funded entities 
speculating in the Hong Kong real estate market.  However, Chen Yuan 
said that it was normal for PRC-funded enterprises in Hong Kong to 
buy office buildings and residences for their staff, adding that the 
Bank of China ran its banking business in Hong Kong independently, 
determining its scale of mortgage lending according to the market 
situation.  Chen Yuan also noted that the People's Bank of China was 
not paying any special attention to the issue. 

   Lu Ping, director of the State Council's Hong Kong and Macao 
Affairs Office, has also commented on the role of PRC-funded 
companies in the real estate market.  ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE at 1400 
GMT on 17 March cites Lu Ping, in remarks to a group of Hong Kong 
delegates to the National People's Congress, as saying that China- 
funded enterprises should refrain from actions detrimental to Hong 
Kong's prosperity and stability.  Lu said that these firms should 
not engage in real estate trading activities and that, as they were 
using state funds, they had an unfair advantage over other market 
players. 
   Hong Kong Investment Funds Created for PRC Investment - More 
investment funds are being established in Hong Kong to facilitate 
investment on the mainland.  Taiwan's Jun Tai Group and the Shanghai 
International Trust and Investment Company are organizing a 
"Shanghai Development Fund" with $150 million to invest in 
enterprises in Shanghai; the U.S.-based Boston Pacific Technology 
and Investment Fund is cooperating with financial organizations on 
the mainland to set up funds to invest in projects in Shanghai; and 
the U.S.-based multinational GE Financial Services has joined other 
companies to promote a $50-million China Industrial Investment Fund. 
In addition, a China fund aimed at investing in high-tech projects 
is likely to be established this year, while 34 state enterprises 
and financial organizations on the mainland are discussing the idea 
of establishing a "Chinese Enterprises Development Fund" in Beijing 
with a Hong Kong company.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1020 GMT 
15 Mar 94) 

   Hong Kong Dominates Foreign Investment in Beijing - Beijing by 5 
March of 1994 had approved 7,521 foreign funded enterprises of all 
types with contracted foreign investment of $18.5 billion and 
realized foreign investment of $10.24 billion.  Hong Kong interests 
were represented in 3461 enterprises, with a total capital 
investment of $5.76 billion.  Taiwan investors provided $878 million 
in 948 enterprises.  Together, Hong Kong and Taiwan investors 
accounted for 58 percent of foreign investment in Beijing.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0808 GMT 5 Mar 94) 

   Wholesale Grain, Oil Markets Show Rapid Development - China's 
wholesale markets for grain and vegetable oil have shown rapid 
development and there are now two state-level markets, the Zhengzhou 
Wholesale Grain Market and the Shanghai Grain and Vegetable 0il 
Exchange.  There are also over 10 provincial-level wholesale 
markets, dozens of regional wholesale markets, and over 80,000 
primary grain markets.  According to statistics, 13 provincial 
wholesale grain markets from January to November 1993 showed a 
business volume of 55.53 million tonnes, 260 percent up from the 
similar period in 1992.  The Zhengzhou Wholesale Grain Market, since 
its inception, has had a business volume of 4.1 million tonnes and 
its prices have become the benchmark for the grain business 
throughout the country.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0810 GMT 5 Mar 
94) 

   Golden Resources Sets Up Rice Processing Venture in Vietnam - 
Golden Resources Development has taken a 55 percent stake in a $10 
million joint venture in Vietnam to process and trade rice.  Hong 
Kong's biggest rice distributor has signed a 50-year joint venture 
agreement with the four major rice producing provinces in Vietnam: 
Long An, Dong Thap, Tien Giang, and An Giang, which together account 
for 40 percent of the country's production.  Vietnam's trade 
representative in Hong Kong, Huynh Minh Hue, said the venture was 
the largest of its kind so far.  Golden Resources' share of the 
investment will be used to build a processing plant and to provide 
working capital.  The managing director of Golden Resources, David 
Lam, said the company hoped to raise the quality of Vietnamese rice, 
so as to command higher prices on the world market.  (Hong Kong 
SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 8 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Guangdong Governor Wants More Foreign Banks, Cites Funds Shortage 
- Guangdong Governor Zhu Senlin says that his province is suffering 
from a shortage of funds and will try to absorb at least $10 billion 
in foreign investment.  He also said that Guangdong should try to 
attract more foreign banks and China-funded banks in Hong Kong and 
Macao to set up branches in the province.  At the moment, Guangzhou 
only has seven branches and 24 representative offices of foreign 
banks, falling far behind Shanghai.  Zhu requested the head office 
of the People's Bank of China to consider easing the number of 
foreign banks allowed into Guangzhou.  Zhu WanIi, governor of the 
Guangdong branch of the People's Bank of China, said that Guangdong 
should make better use of the fund management experience and skills 
of Hong Kong and Macao.  He also commented on the shortage of 
circulating funds that has landed many enterprises in dire straits, 
saying:  It is imperative to put an end to ill-planned capital 
construction and use available resources on efficient enterprises to 
speed up the circulation of funds in a positive direction.  (Hong 
Kong TA KUNG PAO Chinese 14 Mar 94 p 3) 

   South African Bank Opens Representative Office in Beijing - 
Nedbank, one of South Africa's big four banks, became the first from 
that country to set up a representative office in Beijing 16 March, 
despite the lack of diplomatic relations.  John Maree, president of 
Nedbank's parent group Nedcor, said bilateral trade has more than 
tripled from $200 million in 1992 to $660 million in 1993.  Beijing 
decided last October to lift trade and economic sanctions against 
South Africa after 30 years and trade this year is expected to reach 
$1 billion.  "South Africa is the gateway for Chinese firms into the 
huge African market," Maree said.  China mainly imports steel, coal, 
wool, gold, and raw materials from South Africa and exports textiles 
and electrical goods.  0ver 20 Chinese companies have opened 
representative offices in Johannesburg.  (Hong Kong AFP 0609 GMT 16 
Mar 94) 

   Shandong Reports Use of Foreign Government Loans - By the end of 
1993, Shandong had signed more than 160 contracts on the use of 
foreign government loans.  The actual amount of the loans used total 
$1.5 billion.  Most of the projects developed with the loans have 
created economic and social benefits.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 
GMT 2 Mar 94) 

   Danish Company Plans Investment in Tianjin Development Zone - A 
Danish company plans to invest in a project producing enzyme 
derivatives for industrial use and insulin in Tianjin Development 
Zone.  The letter of intent was signed at the Tianjin Municipal 
Government 0ffice on 26 February with Mayor Zhang Lichang.  This 
project will cover an area of 170,000 square meters with an 
investment of about $200 million.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBA0 27 Feb 94 
p 1) 

   Tianjin Plans To Build Four Projects With Singapore - After two 
days of inspection and talks, Singaporean businessmen signed four 
letters of intent with Tianjin's relevant departments on 26 February 
on establishing four projects in Tianjin, including a plant to 
jointly produce plastic products with an investment of 32 million 
yuan; a company for handling and delivering containerized goods; a 
company for handling the storage of oil at Tianjin oil wharf; and a 
bonded goods circulation center with an investment of $100 million. 
(Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 27 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Taiwan Shipping Giant To Invest in Mainland Facilities - The 
Taiwan shipping giant Chang Jung Group has decided that its two 
subsidiaries will invest $50 million and $30 million respectively in 
mainland projects.  This is the first mainland investment ever 
undertaken by any listed Taiwan shipping company and will prepare 
for the opening of direct shipping links between the two sides of 
the strait.  The planned investments will concentrate on piers, 
container distribution areas, and trailers at ports such as 
Shanghai, Qingdao, and Shenzhen's Shekou.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE 0953 GMT 13 Mar 94) 

   Taiwan Company Invests in Fujian, Shanghai - Taiwan's leading 
warehousing enterprise, Far East Warehousing Company, recently 
started setting up operation bases in mainland China.  Apart from 
the bonded warehouse project at Shanghai's Waigaoqiao which has been 
finalized, its next investment project will be aimed at Fujian's 
Zhangzhou Bay.  The company's investment in port-related projects on 
the mainland mainly covers facilities in the hinterland of the 
ports.  In cooperation with the mainland partners, it will first 
make small investments to establish footholds and prepare for direct 
links between the two sides.  In Shanghai, for example, it will 
cooperate with its mainland partner in running a bonded warehouse at 
Waigaoqiao.  The joint investment will be $3 million, of which Far 
East Warehousing will contribute 49 percent or $1.47 million.  (Hong 
Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1025 GMT 2 Mar 94) 

   Guangxi's Beihai City To Set Up Industrial City With Singapore 
Help - A Singapore business leader and the mayor of Beihai recently 
signed a memorandum on the construction of a Singapore Industrial 
City, which will occupy 10,000 mu of land in Tieshan Port Industrial 
Zone in Guangxi's Beihai City.  The land tenure offered by Beihai 
City Government is for a period of 50 years and is renewable with 
government approval.  The city government will provide all 
infrastructural facilities, while the Singapore side will be 
responsible for overall planning, leveling, waste disposal, 
attracting investment, property management, and so on.  This 
industrial city is intended as a base for the development of 
advanced industries, on a par with Singapore's industrial 
sophistication, and to create new jobs and import new technology and 
management techniques.  (Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO11 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Shenzhen Reaches Agreement With South Korean Firm on Oil Refinery 
- China Petrochemical Corp (Sinopec) has reached agreement in 
principle with Yukong Ltd, South Korea's leading refinery company, 
to build a $1.5-billion oil refining project in Shenzhen Special 
Economic Zone, Guangdong Province.  This is the biggest venture 
involving South Korea since diplomatic ties were established in 
1992.  The refinery will have the capacity to process 100,000 to 
150,000 barrels of oil per day.  Yukong will hold 40 percent of the 
equity, the rest being owned equally by the state-owned Sinopec and 
the Shenzhen City Government.  Yukong has a long-term agreement to 
import 10,000 barrels of oil per day from China. Sinopec is the 
largest industrial corporation in the PRC, with 690,000 employees, a 
registered share capital of $2.5 billion, and assets valued at $15 
billion.  It has investments in Japan, Hong Kong, and Thailand. 
(Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA SUNDAY MORNING POST (SUNDAY MONEY) 13 Mar 94 
p 2) 

   Heilongjiang Imports Telephone Switchboards From Australia - 
Qingan County in Heilongjiang Province formally put its program- 
controlled telephone switchboards with a total capacity of 6,000 
lines into operation on 15 March, thus becoming one of 
Heilongjiang's counties with advanced telecommunications equipment 
imported from Australia.  This equipment is jointly financed by the 
World Bank and Qingan County with a total investment of 17 million 
yuan.  After putting this equipment into operation, Qingan County 
will change its telephone number from five digits to six.  (Harbin 
Heilongjiang Radio 2200 GMT 14 Mar 94) 

   Heilongjiang Uses German Loan To Upgrade Switchboards - 
Heilongjiang Post and Telecommunications Bureau has decided to use 
$100 million of a low-interest loan from Germany to introduce 
program-controlled telephone switchboards with 79,600 channels.  On 
10 March, the China Post and Telecommunications Equipment Company, 
the Heilongjiang Provincial Post and Telecommunications Bureau, and 
a German company jointly signed this contract.  These telephone 
switchboards will be installed in 14 cities and counties in 
Heilongjiang, including Qiqihar, Mudanjiang, Jiamusi, Daqing, and 
Hulin.  It is planned that all these telephone switchboards will be 
put into operation prior to June 1995.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 
2200 GMT 10 Mar 94) 
   Tianjin Signs First Joint-Venture Agreement With Poland - On 11 
March, Tianjin Alcohol Plant and a company in Poland signed a letter 
of intent to jointly building a brewery in Tianjin.  The brewery 
will produce vodka wine with alcohol material provided by the 
municipal plant and production technology by the Polish side.  The 
total investment in this joint-venture project is $1.5 million.  It 
is the first Sino-Polish enterprise in Tianjin.  (Tianjin Radio 2300 
GMT 11 Mar 94) 

   Hutchison To Build 12-Billion-Yuan Power Plant in Shenzhen - 
Hutchison Whampoa will build and operate a thermal power plant 
outside Shenzhen, according to an agreement signed with the Shenzhen 
Electricity Bureau.  Total output from the first phase of the 
proposed plant will be 2540 megawatts.  According to Shenzhen Vice 
Mayor Li Guangzhen, the Eastern Power Plant will be developed in 
several phases and will involve a total investment of 12 billion 
yuan.  Li Guangzhen's assistant, Li Jangguo, said an agreement had 
been signed with Hutchison earlier this year and site preparation 
work had already begun.  (HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 16 
Mar 94 p 1) 

   Fujian's Fuzhou City Uses Foreign Funds For Agricultural 
Development - Last year, Fuzhou City agricultural and sideline 
products industries attracted $1 billion in direct foreign 
investment in over 450 items.  This investment helped the city earn 
$200 million in exports.  The city exported agricultural and 
sideline products valued at over 1 billion renminbi to over 20 
foreign countries and regions last year.  The foreign investors are 
mainly from Japan, the United States, France, Singapore, Indonesia, 
Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0810 GMT 
5 Mar 94) 

   Taiwan:  Taiwan's 1993 Mainland Investment Trend Outlined - By 
October 1993, China had approved more than 15,100 requests by 
Taiwanese enterprises to do business on the mainland for a total 
negotiated cost of $13.6 billion.  Many Taiwanese industry and 
business people pointed out that cross-Strait economic cooperation 
has contributed to the development of the Taiwan economy. 

   Taiwan's investment areas on the mainland have rapidly expanded 
from the southeast coastal area into all the coastal and some of the 
interior areas.  There was a sharp increase of Taiwanese investment 
in and around the Changjiang River, Bohai region, and inland areas, 
and even in the remote provinces and autonomous regions such as 
Qinghai and Tibet.  In the Changjiang River region, Shanghai alone 
had approved 482 direct Taiwan investment projects between January 
and September with a negotiated cost of $430 million dollars.  This 
amount has exceeded both the total number of investment projects and 
the total cost for the past five years.  Anhui Province has newly 
approved a group of Taiwan's investment projects whose total numbers 
and total investment amount have increased several fold.  Jiangsu 
Province has the largest number of Taiwanese businesses.  Taiwan's 
investment in the interior provinces such as Sichuan and Shanxi 
increased by a big margin.  The northeast region has also become a 
hot spot for Taiwanese investment; Liaoning Province alone has 
attracted investment from more than 300 Taiwan businesses between 
January and September, far exceeding the total combined numbers of 
the previous nine years. 

   Taiwan's cross-Strait investment in 1993 has the following 
special characteristics: 

   One, there has been an increase in long-term investment and an 
expansion of investment areas.  In addition to investing in labor- 
intensive processing industries, Taiwan businessmen have invested in 
the capital-intensive and new technology-intensive enterprises, and 
in basic infrastructure projects such as transportation, energy, and 
communications. They have also set up a whole series of new high- 
tech enterprises involving plasma slicers, laser products, 
biological projects, and computers in addition to expanding in the 
areas of finance and real estate.  In recent years, Taiwan 
businessmen have actively focused their mainland investments on 
long-term strategic development, investing in plants and factories, 
seeking land use rights, and even building built factories and 
employee housing themselves. 

   Two, investment scales have hit new heights and business 
structures have undergone drastic changes.  Estimates announced by 
the Council of Economic Planning and Development show that Taiwanese 
not only invest in the long-term capital-intensive and high-tech 
businesses, but also in all types of cross-industry, large-scale 
investments manifesting a pluralistic developmental approach. 
According to the same estimates, 64 percent of Taiwan's 
manufacturing industry investing in the mainland have already 
invested $2.65 billion in the first eight months of 1993, accounting 
for a 13-fold increase over the same period in 1992.  Taiwanese 
businesses investing in the similar industries have joined together 
and established their own industrial regions, processing zones, and 
other cluster-oriented areas on the mainland, such as a bicycle 
production region in Kunshan, Jiangsu Province, a "computer street" 
in Shanghai, and a Taiwan machinery-specialization zone in Xiaoshan, 
Zhejiang Province.  This large-scale and pluralistic grouping trend 
in Taiwan's investment in China will continue.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 15 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Companies Planning To Invest in Mainland's Hainan Province - 
According to a 21 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN article by Yosahiko 
Sakurai, one of the paper's Hong Kong correspondents, private-sector 
Taiwan companies are planning large investments in China's Hainan 
Province.  A 200-man inspection group will visit Hainan in late 
March to assess investment areas, while a trade promotion group, the 
"Hainan-Taiwan Economic Cooperation Promotion Committee," has 
already been organized and is chaired by Hainan's vice governor.  At 
present Taiwanese investment in Hainan is primarily small in scale, 
such as investment in restaurants. 

   Sakurai notes that in January 1994, Lien Chan, president of 
Taiwan's Executive Yuan, visited Singapore and proposed to Prime 
Minister Goh Chok Tong that Taiwanese and Singapore companies 
jointly undertake investment projects in Hainan, a step that would 
help protect Taiwanese investments.  The outcome of Lien's visit 
reportedly heightened enthusiasm toward investing in Hainan on the 
part of Taiwanese companies. 

   The purpose of the trade promotion committee, which is based in 
Haikou, Hainan's capital, is to promote two-way economic cooperation 
and expedite the introduction of Taiwanese investment.  The honorary 
chairman of the committee is Du Qinglin, Hainan's NPC delegate, and 
the chairman is Vice Governor Mao Zhijun.  Hainan is seeking "large- 
scale Taiwan cooperation" in the petroleum, natural gas development, 
agriculture, fishing, and basic infrastructural sectors, Sakurai 
reports. 

   The 200-person corporate inspection group, Taiwan's "largest 
company inspection group ever," will visit Hainan from 25 to 30 
March.  For its part, Hainan's government has "growing expectations" 
concerning Taiwanese investment in the province, one of the five 
Chinese special economic zone, where foreign investment "has 
lagged." 

   Sakurai maintains that one uncertainty regarding investment in 
Hainan is "deep-seated opposition" to promoting trade with China 
among Taiwanese governmental officials.  Because of this, people 
involved in this issue reportedly feel "the situation remains fluid" 
whether large-scale Taiwan investment in Hainan "will progress 
smoothly." 

   Minister of Economic Affairs Warns Taipei To Avoid Super 301 - 
Commenting on 3 March on U.S. moves to revive super article 301 
against Japan and other countries, Minister of Economic Affairs 
Chiang Ping-kun said that even though the article is aimed at Japan, 
and despite the fact that Taiwan's foreign trade surplus against the 
United States declined in 1993 to $6.76 billion from a peak of $16 
billion, the not-too-open Taiwan market may still make it a possible 
U.S. target.  As the United States has been exerting pressure on 
Taiwan to open up its domestic market, Taiwan should properly 
restructure its market before joining GATT at the end of 1994. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 4 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Plans To Export Arms, Planes, Missiles - In a report to Premier 
Lien Chan on 7 March, Minister of Defense Sun Chen said the Defense 
Ministry plans to cooperate with the civilian sector in 
commercializing for export defense industry products such as 
missiles and planes.  Sun Chen noted that the shifting of the 
defense industry to manufacturing civilian products has been 
promoted for many years, adding that concrete results have been made 
in the manufacturing of communications equipment, radar, chemical 
weapons protection gear, and electronics equipment for military 
purposes in cooperation with the civilian sector.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 8 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Exports to United States Reverse Course, Increase in Dec 93, Jan 
94 - After declining for six consecutive months in 1993, Taiwan's 
exports to the United States in December 1993 and January 1994 
reached $2 billion and $1.9 billion respectively, up 8.8 percent and 
8.7 percent respectively over the corresponding months in 1992 and 
1993.  The United States is the largest importer of Taiwanese 
exports, absorbing some 28 percent of the nation's total exports. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 3 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Competitive Edge in U.S., Japan Deteriorates - A quarterly report 
released on 7 March by the Industry Development Bureau shows the 
Republic of China's export competitive edge in the United States and 
Japan is deteriorating rapidly in terms of constant market share. 
In the U.S. market, the competitive edge declined by 42 percent 
compared with five years ago, while in the Japanese market it 
declined between 42 and 52 percent compared with six years ago. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO Mar 94 p 2) 

   National Council Views Impact of Entry Into GATT on Local 
Industries - According to Taiwan's Council for Economic Planning and 
Development, after Taiwan joins GATT and lowers its tariffs, it will 
import greater amounts of raw materials for the agricultural and 
industrial sectors.  While manufacturers' output will occupy a 
smaller proportion of the gross national product, the output of 
export-oriented manufacturers will increase.  Agricultural output 
and the number of related workers will drop considerably.  Both 
imports and exports will increase.  A large number of foreign 
competitors will join Taiwan's service industry, a situation which 
will result in the improvement of services because of fierce 
competition.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 26 Feb 94 p 13) 

   Profit Rate of Manufacturing Sector Declines - The average 
selling price of Taiwan's major export products continued to decline 
in 1993, and the profit rate of the manufacturing sector averaged 
only 5.6 percent, the lowest in the past 8 years, according to the 
Council for Economic Planning and Development under the Executive 
Yuan.  The council noted Taiwan's exports grew only 4.3 percent in 
1993 and that the profit rate of its textile, timber, woolen, pulp, 
paper, and basic metal products averaged less than 4 percent.  Only 
the profit rate of nonmetal mineral products exceeded 7 percent. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 8 Mar 94 p 2) 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  DPRK's Interest in 'Chinese-Style 
Economic Reforms' Noted - SUMMARY:  Since the 1980's, North Korea 
has ruled out the possibility of adopting "Chinese-style economic 
reforms" and even declared that "establishing special economic zones 
does not suit our interests" when it introduced its joint venture 
law in 1984.  However, in 1991, the government  changed directions 
by making Najin and Sonbong free trade zones and is now planning to 
do the same in other areas of the country, according to South Korean 
press reports.  A recent article in a Seoul journal features the 
views of two experts on North Korea on the DPRK's interest in 
China's reforms and the prospect for change in North Korea. 

   The 14 February CHUNGANG ILBO quotes an unnamed Chinese expert on 
North Korea who says that the DPRK is planning to make Sinuiju and 
Nampo special economic zones.  With Najin and Sonbong on its eastern 
shore, and Sinuiju and Nampo on its western shore, the DPRK expects 
to reap economic benefits from these areas "much sooner" than from 
the UN-sponsored Tumen River free trade zone project, CHUNGANG 
states.  The 1 March MUNHWA ILBO echoes CHUNGANG's views and reveals 
that Chongjin and Wonsan are also slated to  become special economic 
zones. 

   In the 3 February SISA JOURNAL, Kim Pong-tok, a professor at 
Northeast Finance University in China, gave the following reasons as 
to why North Korea would be interested in China's approach to 
reform: a) China has made economic reform a priority, allowing 
social changes when timing and conditions are right, in order to 
"minimize shock;" b) China has been able to maintain a "socialist 
structure" under "communist leadership;" and c) if reforms are well 
planned from the outset, they can take place gradually, as they are 
in China.  Kim notes several indications that the DPRK may be 
adopting "Chinese-style economic reforms:"  a) North Korea has 
relaxed the rules on private ownership; b) since 1985, the DPRK has 
slowly changed its centrally controlled and planned economic system, 
allowing various industries a certain degree of freedom; c) the 
government has reduced the scope of central management; and d) North 
Korea has opened special economic zones, under new investment 
regulations.  Kim points out that North Korea's joint venture law 
offers foreigners more favorable terms than China's law, and 
concludes by saying that "North Korea could rise as a new star of 
the Far East, if reform is properly handled." 

   SISA also reports the views of Ho Mun-yong, a prominent 
researcher at the National Unification Research Institute, regarding 
North Korea's outlook on China's reforms.  Ho believes that Kim Il- 
song's visit to China in 1982, Kim Chong-il's tour of the Shenzhen 
special economic zone in 1983, and the enactment of the joint 
venture law in 1984 are indications that the DPRK is moving toward 
Chinese-style reforms.  According to Ho, North Korea's interest in 
PRC economic reforms was "intense," but the government was "afraid" 
of following the Chinese Government's lead because of the risk of 
"ideological corruption by outside forces." 

   In Ho's opinion, the DPRK has "very little choice" but to make 
economic changes in order to maintain a political system that will 
allow Kim Chong-il to succeed his father.  Kim has to do something 
extraordinary" to establish his own credentials and "what better 
way to do that than to show leadership by boosting the economy and 
improving the standard of living through economic reforms?"  Ho 
notes that North Korea has marked "1990-1993 as a survival period, 
1994-96 as an adjustment period, and the post-1997 years as a well- 
to-do period."  He also predicts that North Korea will continue to 
change its economic policies. 

   Efforts Marking Beginning of 'Adjustment Period' Reported - 
Various industries are reportedly making "extraordinary" efforts to 
give  the "adjustment period" a "successful" start.  The 26 March 
Factory in Pyongyang has increased its productivity by utilizing 
industrial waste materials "effectively" and has found a way to 
produce insulators using common domestic raw materials.  Other 
industries in Pyongyang have already produced over 6,000 tons of 
steel and 106,000 of general material items in 90 different 
categories.  Also, over 90,000 small farming equipment items  of 20 
different types were distributed to Pyongyang area farmers to mark 
the opening year of the "adjustment period."  (Pyongyang NODONG 
SINMUN 20 Jan 94 p 1) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Trade Ministry Announces New China Policy 
- SUMMARY:  South Korea's Trade Ministry has issued a paper 
outlining the country's new plans for economic relations with China, 
according to ROK press reports.  Highlights include shifting from 
light to heavy industry, redirecting investment southward, and 
cooperating in five high-tech fields including nuclear energy. 
Seoul is backing its drive into China-with a full range of direct 
and indirect subsidies designed to give ROK firms an advantage over 
competitors. 

   On 17 February, South Korea's Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy (MOTIE) released a report entitled "Comprehensive Measures 
for Making Inroads into China," outlining the ROK's latest plans for 
economic relations with the PRC.  As reported in the 18 February 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), the policy seeks to "build a 
comprehensive support structure for economic cooperation including 
trade, investment, and industrial cooperation."  Unlike previous ROK 
economic ventures into China which were "one-sided and impromptu," 
the current plan takes into account the experiences of Japan, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, and other competitors in their dealings with 
China to help South Korea meet its challenges more effectively, the 
newspaper says. 

   Among the plan's concrete aspects, MKS reports the ROK Government 
will "greatly enlarge" its "Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund" and 
the Export-Import Bank's "Deferred Payment Export Fund" to "expand 
the scale on which our companies will be able to provide important 
plants and facilities which China needs to move forward with its 
plans for economic development."  The paper reports that the former 
fund is supporting China investors this year with some $50 million, 
and that the figure will grow to $5 billion by 1996.  At present, 
there are nine China-related deferred payment applications with a 
total value of $1.2 billion, according to the report.  MOTIE intends 
to "accelerate" this by making China "the main target for deferred 
payment export financing."  South Korea "through support measure 
like this will prepare an opportunity for itself to secure a 
favorable position vis-a'-vis competing countries," the ministry 
states. 

   MOTIE considers it "urgent" that South Korea build its own 
distribution network in China and is working on a plan to accomplish 
this, according to MKS.  The ministry aims to put a stop to "South 
Korean companies' indiscriminate investment in China, which has been 
lopsided by region," and will select "business sectors in which 
China investment will be encouraged," by dropping, for example, the 
requirement for prior approval.  "Other types of financial support" 
will also be given, such as raising the ceiling on "Overseas 
Investment Fund" loans from 70 percent for large firms and 80 
percent for small and medium businesses, to 90 percent for both. 

   Commenting on MOTIE's plan, the 18 February TONGA ILBO reports 
the government will enact measures to reduce the concentration of 
South Korean investment in Manchuria and redirect investment toward 
Shanghai and further south.  The newspaper also says that ROK trade 
offices, now limited to Beijing and Shanghai, will be expanded to 
Dalian and Chongqing.  Five particular areas of industrial 
cooperation will be pursued according to MOTIE's agenda: aircraft, 
automobiles, time-division exchange (TDX) switching equipment, 
nuclear energy, and high-definition television (HDTV).  TONGA ILBO 
reports cooperation in aviation will be in the form of a joint 
program to build a mid-size 100-passenger airplane.  (No mention is 
made of how this ties in with MOTIE's plans to produce a mid-size 
aircraft with a European partner.  See related article in this issue 
of the PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW.)  In the automotive sector, 
TONGA ILBO reports MOTIE wants to export finished cars to China, in 
addition to producing them locally.  Plans for cooperation in the 
nuclear field include "operation and control" of a nuclear power 
station in Guangdong, exporting generating equipment, and building 
nuclear power plants.  MOTIE reportedly is also encouraging 
exchanges of technology and personnel. 

   The 19 February MKS reports on how South Korean conglomerates are 
gearing up for large investments in China in anticipation of 
government support for increased involvement.  ROK investments, 
which have been primarily in assembly and light industry, will shift 
to cars and other forms of heavy industry.  Major projects planned 
or under way are reported to include the following. 


                    Major ROK Investment Projects in China 
                         (figures in million dollars) 

Company    Project            Location       Scale        Investment 

Samsung    Heavy equipment    Liaoning   1,000 pieces         13.0 
           VCR factory                   600,000 units 
Hyundai    Auto assembly      Dalian     300,000 cars 
           Semiconductors     Shanghai                        50.0 
           Car audio sets     Tianjin    300,000 units         2.0 
Lucky-     VCR's              Shanghai 
Goldstar   Color CRT's        Changsha                       100.0 
           Audio equipment               1,000,000 sets 
           TDX factory        Shandong   1,000,000 units 
Daewoo     Cement             Shandong   2,400,000 tons      300.0 
           a/c compressors               150,000 units        10.0 
           Bus assembly       Shanghai                       900.0 
           Bus assembly       Guangxi    2,500 buses          35.0 
           Pipes              Guangdong  100,000 tons         29.0 
Sunkyong   Oil refinery       Shenzhen   150,000 barrels   1,100.0 
           Video tapes                   18,000,000 tapes      8.5 
Ssangyong  Cement             Shanghai   600,000 tons 
Daerim     Octanol                       100,000 tons        150.0 
Posco      Cold-rolled steel  Liaoning   300,000 tons 



   Other projects reported are tire cord, cotton spinning, 
polyester, cranes, construction equipment, transmissions, trash 
trucks, and beer. 

   FEATURE:  ROK Announces Decision on Mid-Size Aircraft - SUMMARY: 
The South Korean Trade Ministry's announcement that a single 
domestic firm will "lead" the development of the country's first 
indigenous commercial aircraft has drawn charges of "favoritism" 
among companies less likely to be selected, according to Seoul press 
reports.  The 50-100 passenger design will be pursued with technical 
support from a European aircraft manufacturer.  China's involvement 
on some level is being considered to facilitate overseas sales. 

   According to a plan made public on 7 February by the ROK's 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) reported by MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) the following day, South Korea's government 
will sponsor development of a mid-size 50-100 passenger aircraft 
through a domestic consortium under one leading company, with 
technical help from a foreign manufacturer, probably European.  Work 
is scheduled to begin later this year, after a decision is made on 
what companies will participate, and will be finished by 1998. 
MOTIE's announcement reportedly ends months of speculation over the 
type of aircraft to be developed and how the project will be 
apportioned among domestic companies (see PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC 
REVIEW Vol 2 No 25, 15 Dec 93 pp 29-30 and Vol 3 No 1, 12 Jan 94 pp 
26-27 for earlier reporting). 

   MOTIE chose the 50-100 passenger design based on estimated 
domestic demand for 170 units of an aircraft this size by the year 
2000, with an export potential of another 100 planes, according to 
the 8 February CHOSON ILBO.  The ROK Government will pay half the 
279 billion won ($349 million) development costs as part of its goal 
to make South Korea 10th in aircraft worldwide by the next decade. 
The newspaper reports MOTIE will "direct and supervise" the project 
while private companies carry out the developmental work. 

   MKS reports the government will select by this May the "leading 
company" within a consortium of domestic manufacturers, whose stake 
in the project will be less than 50 percent.  The share of other ROK 
firms will depend on their actual roles.  All companies in the 
consortium will work together on design, equipment, parts 
manufacture, and mass production, but only the leading company will 
perform final assembly and afterservice, according to CHOSON ILBO. 
Except Samsung which reportedly is the "strongest contender," all 
other candidates, including Daewoo, Korea Air, Hyundai, and Halla, 
oppose the concept of a leading company as "favoritism." 

   Several of the firms cited above have already signed cooperative 
agreements with Asian countries and are "extremely dissatisfied" 
with the government's decision to limit foreign cooperation to a 
single firm.  Candidates said by MKS to be "under consideration" are 
all European: England's BAE, Spain's CASA, and Sweden's Saab, MKS 
reports.  MOTIE's quest for a foreign partner stems from its 
"concerns' that local technology is inadequate, and that the ROK 
would have trouble selling the plane overseas on its own.  CHOSON 
ILBO notes similarly that MOTIE's present plan is to invite only one 
foreign firm to participate in the plane's development, but that it 
may bring in a third country, "including possibly China," to 
facilitate marketing the aircraft. 

   FEATURE:  South Korea Building Two New Research Institutes - 
SUMMARY:  Two large research institutes will open this year in South 
Korea, each in its own way aimed at accumulating and disseminating 
information from and about foreign countries.  Kwangju is getting 
its first graduate engineering research institute, staffed with many 
foreign instructors and geared toward acquiring foreign technology. 
Samsung meanwhile has built the country's first "Industrial Business 
Research Institute" which will train employees in overseas business 
practices while doubling as a commercial intelligence collection 
facility. 

   South Korea will open two major research institutes over the next 
few months, one a government-sponsored S and T university in the 
southern city of Kwangju, the other a private business research 
facility in Yongin near Seoul.  Although different in location, 
affiliation, and ostensible function, the two institutes share a 
common goal of acquiring information on foreign commerce and 
technology, and disseminating this knowledge among the ROK's 
professional and managerial elite. 

   According to the 2 March CHUGAN MAEGYONG, construction of the 
Kwangju Science and Technical Institute will be completed this year 
and first classes will be held in March 1995.  Intended as a "first- 
rate" engineering college, the institute will admit 360 students 
into master and 224 students into PhD programs in five fields: 
information and communications engineering, new materials, electro- 
mechanical engineering, life sciences, and environmental 
engineering.  Before 1993, the school was operated as a branch of 
the Taedok-based Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST).  The decision to upgrade its status and facilities was made 
to attract better students and to integrate the south into the 
country's S and T network.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports the cost of the 
physical plant at 132 billion ($165 million).  The 1 January MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN gives its 1994 operating budget at 23.97 billion won 
($29.96 million). 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG describes the new institute as one of several 
projects undertaken by the ROK's Ministry of Science and Technology 
to foster the development of high-level technical personnel able to 
help South Korea "leap" into the ranks of advanced countries by the 
21st century.  The university will heavily emphasize research, with 
a planned faculty-to-student ratio of 1 to 5.  The magazine reports 
a "large number" of foreign professors will be hired.  It also says 
10 to 20 percent of the 120-member faculty will be "pure" 
foreigners, presumably to distinguish this group from ethnic Koreans 
overseas who will also be recruited.  The university will require 
faculty and students "to attend all types of international academic 
meetings and receive education from foreign professors."  Foreign 
languages will be taught to give students access to "theoretical 
work in their specialties." 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG's 28 February issue reports that Samsung, South 
Korea's leading industrial conglomerate whose efforts to collect 
information on foreign commercial technology and businesses have 
been the subject of several ROK media reports (see PACIFIC RIM 
ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 17, 25 Aug 93 pp 22-23 and Vol 2 No 20, 6 
Oct 93, p 25), will open an Industrial Business Research Institute 
this June in Kyonggi Province.  The facility is designed to produce 
"global businessmen" on the premise that Samsung's future depends on 
its employees' knowledge of foreign customs, business practices, and 
languages.  The institute, reportedly the first of its kind in South 
Korea, will cost 22 billion won ($27.5 million).  Some 220 trainees 
will be in residence at any one time. 

   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, Samsung's institute has three 
functions: (1) preparing international specialists for 
"globalization" (essentially, a group-wide effort to sell more goods 
overseas through better market research and products tailored to 
individual countries);  (2) The training facilities will double as a 
"professional information center" for storing and handling data on 
foreign countries; and (3) "Concentrated research" on different 
areas of the world will be carried out by more than 100 full-time 
area specialists, including former diplomats, overseas Koreans, 
Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA) officials, and Samsung 
employees with experience abroad.  The results of this research will 
be "used fully" in the company's business activities. 

   "Globalization" training will include courses on international 
finance, taxation, investment, labor-management relations, 
marketing, languages, and customs.  Satellite receivers will pick up 
lectures in foreign languages on these and other subjects.  Samsung 
reportedly has consulted with Japan's SR International, the United 
States' Global Success, and other foreign firms on curricula. 

   ROK Advertises for Expatriate, Foreign Scientists - The following 
advertisement appeared in the 14 February Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE 
SINMUN on page 7: 

   Invitation To Apply for Employment in a Brain Pool of High-Level 
Overseas Scientists - The General Federation of Korean Science and 
Technology Organizations, in accordance with the Government's 
(Ministry of Science and Technology's) plan to employ high-level S 
and T personnel (a brain pool system), invites superior overseas 
scientists and technicians to South Korea for work in research and 
development, in order to achieve the supreme national task of 
helping South Korea enter the ranks of scientifically and 
technologically advanced countries by the 2000's.  We hope for your 
wide participation. 

1. Goals - To strengthen national competitiveness in keeping with 
the trend toward a global, worldwide, information society, we seek 
to employ superior overseas ethnic Korean and foreign scientists and 
technicians locally in domestic research and development, to 
contribute toward South Korea's entry into the ranks of 
scientifically and technologically advanced countries by the 2000's. 

2. Fields - All fields of science and technology which are the 
objects of national strategic development, including: 

   - basic fields (basic research, measurement, standards, 
astronomy) 
   - machinery and materials fields (machinery, ships, aviation, 
space, materials) 
   - electrical and electronic fields (electricity, power, 
electronics, computers, communications, optical technology) 
   - chemical engineering and biological fields (chemistry, chemical 
engineering, biology, agriculture and fishing, sanitation) 
   - resources and oceanographic fields (resources, oceanography, 
environment, construction) 
   - energy fields (atomic power) 

3. Positions To Be Filled - 100 or fewer 

4. Personnel Sought 

   a. Ethnic Korean and foreign scientists and technicians with 
five years or more experience working overseas from the time they 
received a PhD. 
   b. Ethnic Korean and foreign scientists and technicians who 
possess excellent, world-class R and D accomplishments or know-how, 
regardless of their degree or experience, as determined by the 
Selection Committee. 

5. Period of Employment 

   a. Between six months and two years (less than six months is also 
possible, as determined by the Selection Committee). 
   b. There is a possibility of extending the employment period 
beyond two years (as determined by the Evaluation Committee). 

6. Support and Expenses 

   a. Expenses incurred entering and leaving the country (airfare 
and personal expenses, etc.) 
   b. Costs in country (automobile and other support depending on 
one's experience, salary on a level higher than the compensation 
received in one's own country, to be decided by the Selection 
Committee) 

7. Institutions of Employment 

   a. Government-funded research labs (institutes) 
   b. National and private research labs 
   c. Universities (except ERC (Engineering Research Center) and SRC 
(Science Research Center)) 

8. Method of Employment 

   Conduct joint research as part of an existing or new R and D 
team, with the possibility of concurrently giving lectures in one's 
specialty, and making presentations in various types of academic 
meetings and seminars. 

9. Evaluation 

   The scientists and technicians who are hired will have their 
research results evaluated from the perspective of the type of 
employment at six-month intervals by the Evaluation Committee.  (If 
found "unsuitable," support will be discontinued and that part of 
the support paid will be recovered from the institution where the 
person is employed.) 

10. Application Period 

   14 February to 10 March (for the first half of the year). 
   * Remaining personnel look for a later notice in the second half 
of the year. 

11. Documents To Submit 

   a. Application for employment with the Brain Pool (in a form 
determined by the individual)    1 copy 
   b. Statement of plans (to be drawn up by the institution 
applying) 1 copy 
   c. Written introduction from the institution applying    1 copy 

12. Information Office 

   General Federation of Korean Science and Technology Organizations 
   (635-4 Yoksam-dong Kangnam-gu Seoul 135-703) 

13. Miscellaneous 

   a. Materials received will not be returned. 
   b. Please address detailed inquiries to the General Federation of 
Korean Science and Technology Organizations (Tel: 553-2181-5) 

                                   Director 

General Federation of Korean Science and Technology Organizations 

(Note: the 25 January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN identifies South Korea's 
Ministry of Science and Technology as the sponsor of this organized 
effort to acquire foreign technology.  See PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC 
REVIEW Vol 3 No 5 9 Mar 94 pp 33-34) 

   Steel Firm Imports North Korean Scrap Iron - ROK steel producers 
are actively moving ahead with importing scrap steel from North 
Korea.  In January, Inchon Iron and Steel Co., Ltd. (Inchon Steel) 
brought in on a trial basis 1,200 tons of scrap iron from Najin. 
The company tested the suitability of the iron, which was obtained 
from dismantled rail cars, and found that the quality was not as 
good as U.S. scrap iron.  Nonetheless, steel firms which use scrap 
steel as raw materials in their electric furnaces are actively 
moving ahead with importing scrap iron from North Korea.  Inchon 
Steel is already prepared to place a supplemental order for 8,000 
tons via a Japanese trading company.  North Korea has many scrapped 
rail cars and cracked rails.  If the nuclear issue is resolved and 
North Korea normalizes its foreign relations, ROK firms could 
possibly import 40-50,000 tons of scrap iron from North Korea 
annually. 

   In the long run, steel firms could even import scrapped Russian 
rail cars via Najin or Sonbong, where they could be disassembled. 
Realizing that North Korean scrap iron refining facilities are 
insufficient, ROK steel firms are considering plans to have a joint 
scrap iron refining facility in the Najin-Sonbong region.  In 
addition, they are considering plans to import pig iron directly 
from the Songnim region.  Currently, steel firms import 4-5,000 tons 
of North Korean pig iron each year via China.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE 
SINMUN 16 Feb 94 p 9) 

   Car Makers Consider New Production Method To Raise Productivity - 
ROK auto makers Hyundai, Kia, and Daewoo believe that it is not 
possible to greatly increase productivity using current production 
methods and are looking at a method that most overseas car makers 
use.  With the "module" production method, a cooperating company or 
separate assembly line assembles individual parts in advance, and 
then a main assembly line assembles the semi-finished goods.  This 
method allows producers to check in advance for defects, and it 
requires fewer workers on the assembly lines.  Thus, companies can 
greatly increase their product quality, automation rates, and 
productivity by using this method.  Hyundai Motors has done a few 
experiments with the module method, and this year will prove to 
bring the process into its company.  Kia Motors is already using the 
method in some of its production, but there is still a big 
difference between its efforts and those of advanced car makers. 
(Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 13 Feb 94 p 4) 

   China's Currency, Tax Reforms To Be 'Direct Blow' to ROK Exports 
- China's moves to unify its two currency system (renminbi and 
foreign exchange certificates), adjust tariffs, raise the VAT, and 
impose a consumption tax will greatly weaken ROK export 
competitiveness in third country markets where ROK and Chinese goods 
compete.  The moves are also expected to be a "direct blow" to ROK 
exports into China.  China has devalued the yuan by 33.3 percent, 
fixed the VAT (which had varied between 8 and 15 percent depending 
on the type of good) at 17 percent, and set up a new consumption tax 
to restrain imports.  The estimated effect of these changes will be 
to boost the price competitiveness of Chinese goods by at least 20 
percent in overseas markets. 

   While China's reform measures bring its trade system in line with 
international standards, they also seem to reveal China's intention 
to curb imports.  The exchange rate adjustment and tax measures will 
act like a "double trap" to ROK exports to China.  For example, one 
ton of cold-rolled ROK steel, which cost a Chinese importer $400 
last year, would now cost close to twice that amount.  The VAT and 
tariffs on that ton, which last year equalled 592 yuan ($102.07 at 
$1/5.8 yuan), would now total 1009 yuan ($115.98 at $1/8.7 yuan) 
thanks to adjustments in the tax, tariff, and exchange rates.  The 
impact on ROK firms is not all negative, however.  ROK firms that 
manufacture in China and export to third countries will see their 
competitiveness rise.  Also, because foreign currency restrictions 
are being eased, there is a growing possibility that Chinese firms 
may expand their imports.  (Seoul HANGUK ILBO 11 Jan 94 p 9) 

   South Korea To Set Up 'KORNET'--Korea Internet - This year South 
Korea will put into service Korea Internet (KORNET), which can 
receive databases from "famous" overseas universities or research 
institutes.  In Korea Telecom's judgment, using an international 
scientific research network that can easily utilize high-tech S and 
T information in order to strengthen industrial competitiveness is 
an urgent matter.  It has decided to offer domestic commercial 
service for INTERNET, and wll set up the service so that customers 
can link up with the system using various methods, such as a LAN 
(local area network) or a modem.  Links with LAN units will use 56 
Kbps (kilobits per second) or 9.6 Kbps lines, while links with 
modems will use 2.4 or 9.6 Kpbs.  This year, Korea Telecom will set 
up T1-level (1.544 Mbps) backbone networks in six ROK cities (the 
article names only five--Seoul, Pusan, Taejon, Taegu, and Kwangju). 
Korea Telecom will upgrade the backbone network to T3-level (43 
Mbps) lines by 1997.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Jan 94 p 20) 

   Government To Regulate Transport of Industrial Waste - Beginning 
in June, ROK companies must receive advance permission from the 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) before importing or 
exporting certain industrial wastes.  This procedure will apply to 
47 different items.  In addition, in March the government plans to 
formally join the Basel Convention regulating transboundary 
movements of hazardous wastes.  It also intends to establish its own 
regulations governing the shipment of waste between nations in mid- 
March.  According to the regulation prepared by MOTIE, the 
government will call for the forcible re-export of illegally 
imported waste.  The government also may, if necessary, prohibit the 
import of certain wastes to protect the environment or public 
health.  Furthermore, those who import waste without permission or 
who disobey the rules on exporting waste will face five-year prison 
sentences and fines of up to 30 million won ($37,500).  To more 
strictly regulate transport of these materials within South Korea, 
the government will set up recycling complexes to nurture recycling 
enterprises in places like Noksan and South Cholla Province's Yojon. 

   South Korea imports 50 different types of waste materials--worth 
$1.5 billion--each year for use as industrial raw materials (see 
table).  While MOTIE realizes that importing some types of 
industrial waste is unavoidable, it plans to regulate more strictly 
the transport of certain toxic materials within South Korea.  In 
addition, companies will be required to obtain permission from the 
Ministry of the Environment in cases involving extremely toxic or 
hazardous materials. 


                  ROK Imports of Industrial Waste, 1990-1993 
                                 (Unit: 1 ton) 

                                         Imported from: 
Product                   United States  England          Canada 

Nickel                    346            - 
Lead                      162.7          -                181.1 
Copper                                   4,669.5 
Zinc                      17.8           - 
Plastic                   38.2           -                35.5 
Aluminum                                                  4,503 
Toxic chemicals           -              23,331.5 
Metallic iron             3,064,185.9    749.5 
Non-ferrous metals        -                               2,634 
(Seoul HANGUK ILBO 4 Feb  94 p 2) 



   Hyundai Motors To Market 'Fully Indigenous' Automobile - Hyundai 
Motors will begin selling a fully indigenous, 1,500-cc passenger car 
next month.  The "Accent" was developed solely with domestic 
technology and is equipped with locally built components including 
engine, transmission, various metal casts, and electronic parts.  It 
is the first car built by South Korea without royalty payments to 
foreign component suppliers.  (Seoul YONHAP 0230 GMT 11 Mar 94) 

   Sunkyong Industries Develops Biodegradable Film - Sunkyong 
Industries has developed a type of polyester-based film for paper 
coating that can be fully dissolved by micro-organisms.  The film is 
used for coating paper bags and stationery.  (Seoul YONHAP 0223 GMT 
4 Mar 94) 

   Yukong Enters Power Generation, Liquefied Gas Business - Yukong 
Ltd. plans to enter the power generation and liquefied natural gas 
(LNG) businesses.  The oil refining company's move is in line with 
the government's policy of promoting the participation of private 
firms in electric power generation and LNG projects.  The action is 
also part of Yukong's long-term plan to become a general energy 
company by diversifying into other areas because of oil refining's 
growth limits.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 9 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Real Estate Company Becomes First Private Owner of Public Firm - 
Keo Pyong Co., a real estate developer, has taken over the Korea 
Tungsten Mining Co. to become the first private buyer of a public 
corporation under the government's policy to privatize state-run 
companies.  Korea Tungsten, founded in 1916 as an exporter of 
tungsten ore, has recently focused on manufacturing processed 
products as China has emerged as the biggest supplier of the metal. 
The company's capital was 26.2 billion won ($32.75 million) as of 
the end of last year, with 60.2 billion won ($75.25 million) in 
sales and 8.5 billion won ($10.63 million) in net profits.  Its 
assets are valued at over 300 billion won ($375 million).  (Seoul 
THE KOREA HERALD 2 March 94 p 8) 

   Goldstar Signs Multimedia Deal With U.S. Company - Goldstar 
recently announced that it has signed a contract to cooperate with 
the U.S. company Oracle Corporation to develop and market multimedia 
equipment.  The contract will pave the way for Goldstar to 
participate in the U.S. information superhighway project and to 
enter the multimedia market there.  The contract calls for Goldstar 
to provide technology for producing compact disk interactive (CDI) 
equipment, which is designed to allow customers to select video 
movies on their televisions through telephone lines on a video-on- 
demand (VOD) basis.  The communicable CDI system, called "set top 
box," is a basic instrument for new media service firms such as 
Oracle.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 18 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Daewoo Electronics To Export Computer Monitors to U.S. Firm - 
Daewoo Electronics has been designated the main supplier of monitors 
to the AST Research Company, a U.S. computer company.  Daewoo will 
supply over 500,000 units including 14-inch monitors for personal 
computer use and 17-inch monitors for CAD/CAM (computer-aided 
design/computer-aided manufacture) use.  Sales will reach $100 
million per year.  The contract is renewable annually as conditions 
warrant.  (Seoul MAEIL KY0NGJE SINMUN 26 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Koryo Zinc To Develop Lead, Zinc Mines in Canada - Koryo Zinc 
will invest $8.952 million to establish a corporation in Canada to 
develop lead and zinc mines there.  Koryo Zinc and a Canadian zinc 
refining company will take over two lead and zinc mines in Canada at 
a cost of Canadian $29.84 million.  Expenses will be shared 50:50. 
Koryo Zinc is also promoting development of lead and zinc mines in 
China.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 25 Feb 94 p 11) 

   Daewoo Motors Enters Partnership With Japan's Honda - Daewoo 
Motors is forming an overall partnership--in technical assistance 
and sales--with Japan's Honda.  After developing its "Arcadia" model 
based on the Acura "Legend," Daewoo signed a contract to import 
Honda's "Accord" in April or May this year.  Honda's former Korean 
import agent Daelim had stopped importing Accords since the end of 
last year.  Daewoo will also develop a compact car based on Honda's 
"Civic," and is negotiating to produce Civics in its PRC plant in 
Changchun.  Daewoo is expanding cooperation with Honda to save on 
development costs.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Sambo To Export Personal Computers to Japan - Sambo Computer 
Company recently concluded a contract with Japan's NEC to export 
NEC-9800 personal computers worth $200 million to Japan in the form 
of OEM (original equipment manufacturing).  Shipments will begin in 
1995. (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Goldstar To Build Television Plant in Vietnam - Goldstar will set 
up a color TV plant in Vietnam as a joint venture with two 
Vietnamese enterprises--Thang Loi and Sae Yang.  A contract will be 
signed at the end of April, with construction starting in September 
on a $6-million plant located outside Ho Chi Minh City.  The 
venture, which goes into operation in March 1995, will produce 
200,000 color sets per year with 14-, 16-, 20-, and 25-inch screens. 
Some 70 percent of the TV's will be sold in Vietnam and the 
remainder exported to neighboring countries.  Goldstar's parts 
making affiliates are also making plans to enter the Vietnamese 
market.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 7 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Daewoo To Export ForkliftS to United States - Daewoo Heavy 
Industries will establish a sales corporation in the United States, 
DEC, to export its own model of forklift trucks.  DEC will be based 
in Cleveland, and a center for spare parts will be built in 
Brunswick, Georgia.  The company plans to set up distributors in all 
50 states.  Daewoo will export 9,000 forkliftS this year to the 
world market, and 15,000 units in 1995.  For the past 10 years, 
Daewoo has exported forklift trucks under the Caterpillar brand name 
through original equipment manufacturing   (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 8 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Korea Nambang Development To Advance Into PRC, Indonesia - Korea 
Nambang Development (KODECO) will invest $500 million to begin new 
large-scale businesseS in the PRC and Indonesia.  KODECO established 
a joint-venture plywood company with an Indonesian firm (Pakati 
Wood).  With paid-in capital of $10 million, the 60:40 joint-venture 
acquired development rights for 30,000 acres of forest in Irian 
Jaya, Indonesia.  The company will produce 240,000 cubic meters of 
plywood a year. 

   KODECO also established a joint venture with the Forestry Bureau 
of Shanhe Village, Heilongjiang Province, China.  The operation, to 
be located in yingkou, near Dalian, Liaoning Province, will produce 
yearly 35 million cubic meters of plywood from pulp beginning in 
1996.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 4 Mar 94 p 19) 

   Daewoo To Build Joint Venture Auto Plant in PRC - The Daewoo 
Group will build a joint venture automobile plant in China in 
cooperation with China's Shandong Provincial Government and a 
Chinese motor company.  Daewoo and the Chinese side will each invest 
50 percent of the total fund of $1.5 billion.  Chairman Kim U-chung 
and other Daewoo managers will visit China soon to finish 
negotiations- and the project will be announced officially after 
approval is obtained from both governments.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 27 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Il-yang, Chinese Firm To Build Pharmaceutical Factory in Jiangsu 
- Il-yang Pharmaceutical Co. will establish a joint venture with a 
Gaoyou City pharmaceutical factory in China's Jiangsu Province.  The 
company, tentatively named Yangzhou-Ilyang Pharmaceutical Co., will 
be capitalized at $4 million, with the Korean company contributing 
32 percent.  Il-yang will build a plant as soon as it receives 
authorization from the Chinese Government and start manufacturing 
tonic drinks and digestives in the latter part of next year.  (Seoul 
YONHAP 0223 GMT 4 Mar 94) 

   Inchon Steel ReceiveS Order From Indonesia - Inchon Steel 
recently received an order for 500 tons of molding iron (worth $1.3 
million) from the Indonesian engineering company FPE (Flat Product 
Equipment Co).  The molding iron will be used to expand FPE's 
facilities for large-scale housing and housing parts.  Shipments 
will begin on 10 August.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 4 Mar 94 p 18) 

   Dongbu Steel To Transfer Silicon technology to German Firm - 
Dongbu steel will transfer silicon production technology to Wacker- 
Chemitronic of Germany for $3.84 million plus royalties.  The 
technique is for the production of multicrystalline silicon, an 
ingredient for semiconductors.  The German firm currently supplies 
30 percent of the world's demand.  Dongbu is entitled to a royalty 
of 1-2.5 percent for the technology it developed jointly with the 
Korea Research Institute of Chemical Technology, a government-funded 
research institute, over a period of 10 years.  The company said it 
opted for German production instead of domestic manufacturing 
because of the high costs involved in transporting the ingredient 
material, thricholosil.  (Seoul THE KOREA HERALD 10 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Daewoo Car Audio Plant in Tianjin Begins Operations - Daewoo 
Electronics expects to put its car audio plant in Tianjin, China 
into full operation on 11 March.  The plant will make 600,000 car 
audio systems a year, all for export.  Daewoo has a 100-percent 
stake in the plant with an investment of $3 million.  Annual 
capacity will be increased to about 2 million units by the year 
2000.  (Seoul YOHAP 0230 GMT 11 Mar 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA - Paiton Electric Power Agreement 
signed -- Indonesia recently signed an agreement with P.T. Paiton 
Energy Co., an international consortium, to produce electricity at 
the $2.3-billion, coal-fired Paiton power station in East Java. 
According to Indonesian officials, the two 615-mw units covered 
under the agreement are expected to be operational by 1998. 

   The consortium consists of Mitsui and Co. of Japan and Mission 
Energy of the Netherlands, each holding a 32.5-percent stake in the 
project; the U.S. General Electric Power Funding Corporation which 
has a 2O-percent share; and Indonesia's P.T. Batu Hitam Perkasa, 
controlled by Hashim Djojohadikusumo which holds the remaining 15 
percent. 

   Paiton Energy has agreed to sell the electricity it will produce 
to Indonesia's state-owned electric company PLN over a 3O-year 
period, based on a three-tiered rate structure--8.56 cents per 
kilowatt hour (kwh) for the first six years, 8.41 cents per kwh for 
the following six years, and 5.54 cents per kwh for the last 18 
years.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 14 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Increased Competition Expected in LNG Market - Pertamina Director 
for General Affairs Baharudin recently stated that even though 
Indonesia is the world's largest LNG exporter, it cannot ignore the 
emergence of several new competitors.  Baharudin said that five 
countries are vying for the Asia-Pacific region's LNG market, which 
is currently concentrated in Japan, south Korea, and Taiwan, with 
China and Thailand surfacing as potential markets.  Qatar, Alaska, 
and Australia are in the process of jncreasing their annual LNG 
production by 10 to 15 million tons, and Malaysia and Oman by 5 
million tons, Baharudin noted.   (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 19 Feb 94 
p 5) 

   Batam Island To Be 'Center' for Taiwanese Investments - Minister 
of Research and Technology B.J. Habibie recently stated that Taiwan 
has formed a-task force to encourage entrepreneurs to invest in 
Batam, as Taiwan plans to make Batam Island the "center" of its 
Southeast Asian investments.  In return, Habibie has requested that 
Chang, director of Taiwan's Evergreen Group, serve as his personal 
advisor in a $600,000 project to establish a container port in 
Batam, capable of handling 600 million containers annually. 
Evergreen has already completed a feasibility study on the project, 
at no cost to the Indonesian Government.  While Indonesia has 
of fered Evergreen the contract to construct the port, the company 
has not responded thus far.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 15 Feb 94 p 
6) 

   P.T. Pindad To shift Production, Marketing Focus - T. Sjamsu, 
senior executive vice president of P.T. Pindad, recently announced 
that the company is shifting its production and marketing efforts 
away from the military sector.  In order to boost revenues and 
defray the cost of producing military equipment for the Indonesian 
Armed Forces (ABRI), the company plans to devote 80 percent of its 
production capability to the manufacture of non-military equipment. 
In the past, P.T. Pindad was able to sell 40 percent of what it 
produced to overseas commercial markets, Sjamsu said. 

   P.T. Pindad produces ammunition, pistols, revolvers, and non- 
military equipment such as generators- machine tools, vacuum circuit 
breakers, and air brake systems.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 14 Feb 
94 p 9) 

   State-Owned Gas Company To Receive $424-Million Loan - The state- 
owned gas company Perum Gas Negara will receive a $424-million loan 
for the construction of an 823-km pipeline from the Asamera gas 
field in south sumatra to the Duri oil field and Batam Island, Riau. 
The loan will come from a syndicate comprising the Asian development 
Bank, the Export-Import Bank of Japan, and the European Investment 
Bank.  (Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 4 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Increase in Trade With Taiwan Expected - An official of the 
Taipei Economic and Trade Office in Jakarta recently announced that 
bilateral trade this year is expected to increase by $3.5 billion 
over 1993.  The estimate is based on historical growth trends, 
Taiwan's increased purchase of liquefied natural gas, coal, crude 
oil, and non-oil products- and Taiwan's increased investments in 
Indonesia.  (Jakarta THE JAAARTA POST 4 Mar 94 p 9) 

   LAOS:  French Firm To Build Hydropower Station - The state-run 
Electricite du Laos and sogreah of France recently signed an 
agreement for the construction of the Nam Leuk hydropower station. 
The project, to be funded by an Asian development Bank loan, is 
expected to generate 40 mw of power.  (Vientiane KPL 0830 GMT 15 Mar 
94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Mahathir Outlines strategy for space Industry - Prime 
Minister Mahathir has outlined a three-step approach to develop an 
indigenous space industry that can foster space-related commercial 
ventures in the country.  The strategy calls for local companies and 
institutions to participate in selected foreign space programs that 
are compatible with Malaysia's scientific and industrial capability 
to establish a networking system with space agencies in Europe, 
Asia, and the United States, that will facilitate Malaysia's 
participation in various programs and projects; and to promote 
closer relations among the countries in the region in order to 
develop scientific and commercial activities that would be mutual1y 
beneficial. 
   Mahathir remarked that Malaysia should break into the space 
industry, not only because of the impact it would make on 
international politics and the economy and defense worldwide, but 
also because new initiatives in the space industry can benefit other 
industrieS, such as aeronautics, aerospace engineering- and 
communications.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 18 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Telekom Malaysia To Provide services in India - Telekom Malaysia 
recently announced that it has received an offer from the Indian 
Telecommunications Department to operate paging and cellular 
services in several major cities in India.  It has formed a joint 
venture company with Usha Martin IndustrieS (UMI) Ltd. of India, 
which is expected to be operational sometime this year.  The new 
company, Usha Martin Telekom Ltd., will be worth $40 million, with 
both sides holding equal shares.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN 17 Feb 
94 p 7) 

   PHILIPPINES:  FEATURE:  Davao Focusing on Economic Growth - 
SUMMARY:  Davao, the principal city on the island of Mindanao, is 
focusing on achieving economic growth, according to related articles 
in a Manila daily.  The city has turned its attention away from 
Manila, to a "triangle area" that includes East Indonesia, East 
Malaysia, and other parts of Mindanao.  Cooperative efforts between 
Davao and other cities are under way, cross-investments have 
started, and infrastructural improvements in Mindanao are being 
planned, the paper notes. 

   An article in the 11 February BALITA reports that just as the 
philippines feels "left out of booming southeast Asia," its southern 
island of Mindanao feels "left out of the rest of the country." 
However, the article adds, the island's main city, Davao, is trying 
to achieve economic growth by working with surrounding areas in 
Mindanao, East Indonesia, and East Malaysia. 

   The East Asian Growth Area (EAGA), patterned after the two other 
economic areas in the region (the Southern Triangle encompassing 
Singapore, Johor (Malaysia), and Batam Island (Indonesia), and the 
Northern Triangle, comprising Aceh (Indonesia), Penang (Malaysia), 
and southern Thailand), is designed to promote trade and development 
in the "triangle area" of Mindanao, East Indonesia, and East 
Malaysia, according to the 12 February BALITA.  Guided by the EAGA 
concept, Davao is focusing on its own economic progress, the paper 
says, citing increasing construction of new buildings and the recent 
opening of three shopping malls as indications of growth in the 
city. 

   The 11 February BALITA reports that, according to Merle Cruz, 
regional director of the Department of Trade and Industry, the 
private sector has led the way in establishing links between Davao 
and Manado, capital of North Sulawesi, Indonesia.  For example, 
Indonesia's Bouraq Airlines currently makes two weekly flights to 
Davao and Philippine Airlines is seeking landing rights in Labuan, 
which is being developed as Malaysia's financial center.  Cruz adds 
that cross-investments have also begun.  A Philippine fishing 
company, QBRO, has invested in a cold-storage facility and ship 
repair operation at Bitung, Indonesia, while the Indonesian company 
P.T. Intimas has bought into a soya oil processing plant in 
Mindanao. 

   Davao officials note other cooperative opportunities as well, 
says the 14 February BALITA.  These officials suggest, for instance, 
that Mindanao might ship its rice and corn to Sabah and Sarawak and, 
perhaps, benefit from the two Malaysian states' oil and gas 
reserves.  In addition, since Manado lacks colleges and private 
hospitals, its residents could use Davao's facilities which are more 
easily accessible and more affordable than the facilities in 
Jakarta.  Infrastructural improvements are also being planned, the 
paper adds, noting that the construction of overpasses and a four- 
lane road connecting Davao to the northern part of Mindanao, and the 
upgrading of Davao airport to international standards are all 
priority projects. 

   Syvelyn Tan, head of the Philippine Government-private sector 
group promoting investments in Davao, is quoted in the 12 February 
BALITA as saying that business confidence "has come slowly" to Davao 
because it used to be a battleground between Muslim and communist 
guerillas and government forces.  Furthermore, Davao had the 
reputation of being a "crime and murder center."  But now, Tan says, 
even the communist New People's Army has withdrawn, making room for 
peace and investment. 

   Most importantly, the 14 February BALITA concludes, the regional 
grouping is getting "full support" from the three governments 
involved.  Malaysian Prime Minister Mahathir has endorsed the EAGA, 
while the Philippines and Indonesia have signed agreements for 
postal and shipping services between Davao and Manado, and have 
established a joint commission to handle border and customs issues. 

   Consortium To Undertake Water Project - Malaysian entrepreneur 
Eugene Campos will head a consortium that will  undertake a $480- 
million, build-own-operate water project in Metro Manila.  The 
project, expected to be completed in five to six years, will help 
accelerate infrastructure development and delivery of basic 
services, in line with the "Philippine 2000 Vision."  The project 
entails financing, designing, constructing, managing, operating, and 
maintaining a water treatment plant with a capacity of 1,000 million 
liters a day.  (Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 18 Feb 94 p 5) 

   Increase in Money Supply Noted - Money supply (M3), representing 
the total amount of currency in circulation plus savings deposits, 
time deposits, and deposit substitutes, stood at $17.14 billion in 
1993, an increase of more than 22 percent over the previous year. 
On the other hand, broad money (M2), which is the total amount of 
currency in circulation, savings, and time deposits, rose by 24.49 
percent to $17 billion.  (Manila MANILA BULLETIN 26 Feb 94 p B-1) 

   Decrease in Foreign Investment Reported - Foreign investment 
dropped to $327.942 million in 1993 from $328.012 million the 
previous year.  Less infusion from the major trading partners, Japan 
and the United States, accounted for the decline, but investment 
from Great Britain has risen.  (Manila MANILA BULLETIN 7 Mar 94 p B- 
1) 

   SINGAPORE:  OCBC Launches Fund for Investment in China - The 
Overseas Chinese Banking Corporation (OCBC) has launched the Savers 
China Growth Fund, offering investors a vehicle to invest in China. 
Initially, investors will have to buy $10,000 worth of shares, while 
subsequent purchases will be transacted in $5,000 lots.  OCBC is 
targeting retail investors and "wealthy individuals," and hopes to 
raise between $20 and $30 million.  (Singapore BUSINESS TIMES 10 Mar 
94 p 17) 

   Company To Build Oil Terminal in Nigeria - IPCO International has 
been awarded a $251-million contract to build an oil terminal in 
Nigeria.  The project will be carried out by IPCO subsidiaries and 
is expected to be completed in 20 months.  (Singapore BUSINESS TIMES 
16 Mar 94 p 17) 

   THAILAND: Norwegian Company To Invest in Gas Venture - Norway's 
national oil firm Statoil is investing $96 million in the Bongkot 
gas field development in the Gulf of Thailand.  This sum will be 
spent between 1994 and 1998 and represents the firm's 10-percent 
share in the project.  Other investors include PTT Exploration and 
Production (40 percent), the French oil firm Total (30 percent), and 
British Gas (20 percent).  (Bangkok XING XIAN RIBAO 14 Mar 94 p 3) 

   VIETNAM:  Joint Venture With Daewoo To Assemble Trucks, Buses, 
Vans - The Machinery Union Enterprise 7983, under the Ministry of 
Defense's General Department of Economics and Technology, and South 
Korea's Daewoo group have formed a 30-year joint venture to assemble 
trucks, buses, and vans in Vietnam.  The venture was licensed in 
December 1993, with an investment capital of $32.2 million. 
Prescribed capital is $10 million, of which the Vietnamese company 
is contributing 30 percent.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM 23-29 
Dec 94 p 3) 

   The new company, which is called Vidamco, has received approval 
from the State Committee for Cooperation and Investment.  It is 
expected to produce 500 cars this year and 10,000 cars in the year 
2000.  (Hanoi VNA 0605 GMT 10 Mar 94) 

   Malaysian Company To Build Industrial Compound in Dong Nai - The 
Malaysian company Hwa Leong Ltd. has been licensed to build a 
$242.7-million industrial compound in Dong Nai, about 50 km from Ho 
Chi Minh City.  The compound will consist of eight textile mills. 
(Hanoi TUAN BAO QUOC TE 20 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Interior Ministry Firm Forms Venture With Hong Kong Firm - The 
Interior Ministry's Thang Long Company, Vietranimex Co. from Hanoi, 
and Merry Dragon Development Ltd. from Hong Kong have formed a 25- 
year joint venture to produce license plates for motor vehicles, 
traffic signs, motorcycle helmets, and hard hats.  The new venture, 
called Vietnam Transportation Safepromotion Co. Ltd., was licensed 
in December 1993.  Investment capital in the venture totals $4 
million, while prescribed capital is $3 million, of which the Hong 
Kong firm is contributing 60 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 19 Jan 94 p 
2) 

   Venture With Russian Company To Produce Tractor Parts - The 
Engineering Command's Lung Lo Construction Company and Russia's 
Uraltrac company have formed a joint venture to provide services and 
supply parts for construction equipment and tractors.  Investment 
capital in the venture totals $1.8 million, while prescribed capital 
is $1.3 million, of which the two partners will have equal shares. 
The joint venture, called the Vietnam Uraltrac Construction Machine 
Joint Venture or Vu Trac Co., Ltd., was licensed in late October 
1993.  (Hanoi QUAN DOI NHAN DAN 9 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Cardphone Company Inaugurates Center in Ho Chi Minh City - 
Uniphonekad is a joint venture between the Ho Chi Minh City Post 
Office and Malaysia's Sapura Holdings Ltd.  Investment capital in 
the joint venture totals $5.12 million, of which the Malaysian firm 
is contributing 68 percent.  The new company recently inaugurated a 
cardphone center in Ho Chi Minh City. 

   As of August 1993, Uniphonekad has issued 79,000 cards in Ho Chi 
Minh City, with an average of 6,000 cards per month.  The company 
plans to open 200 new phone booths in the city in 1994 and increase 
the number of cards issued to 8,000 per month.  (Ho Chi Minh City 
THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 6-12 Jan 94 p 6) 

   Industrial Output Increases to $1.9 Billion in 1993 - According 
to the General Department of Statistics and the Ho Chi Minh City 
Bureau of Statistics, Vietnam's industrial output was worth 
approximately $1.9 billion in 1993, a 12-percent increase over 1992. 
The average increase in the past three years (1991-1993) was 13.2 
percent.  The output by sector breaks down as follows: about $968 
million from central state-owned industries (a 14-percent increase 
over 1992); about $539 million from non-state industries (a 9- 
percent increase over 1992); and about $374 million from local 
state-owned industries (a 10-percent increase over 1992).  (Ho Chi 
Minh THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 6-12 Jan 94 p 40) 

   Electricity output Increases Reported - Electricity output 
nationwide continues to show yearly increases: 8.9 billion kwh in 
1990, 9.3 billion kwh in 1991, 9.8 billion kwh in 1992, and 10.8 
billion kwh in 1993.  When the 500 kv north-south powerline is 
completed in April, it will provide the south between 200 mw and 300 
mw.  Currently, almost all districts in the Red River Delta receive 
electricity from the national power network.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIET NAM 5 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Export, Import Figures for 1993 Reported - According to the 
General Department of Statistics, total exports were worth $2.08 
billion in 1991, $2.57 billion in 1992, and between $2.8 and $3 
billion in 1993.  Crude oil export reached 3.93 million metric tons 
in 1991, 5.4 million metric tons in 1992, and 6.31 metric tons in 
1993.  Rice export rose from 1.03 million metric tons in 1991 to 
1.95 million metric tons in 1992, but dropped to 1.7 million metric 
tons in 1993. 

   Total imports for 1993 amounted to over $3.3 billion, a 31- 
percent increase over 1992.  This does not include unofficial trade 
which, according to the Customs Department, reached approximately 
$390 million in the first eight months of 1993.  An increase in 
almost all essential imports was noted in 1993.  Total imports were 
worth $2.33 billion in 1991 and $2.57 billion in 1992.  (Hanoi OUAN 
DOI NHAN DAN 19 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Among the export products that registered an increase of over 20 
percent in 1993 are garments, textiles, ground nuts, tea, and 
aquatic products.  Export products that showed a decrease of over 20 
percent in 1993 include handicrafts, rice, and tin.  Several import 
products registered an increase in 1993, such as steel and iron 
(116.1 percent), electronic components (73.6 percent), and oil and 
gas (26.7 percent)  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE 6-12 Jan 94 p 12) 

   Haiphong Tops Hanoi, Ho Chi Minh City in Industrial Growth - 
According to the General Department of Statistics, industrial growth 
in Haiphong in 1993 increased by 30.1 percent over 1992.  Hanoi 
ranks second with an increase of 25.8 percent, followed by Ho Chi 
Minh City with 11.5 percent.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE 
SAIGON 6-12 Jan 94 p 40) 

   GDP Figures for 1993 Reported - According to the General 
Department of Statistics, the gross domestic product (GDP) in 1993 
was about $11.6 billion, an increase of 22.78 percent over 1992. 
The breakdown by sector is as follows: agriculture and forestry(30.9 
percent); industries (22.7 percent); trade (12.07 percent); other 
services (12.6 percent); state administration, national security, 
and defense (12.1 percent); capital construction (4.57 percent); 
communications, transportation, and postal services (4.1 percent); 
and other material production (.96 percent).  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI 
BAO KINH TE SAIGON 6-12 Jan 94 p 5) 

   Korean Oil Company Reports 0f fshore Discovery - The ROK Petrol 
Development Company recently announced that it has discovered a well 
about 280 km southeast of Vung Tau Province, with a daily production 
capacity of 3,400 barrels of oil and 22 million cubic meters of gas. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1430 GMT 7 Mar 94) 

   Hanoi Airport Expressway Opens - The recently opened $20-million, 
six-lane expressway linking Hanoi and Noi Bai International Airport 
is reportedly capable of handling up to 8,000 vehicles a day, 
traveling at 120 km per hour.  It goes through an industrial zone at 
the western end of the capital and is a part of the east-south 
beltway that is going to be built.  (Hanoi VNA 0614 GMT 10 Mar 94) 

   Norwegian Company Discovers Natural Gas Offshore - Norway's 
national oil company Statoil has discovered natural gas off the 
southern coast of Vietnam.  Decisions are expected to be made in the 
next few months on Statoil's $400-million gas project that includes 
a compression station, a liquefying plant, and a pipeline from Vung 
Tau to Ho Chi Minh City.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 14 Mar 
94) 

EAG/23MAR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/CL 24/1945Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-041--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  JOINT VENTURES, No 1, 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Eleven     joint ventures have been registered at the Mongolian State 
Registry since 11 May 1993.  Five of the foreign Participating 
parties are Russian, four are Far Eastern, and two are European. 

   The following 11 joint ventures have been registered at the State 
Registry in accordance with the Foreign Investment Law and the Law 
on Economic Units since 11 May 1993.  [For reporting on 37 earlier 
registered joint ventures, see FB PN 92-386, FB PN 92-426, and FB PN 
92-479.] 
   1.  "Mongolpress" BBHK [expansion not given] -- Registration No.: 
764183; Mongolian Participating party:  MONTSAME agency; Foreign 
Participating party:  "Fredi Hofmani" Corporation of Denmark; 
Investment:  $62,300; Business activity:  Production of high-quality 
printed materials; Duration:  5 years; Director:  M. Kristensen 
(Ulaanbaatar-l3, Suhbaatar, Mongolian; Trade Union Building) 

   2.  "Herlen" BBHK -- Registration No.:  764329; Mongolian 
Participating party:  "Mongol em" impeks UUK [expansion not given]; 
Foreign Participating party:  Korean Far Eastern Medicine Production 
Administration; Investment:  13,624,000 tugriks; Business activity: 
Cultivation of medicinal plants and production of tea and medicines; 
Duration:  10 years; Director:  D. Monhbaatar (Ondorhaan, Hentiy 
Aymag) 

   3.  "Undral" BBHK -- Registration No.:  759481; Mongolian 
Participating party:  Military Trade Administration, UUG [expansion 
not given]; Foreign Participating Party:  "Huan Ho" Company in 
Hohhot; Investment:  10 million tugriks; Business activity:  Pastry 
Production and sale; Duration:  3 years; Director:  Yang Li-shun 
(Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, Military Unit No 089 Premises) 

   4.  "Falikon Internayshil" -- Registration No.:  759635; 
Mongolian Participating Party:  "Attila" BHH [expansion not given]; 
Foreign Participating Party:  "S.M. Handelskonsolt" Company; 
Investment:  $125,000,000 and 5 million tugriks; Business activity: 
Restaurant and foreign trade consultation; Duration:  10 years; 
Director:  L. Unenburen (Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, Russian Culture 
Center) 

   5.  "Monkikal" BBHK -- Registration No.:  759867; Mongolian 
Participating party:  "Monteh" BBHK; Foreign Participating party: 
Russian Kalmyk "Ay-Pi-N" and the OMODzO [expansion not given] 
Information and Service Center of China; Investment:  3 million 
tugriks; Business activity:  Exchange of scientific and technical 
information, installation  and repair of home electrical appliances, 
and tourism; Duration:  3 years; Director:  B. Dabaadorj 
(Ulaanbaatar-songino hayrhan, Geology Building) 

   6.  "Monteks Internayshil" BBHK -- Registration No.:  759899 
Mongolian Participating Party:  "Dzos shir" BBHK; Foreign 
Participating party:  Hong Kong Redis Company; Investment: 
48,051,900 tugriks; Business activity:  Production of various kinds 
of children's clothing; Duration:  5 years; Director:  D. Dunger 
Yaychil (Ulaanbaatar-Han-Uul, Construction Troops Unit No 073 
Premises) 

   7.  "Buteel" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760021; Mongolian 
Participating Party:  "Tushee" BBHK; Foreign Participating Party: 
Ulan-Ude "Soyol" Publications and Writers Association, "Shola" 
Enterprise, and the "Vostochnaya vorota" Company, all of Russia; 
Investment:  2 million tugriks; Business activity:  Experimental 
production of newly created medicines; Duration:  5 years; Director: 
P. Tomorbaatar (Ulaanbaatar - Suhbaatar, State Statistical Office) 

   8.  "Ji-M" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760161; Mongolian 
Participating Party:  Citizen D. Mondzul; Foreign Participating 
party:  Hobei Province Water Supply Base of China; Investment: 
$40,000; Business Activity:  Furniture Production; Duration:  5 
years; Director:  D. Monhdzul (Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, Building No 
17) 

   9.  "Yol-Had" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760307; Mongolian 
Participating Party:  "MONNAA [expansion not given]" Concern; 
Foreign Participating Party:  Russian Buryat "Agrokonsortsium"; 
Investment:  6.75 million tugriks; Business activity:  Tourism, meat 
and milk processing, and Production of Pastry and beverages; 
Duration:  5 years; Director:  N. Baatarchuluun (Bornuur Somon, Tob 
Aymag, "Yol had" amralt) 

   10. "Monross Ard" BBHK -- Registration No.:  763187; Mongolian 
Participating Party:  5 citizens, including S. Chimeddorj and D. 
Chuluunbaatar; Foreign Participating Party:  "Novosti Holding" of 
Novorossiysk, Russian and 5 citizens, including Semikin; Investment: 
7,719,600 tugriks; Business activity:  Household electric equipment 
and vehicle repair and servicing, ShTS [exPansion not given], 
importing, exporting, and re-exporting; Duration:  3 years; 
Director:  S.V. Filinovich (Ulaanbaatar-Bayandzurh, "Mobidemiks 
Company 

   11. "Burvodstroy" BBHK -- Registration No.:  760587; Mongolian 
Participating party:  [not given]; Foreign Participating party: 
Rosglavzarubezhvodstory Cooperative, Russia; Investment:  24 million 
tugriks; Business activity:  Water removal from the Baganuur Mine, 
deep drilling for centralized water supply, and delivery of material 
and equipment; Director:  A.S. Kutsay (Ulaanbaatar-Songino hayrhan 
"Nuurs" Company Building) 

(Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 28 Jan 94 p 4) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CISD, (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/24 MAR/ECONF/CIS DIVISION/DEW 24/2150Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-60 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000016994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-013--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Europe     Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 13, 24 
March 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. The EER is published in two 
editions, one for Western Europe (also including media coverage of 
Canada and Turkey), and the other for Eastern Europe.  Drawing 
primarily from domestic media sources of these countries but also 
using other foreign media where appropriate, the EER focuses on 
national and regional economic issues, such as economic 
competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic reforms and 
other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade and 
investment. 

    FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S  Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

    TABLE OF CONTENTS 

    FEATURES: 

    Sweden--Exporters Set Their Sights on China 

    EU 

    Rapid Conclusions of Leuna Dispute Sought; EBRD Doubles 
Investment in East Europe 

    FINLAND 

    Commentary Views Reich's Jobs Solutions 

    FRANCE 

    Editorial Discusses G-7 Job Summit; Commentary Advocates Social 
Welfare Commitment; Job Summit Ignores World Unemployment;Commentary 
on G-7 Job Summit; U.S. Seen Speaking 'Double Talk' on Audiovisual; 
Sapin Discusses Monetary Policy; Editorial on OECD Views on French 
Interest Rates; Editorial on Government Subsidies;Dassault Asks 
Assembly To Stop Rafale Delays; Roots of Unemployment Viewed; U.S. 
'Pressure' Divides EU on Naval Construction 

    GERMANY 

    Commentators View Jobs Summit; Environmental Technology Seen As 
Creating Jobs; Governments Push Small Business Funding; New 
Semiconductor Plant Opens in East; Bitterfeld Chemical Facilities 
Expanded 

    GREECE 

    Civil Service 'Inflation' Noted; Greek-Romanian Economic 
Relations;  Energy Pollution Taxes Assessed 

    ITALY 

    Labor Minister Discusses Black Market Labor; Recent Labor 
Accords Seen As Stopgap Measures; ENI's Plans To Expand East 

    NORWAY 

    Record Export Year Reported; Pension Fund Called 'Profitable 
Business';  Swedish Bank Predicts Growth for Norway, Denmark; 1993 
Profitable for Most Businesses; New Oil Drilling Planned; 
Competitiveness of Norwegian Shelf Assessed7 

    SWEDEN 

    Swedish Contribution to EU Budget Calculated 

    ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

    France, Greece, Norway 

    FEATURE 

    Sweden:   Exporters Set Their Sights on China 

    With many Swedish companies hoping to take advantage of the 
Chinese economic boom, exports to China have more than doubled in 
the last two years.  In fact, according to a 29 January SVENSKA 
DAGBLADET survey of Swedish economic activity in China, the Far East 
is well on its way to becoming a more important market for Swedish 
firms than North America.  Swedish exports to China increased from 
1.6 to 3.5 billion kronor between 1991 and 1993, and more Swedish 
firms are establishing joint ventures in China as well.  The 
commercial section at the Swedish embassy in Beijing described 1993 
as a "real record year." 

    Despite the export boom, Sweden's trade picture with China is 
not all rosy.  According to the 29 January SVENSKA DAGBLADET, Sweden 
continues to maintain a trade deficit with China because imports 
from that country--especially textiles--have increased dramatically. 
In recent years, China has replaced Portugal as the leading supplier 
of textiles to Sweden.  The business weekly VECKANS AFFARER also 
reported on 21 February that Sweden's share of Chinese imports has 
decreased from 1.35 percent in 1987 to under 1 percent in 1993. 
This is attributed to Eurocentric attitudes on the part of many 
Swedish firms. 

    Ericsson: The Shining Star 

    The Ericsson electronics company accounts for the lion's share-- 
60 percent--of Sweden's exports to China, which is well on its way 
to becoming Ericsson's largest market, according to an article in 
DAGENS NYHETER on 29 January.  Ericsson has been most successful in 
exporting mobile phones to China, where it holds a 70-percent market 
share.  The article cites Hans Ekstrom, the company's head of 
operations in China, as saying that "the sale of mobile telephones 
in China has been a real cash cow for us."  Ericsson's sales of 
these phones--a popular status symbol in China--doubled in 1992 and 
1993 and are expected to further increase when China installs a 
standardized digital system.  Ericsson already has an advantage in 
the vast Chinese market because of its ability to build large-scale 
systems.  According to the article, the firm sees its most important 
competitors in establishing a mobile phone system in China as 
Motorola and the Finnish firm Nokia.  The article also notes that a 
large part of the export credits for Ericsson's sales is expected to 
come from foreign institutions because of the low risk tolerance of 
Swedish banks. 

    Ericsson, which last year moved its southern China office from 
Hong Kong to Guangzhou to be closer to its customers, has been 
particularly active in Guangdong--a province of 66 million 
inhabitants whose capital is Guangzhou.  According to the 31 January 
SVENSKA DAGBLADET, Ericsson has 40 percent of the overall public 
telecommunications market in Guangdong, second only to Japan's 
NEC, and 80 percent of the market for mobile telephones.  In 
addition, the company has received 80 percent of all new 
telecommunications orders in the province in the last three years. 
Last year it got a 2.5-billion-kronor order from Guangdong Post &amp; 
Telecom to expand the regular telephone system to 2 million new 
subscribers; the order will be 15 percent financed by state- 
backed Swedish export credits.  Ericsson is also one of five 
companies invited to bid on building a digital GSM mobile phone 
system in the province;  according to an article in DAGENS NYHETER 
on 29 January, Ericsson has an advantage in the competition because 
it built Guangdong's GSM test system.  SVENSKA DAGBLADET also 
reported on 1 March that Ericsson got a 1.7-billion- kronor order 
from the province, which the deputy head of Ericsson Radio Systems 
in China called "one of our largest orders ever," to build an 
analogue system for mobile phones, called the Total Access 
Communication System.  It will also deliver mobile phone exchanges, 
radio base stations, a system for maintenance and monitoring, and 
subscriber databases, all of which will be produced in Sweden. 

    Other Players 

    Other Swedish firms are hoping to take advantage of the 
development of the Chinese infrastructure, especially the railroad 
industry.  Asea Brown Boveri (ABB), a Swedish-Swiss electrical 
engineering giant, is perhaps the second most active Swedish company 
in China.  An article in the 29 January SVENSKA DAGBLADET explains 
how ABB, whose sales in China totalled 1.5 billion kronor in 1992, 
has capitalized on China's energy and transportation needs to 
carve out a niche for itself in the Chinese market.  While the 
company had only 50 employees in Hong Kong and China five years ago, 
that total has now risen to 1,500.  China is its single largest 
market for power generators, power transmitters, and trains.  ABB 
hopes for large sales of its X2000 high speed train as well. 
According to a SVENSKA DAGBLADET report from 27 October, the 
railroad is also among Atlas Copco's biggest Chinese customers. 
The mining engineering firm, which has built dams and tunnels in 
China, is hoping for a contract to construct tunnels for the high- 
speed train route between Beijing and Hong Kong.  Last year SKF, a 
ball bearings manufacturer, also got what the report calls a 
"breakthrough" order from the railroad.  SKF had previously 
concentrated on supplying ball bearings and components for 
textile machines in China.  The Swedish trade counselor in Beijing 
told SVENSKA DAGBLADET on 27 October that Swedish exporters can be 
as successful in the railroad industry in China as Ericsson has been 
in the telecommunications sector, providing they can secure 
financing.  However, the Swedish development aid organization, which 
has established strict regulations on deals in China, has not been 
forthcoming. 

   Looking at the success of Swedish industry in China, an article 
in SVENSKA DAGBLADET on 29 January notes that the country is also an 
important market for Hagglunds, which produces heavy machinery. 
China makes up 30-40 percent of Hagglunds' market worldwide for 
hydraulic motors.  The company also sells cranes, many of which are 
made in a joint venture in Nanjing, to China's growing shipbuilding 
business.  Its vehicles are also being used in oil exploration on 
the coast and the Yellow River delta. 

    Automaker Volvo has been making inroads into the Chinese market 
through local representation and joint ventures, another article in 
SVENSKA DAGBLADET on 29 January claims.  Although sales slacked off 
last year due to tight Chinese economic policies, the company is 
expecting sales to increase this year.  It has 10 retail and service 
locations in China and earlier this year opened an office in 
Beijing.  Last Fall Volvo concluded a joint venture agreement with 
Xian Aircraft Company for the production and marketing of buses. 
The factory will start by producing 1,000 buses a year and then 
increase to 3,000; it will employ 1,100 workers.  An article in 
DAGENS NYHETER on 29 January notes that the company is hoping to 
open another production facility.  (WS) 

    EU 

    RAPID CONCLUSION OF LEUNA DISPUTE SOUGHT--At a meeting in Bonn 
to discuss economic convergence between the two countries, French 
and German parliamentarians pointed out the symbolic character of 
the proposed Leuna oil refinery, which France's Elf oil company 
agreed to build in eastern Germany.  The refinery project, they 
claim, could solidify industrial links between France and Germany. 
To do so, however, the parliamentarians state that there needs to be 
a quick resolution of the dispute which has arisen between Elf 
and Germany's Trust Agency over Elf's desire to reduce its 
investment commitment to the project.  Noting that this investment 
was "vital for overcoming the difficulties of eastern Germany's 
chemical industry," the parliamentarians added that besides the 
purely political considerations, necessary market considerations 
must not be neglected.  However, any arrangement should proceed 
"with the general principle of law which says that contracts 
concluded should be respected in their spirit." 

    Because of the impasse in the negotiations between the Trust 
Agency and Elf, the economy minister of Saxe-Anhalt, where Leuna is 
located, intends to talk directly to Elf.  Additionally, officials 
at Germany's Thyssen, Elf's partner and coinvestor in the refinery, 
declared they were convinced the issue would be resolved soon and 
that the question of Elf's ownership share could be resolved 
internally between Thyssen and Elf. (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS 
in French 10 Mar 94 p 10) 

    EBRD DOUBLES INVESTMENT IN EAST EUROPE--The European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) approved 91 projects in East 
Europe in 1993, which represented a financial investment of 2.28 
billion ECU's or two times more than the preceding year, according 
to an EBRD report published on 9 March.  In 1992, the bank approved 
51 projects representing 1.09 billion ECU's.  The report indicates 
that in 1993, EBRD loans made possible East European projects worth 
11.3 billion ECU's compared to 7 billion ECU's in 1992 and 1.5 
billion ECU's during the first nine months of the banks existence in 
1991.  According to the report, EBRD wants to maintain the same 
level of investment this year as in 1993. 

    However, as in 1992, EBRD only disbursed a small fraction of the 
approved sums: Out of the 2.28 billion ECU's approved, only 435 
million ECU's were actually made available to projects, according to 
an article in LES ECHOS.  This "enormous" difference between 
approved and disbursed funds, although caused by projects structured 
for completion over several years, may rekindle the debate on EBRD's 
ability to lend.  The article questions whether this might thwart 
EBRD's attempt to highlight the good conditions of its accounts 
after the past year when the bank was criticized for former director 
Jacques Attali's management.  In any case, EBRD can point to 
progress in containing bank operating expenses, which at 137.3 
million ECU's are 8 percent less than forecast, according to the 
report. (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 10 Mar 94 p 7) 

    FINLAND 

    COMMENTARY VIEWS REICH'S JOBS SOLUTIONS--In the lead editorial 
for Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET on 16 March, editor-in-chief Bo 
Stenstrom commented on U.S. Labor Secretary Robert Reich's message 
at the G-7 Jobs Summit that infrastructure investment is a major 
factor in creating employment.  While admitting that Finland, with 
its over 20-percent unemployment rate, has not been as successful as 
the United States in putting people to work, Stenstrom criticizes 
those who have taken Reich's ideas as a "job creation recipe in 
itself."  Stenstrom argues that investing in infrastructure will not 
automatically lead to better jobs and better wages.  He cites 
assertions that while the United States has indeed a better record 
as far as raw unemployment figures, that many of these jobs are low- 
paid service sector positions.  Stenstrom suggests that both Reich's 
and the G-7's White Papers are too eager to diminish the role of the 
public sector, which Stenstrom sees as vital for "providing 
training" to improve workers' skills to make them more competitive 
with those in developing countries. 

    Stenstrom also points to another problem particular to Finland's 
virtually flat population growth, a problem he believes 
infrastructure investing alone cannot solve: overproduction as 
industry and workers become more efficient.  He reasons that growth 
in industrial production leads toinvestment in technology, which 
will improve productivity but cut jobs.  The lack of population 
growth, with its attendant reduction in consumption, makes 
Finland unable to absorb more production or create more employment, 
Stenstrom maintains.  He questions whether Finland or Europe are 
going to provide the ever higher-paying and higher-skilled jobs 
demanded by its more educated work force.  As an example of how 
European governments are running out of solutions, he mentions such 
practices as Denmark's sabbatical leave program, which--used as a 
substitute for paying unemployment compensation--is "a big 
minus" for the economy.  "We are resorting to such methods in a 
situation which we cannot in the long run afford." (RB)  (Helsinki 
HUFVUDSTADSBLADET in Finnish 16 Mar 94 p 2) 

    FRANCE 

    EDITORIAL DISCUSSES G-7 JOB SUMMIT--Deputy editor-in-chief for 
macroeconomics Francoise Crouigneau writes in the Paris financial 
daily LES ECHOS that the G-7 job summit in Detroit is strongly 
symbolic despite the fact that the United States has transformed 
"this think-tank seminar" into a "media happening" and that each of 
the G-7 countries is "showing off" its own solutions for 
unemployment.  The meeting, Crouigneau contends, is an 
acknowledgment of "worry and of powerlessness" when faced with 
safeguarding the competitiveness of the companies of industrial 
countries and their ability to employ workers.  The world's work 
force seems to have a choice between being poorly paid and unskilled 
overseas or being skilled but unemployed in Europe. 

    Crouigneau argues that if the future world job market depends on 
the highly skilled, then Europe, despite its unemployment problems, 
is further along than the United States, which has essentially 
created low-skilled jobs.  However, creating jobs in the future is 
all the more troublesome since the solution is no longer the 
budgetary and monetary management of governments.  The emergence of 
newly industrialized countries creates an unknown factor in the 
rules of the game for foreign trade.  These rules, Crouigneau points 
out, are all the more important now since  economic guerilla 
warfare" has replaced past relationships built on politics and the 
Cold War.  Today, the most advanced nations are condemned to adapt 
and innovate to survive.  To do so, they must recognize that two 
conditions are needed.  They must agree to at least a minimum of 
coordination so that growth in the G-7 countries can resume, and 
they must reform their economies to address unemployment caused 
by high labor costs.  Crouigneau acknowledges that no one has the 
secret for accomplishing the latter. (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in 
French 14 Mar 94 p 4) 

   COMMENTARY ADVOCATES SOCIAL WELFARE COMMITMENT--According to 
Pascal Riche writing in the 15 March Paris daily LIBERATION, U.S. 
Labor Secretary Robert Reich's comments that countries do not have 
to choose between good jobs or a decent life is an attempt to 
achieve a convergence between Europe's need to create unskilled jobs 
and the U.S. need for skilled employment.  However, while this 
approach seems logical, it may not be the right one, Riche argues. 
The United States is just beginning to try creating skilled jobs and 
no conclusion can be drawn from the U.S. experience at this time. 
As for Europe, it tried "various schemes" during the "laissez-faire" 
1980's to do the same and failed to produce results, which has led 
to the French Government now proposing to modify minimum wage 
requirements for young people.  For Europeans to seek a third way 
between the two models would probably result in a system that would 
only "preserve the disadvantages of the two systems," Riche 
contends.  Instead, he advocates that European governments "deepen" 
their commitment to social welfare.  These governments, Roche notes, 
failed in the fight against unemployment because they did not 
deal with unemployment in a timely manner.  While he adds that some 
blame budgetary difficulties for this neglect, he also points out 
that successive governments allowed social costs to escalate and did 
not recognize the importance of job training.  At the same time, 
working Europeans fought to preserve salary raises in disregard of 
labor market conditions.  However, Riche concludes that if there had 
been more commitment to maintaining social welfare during the 
1980's, the government might have formulated policies to 
stimulate economic growth to alleviate unemployment rather than 
trying its various ineffective job creation schemes.  Instead, it 
allowed unemployment to "swallow up" working people "as if a l0- 
percent unemployment rate were considered 'normal'."  (RM)  (Paris 
LIBERATION in French 15 Mar 94 p 3) 

    JOB SUMMIT IGNORES WORLD UNEMPLOYMENT--Gerard Dupuy, commenting 
on the G-7 Job Summit in the 15 March Paris daily LIBERATION, cites 
a recent report noting that unemployment rates in the rest of the 
world are "hugely" higher than the rate in rich countries. 
According to Dupuy, these "hundreds of millions of unemployed will 
be ignored in Detroit."  Given the breadth of the challenge, it is 
easy to see why summit participants have warned that "no decisions 
should be expected."  While unemployment problems in less-developed 
countries will make a "timid" appearance at the summit, Dupuy is 
skeptical about any impact it might have since he sees in it "less 
compassion about the miseries of the present" and more concern about 
the threat that such a  problem entails. (RM)  (Paris LIBERATION in 
French 15 Mar 94 p 3) 

    COMMENTARY ON G-7 JOB SUMMIT--Delphine Girard, commenting in the 
Paris business daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES on the G-7 Job Summit, 
stated that President Bill Clinton's message on unemployment caught 
Europe "on the wrong foot."  Europeans have for months been trying 
to explain to distraught workers, especially in France, that they 
must choose between wages and employment.  Clinton could have used 
the summit to provide a "final blow" to "old [European] complaints" 
about social welfare and unemployment, Girard claimed.  Instead, 
Clinton stressed that it is not by underpaying wages and 
multiplying small jobs that industrialized countries will improve 
unemployment.  To create employment, he said, they must instead 
raise living standards by increasing salaries, favoring higher 
education to foster technological progress, developing productivity 
in industries of the future, and reinforcing social protection. 
(DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 17 Mar 94 p 3) 

    U.S. SEEN SPEAKING 'DOUBLE TALK' ON AUDIOVISUAL-- According to 
Emmanuel Schwartzenberg writing the economic supplement to LE 
FIGARO, Le Fig-Eco,  the United States is speaking "double talk" 
when it comes to audiovisual policy since U.S. Trade Representative 
Mickey Kantor says one thing while President of the Motion Picture 
Association of America (MPAA) Jack Valenti says another.  While 
Kantor has again threatened to use U.S. trade laws to force Europe 
to open its audiovisual market, Valenti has been very conciliatory 
toward Europeans declaring, "The government position and that of U.S 
producers and distributors is not identical.  Cinema is outside the 
political field and it is I who guards the keys to the house. 
Kantor has never consulted me on the question of trade sanctions." 

    Schwartzenberg contends that Valenti, since the GATT agreement, 
considers that the "too intransigent position" of the U.S. 
Government reinforces European cohesion and may prod the EU to 
establish a "super" trade regulation prejudicial to U.S. interests. 
Persuaded that "new technologies, which allow each television viewer 
to create his own program, will render legislation obsolete," 
Valenti considers that "France, as can the other European countries, 
can legislate all it wants."  (DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco 
supplement in French 10 Mar 94 p XII) 

    SAPIN DISCUSSES MONETARY POLICY--In an interview with a panel of 
journalists from LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, Bank of France Monetary 
Policy Council (MPC) member and former Socialist Economy and Finance 
Minister Michel Sapin claimed that the Bank of France has "without 
question" become independent.  Nonetheless, Sapin stated he would 
continue the policy followed by the current French Government and 
its predecessors of monetary coordination with the Bundesbank.  He 
also refuted the idea that this policy increases unemployment, 
warned the government about increasing deficits, and said there 
was no "lasting" relationship between U.S. interest rates and those 
of Europe. 

    Although he contended that the Bank of France was "certainly" 
independent, Sapin noted that questions were often asked about the 
counterpart of independence, that is, collegiality."  "There is no 
independence without collegiality," Sapin argued, "because it is 
rarely the case that the correct monetary decision is clearcut." 
Decisions are made within the context of a network of constraints 
and contradictions.  To appreciate these contradictory elements and 
this complexity, it is better to put several people together having 
different agendas, experiences, and languages so that monetary 
decisions can be made.  Besides, he added, when monetary decisions 
were a government responsibility, they too were made after a 
collegial debate. 

    Sapin, pointing out that the MPC was obliged to be accountable 
to the public and to be responsible in what it said since financial 
markets "watch its every word," stated that it was more necessary 
than ever to coordinate French monetary policy with the Bundesbank. 
The problem with France's relationship with the Bundesbank is not a 
question of independence.  It is a question of either thinking of 
monetary policy in a French or a European sense.  In Sapin's view, 
the need to establish a European single currency must not be 
influenced by economic or market conditions.  The objective is to 
quickly establish a single currency to be able then to have more 
decisive margins of maneuver in relation to the United States and 
Asia.  To arrive at that stage, "we must go through some 
turbulence," he said. 

    Regarding unemployment, Sapin said that it cannot be reduced 
without economic growth but that growth is not enough.  In France, 
structural unemployment existed before the recession and it will 
remain after the recovery if something is not done about it.  Sapin 
argues that current monetary policy does not aggravate unemployment, 
since its emphasis on stability has given the economy a sound base. 
Nonetheless, Sapin stated that unemployment was one of his main 
preoccupations. 

    Budget deficits are another.  Sapin said it did not bother him 
if deficits were used in recessions to help fuel the economy. 
However, when recovery starts the government must change its 
spending policy or consumers and companies either will not have 
access to money or the money will cost too much.  "We are at this 
point today," he said, and the government must now make reducing the 
deficit a priority to meet the very strict budgetary requirements 
for French-German convergence. 

    Sapin was also asked how he explained what happened in financial 
markets when the United States raised its interest rates.  He 
replied that the U.S. interest rate hike affected Europe for "no 
rational reason," indicating that European financial agents did not 
understand that increased rates in the United States are not 
contradictory with pursuing lower rates in Europe.  There is no 
lasting connection between the United States and Europe because 
the economic situations are very different, Sapin declared. (Dil) 
(Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 11 Mar 94 p 25) 

    EDITORIAL ON OECD VIEWS ON FRENCH INTEREST RATES--In an 
editorial in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, editor-in-chief Philippe Labarde 
claims that the recent report by the OECD, which advocated 
unilateral French interest rate reductions as the only way to 
sustain demand in France if German rates did not decline, was 
"priceless" as a means to resuscitate the debate on French 
monetary policy.  Despite the hard line taken by the Bank of France 
and Prime Minister Edouard Balladur in support of continuing its 
close monetary coordination with Germany, Labarde notes that the 
critics of such a policy are increasing.  Numerous economists and 
heads of companies are adding their voices to that of the OECD. 
Labarde argues that the OECD, as a bastion of free market orthodoxy, 
gives credence to these "partisans of a French offensive monetary 
policy."  Before the OECD report, these critics were considered at 
best as "sorcerers apprentices or dreamers," at worst as secret 
devaluationists, notorious anti-Europeanists, or shameful 
protectionists." 

    The OECD statement, however, may not lead to monetary 
authorities changing their policy, Labarde cautions.  The government 
has already missed two occasions which would have allowed it freedom 
from the Bundesbank: the first was when it was elected and the 
second during last August's monetary crisis.  Labarde concludes that 
while it is never too late to change monetary direction and that 
economic recovery would be helped by a significant lowering of 
discount rates, he acknowledges that current political and monetary 
conditions make it difficult to do so. (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES in French 10 Mar 94 p 32) 

    EDITORIAL ON GOVERNMENT SUBSIDIES--Deputy editor-in-chief 
Francois Roche, writing in the Paris business daily LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES, observes that government subsidies for public companies 
are expensive for France but that the "real" problem of France's 
public companies, especially the computer company Bull and Air 
France, is that they have been mismanaged for a long time.  Roche 
notes that some would find it "scandalous" that Bull is receiving 7- 
8 billion francs (Fr) and Air France Fr20 billion from the French 
Government.  He characterizes such government assistance as "at the 
limit of decency" in the opinion of many, coming at a time when 
private companies are taking risks to find their own financial 
resources in the market place.  He claims the distortion it causes 
in competition is "too flagrant" not to "set right." 

    However, Roche states that the cause for Bull's and Air France's 
financial problems lies with long-term government mismanagement. 
These two companies have never been managed as they have should have 
been, that is to say, as part of a competitive free market.  Their 
directors have never been able to cut themselves off, even when they 
wanted to, from larger political issues.  Moreover, the government, 
when it harbored "great ambitions" in data processing or air 
transport, never furnished these two companies with the financial 
means to fulfill these "grandiose" projects.  Roche concludes that 
Bull and Air France, which have been sheltered from the realities of 
the world in an attempt to make them the "guarantors of national 
independence," are now at the "end of their rope."  Roche adds that 
while it is understandable that the new directors of these companies 
do not want to deal with the consequences of past mismanagement, 
waiting for them to come to grips with their problems wastes money, 
energy, and demoralizes employees. 
(DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 11 Mar 94 p 40) 

    DASSAULT ASKS ASSEMBLY TO STOP RAFALE DELAYS--In a plea to the 
members of the National Assembly defense commission on 1 March, 
Dassault Aviation Chairman Serge Dassault asked that the Rafale 
fighter aircraft program no longer be delayed.  "The survival of the 
group is linked to three factors," he said, "The Rafale program, 
innovative future projects, and civilian and military aircraft 
exports."  The Rafale program was last delayed for six months at the 
end of 1993 and resulted in the loss of 1,000 jobs, half of them in 
the Dassault group.  Serge Dassault pointed out that under present 
conditions, the Ministry of Defense foresees that "very few" Rafale 
aircraft will be delivered before the end of the decade.  (RM) 
(Paris LE MONDE in French 4 Mar 94 p 10) 

    ROOTS OF UNEMPLOYMENT VIEWED--In the Paris daily LE QUOTIDIEN DE 
PARIS, Economist Michel Drancourt notes that there is a "French 
cultural exception" with regard to the causes of unemployment.  As 
early as the 1970's, the Europeans, and notably the French, chose to 
increase the salaries and social benefits of workers, despite 
periodic economic crises, and to finance growing unemployment by 
steadily increasing workers wages and thus employer social 
contributions.  Drancourt remarks that such a "revenues policy" must 
be revised in favor of an "employment policy."  He suggests the 
French could learn from the U.S. system, which he notes is "more 
efficient," with job creation increasing because productivity 
increases faster than do wages. 
    Drancourt does not recommend "systematically reducing" salaries 
but proposes that they should be linked to productivity.  The high 
cost of salaries, he argues, has limited companies chances to 
increase productivity.  In playing the role of provider, the state 
caused a systematic reduction in employment in both large and small 
companies.  The growth in unemployment, however, did not result in 
lower salaries.  Drancourt lays the blame on social benefit costs, 
which are rising faster than direct salaries because they pay for 
redistribution of capital which does not promote job creation. 
"Rigidity should be dismantled," Drancourt contends, and real 
salaries should be adjusted according to productivity.  This entails 
an adjustment in social benefit costs and their financing--a 
difficult but necessary solution, Drancourt concludes.  (RM)  (Paris 
LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS in French 3 Mar 94 p 
4) 

    U.S. 'PRESSURE' DIVIDES EU ON NAVAL CONSTRUCTION--A debate is 
beginning in Brussels on the position it should adopt in the last 
round of OECD negotiations on naval construction subsidies.  EU 
shipbuilders fear that the EU Commission will only adopt a 
"minimalist" position in the face of U.S. retaliatory threats, 
according to an article in the Paris business daily LES 
ECHOS.  The naval shipbuilders union (CSCN) claimed that EU 
negotiators want an agreement at any cost even if it is an 
inequitable one and shipbuilders fear they will lose the little 
protection they now have.  However, the terms of the agreement which 
EU negotiators were prepared to accept could be modified under 
French Government pressure, the article contends, because 
France is "sharply opposed" to the EU "minimalist" position. 

    The EU position, which was also criticized by Spain, Belgium, 
and Italy, would abolish as of 1 January 1995 aide to naval 
construction and aid to shipowners linked to naval construction. 
Japanese subsidies to its shipbuilding industry, however, would be 
examined to find out if it distort the market, but the results from 
such an examination would not be ready for several years.  No 
safeguards have been provided in case of "monetary dumping."  The 
United States could continue, at least for a while, numerous 
protectionist measures, especially those contained in the Jones Act, 
which stipulates ships must be built in the United States and keeps 
foreign builders from participating in a $1.5-billion market, 
according to a CSCN study.  In addition to the United States 
protecting its shipbuilders in the civilian market at a time when 
military orders have decreased, the United States is also providing 
$2 billion a year for shipyards to convert to civilian work.  The 
article concludes that the United States has entered the 
final round of OECD negotiations by brandishing the threat of 
retaliation if an agreement is not reached because they are "certain 
of their right, or at least their power, [to do so]." (DiI)  (Paris 
LES ECHOS in French 10 Mar 94 p 
12) 

    GERMANY 

    COMMENTATORS VIEW JOBS SUMMIT--Although German press 
commentators generally agreed that the recent G-7 Jobs Summit 
produced few concrete results, some thought the gathering was 
important as a sign of new international priorities and as an 
opportunity for countries to learn from each other's experiences. 
Writing in the 16 March SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG, Peter De Thier 
complained that the meeting was "rich in symbols and poor in 
content" and that it served "no concrete purpose," except as a 
"glittering self-portrait of the resurgent U.S. economy."  Other 
commentators agreed that the meeting yielded few tangible results 
but noted that it was not expected or intended to.  Gerd 
Brueggemann, for example, pointed dut in DIE WELT of 16 
March that "quick successes were not to be expected," and Josef 
Joffe declared in the same day's SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG that meager 
results were "predictable, because summits rarely produce anything 
that was not put on paper beforehand." 

    Some commentators, however, thought the conference was important 
despite this dearth of concrete achievements.  Carola Kaps, for 
example, argued in the 16 March FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE that "it 
would probably be wrong" to call the summit a "failure," since its 
only objective was to allow the G-7 countries to "learn from one 
another through an intensive exchange of opinions" and "to take home 
new ideas or motivations."  Judged by this standard, she argued, the 
meeting enjoyed at least one "success," since the United States 
seemed to have come away with more understanding and acceptance 
of Germany's reluctance to stimulate its economy.  Kaps, along with 
Joffe, also saw the conference as evidence that the West had changed 
its international economic priorities.  The meeting, both writers 
noted, marked the first time Western leaders had met to discuss 
unemployment, which was previously viewed as too prosaic for their 
attention.  For her part, Kaps believed this change would "send a 
signal" to average citizens that their leaders "are aware of 
people's fears" and of the socially "dangerous" effects 
of a high rate of joblessness.  Joffe, meanwhile, saw the meeting's 
attention to the jobs issue as important "because it enhances the 
shift in awareness" toward the unemployment issue, and because it 
showed that the G-7 recognized the "globalization" of economic 
problems and solutions.  (RoH)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in 
German 16 Mar 94 pp 4, 28; Berlin DIE WELT in German 16 Mar 94 p 6; 
Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 16 Mar 94 p 
15) 

    ENVIRONMENTAL TECHNOLOGY SEEN AS CREATING JOBS--In the field of 
environmental technology, Germany is the "undisputed" world champion 
exporter, ahead of the United States and Japan, according to Federal 
Minister of the Environment Klaus Toepfer, who is a member of the 
Christian Democratic Union (CDU).  Speaking at the Leipzig Spring 
Fair, Toepfer presented the following data: 

    --In 1991 (the latest year for which statistics are available) 
Germany captured a 20-percent share of the world environmental 
technology export market, with exports of goods and services 
amounting to 37 billion German marks (DM) or 6 percent of the 
nation's total industrial exports. 

    --Currently, 680,000 German workers are employed in the 
environmental technology industry, a number which could grow to 1 
million by the year 2000. 

    Toepfer interprets the data as evidence that "German 
environmental standards are not the reason for our economic 
problems" but rather a stimulus for growth, given an environmental 
technology market that is "nearly limitless."  Citing an OECD study 
which estimates the volume of potential environmental sales in East 
Europe alone at $15 billion, Toepfer expressed his hope that German 
industry "will make use of its lead in exporting and will not gamble 
away its environmental know-how."  To this end, he intends to 
champion the establishment in Leipzig of an environmental technology 
center with a "special" orientation toward Central and East Europe. 
(JS) (Berlin DIE WELT in German 10 Mar 94 p 14) 

    GOVERNMENTS PUSH SMALL BUSINESS FUNDING--The laender governments 
in eastern Germany are trying to encourage the growth of small- and 
medium-sized businesses through a variety of aid programs. 
Thuringia, for example, is providing funds to new businesses to help 
preserve and create jobs and to assist with sales, trade fairs, 
consulting work, travel, credit guarantees, and direct investments. 
The German Bank of Settlements has extended aid to 
35,000 businessmen in Thuringia, using its roughly DM6 billion in 
seed funds to generate DM9 billion in private investment.  This 
program has preserved or created about 250,000 jobs since 1990, 
notably in the trade and craft sector. 

    Meanwhile, in heavily industrialized Saxony-Anhalt, the land 
government is attempting to stimulate banks to fund small firms' 
needs through credit guarantees and manufacturing subsidies for 
particular products.  The land of Brandenburg claims to have funded 
48,000 small entrepreneurs with DM15.1 billion since 1991 and to 
have more than offset the loss in manufacturing jobs by the increase 
in trade and craft positions.  Finally, the government of 
Mecklenburg-Vorpommern has instituted two new funding mechanisms for 
small businesses, the "capital support program," which provides 
supplemental capital funding, and the "consolidation program," a 
one-time advance to establish liquidity or to refinance loans.  (CW) 
(Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 10 Mar 94 p 8) 

    NEW SEMICONDUCTOR PLANT OPENS IN EAST--System Microelectronic 
Innovation (SMI), the privatized successor to East Germany's VEB 
Halbleiterwerk of Frankfurt/Oder, is the first European company to 
manufacture silicon-based, superfast bipolar semiconductors.  A new 
DM17-million plant developed by Synergy Semiconductor Corporation, a 
U.S. firm which owns 49 percent of SMI, has just been opened.  SMI 
expects sales of DM33 million in 1994 and estimates selling 50 
percent more in 1995, largely because of sales of the new 
semiconductor, which is based on a Toshiba license.  SMI believes 
the new device will soon account for nearly 50 percent of the its 
output.  Once profitability is reached and investors are found for 
the Trust Agency's remaining stake, Synergy plans to increase its 
share in SMI to 51 percent and foresees a total investment of DM40 
million to develop the German company. 
(CW)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 7 Mar 94 p 
18) 

    BITTERFELD CHEMICAL FACILITIES EXPANDED--The Chemiepark 
Bitterfeld industrial park reports that 178 firms have located in 
its complex--once the center of the East German chemical industry-- 
and that over DM2 billion have been spent on new manufacturing 
facilities and businesses there.  Barely one-half of the complex's 
GDR-era companies have been privatized and some 40 percent of its 
production facilities are shut down and being dismantled. 
Akzo Nobel, a Dutch firm, has just purchased part of a phosphorus 
production company in Bitterfeld from the Trust Agency and plans to 
invest DM50 million by 1996 to establish production lines for fire- 
retardant chemicals. 

    The Eschborn-based Ausimont Deutschland company, a subsidiary of 
Italy's Montedison group, is building a DM140 million hydrogen 
peroxide plant at Bitterfeld and expects to produce 40,000 tons of 
the chemical per year, yielding revenues in the "high double-digit 
millions."  Chemiepark Bitterfeld's manufacturing branch reports 
that the complex's inorganic chemicals and dyestuffs facilities are 
still not privatized but that negotiations for sale of the pesticide 
production facilities are progressing. (CW)  (Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 3 Mar 94 p 19) 

    GREECE 

    CIVIL SERVICE 'INFLATION' NOTED--According to Fotini Kalliri 
writing in the 3 March Athens daily I KATHIMERINI, "the thoughtless 
hiring policy" of both the New Democracy (ND) and the Panhellenic 
Socialist Movement (PASOK) governments in recent years has resulted 
in a "ponderous, costly, and submissive" civil service, which 
presently numbers  about 700,000 workers.  For a population of 10 
million, that is one civil servant for every 14 inhabitants.  Total 
figures have steadily risen: 53,914 in 1972, 100,955 in 1980, and 
589,386 in 1988.  Salary and pension costs have risen from 1,858.3 
billion drachmas in 1992 to 2,040 billion drachmas in 1993 and are 
projected to reach 2,272.6 billion in 1994.  (RM)  (Athens I 
KATHIMERINI in Greek 3 Mar 94 p 6) 

    GREEK-ROMANIAN ECONOMIC RELATIONS--A Greek-Romanian Chamber of 
Commerce was recently established in Athens by a number of Greek 
companies, with a Salonica and a Budapest branch expected soon, 
aimed at intensifying commercial and industrial relations between 
the two countries.  Between January and October 1993, Greek exports 
to Romania dropped to $73.9 million from the 1992 mark of $97.8 
million.  A simultaneous drop was reported in Romanian exports to 
Greece, which declined from $46.7 million in a 10-month 
period in 1992 to $43 million in the same period in 1993. (RM) 
(Athens TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS in Greek 6 Mar 94 p D31) 

    ENERGY POLLUTION TAXES ASSESSED--According to a study by 
Ministry of National Economy experts, the EU Commission wants to 
levy a general energy and carbon dioxide environmental tax during 
the Greek EU presidency.  The study claims' the burden of such a tax 
on Greece is "significant," and will: 

    *  Increase the inflation rate by 1 percent a year. 
    *  Decrease private investment by 2.5 percent a year. 
    *  Decrease GDP by 0.5 percent. 
    *  Decrease employment by 0.5 percent. 
    *  Increase cost of electricity.  (RM) 
(Athens I KATHIMERINI in Greek 1 Mar 94 p 21) 

    ITALY 

    LABOR MINISTER DISCUSSES BLACK MARKET LABOR--At an informal EU 
meeting on labor held in Athens on 10 March, Labor Minister Gino 
Giugni discussed a white paper prepared by the Italian Government on 
unemployment.  The paper, which identified most of the 2.5 million 
unemployed as women, youths with little education, and southerners, 
also said that the 2.5 million unemployed is paralleled by the 
"totally Italian anomaly" of black market labor involving 2.4 
million people.  According to Giugni this figure was derived by 
studying the following factors: Italy's extremely high propensity 
for saving, the unusual ratio of the self-employed to employed 
workers, the low participation of women in the "official" job 
market, and "an otherwise unexplainable general ability for the 
public to continue purchasing government bonds."  The white paper 
concludes that the extent of the underground economy will make it 
very difficult for Italy's next government to bring the "value" of 
Italian labor up to that of the rest of Europe by increasing the 
number of the "officially employed," thereby guaranteeing 
increased tax revenues and social welfare benefits. 

    The white paper also details the government's program to create 
1 million new jobs by the year 2000 by raising GDP at least 3 
percent yearly, raising the mandatory school age to 16 and later to 
18, increasing flexible forms of employment, legalizing many of 
those forms to bring many of the "underground" jobs into the system, 
and encouraging part-time work to make it a truly competitive form 
of labor. (AB)  (Milan IL SOLE-24 ORE in Italian 11 Mar 94 
pp 1, 13) 

    RECENT LABOR ACCORDS SEEN AS STOPGAP MEASURES--The recently 
concluded labor agreements between the labor unions and Fiat, 
Olivetti, and Italtel, which were concluded thanks to Labor Minister 
Gino Giugni's intervention, are considered to be mere stopgap 
measures that will cost the government billions of lire and will not 
solve the long-term problem of unemployment.  Originally, the three 
companies had asked to be allowed to lay off 11,150 workers. 
Fearing social unrest, the government came up with a plan that 
would allow most of those workers to be retained under "solidarity 
contracts."  These contracts stipulate that the employees would work 
reduced hours and the government would make up 75 percent of the 
lost pay. 

    However, while these measures are designed to preserve the 
workers' jobs and salaries, they are temporary measures that will 
have to be renegotiated soon unless the economy rapidly improves. 
Former union leader and current director of personnel at Italtel 
Luciano Scalia said that unemployment is structural in nature and 
unless the work force is reduced, the problem will return as early 
as December 1995.  At present, it is impossible to assess precisely 
the cost to the government because to do so requires detailed 
information is needed about the age, salary, and seniority of each 
employee--something which is not readily available.  General 
estimates, however, place the total cost to the government at 2.1 
trillion lire. (AB)  (Milan IL MONDO in Italian 28 Feb-7 Mar pp 34- 
35) 

    ENI'S PLANS TO EXPAND EAST--The National Hydrocarbons 
Corporation's (ENI) planned reorganization to prepare for the 
eventual privatization of its two main groups--energy and chemicals- 
-includes expanding its activities in the former Soviet republics of 
Central Asia, Russia, and China, according to ENI's General Manager 
Franco Bernabe in an interview published in Milan's CORRIERE DELLA 
SERA.  Bernabe explained that the changes taking place within 
ENI are intended to correct the overly ambitious expansion plans of 
its former management--involved in corruption and kickback scandals- 
-which led ENI into "tremendous" debt.  The current plans are to 
sell off at least 80 of ENI's subsidiaries, keeping ENI's energy and 
chemical companies.  In the meantime, ENI is planning to go from an 
international conglomerate operating primarily in the Middle East 
and western Africa, to a multinational entity focusing primarily on 
the energy field that will expand as far east as Siberia and China. 
Bernabe said ENI will not decrease its presence in the Middle East 
and western Africa, as 80 percent of Italy's oil reserves are 
located there. 

    Bernabe said that Russia, Kazakhstan, and the Caspian Sea hold 
tremendous mineral reserves, and ENI is involved in large-scale 
projects in those areas either alone or in joint ventures.  In 
China, ENI will not only pursue mineral exploration there but hopes 
to participate in refining crude oil and its distribution.  (AB) 
(Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 7 Mar p 19) 

   NORWAY 

    RECORD EXPORT YEAR REPORTED--While Norwegian imports increased 
in 1993 by 5.6 percent, exports had a record year, according to a 
report published by the Norwegian Export Council in late January 
1994.  Total exports increased in value by 4.6 percent to 316.8 
billion Norwegian kroner.  The greatest increase was in oil and 
natural gas (6.8 percent), while traditional exports from the 
mainland increased by 3.8 percent in value.  Fish exports increased 
by 8 percent in 1993, making that industry Norway's third largest. 

    The rise in exports is due to greater Norwegian competitiveness 
and strong growth in foreign markets, the report stated.  Germany 
replaced the Nordic countries as Norway's most important export 
market in 1993 with the UK as the second most important.  Exports to 
the UK increased by 20 percent in 1993.  The export of construction 
materials to the UK quintupled from 1992 to 1993.  Additionally, 
exports to Japan, China, and the Far East grew strongly in 1993. 
(TF)  (Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 26 Jan 94 p 22) 

    PENSION FUND CALLED 'PROFITABLE BUSINESS'--The agency charged 
with investing National Pension Fund revenues had a "boom year" in 
1993, according to an article in the Oslo daily AFTENPOSTEN.  The 
Fund's operating costs, which are only a minute fraction of its 
income, are covered by only one day's income, according to General 
Manager Tore Lindholt.  The rest is profit, he added.  In 1993, the 
Fund had profits of almost 14.9 billion kroner, or more than 1 
billion kroner for each member of the Fund's 13-person staff, 
prompting AFTENPOSTEN to call the Fund "Norway's most profitable 
business." 

    The Fund increasingly acts as lender to the Norwegian state and 
has become one of the leading actors on the Oslo Stock Exchange, 
having placed 8.5 percent of its capital in stocks there.  The Fund 
is also seeking permission from the government to invest 10 percent 
of its capital abroad.  (TF)  (Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 8 Feb 
94 p 27) 

    SWEDISH BANK PREDICTS GROWTH FOR NORWAY, DENMARK--Norway and 
Denmark are identified by economists at Sweden's Handelsbanken as 
being among the European countries that will experience the greatest 
growth in 1994.  The economies of Sweden and Finland are also 
expected to grow, following the worst recession in those countries 
since the depression of the 1930's.  As a whole, the Nordic region 
is expected to lead in growth in Europe. 

    The strong growth predicted for Denmark and Norway is attributed 
to increased domestic demand and, in Denmark's case, to several 
years of austere fiscal policies and a surplus in foreign trade. 
Norway's GDP is expected to rise by 3 percent in 1994 and 3.5 
percent in 1995 according to the Handelsbanken report. (TF)  (Oslo 
AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 17 Feb 94 p 26) 

   1993 PROFITABLE FOR MOST BUSINESSES--The annual reports of 
Norway's major industrial, shipping, and banking firms indicate 
moderate to fast growth in profits for 1993.  According to an 
article in the Oslo daily AFTENPOSTEN, the total growth in profits 
after taxes for these firms was 70 percent.  The growth trend of 
these companies--Den norske Bank (DnB), Statoil, metals 
exporter Elkem, food manufacturer Rieber, pharmacological products 
exporter Hafslund Nycomed, shipping giant Bergesen--are viewed by 
chief analyst Sigmund Ellingsen of DnB Funds as typical of the 
entire commercial sector.  He feels the growth will only continue. 
To a considerable extent this growth is attributed to the cut in 
costs which has made Norwegian industry more competitive 
internationally.  However, while this increased competitiveness 
boosted exports in 1993, it also increased unemployment.  (TF) 
(Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 11 Feb 94 p 27) 

    NEW OIL DRILLING PLANNED--The Ministry of Industry and Energy 
has opened up several new fields on the Norwegian Shelf for explore 
for oil.  The ministry will allow a maximum of six drillings off the 
Nordland coast and four drillings in the Skagerrak.  Responding to 
criticism from environmental organizations and fishermen, Industry 
and Energy Minister Jens Stoltenberg noted that if oil is found, any 
development of the wells would not start until the year 2010 and 
that in any case, the country's best fishing areas are not in the 
area proposed for exploration.  He added that Norway has "30 
years' experience in guarding the coexistence of the oil and 
fisheries industries." (TF)  (Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 25 Feb 
94 p 21) 

    COMPETITIVENESS OF NORWEGIAN SHELF ASSESSED--A report 
commissioned by the Ministry of Industry and Energy on the future 
competitiveness of the Norwegian Shelf states that costs in the oil 
industry will have to be cut in half in the future.  It also 
concludes that the oil industry's taxes and fees must be made more 
predictable for the industry to compete.  The report says that 
controlling costs is the industry's most important task, suggesting 
that projects currently planned should cut costs by 25-30 percent. 

    The report states that the North Sea and the Norwegian Shelf are 
no longer the most attractive areas for oil companies to explore. 
This is in large measure because new, more competitive oil fields 
have emerged in Asia, Africa, and the former Soviet Union, according 
to the report, which was written by representatives of the Norwegian 
Government, the oil companies, and the delivery industry.  (TF) 
(Oslo AFTENPOSTEN in Norwegian 17 Feb 94 p 
27) 

    SWEDEN 

    SWEDISH CONTRIBUTION TO EU BUDGET CALCULATED--The Finance 
Ministry has calculated that Sweden's net contribution to the EU 
budget will be 8.9 billion kronor in 1995--potentially the first 
year of membership--then rise to 11.7 the next year and total about 
18 billion by 1999, when the transition period for budget payments 
is complete.  The total sum for 1995 is expected to be 18.3 billion 
but from this is deducted 5 billion in agricultural and regional 
support and an additional 4.4 billion in rebates.  For 1996, these 
figures will be 19.1 billion total, 3.5 in subsidies, and 3.9 
billion in rebates.  Sweden will receive an additional 7.6 billion 
kronor per year in agricultural support that will not be counted in 
the state budget.  It can also receive a maximum of 1.8 billion in 
environmental support, if it spends the same amount domestically. 
Under the framework of joint programs, Sweden can also expect to 
receive one-half to one billion kronor in subsidies for research and 
development, culture, and youth, according to the Finance Ministry 
report.  (WS)  (Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 4 Mar 94 p C2) 

    ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

    France 

    --EMIRATES NEWS reports France's Giat Industries has annulled 
contract with French Offset partners group.  company wants to revise 
compensation program linked to Leclerc tank sales to United Arab 
Emirates. (LE FIGARO 17 Mar 94 p 1) 

    Greece 

    --Government to "finally" tax gambling, most heavily on 
establishments masquerading as coffee houses...one-sixth of taxes to 
be paid at time of licensing, rest in five bimonthly payments. 
revenues may reach 10 billion drachmas yearly. (TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS 
6 Mar 94 p D12) 

    Norway 

    State-Owned Statoil considering start-up operations in eight new 
gas, oil fields on Norwegian Shelf...operations to begin in 1994-95. 
(AFTENPOSTEN 5 Feb 94 p 24) 

    Anilla B. (703-733-6283), Roger B. (703-733-6508), Thale F. 
(703-733-6294), Robert H. (703-733-6504), Dian I. (703-733-6286), 
Rosa M. (703-733-6287), Joel S. (703-733-6503), Wendy S. (703-733- 
6506), and Charles W. (703-733-6473) contributed to this Foreign 
Media Survey. 
ELAG/24MAR/ECONF/WED/CL 24/2227Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U. S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23MAR94-GERNANY-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Germany Positive But Cautious on Jobs Conference </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Reflecting Bonn's preference for structural reforms and 
opposition to economic stimulus measures, the German 
participants' positive evaluation of the 14-15 March G-7 jobs 
conference in Detroit focused on the conference proposals for 
education and labor market reforms but rejected U.S. suggestions 
that Germany stimulate domestic growth by reducing taxes and 
lowering interest rates.  German officials were also cool to U.S. 
proposals for setting up new institutions to deal with the issues 
of unemployment, technology policy, and education, preferring 
instead to work through the existing OECD framework or through 
bilateral ties. 
                            END SUMMARY 
   Germany's finance, economic, and labor ministers, all of whom 
participated in the jobs conference, seemed to devote virtually 
all their attention to the conference recommendations to promote 
economic growth through international trade, technological 
innovation and private enterprise and to achieve structural 
reforms through education, greater flexibility of the labor 
force, lower costs, and deregulation.  Anticipating U.S. efforts 
to make the Bundesbank's interest rate policy a central issue, 
Bonn officials sought even before the conference to focus 
attention on structural issues and to avoid discussion of 
stimulus measures (Die Welt 14 March).  They also rejected U.S. 
proposals for setting up new groups to study technology policy 
and employment and for creating a new institution to exchange 
ideas about education, suggesting instead that existing 
institutions and bilateral relations were better suited for 
dealing with these issues (Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March). 

No New Stimulus Measures 
   Both Finance Minister Theo Waigel and Economics Minister Guenter 
Rexrodt rejected the U.S. call for Germany to reduce its taxes 
and interest rates to stimulate domestic growth.  Citing 
Germany's budget deficit, Waigel repeated Bonn's position that 
Germany's unemployment is a structural problem and that a 
cyclical recovery will not automatically solve the problem 
(Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March).  According to Rexrodt, since 
new programs to "stimulate the economy" do not offer a way out of 
the German labor market crisis, efforts must focus on "structural 
changes" (DPA, 14 March). 

Structural Measures, Domestic Solutions 
   German conference participants stressed the need to reform 
Germany's economic structures and, while welcoming cooperation on 
common concerns, rejected proposals to create additional G-7 
institutions: 
   --Indicating that he saw the jobs conference largely as a 
confirmation of the German government's plans for improving 
Germany's competitiveness, Rexrodt said he would take away from 
the conference ideas on "labor market flexibility, trade 
liberalization, deregulation," and lower wage costs, and said 
Germany must "learn from U.S. technological and innovation 
successes."  He did not favor U.S. proposals for new study groups 
for technology policy and employment statistics, however, saying 
that the OECD framework already dealt with such issues, and he 
opposed creating a new institution for exchanges on educational 
issues, saying he preferred bilateral arrangements (Frankfurter 
Allgemeine, 15 March). 
   --Similarly, Waigel stated that there is no "miracle cure"--each 
country "must find its own solutions" and, for Germany, 
"structural reforms" will make its labor markets "better equipped 
for the challenges of the future" (Handelsblatt, 17 March). 
   --Bluem, on the other hand, appeared to see more room for 
international cooperation, saying that the jobs conference had 
"clearly improved conditions for harmonizing labor market 
initiatives."  Because of current practices of multinational 
corporations, he said, job developments can "no longer be an 
exclusively national task" (Sueddeutsche Zeitung 17 March).  He 
cautioned against an "uncritical acceptance" of the U.S. model, 
however, saying that the drastic cost reductions have not led to 
the expected rises in profits (Frankfurter Allgemeine, 15 March). 

Press Reaction 
   Press reaction echoed the largely positive official reaction, 
with several papers welcoming President Clinton's initiative, the 
G-7's focus on people's concerns rather than on macroeconomic 
issues, and the opportunity for international cooperation on 
employment issues.  Most media supported the Government's stance 
against stimulative measures: 
   --Frankfurter Allgemeine's Washington correspondent Carola Kaps 
on 16 March called it "remarkable" that a G-7 conference had 
focused not on "interest rates and exchange rates" but on the 
"well-being of the average citizen."  She defended Germany's 
stance against stimulus measures, however, saying that the "nasty 
and trite" controversy over German interest rates shows that the 
"special German situation" is still being largely "ignored." 
Nevertheless, she said hopefully that the U.S. administration now 
"seems to understand" that Germany's current conditions "do not 
permit an additional stimulation" of demand. 
   --The leading business daily Handelsblatt of 17 March, citing 
Clinton's observation that job losses in one country lead to 
higher unemployment in neighboring and partner countries, said 
that "no country" can fight unemployment with domestic means 
alone in a world economy that is increasingly interdependent. 
   --Sueddeutsche Zeitung's chief editor Josef Joffe also saw 
increased international cooperation resulting from the jobs 
conference, saying that such issues as "unemployment, health 
insurance, immigration" have become "international politics" and 
politicians now realize that domestic policy problems "cannot be 
solved exclusively" by a single country.  He praised President 
Clinton's "initiative" for highlighting the "necessary shift in 
awareness" (16 March). 
   --The left-of-center Frankfurter Rundschau presented one of the 
few negative reactions to the conference outcome, regretting the 
conference's failure to adopt new stimulus measures.  "Any plans 
President Clinton may have had" for preparing a plan for 
coordination at the Naples G-7 Summit, it said, were "destroyed" 
with Rexrodt's "unmistakable rejection" of "any type of Keynesian 
economic program" (16 March). 
   (AUTHOR: SHAVER. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, ELAG, (703) 733-6120.) 
   ELAG/GILISON 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-62 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT IS 
BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT 
COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS.) 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-040--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  KAZUSA ACADEMIA PARK, SCIENCE PARK </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Chiba     Prefecture has been successfully carrying out construction 
of the "Kazusa Academia Park," the second project of an ambitious 
plan to establish three new industrial-based cities in Chiba 
Prefecture.  Chiba Prefecture incorporated a semi-public corporation 
in 1991 to establish this world-class science park.  This 
cooperative effort included four Chiba cities, the Japan Development 
Bank, and private companies.  Zoning and infrastructure development 
for the first phase of the Kazusa Academia Park is to be completed 
by the end of 1995.  It has been estimated that the first phase will 
cost approximately 41 billion yen ($370 million) of which over 22 
billion yen ($200 million) is designated for the construction (NIHON 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 
26 Jan 94). 

   (The hard copy version of this FMN contains a photo of the final 
proposed site plan for the Kazusa Academia Center which will be the 
central facility of the Kazusa Academia Park.) 

   Three Industrial-based Cities in Chiba 

   Chiba Prefecture is making steady progress in the construction of 
its new science park, Kazusa Academia Park.  Establishment of the 
Kazusa Academia Park was part of Chiba Prefecture's conceptual plan 
submitted in 1983 to establish three new industrial-based cities in 
Chiba.  These cities include Makuhari New Metropolis, in Chiba City; 
Narita International Airport Community, in Narita City; and Kazusa 
Academia Park, in Kisarazu City.  Chiba Prefecture aims to establish 
the Kazusa Academia Park as a world-class research and development 
city, integrating primary R&amp;D facilities for prospective industries 

(NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 
26 Jan 94). 

   Construction of the Kazusa Academia Park was initiated in March 
1991, following the completion of the first stage of the Makuhari 
New Metropolis.  The total area of the project site is 
approximately 1000 hectares.  Chiba Prefecture predicts it will take 
approximately 10 years to complete each of the three phases of the 
project completing the construction in 30 years (NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 
26 Jan 94). 

   The first development phase will result in approximately 278 
hectares of the site.  The table shown in Figure 1 represents the 
projected size of each construction site (NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Jan 
94). 

   Kazusa Academia Park, World-class R&amp;D Center 
   Compared to Tsukuba Science City, in Ibaraki Prefecture, in which 
the majority of the research organizations are national research 
institutes, the center of the Kazusa Academia Park will be comprised 
of private companies.  These companies are expected to be the 
driving force of Japanese science and technology in the 21st 
Century.  Chiba Prefecture's objective is to establish an 
international R&amp;D center for high-tech industries including 
electronics, advanced materials, and biotechnology, centered with 
private research institutes.  The prefecture also aims the 
development growth of Kisarazu City and Kimitsu City as "mother 
cities," along with development of the new cities.  When a new road 
that crosses over the Tokyo Bay is completed in 1996 it will be 
approximately 30 minutes to the Kazusa Academia Park from either the 
Haneda Airport or Kawasaki City and about 50 minutes from downtown 
of Tokyo by car (See Map shown in 
Figure 2.) (NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Jan 94). 

   Kazusa DNA Research Institute 

   The highlight of the Kazusa Academia Park will be the "Kazusa DNA 
Research Institute," which is scheduled to be open in the fall of 
1994.  The research institute will be Japan's first research center 
specializing in structural analysis of DNA.  The construction of the 
institute is near completion, with approximately 15 billion yen 
($136 million) allocated.  The institute is expected to be one of 
the world's largest research centers when completed.  The institute 
will be operated by the Kazusa DNA Research Institute Foundation, 
which was established in March of 1991.  Gaishi Hiraiwa, senior 
advisor to The Tokyo Electric Power Co. and chairman of the Japan 
Federation of Economic Organizations (Keidanren), has been appointed 
as the chairman of the board of the institute (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
19 Jan 94, DENKI SHIMBUN 13 Dec 93).  The institute will initially 
be operated with 70 staff members, including Mitsuru Takanami, 
professor emeritus of Kyoto University, who will be the director of 
the institute, Susumu Tonegawa, Nobel Prize-winning molecular 
biologist and MIT professor, and Itaru Watanabe, professor emeritus 
of Keio University -- both appointed as special advisors (NIHON 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Jan 94). 

   The institute will encourage joint research projects between 
Japanese researchers and researchers from overseas as a research 
institute with an "open-door policy."  The institute plans to 
establish lecture rooms for visitors and observers (NIHON KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 26 Jan 94 and 19 Jan 94). 

   (The hard copy version of this FMN contains the final proposed 
site plan for the Kazusa DNA Research Institute.) 

   The Research Institute, equipped with supercomputers and 18 of 
the latest DNA sequencers, will focus on 1) analytical research on 
DNA structure, 2) research on analytical technologies for DNA 
structure, 3) research on mechanisms of DNA, 4) production and 
provision of DNA data, and 5) education of personnel for DNA 
research.  Along with these research activities, a primary mission 
of the institute will be to provide research data to the private 
sector in order to promote biotechnology industry (NIHON KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 26 Jan 94). 

   So far, the institute has made agreements with seven Japanese 
companies to construct high-tech R&amp;D centers and R&amp;D-focused plants 

in the Park.  These companies include Fujitsu, Canon, Nissan 
Chemical Industries, Denki Kagaku Kogyo, Nippon Zeon Co., Maruzen 
Petrochemical Co., and Tokyo Tanabe Co. (NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Jan 
94)  Tokyo Tanabe Co. will obtain approximately 34,000 square meters 
on the site.  Total area of its research center will be 
approximately 20,000 square meters.  The company plans to allocate 
about 200 researchers and invest approximately 12 billion yen ($109 
million) into the project excluding the cost for the land (NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 


FIGURE 1 

                       THE FIRST PHASE CONSTRUCTION PLAN 

FACILITY NAME              AREA               REMARKS 

Kazusa Academia 
Center Facility            Approx. 17ha 

Public experimental &amp;      Approx. 40ha       Kazusa DNA Research 
research facilities                              Institute 
&amp; others                                         approx. 19ha 
                                              Enviornmental Center 
                                                approx. 3ha 
                                             Public experimental &amp; 
                                                research facilities 
                                                approx. 18ha 

Private research           Approx. 94ha       15 divisions 
institutes 

R&amp;D-focused plants         Approx. 56ha         5 divisions 

Lots for other             Approx. 13ha       Lots planned for 
facilities                                    public facilities 

Parks &amp; Landscapes         Approx.  37ha      5 parks &amp; 3 landscapes 


Roads &amp; Rivers             Approx.  21ha      Prefectural roads 

TOTAL                      Approx.  278ha 




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-63 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-24MAR94-JAPAN-EU 
<H3> <TI>      Japan-EU:  Tokyo, EU Reach Auto Export Agreement </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Possibly  seeking to avoid simultaneous disputes on auto trade 
with both Washington and Brussels, Japan and the European Union, 
as announced on 19 March, concluded an agreement raising the 
quota for Japanese auto exports to the EU.  Under the new 
arrangement, the Japanese quota will rise by 0.4 percent in 1994 
(KYODO, 19 March) and the Japanese will be allowed to ship up to 
an estimated 984,000 vehicles to the EU -- an increase of 4,000 
units over the 980,000 permitted in 1993 (Nikkei Weekly, 21 
March).  This agreement came after earlier negotiations in 
February had broken down because of disagreement over projected 
European auto market demand in 1994.  According to a Kyodo report 
at the time, the EU had argued that demand would remain flat, 
while the Japanese maintained that it would increase slightly (25 
February). 
   Suggesting that Japan has been eager to conclude the auto trade 
talks with the EU, a 14 March KYODO report quoted Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI) Vice Minister Hideaki 
Kumano in remarks at a press conference that day as urging both 
sides to "agree as early as possible on setting a ceiling for 
European-bound Japanese car exports for 1994."  Kumano also 
reportedly stressed that the new ceiling should be agreed upon 
before the start of the next Japanese fiscal year, beginning 
April 1. 
(AUTHOR:  COHEN.  QUESTIONS AND OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL JEG 25/0144Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-64 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-25MAR94-JAPAN-CHI-US 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN-CHINA-U.S. </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Hosokawa     Visit to China Yields Mixed Results 
                            SUMMARY 
   Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa's recent visit to China appears 
to have yielded few concrete results, either on the economic or 
political and security fronts.  Beijing evidently did little to 
address issues of key concern to Tokyo, resisting Tokyo's call 
for a more active Chinese role in resolving the North Korean 
nuclear issue and for clarification of China's military spending. 
Beijing, however, appears to have reaped a propaganda bonus for 
use in its dispute with Washington, as Hosokawa, in keeping with 
past Japanese policy, sof t-pedaled the issue of China's human 
rights record.  In addition, Beijing used the visit to signal 
Washington that it has other alternatives if China's most-favored 
nation trading status is revoked. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Hosokawa used the his 19-21 March visit to China, his first trip 
to the country since taking office last summer, to highlight the 
burgeoning economic ties between Tokyo and Beijing.  In a 20 
March news conference in Beijing, Hosokawa described the growth 
of trade and investment between the two countries as a "very 
desirable development" and stated that he and his Chinese 
counterparts had agreed to "continue to exert efforts to further 
develop our economic relations."  He also noted that, as 
previously announced, Japan would extend a fourth yen-based loan 
to China (NHK Television, 20 March). 
   Beyond the rhetoric, however, no significant new developments in 
bilateral relations appear to have come out of the visit.  The 
most substantial accomplishment during the trip on the economic 
front, judging from media reporting, was the signing on 20 March 
of an agreement designed to promote cooperation between the two 
countries in the prevention and control of environmental 
pollution (Xinhua, 20 March).  According to the 21 March Nihon 
Keizai Shimbun,  Hosokawa and Chinese Vice Premier Zhu Rongji 
also discussed Japanese investment in China's auto industry--an 
area where the Ministry of International Trade and Industry has 
been pushing Japanese investment for some time in an effort to 
compete with U.S. and European ventures in China. 
   Disagreement on Approach to DPRK 
   On several issues of high concern to Tokyo, however, Hosokawa 
appears to have made little headway.  One such issue was a 
reported Japanese request for China to use its influence with the 
DPRK to pressure Pyongyang to submit to full inspections by the 
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA).  An article in the 21 
March Nihon Keizai Shimbun, sourced to unnamed Japanese 
government officials, claimed that securing China's cooperation 
on this issue was the main purpose of Hosokawa's trip.  The paper 
and a 20 March Kyodo report portrayed Hosokawa as taking a tough 
stance on this issue, telling Li Peng and Jiang Zemin that the 
DPRK was using "delaying tactics," and as warning that "the 
international community's patience is running out and attempts to 
resolve this nuclear issue through dialogue may end in failure." 
Kyodo also said that Hosokawa expressed to Premier Li Peng "grave 
concern" about Pyongyang's recent stance on inspections, warning 
that the possibility that the UN Security Council would take up 
the issue was "rising," and asking the Chinese to convey the 
international community's increasing impatience to North Korea. 
   Chinese leaders who met with Hosokawa, however, appear to have 
done little more than reiterate China's long-standing position on 
the issue--that the problem should be resolved through 
negotiations.  A 20 March Xinhua report on Hosokawa's meeting 
with Li Peng that day quoted Li as saying that the issue "should 
be solved through dialogues and negotiations."  According to a 20 
March Kyodo report, unnamed Japanese officials familiar with what 
was discussed at the meeting reported that Li also stated that it 
was necessary to offer North Korea "what it needs" in return for 
agreeing to inspections.  The report did not indicate what, if 
anything, Li said North Korea needed, although this would 
presumably include economic aid. 
   Concern Over Chinese Military Spending 
   Tokyo also appears to have made little headway in clarifying 
another issue that reportedly worries the Japanese Government- 
-Beijing's recent increase in military spending.  During his 20 
March Beijing news conference, Hosokawa stated that he had urged 
Chinese leaders to "make efforts to increase the openness of 
China's military programs"--a step he said would "assure a sense 
of security and increase the international community's trust in 
China."  Hosokawa added that he told his Chinese counterparts 
that Japan would have to take the level of China's military 
spending into account when considering future official 
development assistance (ODA) loans to China (NHK Television, 20 
March).  Li Peng, however, appears to have responded to 
Hosokawa's comments with Beijing's standard defense of China's 
military budget, telling Hosokawa at their talks on the 20th that 
China's military budget was among the "lowest" in the world and 
assuring him that the recently-announced increase in military 
spending is aimed primarily at "offsetting inflation."   He went 
on to dismiss Japanese concerns, saying that "any worry abroad" 
over the recently announced increase in military spending is 
"groundless" (Xinhua, 20 March). 
   Footdragging on Security Council Membership 
   Tokyo also appears to have gained no Chinese commitment to 
support Japan's efforts to attain a permanent seat on the United 
Nations Security Council.  According to a 21 March Asahi Shimbun 
report, Li told Hosokawa during their meeting on 20 March that, 
while China supported the concept of reforming the Security 
Council "at an appropriate time," the issue would have to be 
given "careful consideration" because "it will affect the 
interests of various countries." 
   Soft-pedaling Human Rights 
   While Tokyo failed to secure Chinese support on issues of concern 
to Japan, Beijing appears to have gained some ammunition to use 
against Washington in its dispute with the United States over 
China's human rights policy.  Despite reports that he had 
promised Secretary of State Christopher that he would raise human 
rights during his talks with the Chinese leadership, Hosokawa, in 
fact, appears to have taken an extremely low-key approach on the 
issue, alluding to human rights in only vague and ambiguous 
terms.  According to a 19 March Kyodo report, Hosokawa, in a 
speech at Li's welcoming banquet for him on 19 March, stated that 
"each nation should make efforts on human rights problems" in 
line with the declaration adopted at the June 1993 international 
conference on human rights in Vienna.  Judging from both Chinese 
and Japanese media reporting, however, in private comments to Li 
during the banquet, Hosokawa appears to have undercut any impact 
these comments may have had.  According to a 20 March Xinhua 
report, at a press conference that day PRC Foreign Ministry 
spokesman Wu Jiamin told reporters that during dinner Li briefed 
Hosokawa on Secretary of State Christopher's recent visit to 
China, and Hosokawa commented that "it is somewhat unwise to 
impose Western concepts of democracy on other countries."  Wu 
reportedly added that Hosokawa told Li that he "fully understands 
[China's] viewpoint and position on human rights."  According to 
a 21 March Kyodo report, in comments to reporters on his flight 
home from China, Prime Minister Hosokawa confirmed that he made 
these remarks.  To soften the effect of his comments on 
Washington, the prime minister reportedly denied that he intended 
them as a criticism of U.S. policy toward China. 
   Hosokawa also played down the human rights issue during his news 
conference in Beijing on 20 March.  In his opening statement, 
broadcast on NHK Television on 20 March, Hosokawa referred to 
human rights only in passing, saying that he had had "a candid 
exchange of views" on the topic, among several others, with the 
Chinese leadership.  When questioned about what he had said to 
the Chinese on the human rights issue, he stated ambiguously that 
during the welcoming banquet he had told Li that "each nation 
should make its own efforts to deal with the issue of human 
rights, which has universal value."  Hosokawa refused to comment 
on differences between the United States and China on the issue 
or on China's recent detention of dissidents. 
   Japan's Low Key Track Record on Human Rights 
   While Hosokawa may have sof t pedalled human rights in part 
because he did not want to disrupt his trip or detract from his 
message on North Korea by raising a controversial issue, his 
position is consistent with Japan's past stance on human rights 
in China and other countries in East Asia.  Both the Japanese 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs and past governments headed by the 
Liberal Democratic Party have tended to focus on economic 
relations with China rather than human rights.  To support their 
position, they have maintained that promoting China's economic 
development and keeping the country engaged in the international 
community will promote development of human rights in China more 
effectively than isolating Beijing over the issue.  For example, 
in an article in the October 1993 issue of the Foreign Ministry's 
journal, Gaiko Forum, Japanese Ambassador to the PRC Michihiko 
Kunihiro stated that although the Japanese Government would ask 
Beijing to take "corrective measures" if a specific incident 
involving human rights occurred in China, Tokyo believed that 
"with the development of a market economy in the PRC, the 
consciousness of its citizens about human rights will be elevated 
automatically and it will become impossible for the PRC to 
disregard international opinions as the country becomes more 
involved in the international community."  The ambassador added 
that such a process would be, in his view, "more effective than 
to hastily try to change [China's] opinion by force." 
   Beijing's Pointed Message to Washington 
   At the same time China appears to have used Hosokawa's trip to 
China to signal Washington that Beijing has other economic 
options should the United States decide to revoke China's MFN 
status.  In his meeting with Hosokawa on 20 March, for example, 
Li underscored the "tremendous potential for further growth of 
bilateral economic cooperation, pointedly noting that the 
economies of the two countries are "mutually complementary" and 
that China's priorities for development are in "energy, 
transportation, and telecommunications, in which Japan is 
strong."  During Secretary Christopher's visit just days earlier, 
Li, in identical terms, had held out the possibility of giving 
U.S. companies preference in developing these areas. 
   A signed Xinhua commentary on 21 March similarly described the 
great possibilities for expanding Sino-Japanese economic 
relations.  Hailing the rapid development of relations, the 
commentary noted the "wide scope" for further development of 
cooperation in transportation, energy and communications.  "It 
can be foreseen," the commentary stated, "that as Japan's 
technology and capital continue to increasingly integrate with 
China's market and resources on a wider scale, it will definitely 
become a reality in the near future for the annual volume of 
trade between the two countries to reach $390 billion."  Such a 
figure would be much larger than the current volume of Sino-U.S. 
trade. 
   Vice Premier Zhu Rongji had delivered a similar message about the 
potential for the expansion of Sino-Japanese relations during his 
23 February-4 March visit to Japan.  In an interview in Fukuoka 
summarized by Xinhua on 2 March, Zhu pointed out that trade 
between China and Japan reached a record high of $39 billion in 
1993, making Japan "China's largest trading partner" and China 
"Japan's second largest trading partner."  Zhu added that, 
although this figure was record-breaking, "when we consider the 
potential of Sino-Japanese bilateral cooperation, it is a very 
small figure."  A 4 March article about Zhu's trip in the Chinese 
Communist Party's organ, Renmin Ribao, stated that Zhu also 
frequently pointed out during his trip that Sino-Japanese trade 
had the potential to increase by ten times over its current 
level. 
   Outlook 
   Prime Minister Hosokawa's weakening domestic political position 
made it imperative that he appear to handle his visit to China 
successfully.  Because of this, even had he been inclined to 
raise the human rights issue, he would probably have been 
unwilling to take a forceful position that would have offended 
his Chinese hosts and marred his trip.  China will likely 
certainly use Hosokawa's reported private comments to Li Peng in 
pressing its case against Washington's criticism of Beijing's 
human rights record.  On other fronts, Japan's growing concern 
about the DPRK's nuclear program and the security environment in 
North Asia will almost certainly mean that Tokyo will continue to 
press China in other forums to intervene with the DPRK and to 
clarify the nature of Chinese military spending. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CB 25/1647z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-65 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-039--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN: Study Groups Lay Groundwork for Political Restructuring </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY:      Recent Japanese press articles have detailed the 
mushrooming of policy study groups formed among Japanese Diet 
members, most of which cross party lines and factions within 
individual parties.  Their reported aim is to both promote political 
reform and to act as catalysts for the "second phase" of political 
restructuring. 

   Cross-Party Policy Study Groups Have Proliferated 

   More than ten cross-party policy study groups have been formed 
since the inauguration of the Hosokawa administration in August 
1993, according to the 8 January 1994 SANKEI SHIMBUN.  These are in 
addition to several that were formed in 1992 and early 1993.  The 
study groups have been formed, according to a Sakigake (Harbinger 
Party) leader, because "Diet members are insecure in the current 
chaotic political situation and want to join forces with others" so 
as to be ready for the "second stage" of Japan's political 
reaignment--the possible formation of new political parties.  SANKEI 
notes that the study groups can be "roughly divided" into three 
categories:  1) those composed of "conservative centrists" that 
include LDP Diet members; 2) conservative centrist groupings that 
exclude LDP members; and 3) centrist members of the SDPJ and the 
Democratic Socialist Party (DSP).  The paper observes that some 
groups are not only inviting participation by members of the public, 
but are also actively seeking to "conceptualize" the formation of 
new political parties. [See Annex I for membership listings and 
other information concerning the major cross-party study groups. 
Annex II contains information on the LDP study groups and Annex III 
reports on the Socialist Party study groups.] 

   The 1 January 1994 TOKYO SHIMBUN also reports that the study 
groups are actively contemplating the formation of new political 
movements.  It asserts that "each group" is striving to form a "new- 
new party," coalescing around three groupings: 1) a party comprising 
Sakigake, the Japan New Party (JNP), and "about 30" reform-minded 
LDP members;  2) a party led by Shinseito and Komeito, which would 
follow the line reportedly subscribed to by Shinseito coleader 
Ichiro Ozawa and Komeito Secretary-General Yuichi Ichikawa, viz., 
that political realignment should center on two major parties;  and 
3) a "Yokomichi Party," led by Hokkaido Governor Takahiro Yokomichi, 
that will be the political vehicle of "liberal" SDPJ members, and 
which will be supported by members of the "Democrats," a recently 
established SDPJ policy study group which includes rightist and 
centrist groups within the party. 

   Makeup of Study Groups 

   One ostensibly influential cross-party group, established 
initially by Prime Minister Morihito Hosokawa and others in 1992 to 
promote political reform, is the "System Reform Study Group," 
comprising LDP, SDPJ, Shinseito, Komeito, Japan New Party (JNP), DSP 
and Sakigake members.  It is reportedly led by Hosokawa, Chief 
Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi Takemura, Izumo Mayor Tetsundo Iwakuni, 
and other Sakigake members, particularly Shusei Tanaka and Yukio 
Hatoyama.  Tanaka and Hatoyama left the LDP in June 1993, joined 
Sakigake, and subsequently became "driving forces" behind the birth 
of the Hosokawa administration, according to the 3 October 1993 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   This group also reportedly supports the setting up of an 
independent organization resembling an omsbudsman's staff in the 
Diet to monitor political reform.  On 25 January 1994, group 
chairman Naoto Kan put together an outline of a bill, specifying 
that this new organization, "Gyosei Kanshi Chosakai," or 
"Administrative Supervisory Committee," will include five committee 
members approved by the speakers of both upper and lower houses, 
according to 26 January 1994 YOMIURI SHIMBUN.  In addition to the 
five committee members, the bill also reportedly calls for a staff 
of 70. 

   Another influential grouping, the "Long-Term Basic Problems Study 
Group," was formed in December 1993 by SDPJ and JNP Diet members. 
Its leader is Hirotaka Akamatsu, former secretary general of the 
SDPJ.  The group was formed to coordinate policies among members of 
different political parties with an eye toward a possible tie-up in 
the second phase of political restructuring, according to the 23 
December 1993 YOMIURI SHIMBUN.  This group reportedly discusses 
problems related to the decentralization of power, deregulation, 
problems of an aging society, U.N. policy and Japan's international 
contributions, as well as the nuts and bolts functioning of a new 
political party and its leadership. 

   Another cross-party group that reportedly includes LDP members is 
the "Forum on Comparative Study of Political Systems."  This group 
is comprised of 21 "younger pro-reform Dietmen" from the LDP, SDPJ, 
Komeito, and DSP, according to the 20 February 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN. 
The group reportedly discusses issues such as the functioning of 
different political systems, the Japan-U.S. security treaty, and 
Japan's "vision" of the future, SANKEI notes.  In order to deal with 
the multiplicity of views in Japan, this group reportedly supports a 
"multiparty system" rather than a "two-party system," according to 
ASAHI. 

   One large and expanding cross-party study group, the "General 
Economic Policy Study Group" promoted by Toshio Yamaguchi, an 
independent member of the House of Representatives, has reportedly 
"created quite a stir."  When this group was inaugurated in October 
1993, it was rumored that Yamaguchi's intention was to unite Michio 
Watanabe, leader of the LDP's Watanabe faction, and Ichiro Ozawa to 
form a "new party."  But because of opposition within the Watanabe 
faction to Watanabe's personal involvement in the new group, 
Watanabe refrained from joining the group as chairman.  However, 
according to the 3 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, it now appears 
that Watanabe will participate in the group's activities and will 
give lectures on issues such as economic stimulus measures, the FY95 
budget, and Japan-U.S. economic problems.  NIKKEI concludes that 
such a move by Watanabee could once again stir up speculation 
concerning a "Watanabe-Ozawa tieup." 

   Yet another study group, the "New-WIC Dietmen's Forum," was 
established in January, according to the 20 January CHUNICHI 
SHIMBUN.  Headed by the LDP's Masayasu Kitagawa, it includes 30 
younger Diet members from the LDP, SDPJ, JNP, DSP and Sakigake.  The 
group reportedly aims to make recommendations on improving social 
welfare and Japan's information and communications networks, 
according to the paper.  The paper also observed that this forum has 
excluded  Shinseito, Komeito, and the Communist Party from its 
ranks. 

   LDP-Oriented Groups 

   There are reportedly a number of LDP-oriented study groups in 
existence, including "Forum To Promote Pump-Priming Measures and 
Political Reform," "Forum To Renew the LDP," "Parliamentary Alliance 
To Promote Political Reform," and "Democratic Politics Study Group." 
According to a 24 February Kyodo report, 20 legislators mainly from 
the  LDP attended a meeting on the same day to prepare for launching 
yet another policy study group called "Liberals" in early March. 
Organizers of this group reportedly hope to secure the participation 
of more Diet members, local assembly members, academics and business 
executives.  The group will reportedly be chaired by Diet member 
Koji Kakizawa, and will include Seiichi Ota and Shokei Arai. 

   Hokkaido Governor Yokomichi's Prospective Role 

   The idea of a "Yokomichi Party" corresponds to Rengo (Japanese 
Trade Union Confederation) Chairman Akira Yamagishi's concept of a 
"New Liberal Party," TOKYO SHIMBUN notes.  The prospective leader of 
this party, Hokkaido governor Takahiro Yokomichi, is regarded by 
members of the SDPJ rightist-centrist "Democrats" study group to be 
the "last trump card" left in the hand of the SDPJ, the paper adds. 
Yokomichi, now in his third term as governor of Hokkaido, left the 
House of Representatives in 1983 to run for the Governorship, 
stating that he would return to national politics "in 12 or 13 
years."  In March 1993, "as expected," he made public his intention 
not to seek a fourth term as governor, thus indicating his interest 
in returning to the national political scene. 

Annex I.  CROSS-PARTY STUDY GROUPS 

Forum New-WIC (New-Wic Giin Forum -- "Wic" is an acronym for 
"welfare, information, and communications") 
Established:  19 January 1994 
Goals:    To discuss issues involving social welfare, improving 
          information and communications network. 
Members:  30 young Diet members from the LDP, SDPJ, JNP, DSP 
          andSakigake.  Headed by LDP Dietman Masayasu Kitagawa. 
(source:  20 January 1994 MAINICHI SHIMBUN) 

Long-Term Basic Problems Study Group (Choki Kihon Mondai Kenkyukai) 
Established:  22 December 1993 
Immediate Goals:   To seek consensus on issues such as Japan's U.N. 
          policy and deregulation. 
Members:  SDPJ Members: 
          Hirotaka Akamatsu (representative), Akihiro Ohata, 
          Masanori Goto, Mamoru Kobayashi, Harumichi Hosoya (above 
          are standing executive secretaries), Junsuke Iwata, Tomiko 
          Okazaki, Azuma Koshiishi Taisuke Sato, Shoichi Tanaka, 
          Ryuichi Doi, Ritsuo Hosokawa Ryu Matsumoto (above are 
          secretaries) 
          JNP Members: 
          Akio Nakajima (representative), Fumihiko Igarashi, 
          Sakihito Ozawa, Seishu Makino, Toshimitsu Motegi (above 
          are standing executive secretaries), Banri Kaieda, Yuriko 
          Koike, Tokihiro Nakamura, Hiroyuki Nagahama, Yoshihiko 
          Noda, Kenichiro Hatsumura, Osamu Fujimura, Hirotaro 
          Yamasaki (above are secretaries) 
(source:  23 December 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN) 


Forum Future 
Established:  25 November 1993 
Goals:    To involve younger Lower House Diet members in future 
          political realignment. 
Members:  About 20 young Diet members from the Shinseito, Komeito, 
          DSP, JNP and Sakigake, including Ichiro Aisawa (LDP) 
          (representative), Minoru Yanagida (DSP), Koichiro Genba 
          (independent), Tokihiro Nakamura (JNP), and Osamu Yoshida 
          (DSP) 
(sources: 26 November 1993 MAINICHI SHTMBUN; 23 October 1993 SANKEI 
SHIMBUN) 


Upper House Study Group (Sanin o Kangaeru Kai) 
Established:  25 November 93 
Goals:    To revitalize the Upper House so as to avoid becoming a 
          "carbon copy" of the Lower House. 
Members:  63 members, excluding Japan Communist Party (JCP) Dietmen. 
          Headed by Motoo Shina (independent).  Other members 
          include 10 LDP members (such as Masakuni Murakami), 5 SDPJ 
          members (such as Manzo Hamamoto), Hiroshi Tsuruoka 
          (Komeito), Kei Inoue (DSP-Kokumin Rengo), Sadao Hirano 
          (Shinseito) and Osamu Ikeda (JNP-Kaikakuren) 
(sources: 25 November 1993 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN; 1 November 1993 
SANKEI SHIMBUN) 

Group To Promote Political Realignment in 1995 (95-nen Seikai Saihen 
o  Susumeru Kai) 
Established:  9 November 1993 
Goals:  To promote passage of political reform bills. 
Members:  170 Diet Upper and Lower House members, including Kunio 
          Hatoyama (representative, independent), Hajime Funada 
          (Shinseito), Hirotaka Akamatsu (SDPJ), and Toshio 
          Yamaguchi (independent) 
(sources: 9 November 1993 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN; 16 November 1993 
TOKYO SHIMBUN) 

General Economic Policy Study Group (Sogo Keizai Seisaku Kenkyukai) 
Established:  21 October 1993 
Goals:    To exchange opinions on economic issues such as GATT and 
          the Uruguay Round, tax cuts, currency denomination, and 
          pump-priming measures.  Weekly meetings managed by 27 
          representatives of the participating parties. 
Members:  Group started with 159 upper and lower house members, 
          excluding JCP members, but has grown to nearly 200 
          members. 
(sources: 22 October 1993 CHUNICHI SHIMBUN; 31 October 1993 ASAHI 
SHIMBUN) 


Cornerstone Group (Ishizue Kai) 
Date Established:  30 September 1993 
Goals:     To exchange opinions on issues such as Japan-U.S. 
security 
           treaty, tax system, and to lay the ground for future 
           political realignment.  This group sets itself apart from 
           Shinseito co-leader Ichiro Ozawa's line of promoting 
Japan to become a "mini super-power" through active 
           international contributions. 
Members:   18 first-term and second-term Lower House members: 
           SDPJ Members: 
           Ikuo Horigome, Minoru Kawashima, Ryuichi Doi 
           Shinseito Members: 
           Katsuya Okada, Shigefumi Matsuzawa, Yoshihito Iwasa, 
           Takaaki Koga 
           Komeito Members: 
           Yoneo Hirata, Akihiro Ueda, Yoshinori Oguchi, Shigeki 
Sato 
           Sakigake-JNP Members: 
           Susumu Yanase, Ko Tanaka, Sakihito Ozawa, Yoshihiko Noda 
           DSP Members: 
           Kenji Kitahashi, Shingo Nishimura, Ryuzo Sasaki 
(sources:  1 October 1993 SANKEI SHIMBUN; 1 October 1993 NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN) 

Heisei Club 
Established:  5 October 1993 
Goals:    To discuss the need to review 1,100 licenses and approvals 
          to promote deregulation. 
Members:  84 Lower House members, many endorsed by the "Heisei 
          Restoration Society" (Heisei Ishin no Kai) during the last 
          general election:  30 LDP members; 16 SDPJ members; 11 JNP 
          members; 7 Sakigake members; 6 Shinseito members; 5 DSP 
          members; 3 Shaminren members and 6 independents.  Club is 
          represented by Koji Kakizawa (LDP), Seiichi Ota (LDP) and 
          Minoru Kawashima (SDPJ) 
(sources: 3 November and 6 October 1993 MAINICHI SHIMBUN) 


Forum on Comparative Study of Political Systems (Hikaku Seijiseido 
Kenkyukai) 
Established:  February 1993 
Goals:    To promote a multiparty system and discuss "Japan's vision 
          toward 2010." 
Members:  About 20 members including young LDP, SDPJ, Shinseito, 
          Komeito, JNP, DSP, and Sakigake members.  Headed by 
          Sakigake's Susumu Yanase. 
(sources: 2 October 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN; 8 January 1994 SANI?EI 
                                                          ? 
SHIMBUN) 


System Reform Study Group (Seido Kaikaku Kenkyukai) 
Established:  December 1992 
Goals:  To promote administrative reform. 
Members:  About 40 members, including Morihiro Hosokawa, Masayoshi 
          Takemura, Tetsundo Iwakuni, Shusei Tanaka, and Yukio 
          Hatoyama.  Chaired by Naoto Kan. 
(sources: 3 October 1993 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN; 11 October 1993 TOKYO 
SHIMBUN) 


Annex II.  LDP STUDY GROUPS 

Forum To Promote Pump-Priming Measures and Political Reform 
(Keikitaisaku Saiyusen, Seiji Kaikaku Jitsugen no Kai) 
Established:  22 December 1993 
Goals:    To concentrate discussion on pump-priming measures and on 
          anticorruption measures. 
Members:  Representatives are Taro Nakayama, Nobuyuki Hanashi, 
          Shunjiro Karasawa.  There are 11 other managers. 
(source:  23 December 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN) 

Forum To Renew LDP (Shinsei Jiminto o Tsukuru Kai) 
Established:  September 1993 
Goals:    To promote political reform by dissolving factions, and if 
          necessary, to support the coalition government's reform 
          bills. 
Members:  About 40 members, headed by Seiichi Ota and Shokei Arai. 
          However, the group dissolved on 10 February 1994, saying 
          that it had achieved its goal of party reform by 
          "abolishing the practices of 'dango' among factional 
          members." 
(sources: 13 November 1993 SHUKAN JIJI; 11 February 1994 MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN) 

Parliamentary Alliance To Promote Political Reform (Seiji Kaikaku 
Suishin Giin Renmei) 
Established:  June 1993 
Goals:  To promote political reform. 
Members:  186 members, headed by Toshiki Kaifu. 
(source: 25 October 1993 MAINICHI SHIMBUN) 


Democratic Politics Study Group (Minshu Seiji Kenkyukai) 
Established:  17 September 1993 
Goals:  To debate the introduction of the new electoral system. 
Members:  About 70 members, headed by Yoshinobu Shimamura. 
(sources: 2 October 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN; 25 October 1993 MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN) 


Annex III.  Socialist Party Study Groups 

Democrats 
Established:  21 December 1993 
Goals:    To actively support the coalition government and initiate 
          the realignment of political parties while trying to forge 
          a broad-based coalition of interparty political forces. 
          Through exchanges with JNP and Sakigake members, the group 
          hopes to support Yokomichi as a new party head.  Moreover, 
          the Democrats also plan to seek cooperation with reform- 
          minded LDP members. 
Members:  About 40 from the eight groups comprising rightist and 
          centrist members of the SDPJ. 
Diet Lower House Members: 
          Makoto Tanabe, Churyo Morii, Sadao Wada, Yu Amioka, 
          Daikichi Ishibashi Kenji Taguchi, Hirotaka Akamatsu, 
          Junsuke Iwata, ShogoOki, Akihiro Ohata, Azuma Koshiishi, 
          Masanori Goto, Mamoru Kobayashi Taisuke Sato, Shoichi 
          Tanaka, Ryuichi Doi, YoshioHachiro, Kenji Yoshioka, 
          Katsuhiko Yokomitsu, and Shogo Abe (USDP) 

Diet Upper House Members: 
          Shinji Aoki, Wataru Kubo, Keiko Chiba, Masakazu Yamamoto, 
          Yukiko Kawahashi, Tetsuo Kitamura, Takashi Tanihata, 
          Makoto Taneda Akiko Domoto, Toshikazu Hori, Kenichi 
          Yamada, Mitsuharu Tawashina, and Takashi 
          Awamori(Democratic Reform Coalitin) 
Former Lower House Members: 
          Motohisa Ikeda, Makoto Ogawa, Masato Okita, Hachiro Kishi, 
          Kiyoshi Koiwai, Tsuneto Kobayashi, Rikyu Shibusawa, 
          Yoshito Sengoku Nobutaka Tsutsui, Kazuko Yoshida 
(sources: 20 December 1993 YOMIURI SHIMBUN; 22 December 1993 ASAHI 
SHIMBUN; 26 December 1993 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN) 


Network To Recreate a Constitutional SDPJ (Goken no Shakaito o 
Saiseisuru 
Zenkoku Net towaaku) 
Established:  20 November 1993 
Goals:    To defend the Constitution and oppose the introduction of 
          anelectoral system combining single-seat constituencies 
          with proportional representation. 
Members:  10 lower house members and 10 upper house members, headed 
          by Kiichi Murayama and Sukio Iwatare. 
(source: 21 November 1993 YOMIURI SHIMBUN) 


New Policy Forum (Shinseisaku Konwakai) 
Established:  September 1993 
Goals:    To promote reform and to initiate a political realignment. 
          Group was most active in pushing Diet passage of the 
          political reform bills.  Group also plans to reexamine the 
          party's basic political platform, including security and 
          defense policies. 
Members:  20 lower house members and 10 upper house members, 
          including Aogu Matsumae (chairman) and young members such 
          as Masao Sakon, Ikuo Horigome, and Hideko Ito. 
(sources: 11 October 1993 ASAHI SHIMBUN; 10 November 1993 ASAHI 
SHIMBUN; 4 January 1994 MAINICHI SHIMBUN) 

Society To Promote True Political Reform (Shinno Seiji Kaikaku o 
Susumeru Kai) 
Established:  sometime in 1993 
Goals:    To stop corporate political contributions, lower party 
          subsidies,  prevent a conservative two-party system from 
          forming, and maintain the SDPJ's identity through a multi- 
          party system. 
Members:  27, including members of the "anti-Tanabe" and "anti- 
          single seat constituency" factions. 
          Principal members are from the following SPDJ groups: 
          Suiyokai:  Tsuruo Yamaguchi, Shun Oide, Tadatoshi Akiba. 
          Social Democratic Forum:  former and present forum 
          members, such as Koken Nosaka, Sekisuke Nakanishi, Seiko 
          Kitazawa, Mankichi Kato. 
          Creative Society: (Tsukuru Kai--Yamahana faction) Reijiro 
          Sawafuj i. 
          Former Ishibashi-Hori Faction:  Hideyuki Maezima, Masaru 
          Hayakawa. 
          Sangatsukai: (March Society--an ultraleft faction) Yasuo 
          Yamashita. 
(sources: 2 October 1993 SHUI?AN JIJI; 1 September 1993 ASAHI 
                            ? 
SHIMBUN) 


League of Reformist Diet Members (Shakaito Kaikaku Giin Rengo) 
Established:  April 1993 
Goals:    To create a SDPJ that can unite with other opposition 
          parties to oust the LDP from power. 
Members:  Include Aogu Matsumae, Toshiharu Okada, Yu Amioka, Sadao 
          Komatsu, Akira Kima, Takashi Motonobu, Tsuruo Yamaguchi, 
          Han Yasuda, Masato Okita, Kenji Yoshioka, Shuo Matsubara, 
          Mamoru Kobayashi, Minoru Kawashima, Ikuo Horigome, 
          Motohisa Ikeda, Rikyu Shibusawa, Kenji Taguchi, Yukio 
          Takemura, Risei Ueda. 
(source: 30 March 1993 SHM?I SHIMPO) 
                         ? 


New Policy Study Group (Shinseisaku Kenkyu Shudan) 
Established:  24 March 1993 
Goals:    To study policies concerning the 21st century politics on 
          a broad scale. 
Members:  21 members, including Masao Hori, Shigeru Ito, Sanji 
          Muto,Hideyuki Maejima, Masaru Hayakawa. 
(source: 30 March 1993 SHAKAI SHIMPO) 

Young Reformist Diet Members' Union (Wakate Kaikaku Giin Rengo) 
Established:  March 1993 
Goals:    To unite four groups of junior Diet members and, to 
          reexamine the SDPJ's basic policies. 
Members:  Members of "Leadership 21," ""Sirius," "Action New 
          Democracy," and "New Wave." 
(source: 30 March 1993 SHAKAI SHIMPO) 


New Generation Political Forum (Shinsedai Seiji Forum) 
Established:  10 March 1993 
Goals:  To promote reform of the SDPJ. 
Members:  19 members, including Hisashi Suzuki, Takashi Awamori 
          (Upper House) Junsuke Iwata, Hiroshi Tsunematsu. 
(source: 30 March 1993 SHAKAI SHIMPO) 

   (AUTHOR:  KOWALSKI.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, JAPAN BRANCH AT (703) 733-6534. 
EAG/24MAR94/POLCHF/ASIA DIVISION/CB 25/1703z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-66 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-042--ISRAEL 
<H3> <TI>      ISRAEL: CHALLENGES OF A PALESTINIAN STATE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Summary:      Arye Stav, editor of the conservative journal NATIV, 
has written an article published in the journal's January-February 
issue strongly opposing any peace settlement that would involve 
setting up a Palestinian state, which Stav sees as eventually 
ensuing from the Israeli-PLO Declaration of Principles (DOP) signed 
in September; returning the Golan Heights to Syria; and returning 
Palestinian refugees to the West Bank and Israel.  He argued that 
giving up Israeli control of the West Bank and the Golan would 
severely weaken Israel's geostrategic position in the face of 
enemies who are growing stronger, and the return of millions of 
refugees would greatly over tax water supplies in the region, and 
within Israel itself.  This foreign media note summarizes the views 
Stav expresses in his article. 

Geo-Strategy 

   According to Stav, if Israel loses the three strategic 
strongholds in Western Eretz Israel (the Jordan Valley, the Golan 
Heights, and the mountains of Judaea and Samaria) the country will 
be in greater danger than at the time of the Six Day War.  Iraq and 
Syria are now stronger than they were in 1967, Iran is more 
powerful, and Saudi Arabia is being armed at an unprecedented pace, 
all of which makes the eastern front more dangerous.  Since 1967, 
said Stav, Israel has built up its defensive infrastructure in the 
east, including the Jordan Valley proper and the fortified ridges of 
eastern Samaria, which are its "defensive key."  In addition, 
control of the Jordan Valley is a basic principle of the Alon Plan 
(post-1967 peace plan calling for the return of the densely 
populated areas in the West Bank and Gaza, along with most of the 
Sinai, to Arab sovereignty) for eastern front defense.  According to 
the NATIV editor, Samaria--an Israeli troop concentration point and 
early warning zone--is the only defensive line that protects the 
"soft underbelly" of the Israeli coastal plain in which most of the 
Jewish population and energy sources are concentrated.  In addition, 
said Stav, the trans-Samaria highway is the principal strategic 
highway in Israel and is intended to facilitate mobilized troop 
movement from Gush Dan eastward.  If the West Bank territory were 
lost, Israel's mobilization cushion of 72 hours would be reduced to 
a few hours.  Furthermore, Stav wrote, if the coastal plain were hit 
with non-conventional weapons, Israel's north-south movement axes 
would be cut.  Since no western axis exists, 2 million people would 
be forced to flee to the mountains of Samaria, an hour's distance 
away (assuming Samaria was still under Israeli control). 

   According to the NATIV editor, Israeli control of the Golan 
Heights now deprives Syria of a springboard into northern Israel and 
is an effective barrier to any Syrian adventurism because Israeli 
weapons deployed on the Golan can deter Damascus.  In addition, said 
Stav, Israeli control prevents Syria from deploying on the Golan 
missiles capable Of accurately striking population centers on the 
Gulf of Haifa with a Scud B  or along the coastal plain, where most 
Israeli reserve forces are mobilized, with a Scud C.  Israel is also 
able to prevent terrorist attacks in the Galil Finger and Jordan 
Valley which, said Stav, would preclude having "bunkers above and 
children's homes below." 

   According to Stav, there are over 5 million who call themselves 
"Palestinians."  Although a Palestinian entity will not, in and of 
itself, threaten Israel, the great numbers of Palestinians on the 
Jordan will "naturally" remove the Jordanian Hashemites.  Palestine 
would then be an enticing prey for either Iraq or Syria.  Syria is a 
greater threat to Israel, Stav said, because it is pursuing strategy 
of incorporating Jordan and Israel into "Greater Syria"--a strategy 
Damascus has followed by its support of the rejectionist "Group of 
10" and its involvement, through Iran, with Hizballah and Islamic 
Jihad.  Palestine under Syrian influence or control would not be a 
small demilitarized entity as currently envisioned, but the "heavy 
fist of the Arab Ummah (nation)" stretching from Baghdad to the 
outskirts of Gush Dan. 

Refugees 

   The combined number of Palestinian refugees from 1967 and 1948 is 
currently estimated at 2.6 million, says Stav, and their 
repatriation would place a heavy demographic and economic burden on 
Israel.  Under the terms of UN Resolution 194 on Arab refugess, 
Israel is faced with the return of millions of refugees to their 
dwellings inside the 1949 armistice lines.  Stav asserts that Israel 
has apparently agreed to family reunification of around 100,000. 
The alternative to Palestinian repatriation is monetary 
compensation, says Stav, which the Israeli Arab community has 
rejected because it nullifies the right of return.  The only 
compensation the Arab community is willing to discuss, he continues, 
is awarding post-1967 Jewish settler residences and infrastructure 
in the West Bank and Gaza as partial compensation for 1948 Arab 
property losses.  If Jewish residences in east Jerusalem are added, 
this would result in some 80,000 housing units being offered as 
compensation.  According to Stav, these 80,000 Jewish families who 
might be evacuated from their homes in the West Bank, Gaza, and 
Jerusalem would themselves require some $16 billion in compensation. 
Since Israel agreed to recognize the right of return for the 1967 
refugees, Stav expects plans for dealing with the 1948 refugees to 
be brought up sometime in 1994. 

Water 

   According to Stav, a peace settlement that brings the return of 
refugees would also lead to a major shortage of water in Israel.  He 
said that Israel's per capita water consumption of 250 cubic 
meters/annually is half of UNESCO's international minimum 
recommendation of 500 cubic meters.  Consumption is expected to 
continue to decrease despite a natural population increase, the 
influx of immigrants, and returning refugees.  Nonetheless, Israel 
intends to transfer two-thirds of this water to Arab sovereignty. 
The three primary water sources are: 

   Kineret Basin:  Supplies 610 million cubic meters/year.  Two- 
thirds of its water comes from wadis in the Golan and Jordan river 
headwaters which will transfer to the Syrians who, according to 
international law, will be able to draw on a considerable portion of 
it.  The Kineret has a delicate saline balance.  If its water level 
drops below 213 meters, irreversible damage is likely and Israel's 
sole upper water basin will abe destroyed.  Stav notes that the 
Syrians suffer from a water shortage and will need to use the Golan 
waters for intensive irrigation. 

   Mountain Aquifers: Supply 500 million cubic meters/year.  They 
are spread over the central mountain range in Judaea and Samaria, 
where most of the water supply will come under the control of 
Palestinian state.  Since the Palestinians intend to absorb 1.5 
million refugees over the next decade, the population of the West 
Bank will reach 2.5 million by the year 2000.  If the population on 
the coastal plain is to receive almost 50 percent of its water, 2.5 
million Palestinians will thus have only 100 cubic meters/person- 
-one-fifth of the international minimum. 

   Coastal Aquifer: Supplies 400 million cubic meters.  This aquifer 
is under Israeli control, but is contaminated by industrial waste, 
over salinated from overpumping, and is insufficiently replenished 
because of the building boom on the coastal plain.  The aquifer's 
concentration of such contaminants as nitrates has reached 90 
milligrams/liter, double the international standard.  Recycled and 
saline water can also supplement the coastal aquifer.  If Israel 
gives away the Kineret Basin and the mountain aquifers, concludes 
Stav, it will be left with brackish water, sewage, and toxic waste 
to drink. 

   (QUESTION AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/25 Mar/POLCHF/ECONF/NEASA Division/CB 25/2138z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-67 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THIS ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--EAST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-012--EAST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 12, 
23 March 1994. 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical i?sues 
                                                             ? 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investnient. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 
   FORTY PRIVATE CONSTRUCTION FIRMS ACTIVE IN SHKODER:  Following 
the private trade sector, the construction sector has undergone a 
active development in Shkoder.  Currently, there are 40 private 
construction firms active in this region.  They are involved with 
the construction of buildings in the city and are trying to complete 
the construction of apartments financed by the National Buildings 
Institute.  These companies are also involved in roads and works of 
art as well.  One of the companies has been working for several 
months on the renovation of the former Labor Party Central Committee 
building, to be turned into part of the Luigj Gurakuqi University. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1129 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   CABINET VIEWS FOREIGN DEBT NEGOTIATIONS, BUDGET EXPENSES:  The 
Council of Ministers has been discussing a draft decision on a 
response to the Paris Club regarding extending repayment of the 
country's public debts.  Albanian Bank Governor Dylber Vrioni, who 
also holds the post of chairman of the Committee for Negotiation of 
External Debt, spoke in detail about the Committee's work to find 
ways to pay off the public debts that Albania owes Germany, France, 
Austria, Italy, and the Netherlands.  In accordance with the terms 
put forward by the Paris Club, which were approved by the Council of 
Ministers, the repayment of Albania's public debts, which make up a 
fifth of the country's external debt, should be completed within 
seven years from mid-1996.  Concerning the other part of the 
external debt, which Albania owes to foreign private banks, the 
cabinet stressed the preliminary phase, but there are good hopes for 
a quick solution in the future.  The Council of Ministers approved a 
preliminary draft of the budget to the middle of March 1994, which 
will pave the way for budgetary institutions to operate until 
parliament approves a draft law in 1994.  Finally, they reached a 
cooperation agreement between the Albanian National Conipany and the 
Croatian company, Ina, on the exploration, processing, and 
production of hydroxides.  (Tirana ATA in English 0925 GMT 26 Feb 94 
AU) 

   1993 ALBANIAN IMPORTS INCREASE:  The total value of Albanian 
imports during 1993 was 42.1 billion leks or 29 billion more than in 
1992.  Private imports accounted for the major part with 28 billion 
of the total.  The main countries from which Albania imported goods 
were Italy, Greece, Germany, and France.  In 1993, goods worth 
18.888 billion leks were imported from Italy, mainly foodstuffs such 
as meat, flour, vegetable oil, and sugar, while goods worth 10.545 
billion came from Greece, mainly tractors, machinery, and electrical 
appliances.  Some 12,500 tons of oranges were imported from Greece, 
though the southern Albanian coast has many citrus plantations of 
its own.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 26 Feb 94 AU) 

   BRITISH PETROLEUM TO OPEN AIRPORT FUEL STATION:  British 
Petroleum, one of the world's largest companies, will open the first 
petrol station to supply aircraft in Rinas Airport.  This joint 
venture has been due to an agreement between two companies, British 
Petroleum and Petrol Impex of Albania.  The petrol station will be 
constructed soon and is expected to open by mid-March.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1141 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET APPROVES AMENDMENTS TO LAWS, BILATERAL AGREEMENTS:  The 
government has approved an agreement between the Republics of 
Albania and Malaysia on the promotion and protection of investment 
and an agreement between the Governments of Albania and Croatia on 
educational, cultural and scientific cooperation as well as on 
mutual removal of visas between the two countries.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1128 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   BILATERAL AGREEMENTS SIGNED WITH CROATIAN DELEGATION:  Several 
bilateral agreements were signed at the Palace of Congresses and 
Foreign Ministry today between the Albanian and Croatian 
delegations.  The agreement on cooperation in the field of tourism 
between the Government of the Republic of Albania and the Government 
of Croatia was signed by Ministers Spaho and Bulic.  The agreement 
on petroleum research in land between the National Agency of 
Hydrocarbons and Croatian National Company Ina Naf t Plin was signed 
by Fatbardh Ademi and Franjo Gregoric.  Presidents Berisha and 
Tudjman were present at the signing ceremony.  (Tirana TVSH 
Television Network in Albanian 1900 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET ADOPTS BILLS; AGREEMENTS WITH FRANCE, GERMANY:  The Prime 
Minister's Press and Information Office reports that on Monday the 
Council of Ministers approved several draft laws and decisions.  At 
today's meeting, the Council of Ministers discussed and approved the 
draft law on medications.  The bill defines the means of production 
and registration of medicaments, their marketing, as well as their 
import and export.  Later, the Albanian Government approved in 
principle a draft treaty of understanding and friendship between the 
Republic of Albania and the Republic of France.  The treaty 
provisions comprise commitment from both sides on political, 
economical, and cultural cooperation, as well as the exchange of 
experience between the Albanian and French Parliaments, local 
authorities, and the fields of legislation, industry, mining, 
agriculture, technology, tourism, culture, science, and social 
matters.  The government also approved an agreement between the 
Republic of Albania and the Federal Republic of Germany for 
financial cooperation regarding projects on private agriculture and 
the extension of communal infrastructure.  The approval of the 
project decision on the free of charge circulation of the material 
values covers the problems related to the values circulation within 
the system of the Ministry of Defense, the Ministry of Public Order, 
and the financial and forestry policies.  The Council of Ministers 
approved a draft decision presented by the Finance Ministry on the 
Law for Documenting and Keeping Tax Records.  The Albanian 
Government approved a decision to grant land to 427 peasant families 
living within the territory of the Ksamil Agricultural Enterprise in 
Sarande district.  (Tirana ATA in English 1116 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   WINNING TENDER FOR TIRANA WATER SUPPLY PROJECT:  The commission 
set up by Tirana municipality announced the project of the Albanian 
private firm ''Huk-Project'' as the winner of the tender for the 
improvement of Tirana's water supply.  Astrit Hana, Public Services 
director in Tirana Municipality, told an ATA reporter that the 
project foresees the increase of the water quantity with 400 liters 
per second after the sinking of wells in Laknas-Vore area, which 
will be worth some 312 million leks.  The project of the "Huk- 
Project" firm aims to partially improve the water supply for Tirana, 
so as to pass the phase of emergency due to the increase of 
population and the number of the private shops opened during the 
last years.  The final solution will be achieved only in 1996, when 
the water pipe-line in Bovilla will start to function.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1316 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   JOINT VENTURES FOR CLEANING TIRANA STREETS:  The grave situation 
created in Tirana due to dirty streets and the mass of unremoved 
filth is expected to change completely next month.  Astrit Hana, 
director of Public Services in Tirana municipality, said to ATA that 
the contracts with foreign firms, which won the tender organized by 
the municipality for the best Tirana cleaning project, will be 
signed within the first 15 days this month.  Tehnokomerc, a Slovene- 
Austrian firm, and Nuova Ekolega, an Italian firm, will create joint 
ventures with the existing domestic units to for city cleaning. 
Tirana's rural territory will be divided into two areas and one of 
the joint ventures will work in each of them.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1108 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   MALESI E MADHE PRIVATE FARMERS BUYING TRACTORS:  The Regional 
Department of Agriculture and Food reports that during the last two 
years, the private farmers in Malesi e Madhe have bought 245 
tractors.  The increasing number of the tractors has led to a 
decrease in land tariffs and other agricultural services.  Malesi e 
Madhe is a mountainous area north of Albania and one of the 
country's poorest provinces.  (Tirana ATA in English 1304 GMT 18 Feb 
94 AU) 

   PRIVATE FURNITURE FACTORY IN DURRES:  Two years ago, some Durres 
specialists of various professions, such as engineers, doctors, and 
economists set up the private firm "Ada," which mostly deals with 
the import of domestic electric facilities.  Now, the firm has 
extended its activity even in the field of production.  A small 
furniture factory, supplied with foreign technology and raw material 
and with a staff of 11 workers and specialists, has started to 
manufacture furniture, cupboards, and domestic facilities, which 
bear the seal of Ada.  Bujar Bajramaj, the firm's president, told an 
ATA reporter that $45,000 have been invested for the construction of 
this factory and the salaries vary from 7,000 leks monthly for 
workers to 13,000 leks monthly for specialists.  The advantages of 
the productions of this firm to those imported are the prices, which 
are 30-40 percent lower, as well as the employment of Albanian 
specialists.  The firm is prepared to set up a money exchange agency 
and aims to start some productive and elaborate activities in food 
industry.  (Tirana ATA in English 1123 GMT 20 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN ELBASAN:  Xhelil Kaci, chief of the Foreign 
Economic Relations Department in Elbasan Municipality, told an ATA 
reporter that 15 foreign investors have so far started their 
activity in Elbasan, city in central Albania.  Kaci mentioned four 
wood factories, a tobacco plant, a soap and oil enterprise, and two 
clothing production enterprises.  Kaci said that there are also some 
other enterprises, which work with ordered material, such as the 
Carpet and Clothing Enterprise, which has so far employed 700 
workers, as well as oil supply centers that will be built by foreign 
capital.  Total investments reach $7 million, out of which $3.5 
million for the reconstruction of the Wood Processing Plant by an 
Italian company, $1.8 million for the Tobacco Plant by a Greek 
company, and $700,000 for building an oil supply center, undertaken 
by a Slovene company.  Some 70 percent of foreign companies have 
invested in productive fields.  (Tirana ATA in English 1120 GMT 20 
Feb 94 AU) 

   DHL TO EXPAND ACTIVITY IN ALBANIA:  At a news conference held 
last week in Tirana, DHL representatives in Albania confirmed that 
65 percent of DHL post services are carried out by Albanians and 35 
percent by foreigners, who are performing activity or live in 
Albania.  They stressed that during last year, DHL has carried out 
services of 9,000 letters and packages of various sizes.  This year, 
the DHL's activity in Albania will be twice greater and will be 
extended in other regions, too, such as in Fier, Shkoder, Elbasan, 
and Korce.  DHL started its activity in Albania a year ago, and the 
Albanians are making good use of it, though its service tariffs are 
high compared to the country's living level.  (Tirana ATA in English 
0913 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRIVATE CLOTHING PRODUCTION ENTERPRISE IN FIER:  In cooperation 
with the powerful Italian firm Eldo S.P.A, the Fier businessman 
Krijenko Memo established a private clothing production enterprise 
named Luck.  (Tirana ATA in English 1133 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES DRAFT LAWS ON DUTIES, IMPORTS:  Upon the 
president of the republic's proposal, yesterday the People's 
Assembly approved some draft laws and decrees amending Laws on 
Custom Taxes, Tariffs.  It also approved an annual tax on vehicle 
registration, which will be different depending on the kind of 
vehicle.  The tax will vary from 500 to 7,000 leks.  An amendment to 
Article 17 of the Law on Customs Tariffs will discontinue the 
phenomenon of artificially decreasing customs values, which is 
observed in the custom-houses.  The Assembly also adopted two other 
decrees proposed by the president of the republic; one on exempting 
from customs taxes those commodities imported in conformity with the 
projects of granting credits under facilitated conditions, and the 
other on decreasing the customs tariffs on imported cheniical 
fertilizers, froni 30 to 5 percent.  (Tirana ATA in English 1109 GMT 
10 Feb 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN COMBINE RESUMES PRODUCTION OF STEEL:  On 9 February, 
GAZETA SHQIPTARE writes that the former Steelworks Plant in Elbasan 
city, central Albania, has been already divided into three subplants 
-- the hydro-metallurgical, energy, and siderotic divisions.  The 
newspaper comments that this solution has enabled the greatest 
factory of Albanian industry to start producing steel.  The 
siderotic subplant director says that "special sectors are operating 
normally although the technology is generally out of date and cannot 
resist time.  Actually, Albanian steel is being produced in electric 
furnaces, using scrap iron as raw material.  Specialists believe 
that since the scrap iron is considerable and electric energy is 
cheap in Albania, foreign investment will be high in this field.  So 
far, an Italian company has granted $1.3 million.  Steel turned out 
by the Steelworks Plant has met the demands of domestic consumers, 
i.e. different construction companies.  The siderotic subplant 
started to produce in October 1992 and has employed 2,500 workers so 
far.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES LOWER DUTY ON FERTILIZERS:  At today's plenary 
setting, the Assembly approved the president's decree on an 
amendment to custom tariffs.  Based on this decree, the custom 
tariffs on azo fertilizers will be decreased from 30 to 5 percent. 
This will promote private farmers to raise agricultural production. 
The high protectionist tax on azo fertilizers is already of no value 
because the fertilizer plants in Albania are out of work.  The new 
tariff will influence the rise of national incomes and agricultural 
production.  (Tirana ATA in English 0911 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT DATA UNRELIABLE:  Mr. Hasan Carcani, director at 
Labor Department in the Ministry of Labor and Social Assistance, 
told an ATA reporter that extravagant figures are given regarding 
unemployment in Albania.  It is impossible to give real figures on 
the number of the unemployed in Albania because many people who are 
in private business are not registered as such, some others have 
cars and use them as taxis without licenses, and furthermore, there 
are Albanians who "emigrate" illegally every day.  Mr. Carcani says 
that even people who are employed in the administration and state 
enterprises are included in the lists of persons registered in labor 
offices.  To be able to face the abuses, the Ministry of Labor and 
Social Assistance will soon send an order to labor offices clearly 
defining the criteria that unemployed citizens should meet in order 
to be registered as such.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 11 Feb 94 
AU) 

   GLUT OF IMPORTED MACAR0NI HURTS DOMESTIC PRODUCERS: Some 60 tons 
of stockpiled macaroni have remained in the storage-houses of 
Macaroni Factory in Berat.  Consequently, production is blocked and 
50 factory workers are likely to lose their jobs.  Specialists say 
that the market is oversupplied with iniported macaroni from Italy, 
Bulgaria, and Greece, and that is why stockpiles of Albanian 
macaroni are created.  (Tirana ATA in English 1124 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   COUNCIL APPROVES SHKODER DEVELOPMENT PLAN:  The Territory 
Management Council recently approved a plan to regulate Shkoder 
city.  The plan foresees urban development over the 20 next years. 
Specialists say this plan is in full conformity with the new 
economical and social conditions and will bring about many changes 
in the citizens' lifestyles, as well as completing and improving 
accommodation according to the residents' wishes.  Juli Shllaku, 
specialist at the Territory Management Directorate, said the plan 
will raise the population density from 136 to 250 residents per 
hectare.  The plan is also based on the development perspective of 
the city within its limited territory.  As for the private 
buildings, the plan foresees to give away the free existing areas in 
the city, in which the population density will be 200 residents per 
hectare.  (Tirana ATA in English 1116 GMT 12 Feb 94 AU) 

   RINAS AIRPORT MODERNIZATION CONTRACT SIGNED WITH SIEMENS:  On 11 
February, the Albanian Albtransport Enterprise in Tirana and the 
National Agency of Air Traffic in Rinas signed a contract with the 
German firm Siemens A.G. Erlangen for the first phase of the 
modernization and reconstruction of Rinas airport.  Ferdinand 
Petrela, Albtransport director, said that after the contract, we 
will immediately start negotiations on signing a financial agreement 
with the banks that will provide the necessary credit to finance the 
contract.  (Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 13 Feb 94 AU) 

   TWELVE THOUSAND FAMILIES REQUEST RELOCATION:  Some 12,000 
families, mainly from the northern part of the country, have asked 
for a change of residence because they have remained without land 
due to natural disasters, floods from the waters of lakes and hydro- 
power stations, etc.  On 18 October last year, the Albanian 
Government approved a decision to set up a commission that will 
study the problem and try to find possible ways to answer the 
requests of the families who want to change residence.  Aleksander 
Mara, director of Vegetable Production Directorate in the Ministry 
of Agriculture and Food, told an ATA reporter that it is too 
difficult to find a proper solution to such a problem.  In the first 
phase, the commission is thinking about the establishment of some 
families in those areas where, after the distribution of the land 
according to the present law, free arable land has remained, 
especially from the land of the former agricultural enterprises. 
According to this official, the Albanian state has to give millions 
of leks to these families, but such funds are far too limited at 
present.  The free movement of the people, a well-known phenomenon 
in Albania only in the last three years, is still limited due to the 
hard economic situation.  (Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 14  Feb 94 
AU) 

   DURRES HOUSING CONSTRUCTION:  Tomorr Golemi, head of the Durres 
municipality, told an ATA reporter that a total of 500 apartments 
are under construction and will be completed within 1994.  The 
apartments are being constructed to help the 1,200 families that are 
now living in buildings returned to their former owners.  Mr. Golemi 
said that 400 apartments will be constructed from state funds, 
adding that the construction of 65 house units will be covered by 
the amount of money from the privatization of the present 
apartments.  Some of the new apartments will be given to the 
families of former persecutees.  The Durres municipality has asked 
the Ministry of Agriculture and Food for two buildings that can be 
adopted as dwelling places.  (Tirana ATA in English 1119 GMT 14 Feb 
94 AU) 

   BURREL FERRO-CHROMIUM PLANT INCREASES PRODUCTION:  The Ferro- 
Chromium Plant in Burrel, eastern north of Albania, increased its 
January production by 80 tons, Tonin Gjoni, the plant director, told 
an ATA reporter.  In January, the total production amounted to 1,980 
tons or 17 percent more than the same period of 1993 [all figures as 
received].  This will supplement the Albchromium production program. 
Mr. Gjoni said that we have signed contracts with five companies to 
sell our products.  During the next three months we will reconstruct 
technological furnace No. 1, following an agreement with the U.S. 
Company Hackslay Bater to invest $1 million, while the Croatian 
Company Dalmatia Dugirat will implement the project.  Last year, the 
Ferro-Chromium Plant in Burrel covered 80 percent of production in 
the Mat District.  The figure exceeds the production program of the 
Albchromium state company by 9 percent.  (Tirana ATA in English 1122 
GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN WOOD PLANT IN JOINT VENTURE WITH ITALIAN FIRM:  The 
region of Apulia in Italy took the initiative to extend economic 
relations with Albania through investments and other forms of 
business and trade.  The firm Nettis Impianti, with Giuseppe Nettis 
as president, has established cooperation with the former wood plant 
in Elbasan, thus establishing a joint venture called Italdruri. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1124 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   SOROS FOUNDATION DONATES COMPUTERS TO TIRANA UNIVERSITY:  In the 
framework of the continuation of its program for high schools, the 
Soros Foundation donated 45 computers with printers to Tirana 
University.  (Tirana ATA in English 1305 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES BILL ON CUSTOMS TARIFFS:  On 14 February, the 
People's Assembly discussed and approved the draft law on customs 
tariffs, according to which taxes will be imposed on imports of 
grain and flour.  These goods will have a 5 percent custom tax and a 
5 percent surtax.  No taxes will be paid on the grain and flour that 
will continue to be imported in the framework of aid or governmental 
agreements.  The parliament has adopted some amendments even to the 
tax imposed on used cars, depending on the mileage.  The parliament 
also discussed the draft law on some amendments to the Law on 
Traffic Taxes.  (Tirana ATA in English 1121 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGENCY REPORTS 27,500 'UNITS' PRIVATIZED SO FAR:  The National 
Privatization Agency reports that some 27,500 units have been 
privatized so far.  The agency statistics confirm an $17 million 
input into the state budget through privatization.  In the first six 
months of 1993 alone, 710 large units and enterprises were 
privatized, thus representing 80 percent of the monetary value 
cashed during the 1993 period.  Efforts to privatize 7,000 objects 
are presently under way.  Food, clothing, and construction 
enterprises are increasing their demands for privatization.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1123 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   DUTCH AID FOR FIER AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT CENTER:  An 
agricultural development center will be created in Fier with the 
support of a Dutch firm.  In this context, an agreement of 
understanding with partners in the Dutch Ministry of Agriculture, 
Food and Fishing was signed.  Rakip Kryeziu High Agricultural 
School, which will be completely reconstructed, will be the pillar 
of this center for agricultural development.  The investments will 
be mainly allocated to modernize the school conditions, raise the 
level of lessons, and improve the cattle stocks and plant stocks of 
the school.  In the context of this cooperation, three demonstration 
centers in the form of private firms may also be built in the near 
feature.  (Tirana ATA in English 1119 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   SATELLITE RECEIVER STATION TO BE SET UP IN DURRES:  A satellite 
receiver station will be soon set up in Durres, a city 30 kilometers 
from Tirana.  After organizing a poll of specialists and citizens of 
different ages, the city municipality presented the applications of 
various firms that will compete in the tender for the satellite 
station.  This will make it possible for people to watch satellite 
programs broadcast by some renowned television stations such as CNN, 
MTV, and some serious Italian television channels.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1309 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   HEALTH MINISTRY TO CONTROL MEDICINES:  The Ministry of Health 
intends to regulate the import and distribution of pharmaceuticals. 
At a news briefing on 23 February the ministry announced that its 
experts have prepared a draft decree specifying the terms for 
issuing licenses to manufacturers and wholesalers of medicines. 
According to the ministry's experts, the market in medicines has 
been too liberal since 1991, and requires state control.  According 
to the ministry, there are more than 400 wholesale importers and 
distributors at the moment, far too many for a small country like 
Bulgaria.  The number is expected to drop following the introduction 
of a 10,000-leva licensing fee and as soon as the regulations for 
trade and storage of pharmaceuticals have been determined.  The 
decree provides no special mechanism to protect Bulgarian 
manufacturers.  The higher taxes and customs duties charged on 
imported medicines are supposed to provide sufficient protection for 
local manufacturers.  Bulgarian manufacturers of medicines will be 
obliged to make them in accordance with the regulations applicable 
in the EU and worldwide.  (Sofia BTA in English 1701 GMT 23 Feb 94 
AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION FALLS SHARPLY:  In 1993 agricultural 
production accounted for 9.6 percent of GDP, compared with 11 
percent in 1992, according to the National Statistical Institute 
(NSI) on 24 February.  State-owned, private, and cooperative farms 
saw a slump in the output of all crops except wheat, which went up 
by 240,000 tons.  In 1993 the average annual earnings of the 677,000 
persons employed in farming was 26,440 leva.  There was no fall in 
the number of farm workers compared with 1992.  There was a sharp 
drop in livestock numbers:  Cattle went down by 70,000, pigs by 
608,000, sheep by 1,050,000, and poultry by 660,000. This brought 
about a slump in the output of milk, eggs, wool and other stock- 
breeding products.  About 40.5 percent of all former landowners had 
their land back by 25 January 1994.  The figure includes those given 
land for temporary use.  However, the land is much fragmented: 
Statistical data on land use show that plots measuring 0.1 to 1 
hectares (ha) account for 91 percent of the land; plots of 1.1 to 5 
ha, 8.5 percent; 5.1 to 10 ha, 0.47 percent; plots over 10 ha, only 
0.03 percent.  (Sofia BTA in English 1505 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE TALKS HELD WITH BELGIUM:  Bilateral relations and prospects 
for cooperation between Bulgaria and Belgium were discussed on 25 
February at a regular meeting of the Bulgarian-Belgian Mixed 
Committee on Economic, Industrial, Trade, and Technical Cooperation. 
The committee's cochairmen are Edmond de Wilde, minister 
plenipotentiary and director for Eastern Europe at Belgium's Foreign 
Trade Ministry, and Vladimir Kisyov, chief of the International 
Integration and Coordination Department with Bulgaria's Industry 
Ministry.   The Bulgarian side sought Belgian help in the 
fulfillment of procedural requirements for the ratification of 
Bulgaria's association agreement with the EC and in the talks on 
Bulgaria's association with GATT and other international 
organizations.  The Bulgarian side also requested support for its 
claim for compensation for damage suffered in enforcing sanctions 
against Serbia and Montenegro. 

   Bulgarian exports to Belgium account for about 10 percent of 
total exports to the EC, and imports from it for 4 percent of the 
total imports.  After a sharp drop in 1990, two-way trade began to 
stabilize.  According to Racho Petrov, the Belgian side has shown an 
interest in Bulgaria's power engineering, electronics, equipment, 
chemicals and food processing industry.  The Belgian delegation 
tabled specific proposals for joint construction of small 
hydroelectric power stations, joint production and setting up of 
joint ventures.  According to Reneta Indzheva, executive director of 
the Privatization Agency, who also attended the meeting, Belgian 
capital will soon enter Bulgaria.  The first privatized company in 
Bulgaria, the Tsaramil animal feed plant in Razgrad, was sold to a 
Belgian buyer.  Belgian businessmen are interested in other large 
companies in this country, Indzheva said.  Belgian businessmen 
accompanying the delegation met officials of the Union for Private 
Economic Enterprise, the Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce and Industry, 
and the Bulgarian Industrial Association to discuss ways to promote 
Belgian investment in this country.  (Sofia BTA in English 1201 GMT 
25 Feb 94 AU) 

   ORTHODOX BANK TO RAISE CAPITAL:  The International Orthodox Bank, 
incorporated on the initiative of a group of Bulgarian citizens, is 
launching a capital-raising effort.  The Russian Patriarchate is 
ready to invest 150 million leva, the Greek Exarchate and the 
Serbian Patriarchate 50 million leva each, the Armenian Apostolic 
Orthodox Church in Bulgaria 10 million leva, Bulgarian commercial 
partnerships of various economic groups some 150 million leva, and 
the metropolitans of the Bulgarian Orthodox Church for Europe and 
the U.S. some 50 million leva, according to Vasil Gyatsov, secretary 
member of the Supreme Ecclesiastical Board of the Holy Synod.  He 
said that the Bulgarian Orthodox Church still does not fornially 
participate in the bank.  (Sofia BTA in English 1927 GMT 25 Feb 94 
AU) 

   IMF OFFICIAL EXPECTS AID GRANT IN 1994:  Bulgaria will receive an 
aggregate U.S.$500 million from the IMF in 1994 and 1995 after 
signing a stand-by arrangement, according to IMF resident 
representative Gregory Dahl.  To qualify for the SBA, Bulgaria must 
have its 1994 national budget passed by Parliament within the 
parameters agreed with the Fund.  Dahl believes that the 30 percent 
inflation, zero decline of the GDP and a budget deficit of 6.2 
percent of GDP, listed in the government's Letter of Intent to the 
IMF, are realistic if the government is able to keep within the 
budget and not resort to extra borrowing.  The big problem is to 
cope with the problems of the state-owned enterprises, for whose 
debts new loans are contracted, Dahl believes.  In his view, the 
results will depend on the government's efforts.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1739 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   CEMENT MAKER PREPARES FOR PRIVATIZATION:  The state-owned 
Beloizvorski Cement Works in Vratsa is preparing for privatization. 
It is one of the 13 large enterprises whose sale is to be arranged 
by the Privatization Agency.  The works' fixed tangible assets are 
appraised at 837 million leva.  Its 100 million leva of debts have 
been settled by the state and will be no burden for the buyer.  In 
addition, the cement mills in Devnya and Zlatna Panega are also up 
for sale.  They are priced at 734 million and 440 million leva 
respectively, but buyers are interested mainly in the Vratsa 
facility.  Compared with other cement producers, the enterprise has 
more efficient manufacturing lines and thus requires half the usual 
amount of fuel.  The company's capacity, however, is now 
underutilized owing to a smaller cement market.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1654 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   SHARP INCREASE IN FOREIGN CURRENCY DEPOSITS:  On 28 January 
STANDART NEWS reported that foreign exchange deposits in the 
Bulgarian banking system had increased by the equivalent of 2 
billion leva within the space of a week.  According to the latest 
figures released by the Bulgarian National Bank's Economic Analysis 
Department, state-owned enterprises keep the equivalent of 34.1 
billion leva in foreign currency deposit accounts, while private 
businessmen hold the equivalent of 8.5 billion leva.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1257 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RETAIL PRICES RISE IN FEBRUARY:  Retail prices of goods monitored 
by the Council of Ministers went up by an average of 2.16 percent 
between 15 and 28 February, according to figures supplied by the 
National Statistical Institute.  The price of beef rose most (5.13 
percent), followed by white brined cow's cheese (4.62 percent), and 
cow's yogurt (4.16 percent).  (Sofia BTA in English 1956 GMT 28 Feb 
94 AU) 

   STRICTER CONDITIONS FOR HOUSING LOANS:  Amendments to the housing 
loans system that will come into force in the summer will introduce 
higher requirements for borrowers.  Specialists expect the new 
requirements to bring down the number of Bulgarians entitled to 
housing loans.  Under the regulations of the State Savings Bank 
(DSK), which has the major share in the housing loans system, the 
loan extended should be under 70 percent of the dwelling's market 
price.  The interest rate charged on housing loans is 56 percent for 
citizens with housing accounts and 61 per cent for those without 
such accounts.  The total numbers of housing accounts fell in recent 
years.  In late 1993 the housing accounts contained deposits of 
1.921 billion leva, compared with 2.484 billion in late 1992. 
According to DSK figures, 450,000 Bulgarians hold housing accounts 
at the moment, whereas in 1985 there were 560,000.  A 100,000 leva 
loan, for example, is repayable in 4,000 leva (about U.S.$100) 
monthly installments, which is too much for Bulgarians, according to 
DSK Deputy Chairman Georgi Tomov.  The minimum monthly pay is now 
1,565 leva (about U.S.$40).  According to Tomov, real estate is sold 
at speculative prices. 

   Vis-a-vis the percentage of owner-occupied dwellings, Bulgaria 
ranks first among the former socialist countries.  However, the 
statistical data refer to the number of dwellings and not the per 
capita floor area norm and one will often find families of different 
generations sharing one flat.  In 1958 the numerous construction 
companies were nationalized and transformed into large state-owned 
companies specialized in the construction of tall apartment blocks, 
the major type of town dwelling.  The flats constructed were owned 
by the municipalities and could be bought by the people living in 
them.  By 1989 the DSK was the only institution authorized to extend 
loans for house purchase and many Bulgarians had the chance to buy 
their own house on favorable terms without substantially affecting 
the family budget.  Having their own house is an obsession shared by 
nearly all Bulgarians. 

   According to the National Statistics Institute, 13,480 state- 
owned dwellings were constructed in 1992, compared with 30,050 in 
1985.  The increasing number of private construction companies 
during the past couple of years could not stop the downward trend in 
private house-building, which fell from 34,820 in 1985 to 4,100 in 
1992.  (Sofia BTA in English 1036 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNDERFUNDING IMPEDES SPRING SOWING:  The spring sowing is 
expected to put 1.3 million hectares under crops, Polina Stefanova, 
head of the Crop Farming Department at the Agriculture Ministry, 
announced today.  Some 600,000 hectares are expected to be planted 
with cereals, 450,000 hectares with industrial crops, 120,000 
hectares with animal feed crops, 70,000 hectares with vegetables, 
and 30,000 hectares with legumes.  The main problem is lack of funds 
for sowing.  Although the 1994 national budget allocates 1 billion 
leva for financing autumn and spring farm work in the 1993-94 
season, in practice this money is unlikely to reach farmers.  "The 
Ministry of Agriculture is not in a position to provide these funds, 
even though it has done everything within its powers," Agriculture 
Minister Georgi Tanev said.  Of the areas intended for sowing, 
800,000 hectares, or 60 percent, have been deep-plowed.  Between 60 
and 75 percent of the soil cultivators are ready for the planting 
season.  This year some 70 private companies will join the effort. 
All necessary quantities of pest-control chemicals are ready, as 
well as sufficient quantities of fertilizer.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1358 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   DOLLAR RATE EXCEEDS 40 LEVA, AT ALL TIME HIGH:  "Dollar Jumps 
Over 40 Leva.  Lev in Collapse," runs the headline of a front-page 
report in PARI on 2 March, commenting on the strengthening of the 
dollar in Bulgaria's foreign exchange market.  "The dollar's record- 
high of 40.20 leva crushed the Bulgarian national currency in the 
interbank market yesterday.  It was a new all-time low for the lev", 
PARI notes.  The daily cites Finance Minister Stoyan Aleksandrov as 
saying that "there is nothing to worry about if one dollar exchanges 
for 50 leva and the base interest rate goes down to 30 percent (now 
it is over 50 percent) because there are other compensatory 
factors."  "Dollar Hits 40.50 Leva, BNB (Bulgarian National Bank) 
Does Not Intervene," TRUD observes in a front-page headline.  The 
DEMOKRATSIYA daily notes that yesterday the banks purchased 
U.S.$11.2 million at an average exchange rate of 38.316 leva and 
sold $7.7 million at an average of 38.496 leva to the dollar. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1115 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT TO SUBSIDIZE TOBACCO INDUSTRY:  The purchasing of the 
65 percent of last year's tobacco harvest, which is still in 
warehouses, will be financed with a subsidy from the 1994 national 
budget, according to Agriculture Ministry Plant-Growing Department 
Chief Polina Stefanova.  The 1994 budget passed by parliament a 
couple of days ago allocates a total of 500 million leva in 
subsidies to be spent on purchasing for the 1993 tobacco harvest. 
According to  Stefanova, the subsidy will be enough to buy out the 
1993 harvest.  Bulgartabak Executive Director Rafail Ivanov said for 
his part that the subsidy will be spent to compensate the margin 
between the purchase and the market price of tobacco.  He also said 
that the distribution of the funds has yet to be considered.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1345 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   RETAIL PRICES RISE SLIGHTLY:  Retail prices of government 
monitored and controlled goods went up 0.68 percent over the past 
two weeks, the National Statistical Institute reported on 16 
February.  The greatest rise was registered in the price of milk -- 
2.41 percent, and cheese -- 3.43 per cent.  The prices of mutton, 
pork, and bread went down.  (Sofia BTA in English 2150 GMT 16 Feb 94 
AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK OFFICIAL VIEWS BANKING REFORM:  In an interview 
published in KONTINENT on 16 February, Mileti Mladenov, deputy 
governor of the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB), says that the plan to 
reform banking by building a two-tier banking system with a central 
bank independent of the government has not been achieved.  There are 
cases of the government and parliament putting pressure on the BNB 
as a result of the uneven progress of reforms and limited external 
financing.  The BNB's autonomy eliminates the possibility of 
financing the government automatically and unrestrictedly, but now 
most of the central bank's loans go to the government and much less 
to the country's economy, Mladenov points out. 

   The Bank Consolidation Company was set up to promote the 
regrouping of banks and their privatization.  As the legal framework 
is imperfect and because the banks to be privatized belong to the 
state, the BNB Board decided that decisions on selling the banks 
should be made by the government.  The delay in privatization makes 
the condition of the state banks even worse, and improvement can 
only be expected from the application of the Bad Debts Act and 
recapitalizing the banks through sales of shares and state property 
or making new issues of shares in the state banks.  Mladenov 
considers that part of the banking sector should remain under the 
control of the state.  (Sofia BTA in English 1234 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   KHASKOVO TOBACCO PLANT RESUMES PRODUCTION:  The Trakiya Tobacco 
Plant in Khaskovo has resumed production and will be operating at 
peak capacity within 15 days.  Until recently its warehouse was 
packed full of cigarettes.  Now Trakiya is about to make a comeback 
after closing a profitable deal with Russia.  Bulgarski Turgovski 
Dom, a Plovdiv-based private company with a branch in Moscow, will 
export to Russia about 1,500 tons of cigarettes in 1994.  Trakiya 
began exporting cigarettes to the Soviet Union in 1967, and its 
highest annual exports to date were 20,000 tons.  The latest deal 
will provide security for the hard-pressed plant and its 1,700 
employees and will also enable the plant to pay money due to 17,000 
tobacco growers for the purchase of last year's crop.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1634 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   PLAMA REFINERY'S DIFFICULTIES REPORTED:  Production has stopped 
at the Plama Oil Refinery in Pleven.  Plama president Nikola 
Pukalski explained that there was nowhere to store the lubricating 
oils the plant produced.  In November and December it produced 
16,700 tons of lubricating oils which were supposed to be exported 
to Ukraine under a bilateral agreement.  Part of the money due has 
not been paid.  Production will probably be resumed in mid-March. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1738 GMT 20 Feb 94 AU) 

   COST OF LOANS FALLS IN FEBRUARY:  The cost of loans to the 
economic sector went down in the first two weeks of February, 24 
CHASA reports on 21 February, citing figures from the Bulgarian 
National Bank.  The interest charged on long-term loans was reduced 
significantly from an annual 93.35 percent in late January to 82.90 
percent on February 11, representing a monthly interest rate of 5.16 
percent.  The interest rate on short-term loans dropped from 88.65 
to 88.43 per cent, or 5.42 percent per month.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1105 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN BANK SEEKS TO OPERATE IN BULGARIA:  Raiffeisen 
Zentralbank of Austria has asked the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) 
for permission to establish a bank in Bulgaria, STANDART NEWS 
reported on 21 February.  The BNB chiefs declined to specify whether 
Raiffeisen Bank proposed to found a new bank or to buy the Bank for 
Agricultural Credit, in which it currently holds a 34 percent stake. 
According to experts, Raiffeisen Bank is more likely to go for the 
second option.  The Bank for Agricultural Credit is one of the most 
stable financial institutions in this country and is among the few 
to post a handsome profit for 1993.  (Sofia BTA in English 1105 GMT 
21 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRODUCTION, CONSUMPTION OF DAIRY PRODUCTS FALLS:  Deputy 
Agriculture Minister Yuri Borisov reported a considerable drop in 
the production of milk and dairy products to a meeting of top 
Agriculture Ministry officials.  The major causes are a drastic cut 
in the number of livestock and poor technological conditions at 
breeding farms.  Other causes are low purchase prices and irregular 
payments to suppliers.  In 1993 milk output dropped by 337.7 million 
liters from 1992.  Production of staple dairy products also went 
down:  white brined cheese by 10,932 tons; yellow cheese, 2,048 
tons; and butter, 4,218 tons.  However, dairy products are plentiful 
on the domestic market, due to per capita consumption falling from 
194 liters in 1990 to 130 liters in 1993, and a rise in imports. 
The largest exporters of cheese to Bulgaria were Estonia, Lithuania, 
Denmark, and France. 

   Bulgarian cheese, until now one of the staple exports, hit a ten- 
year low of 10,200 tons in 1993, down from 26,877 tons in 1985. 
About 30 percent of it went to Greece; 45 percent to the United 
States, Macedonia, and Lebanon; and the rest to France, Germany, and 
Australia.  Practically none was exported to the former Soviet 
Union, which used to buy over 10,000 tons of cow's cheese per year. 
The Agriculture Ministry expects milk output to reach last year's 
level of 1,506.6 million liters and expects purchasing to increase 
12 percent.  The production of white brined cheese and yellow cheese 
is expected to rise by 6,700 tons and 2,000 tons respectively. 
According to the deputy agriculture minister, the government's 
efforts to guarantee purchase prices and low interest loans and to 
encourage stock breeding in mountain regions give grounds for 
optimism.  (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   HOUSEHOLD BUDGETS ANALYZED:  Bulgarians spend 37 percent of their 
earnings on food, according to a household budget survey carried out 
by the National Statistical Institute and published in STANDART NEWS 
on 23 February.  Bread and pastry account for 13 percent of food 
consumption, followed by eggs, 12.8 percent; milk, 6.5 percent; and 
fresh vegetables, 5.8 percent.  Meat consumption dropped from 4.2 
percent in 1992 to 3.7 percent in 1993.   Cigarettes and alcohol 
account for 0.1 percent and 1.6 percent of household expenses 
respectively.  (Sofia BTA in English 1317 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FIRST CELLULAR TELEPHONE NETWORK:  The first cellular radio 
telephone network in Bulgaria was officially launched in Sofia on 23 
February.  The system is called Mobifon.  It covers Sofia and its 
environs, and has over 1,000 subscribers.  The system will shortly 
be extended to Varna, Burgas, Plovdiv, and the highway from Sofia 
and Plovdiv.  Later it will cover all the larger towns.  Mobifon is 
the trademark of the Bulgarian-British Radiotelecommunications 
Company Ltd., in which Bulgaria holds a 51 percent stake.  (Sofia 
Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 1400 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   CABINET APPROVES WAGE INDEXATION MECHANISM:  At its regular 
session on 3 February, the Council of Ministers adopted three 
decrees that determine the mechanism for its income indexing policy 
this year.  The three regulatory documents were approved in their 
final form after several months of discussions and consultations 
with the trade unions and employers within the National Council for 
Trilateral Cooperation. 

   The first decree sets a new national minimum wage of 1,565 leva 
per month for the first quarter of 1994 and raises the social 
pension received by about 2.5 million pensioners from 450 to 780 
leva per month.  The minimum income for persons receiving social 
assistance is set at 980 leva per month.  During the first quarter 
of 1994 other benefits and payments, such as unemployment benefitS 
and children's allowances, will be indexed by a coefficient of 1.107 
on the basis of the forecast inflation rate for the quarter, namely 
10.7 percent. 

   The second decree regulates wages and salaries in material 
production and the trading sector.  It provides that wages should 
now be indexed on the basis of the forecast inflation rate, as 
compared to last year, when wages were increased on a trailing basis 
by 85 percent of the actual inflation rate. 

   The third cabinet decree regulates the principles for fixing 
wages and salaries in state enterprises, government departments, and 
other organizations funded from the national budget.  Actual 
salaries will vary in different organizations and departments:  For 
example, the average gross monthly salary of employees of the 
Committee for Power Supply will be 5,942 leva; for health care 
employees, the average salary will be 3,685 leva; and for employees 
in the field of education, 3,200 leva.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 4 
Feb 94 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   MACEDONIAN DELEGATION SEEKS BULGARIAN TOURISTS:  Last year 50,000 
Bulgarians went on vacation to Ohrid in Macedonia, Ohrid Mayor 
Blagoje Siljanoski told a news conference on 9 February. 
Siljanovski and about a hundred Macedonian tourist executives, 
mostly from Ohrid, have arrived to attend the Holiday '94 
International Tourist Fair, which will open on 10 February in Sofia. 
This year Macedonia hopes to attract as many tourists as in 1990, 
when over 1 million visited that country, spending 3.5 million 
overnights there, Dose Kotevski, deputy chairman of the Chamber of 
Economy of Macedonia said.  He added that they will rely heavily on 
Bulgarian vacationers in reaching this goal. 

   The Macedonian delegation, which includes directors of the 
largest Macedonian hotels and travel agencies as well as the head of 
the Macedonian Press Office Zivko Georgievski, met with Bulgarian 
intellectuals.  The guests will meet central and local government 
officials in Plovdiv and Stara Zagora. 

   Tourist exchanges between Bulgaria and Macedonia are hindered by 
the limited traffic capacity of the three border checkpoints, the 
bad roads, and the lack of a direct rail link between Skopje and 
Sofia.  A working team from the two countries' ministries in charge 
of the border checkpoints discussed at their first meeting on 8 
February a project to extend the Bulgarian checkpoint at Gyueshevo, 
it was announced at the press conference.  For two years now the 
transport ministers of the two countries have been discussing the 
construction of a 40-km stretch of railway across the border to 
provide a direct rail link between Bulgaria and Macedonia, but the 
route has yet to be finalized. 

   hrid is the largest tourist center of the Republic of Macedonia. 
It lay within the boundaries of the Bulgarian state during various 
periods prior to the Ottoman conquest.  (Sofia BTA in English 1509 
GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   MINISTRY OF TRADE'S PRIVATIZATION EFFORTS:  In 1993 the Ministry 
of Trade conducted 32 privatization transactions, producing receipts 
totalling 188 million leva, Valentin Karabashev, deputy prime 
minister and minister of trade, told a news conference held on 9 
February to mark the first anniversary of the start of 
privatization.  The privatized enterprises are mainly garages, 
warehouses, and shops, plus a single foreign trade company. 
Karabashev pointed out that the Privatization Agency and other 
institutions have joined in the process, but only the Ministry of 
Trade has carried out its privatization program in full.  "To my 
great regret, the other authorized institutions are falling behind," 
he observed. 

   Last year the Ministry of Trade privatized seven enterprises more 
than planned and initiated a further 104 procedures, Karabashev 
stated.  He rejected press allegations that the enterprises were 
sold at knock-down prices.  "The selling prices exceed the 
privatization appraisals of the companies by an average of 28 
percent, and their fixed assets (totalling 41 million leva) by about 
four times," he said.  This year the Ministry of Trade plans to 
privatize 120 companies engaged in trade and services, after which 
50 percent of that sphere will become private property, and in 
another year or so the remaining 50 percent will be privatized as 
well, Karabashev said.  (Sofia BTA in English 1657 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   STATE-CONTROLLED BANKS' LOSSES TOP $270 MILLION:  State- 
controlled Bulgarian banks made losses exceeding 10 billion leva 
(some $270 million) this financial year, TRUD reported on 10 
February, citing estimates from the profit and loss accounts of more 
than half of all banking institutions.  "The figures suggest that 
the banks' state of finances has not been worse since they were 
established," experts are quoted by the daily as saying.  Only 10 
percent of Bulgaria's banks are expected to be in the black.  TRUD 
observes that even some of the profit-makers, which were 
consolidated into new merger groups at the end of last year, will 
move into the red because of the huge losses of the other 
constituent banks in their groups.  The disastrous annual financial 
performance is due mainly to the accrual of nonperforming loans, 
which entails even larger losses because of the steep interest 
rates, TRUD noted.  As a result of this, banks will probably be 
unable to pay dividends to their shareholders.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1219 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   THERMOELECTRIC PLANT CUTS PRODUCTION:  The Ruse-East 
Thermoelectric Power Plant is at present operating at 30 percent of 
its design capacity as a result of a fall in demand in the region. 
It is producing 90 instead of the usual 260 megawatts and trying to 
run down its coal stocks.  The plant has diverted a shipment of 
6,000 tons of Ukrainian coal to the power plant in Vidin.  Since the 
start of the year, the plant has not supplied any industrial steam 
to the factories in the town's eastern industrial zone because they 
are barely functioning and owe a total of 120 million leva to the 
power station.  Due to the low level of electricity production, the 
plant itself is finding it difficult to repay the 150 million leva 
of credits it has been granted.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 10 Feb 94 
p 3 AU) 

   RUSSIAN ENVOY BLAMES GOVERNMENTS FOR TRADE DECLINE:  Addressing 
the press on 10 February following a meeting with the president of 
the Bulgarian Economic Association Bozhidar Danov, Russian 
Ambassador Aleksandr Avdeyev ascribed the lion's share of blame for 
the decline of trade between Bulgaria and Russia to the governments, 
which did not provide the legal basis for trade.  The high excise 
and customs duties make Bulgarian goods hard to sell in Russia, he 
said.  According to Avdeyev, the establishment of joint ventures and 
payments through commercial banks can help promote trade.  Russian 
business circles show interest in privatization of tourist 
facilities on the Black Sea and some industrial companies, the 
ambassador said.  (Sofia BTA in English 2249 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   FIGURES ON FOREIGN LOANS PUBLISHED:  Bulgaria has received a 
total of $2,200 million in loans from world financial institutions 
since the fall of the communist regime on November 10, 1989, DUMA, 
STANDART NEWS, and 24 CHASA reported on 11 February, citing a report 
by the Finance Ministry to the Parliamentary Budget and Finance 
Committee.  Bulgaria received $644 million from the IMF, of which 
$474 million was under the first stand-by agreement and $170 million 
under the second.  The World Bank extended Bulgaria $445 million in 
credits, credits for $161 million have been agreed on with the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, and the European 
Investment Bank has extended Bulgaria credits totalling $316 
million.  (Sofia BTA in English 1148 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   CIGARETTE EXPORTS TO RUSSIA:  The Tobacco Combined Works in 
Khaskovo signed a contract to export 15,000 tons of cigarettes worth 
$56 million to Russia, 24 CHASA reported on 11 February, citing the 
director of the works, Nikolay Zakhariev.  The contract will be 
implemented by Bulgartabak.  (Sofia BTA in English 1148 GMT 11 Feb 
94 AU) 

   FISH CANNING FACTORY EXPORTS OUTPUT:  The Slavyanka Fish Cannery 
in Burgas -- the only one in Bulgaria -- produces 10 tons of canned 
fish per day.  After a prolonged forced outage it has just resumed 
production.  Most of the plant's products are exported to Greece. 
The fish is canned according to Greek recipes and has not so far 
appeared on the Bulgarian market.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 13 
Feb 94 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-SERBIAN BUSINESS MEETING:  A Bulgarian-Serbian business 
meeting was held in Vidin on 10 February.  The meeting was hosted by 
the Vidin Chamber of Industry and Commerce and was attended by 15 
Serbian and 20 Bulgarian companies.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 
13 Feb 94 AU) 

   GROUP FORMED TO PROTECT VARNA CONSTRUCTION MARKET:  Sixteen 
construction companies in Varna have set up a construction chamber. 
Its purpose is to consolidate the construction market and preserve 
it for local companies.  Though almost 300 construction companies 
have been registered, the number of such companies actually working 
in the construction market is actually 10 times smaller, according 
to the chamber's chairman Krasimir Daskalov.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1808 GMT 13 Feb 94 AU) 

   BRAZILIAN SUGAR:  The Martsianopulos Factory in Devnya has 
started processing 18,000 tons of raw sugar from Brazil for the 
domestic market.  According to the plant's director Boris Terziev, 
the recent rise in the sugar price was caused by the adverse trading 
situation on world exchanges, the rise of the U.S. dollar against 
the lev, inflation, and the fact that this country's raw material 
basis has been almost destroyed.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 13 
Feb 94 AU) 

   GABON GRANTS TIMBER CONCESSION:  The Government of Gabon has 
granted Bulgaria a concession for lumbering and trade in timber, 
according to a statement from Ginyo Ganev, legal adviser and member 
of a Bulgarian delegation back from Gabon.  The concession was 
granted to Balkanbank, which will select financial and business 
partners.  Balkanbank will explore 223,000 hectares of tropical 
forest and negotiate the term of the concession, set between 25 and 
30 years in preliminary talks.  President Omar Bongo received 
members of the Bulgarian delegation.  Gabon's foreign minister 
expressed a desire for broader cooperation with Bulgaria, Ganev 
said.  (Sofia BTA in English 2044 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN POSTAL RATES SOUGHT:  On 15 February the National 
Council for Tripartite Cooperation decided to submit to the 
government the softer of the two projects proposed by the Post and 
Telecommunications Committee (PTC) for increasing internal and 
international postal, telegraph, telephone, radio, TV and telematic 
services charges.  According to the project, most postal charges 
will rise by 75 to 300 percent, while some rises will be even 
steeper.  The charges collected at present are insufficient to cover 
the postal system's actual expenses, whose losses exceed the state 
subsidies of 165 million leva (about $4.5 million), the PTC claims. 
The project envisages some concessions for individuals and higher 
charges for companies and organizations. 

   The decision for submitting the project to the Council of 
Ministers was not adopted by consensus.  The main objection raised 
by the social partners who disagreed with the project is that the 
self-financing potential of the system's infrastructure of post 
offices and the Bulgarian Post Bank is not used adequately.  The 
preferences given to the Defense Ministry and the Ministry of the 
Interior also caused discontent.  The government's representative on 
the council,  Mr. Bankov, denied that the new postal charges had 
been calculated without considering the actual incomes of the 
population.  The increased charges takes into account the inflation 
rate projected for this year (45 percent) on which the amount of 
some social benefits is based, Bankov pointed out.  According to 
him, the increase will probably be introduced as of March 1.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1757 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GREEK BUSINESSMEN SEEK NEW CONTACTS:  An international conference 
on Bulgaria's prospects in United Europe was held in the Boyana 
Residence in Sofia on 15 February by the Union of Greek Businessmen 
in Bulgaria and attended by state officials, bankers, and Bulgarian 
and Greek businessmen.  Greek businessmen have made considerable 
efforts to build up their businesses in Bulgaria but we have not yet 
utilized all opportunities, said Panayotis Piroyanos, the unions' 
chairman.  According to Deputy Minister of Trade Velev, 1993 set a 
record in Bulgarian-Greek trade relations.  Bilateral trade reached 
$400 million.  About 400 Bulgarian-Greek joint ventures are 
operating in Bulgaria.  Four Greek banks have opened offices here 
and the joint Bulgarian-Greek bank has been granted a full-service 
license.  Mileti Mladenov, deputy governor of the Bulgarian National 
Bank (BNB) told the conference about the reform in Bulgaria's 
banking system.  (Sofia BTA in English 0906 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   JAPANESE, GERMANS GAIN STAKE IN TESLA HRADEC KRALOVE:  In March, 
the first general meeting of the Tesla Hradec Kralove company will 
take place.  The company was established with the Japanese company 
Y.S. (manufacturer of ceramics), JAIDO, a Japanese fund to support 
exports, and the Czech-American Entrepreneurial Fund.  Tesla owns 97 
percent of this new company.  At the first general meeting, it will 
be decided that the basic capital will be increased to 163 million 
Czech Korunas (Kc): Y.S. will gain 20 percent, and the two financial 
institutions will gain under 20 percent each.  Tesla Hradec Kralove 
will sign an agreement with the German firm Possehl Elektronik on 
establishing a joint venture company with basic capital of Kc16 
million.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 22 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   KLAUS IN MUNICH TO MEET REPRESENTATIVES OF GERMAN FIRMS:  Czech 
Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus arrived in Munich on 23 February for a 
two-day private visit at the invitation of the Allianz Insurance 
Company, the biggest of its kind in Europe, and the BMW automobile 
company.   Klaus is to attend a meeting of representatives of 
leading German companies, banks and societies, including Bayer, 
BASF, Siemens, Hoechst, Bertelsmann, Grundig, Thyssen and Krupp. 
The meeting will also be attended by Hans Peter Stihl, Chairman of 
the Association of German Chambers of Industry and Commerce (DIHT), 
Otto Wolff von Amerongen, chairman of the German Economy Eastern 
Committee, and former German President Walter Scheel.   Klaus is to 
visit the BMW base and meet with its managing board. He is 
accompanied by Czech Economic Minister Karel Dyba, who is to meet 
with his Bavarian counterpart Otto Wiesheu.  They are expected to 
discuss possible extension of Czech-Bavarian Economic cooperation. 
(Prague CTK in English 2101 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRODUCTION FELL, RETAIL SALES INCREASED IN 1993:  The Czech 
Republic's industrial production fell last year by 5.3 percent (in 
constant prices) and construction production by 7.5 percent, while 
retail sales increased by 1 percent, according to preliminary data 
from the Czech Statistical Office (CSU).  Production was worth 
Kc93O.73 billion (about $31 billion) in current prices last year and 
Kc444.62 billion (over $14 billion) in constant prices.  Exports 
(without Slovakia) increased one-fifth last year to Kc297.67 billion 
and imports 2.7 percent to Kc3O1.34 billion.  Exports from Slovakia 
were Kc74.63 billion and imports from there Kc65.02 billion.  The 
Czech Republic had a trade surplus with Slovakia (Kc9.61 billion) 
but a trade deficit with other countries (Kc3.67 billion).  The 
average monthly wage in organizations with 25 or more workers 
increased between December 1992 and December 1993 by 18.6 percent to 
Kc6,665 in industry, by 24.6 percent to Kc7,579 in construction, by 
14.9 percent to Kc5,447 in retail, and by 17.4 percent to Kc6,396 
crowns in transportation.  The number of unemployed increased 
between January 1993 and the same month of 1994 from 158,113 to 
198,837 persons, which represents an increase in the unemployment 
rate from 3.0 to 3.8 percent.  (Prague CTK in English 1944 GMT 23 
Feb 94 AU) 

   COUNTERFEIT GERMAN MARKS SEIZED IN MORAVIA:  A total of 414,000 
German marks worth of forged German banknotes seized in an apartment 
here on Tuesday, 22 February, is probably the largest stash of 
forgeries found in central Europe in the last 10 years, Petr Dvorak 
of the Central Criminal Police said today.  The find of forged notes 
is the largest in Czech history.  In August 1993 a stash of 998 
forged 100-German-mark bills was fotind in the Moravian town of Nove 
Mesto.  The apartment had been rented to a 50-year-old Italian man, 
who was arrested on Monday, 21 February, in Cesky Tesin on the 
Polish border.  The suspect, M.C., was sentenced in absentia in Rome 
last year to 19 years in prison and a 180-million-lira ($107,000) 
fine for cocaine smuggling.  There had been an international warrant 
out for his arrest.  Dvorak said M.C. had admitted intending to use 
the 4,410 forged 100-mark bills to buy precious stones in Russia. 
(Prague CTK in English 1657 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH NATIONALS IN MORAVIA SET UP BUSINESS CONFEDERATION:  The 
main focus of the activities of the confederation of Polish 
entrepreneurs in the Czech Republic is to contribute to the 
development of new commercial and production activities, 
particularly in north Moravia and Silesia.  The confederation began 
operating this month in Cesky Tesin, near the Polish border, and 35 
small and medium-sized businesses have become its members so far. 
Most of the owners are Polish nationals living in the Czech 
Republic, while four of the firms are located in Polish border 
cities.  Confederation President Bronislav Batorek expects 
membership to increase to 300, and possibly include partners from 
other areas in the Czech Republic.  Confederation members will 
cooperate with businesses in Poland, Austria, Slovenia, and also 
with firms located in the Commonwealth of the Independent States 
(CIS).  Confederation activity will include providing up-to-date 
information on production possibilities and arranging joint 
production projects.  (Prague CTK in English 1210 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECHS, SLOVAKS RESUME ARMS SALES:  The Czech and Slovak 
Republics are silently setting their arms industries on their feet, 
the British paper DAILY TELEGRAPH writes on 28 February.  The two 
countries say that it was economic reasons that led them to resume 
arms production that is not so extensive but more competitive, the 
daily states.  In 1990, after halting arms production and exports, 
the unemployment rate in the towns of Martin and Dubnica, both 
central Slovakia, which had relied exclusively on the arms industry, 
reached 25 per cent.  The Czech Republic has established a research, 
development, and production group uniting twelve arms producers and 
aimed at promoting arms exports.  The Slovak Government has created 
the Armex consortium to coordinate production and sales of arms 
systems, the paper reports.  It quotes Slovak representatives as 
saying they intended to increase arms production to 30 to 40 percent 
of its volume in the cold war period.  (Prague CTK in English 1139 
GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN CAPITAL MADE UP 30 PERCENT OF MONEY SUPPLY IN 1993:  The 
influx of foreign capital made up one third of the money supply in 
1993, according to an estimate made by the Ceska Narodni Banka 
(Czech National Bank).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 24 Feb 
94 p 1 AU) 

   EXPORTS INCREASED MORE THAN IMPORTS IN 1993:  Exports from the 
Czech Republic rose by 20 percent against 1992, while imports rose 
only by 2.7 percent.  The most pronounced increase in exports was 
into countries with advanced market economy, particularly into 
Germany, Britain, and Austria.  This is what ensues from the report 
of the Ministry of Industry and Trade.  Exports reached $12.8 
billion, and imports $12.5 billion.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 24 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   ADAMOVSKE STROJIRNY MAKE KC91 MILLION PROFIT:  The audit made by 
Ernst &amp; Young Consulting confirms that Adamovske Strojirny 
(Adamovske Engineering Plants) in Adamov made a profit of Kc91 
million.  This is why the management will propose at the general 
meeting that dividends be paid out.  The production of goods 
exceeded Kc1.3 billion, of which one fifth were pumps and pump 
appliances, and more than thee fifths were printing machines. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 24 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   SURVEY FINDS MOST REFORM SUPPORT IN CZECH REPUBLIC, ALBANIA:  In 
a survey of 16 Central and Eastern European countries conducted by 
the Commission of the European Union and published today, the Czech 
Republic emerges as the country with most popular support for the 
tempo of its reforms.  In terms of overall satisfaction with a 
market economy, however, 71 percent of Albanian citizens expressed 
their approval, the highest result in the survey.  With the growth 
of the economy in that country the financial situation of Albanian 
households has also been improving.  Czechs were somewhat more 
restrained in their praise of capitalist economies, with 51 percent 
signifying approval and 36 percent disapproval.  In Slovakia the 
majority in the survey were displeased with market economy (44 
percent disapproval, 40 percent approval).  The market economy was 
rejected by an absolute majority of polled citizens from the 
Commonwealth of the Independent States, but overall the survey found 
that its support was eroding in other countries as well. 

   Survey results link the current economic difficulties in the 
countries with the drop off in support.  A total of 50 percent of 
Czech Republic's citizens approved of the pace of reform, the most 
of all countries surveyed.  Twenty-one percent considered the reform 
process to be too slow and 18 percent too quick.  In all other 
countries the dominant opinion was that reform was proceeding too 
slowly.  Citizens of the Czech Republic also approved of the pace of 
privatization -- 39 percent considered the pace to be optimal.  It 
was too slow for 36 percent and too fast for 14 percent of Czech 
citizens.  In Poland and Macedonia, however, a majority of citizens 
considered the progress of privatization to be too quick, while in 
other countries a majority saw privatization as proceeding too 
slowly.  The greatest dissatisfaction with the tempo of 
privatization was observed in Slovakia where 54 percent said it was 
too slow, and in Ukraine where 59 percent were dissatisfied with the 
pace of privatization.  (Prague CTK in English 2141 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   SEVENTY-ONE MILLION FOREIGNERS VISITORS IN 1993:  In 1993, 71.1 
million foreign visitors visited the Czech Republic, which is 3.3 
percent more than in 1992.  11.5 million were tourists, mostly from 
Germany, Holland, Italy, Austria, and Poland.  According to the 
Ceska Narodni Banka (Czech National Bank) estimate, the yield from 
tourism will amount to $1.4 billion, which is roughly 24 percent 
more than in 1992.  Foreign currency income from tourism makes up 
approximately 11 percent of Czech exports and 4 percent of gross 
domestic product.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 11 Feb 94 p 3 
AU) 

   CESKE ENERGETICKE ZAVODY READYING NEW BOND ISSUE:  Ceske 
Energeticke Zavody (Czech Electrical Plants) (CEZ) wants to cover 
its capital costs by issuing bonds worth 10 to 11 billion Czech 
korunas (Kc).  In January, CEZ issued bonds worth Kc4 billion.  CEZ 
IS preparING an emission that should be placed at the London 
exchange.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY, BURZOVNI NOVINY Supplement 14 
Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM TO TREAT RADIOACTIVE WASTE WATER:  The U.S. firm Ionics 
Inc. has signed a contract with a Czech state-owned firm to deliver 
$40.2 million worth of technology for purifying radioactive waste 
water.  The contract was signed with the state enterprise Diamo, the 
successor to Czechoslovak Uranium Mines.  A spokesman for the 
Massachusetts-based Ionics said the treatment system would operate 
for two years to clean the water in a large underground reservoir 
where a quantity of sulphuric acid has formed, and which contains 
other poisonous substances and endangers the drinking water supply. 
The spokesman said the process has been so perfected that the 
treated water is clean enough to be returned to rivers, and the 
crystallized impurities are of high enough quality to be used in 
industry.  The firm previously used the technology to clean uranium 
mine water poisoning the Vistula River in Poland.  The Diamo 
contract is the largest in Ionics' history.  (Prague CTK in English 
0810 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   JEZEK ON SECOND COUPON PRIVATIZATION WAVE:  In the second wave of 
coupon privatization more information on enterprises will be 
provided than in the first wave, Tomas Jezek, National Property Fund 
(FNM) chairman, said on Czech Television on 16 February.  One of the 
reasons is the fact that the structure of enterprises entering the 
second wave is more complex, Jezek said.  The second wave comprises 
the enterprises designated for the second-wave of privatization, 
plus enterprises that were not privatized in the first wave, he 
explained, adding that this does not mean they are of lower quality. 
On the contrary, he said that enterprises or their parts not sold 
during the first wave are sometimes of high quality, and, despite 
high demand, have not been sold because of pure technicalities. 
Jezek confirmed that the first round of the second wave should start 
at the beginning of April.  (Prague CTK in English 1418 GMT 16 Feb 
94 AU) 

   STATE WILL FINANCE WATERWAYS:  The government considers public 
transportation via waterways to be a classic case of a useful state 
service, Czech Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus said today after a 
cabinet meeting.  The government even intends to finance such 
transport from the state budget.  For this objective, Kc125 million 
(about $4.1 million) have been provided from this year's state 
budget, he added.  (Prague CTK in English 2255 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH INSURANCE BANK TO LAUNCH PENSION FUND:  The Czech Insurance 
Bank, a joint stock company, is to launch a pension fund that will 
function as an independent joint stock venture, bank spokesman 
Zbysek Stepanek told CTK today.  The bank's decision is a reaction 
to the passing by parliament of a law on pension premiums with state 
participation.  With its current 13 different old age pension 
schemes, the bank has ample experience to draw on, Stepanek said. 
The law requires that 85 percent of the fund's net gains be used 
directly for the benefit of individual contributors, something that 
has been the bank's policy "ever since," Stepanek said, adding that 
profit from the fund's investment policy allows the bank to make 
increased payments each year to offset the effect of inflation 
besides delivering the premiums.  The bank has had a policy of 
paying out an even higher proportion of the gains to the 
contributors than required under the law, Stepanek said.  The law on 
pension premiums allows individual contributors to the schemes to 
obtain payments on top of standard old age pensions.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1504 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSOCIATION OF ENTREPENEURS' POLITICAL AGENDA:  Entrepreneurs 
want more representation in town halls and in the senate.  The 
Association of Entrepreneurs of the Czech Republic (SP) is preparing 
its strategy for the community and senate elections this autumn, 
Chairman Rudolf Baranek told a press conference today.  The SP wants 
to cooperate with the parties of the governing coalition, the Party 
of Entrepreneurs, Farmers, and Tradespeople, the Liberal National 
Social Party (LSNS) and the newly formed initiative for uniting 
right-wing parties.  The problem was that entrepreneurs did not have 
time, SP representatives said.  A partial solution was to find 
pensioners with entrepreneurial ability to run as candidates. 
Baranek said that he was convinced that, as of next year, the tax 
rates on the income of individuals and companies would be under 40 
percent. 

   SP Adviser Jaroslav Vostatek said the government was considering 
making better connections between tax and insurance.  The prepared 
changes to the tax and insurance system are to be negotiated by the 
Tripartite Council for Economic and Social Agreement and put before 
parliament this year.  Among the SP's proposals, which it wants to 
consult with other employer's associations, is the introduction of a 
joint maximum assessment basis for insurance in all branches of 
social insurance for employers and entrepreneurs. 

   The SP also wants to increase the value of tax-deductible 
donations to 3 percent from the tax base, and to introduce a "super 
fast" write-off for material property that would be approximately 
1.3 times faster than the present accelerated write-off, and to 
extend the road tax outside the business sector.  They want income 
tax rates to be lowered for legal persons to a maximum of 37 
percent, and would like to see an ideal rate of 25-30 percent in 
five years' time.  The income tax scale for the income tax of 
physical persons should be made to rise less steeply, with the 
maximum rate being lowered to 38 percent, the association says. 

   The SP will also call for the payment of insurance by the 
employee and the employer to be merged.  The lower rate of value 
added tax should be raised to about 7 percent, with the basic rate 
being lowered.  In five to seven years both rates should be brought 
together at about 15 to 18 percent, they say, so that its total 
weight in the state revenues is not lowered. Deputy Finance Minister 
Jan Klak said recently that lower tax rates for company incomes to 
39 or 38 percent and for individuals to 42 or 41 percent would start 
at the beginning of 1996.  At present, they are 42 and 44 per cent 
respectively.  (Prague CTK in English 1926 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH OFFICIAL VIEWS REGIONAL COOPERATION:  Overcoming the 
recession must be the main objective in the densely-populated areas 
next to the Czech-Polish border, Katowice Regional Administrator 
Wojciech Czech told journalists on 17 February.  Czech is on a 
working visit to the Czech Republic.  Poland currently has 20 non- 
governmental organizations committed to regional cooperation with 
Czech and Slovak business and cultural bodies, Czech said.  A 
meeting of bilateral regional representatives to be held on March 2- 
3 may spur more cooperation, he said, adding that there are plans 
for a commodities exchange to be run jointly by Poland, the Czech 
Republic, and Slovakia, and for an agency -- to be also run jointly 
by the three countries -- to coordinate economic, cultural and 
tourist industry policies. 

   Cooperation may extend to banking, insurance, and consultation, 
Czech said, adding that it might even lead to making the Odra River 
navigable as far as Ostrava, north Moravia; a prerequisite for 
constructing the Odra-Danube and Odra-Vistula canals.  These 
waterways would help solve many difficulties in the transport, 
environment and energy sectors, Czech said.  (Prague CTK in English 
1929 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM SUPPLIES EXTRA GAS DURING COLD SPELL:  The German 
natural gas distributor Ruhrgas supplied 5 million cubic meters of 
gas per day to the Czech Republic on February 15 and 16 and 2 
million cubic meters on 17 February, Antonin Lomecky of the Czech 
Natural Gas Enterprise (CPP) told CTK today.  The supplementary 
supplies of natural gas were ordered because the recent cold spell 
has increased demand to a level that could not be satisfied by 
Russian natural gas supplies. 
   The Russian company Gazprom supplies the Czech Republic with 
almost 7 billion cubic meters of natural gas per year.  The daily 
power input of over 19 million cubic meters is stored in four 
underground storage tanks in Moravia with a total capacity of 1.8 
billion cubic meters.  There is also a storage tank rented from the 
Slovak firm Naf ta of Gbely, where 500 million cubic meters per year 
are stored, Lomecky said.  The daily rate of consumption of natural 
gas in the Czech Republic ranges from 6.5 million cubic meters 
during the summer season to 42.5 million in winter.  When 
temperatures are very low, the volume of gas from Russia is 
insufficient.  That is why a contract was signed with Ruhrgas for 
200 million cubic meters of natural gas to be delivered during the 
first quarter of this year, Lomecky said.  In addition to the 
contract with Ruhrgas, we have other agreements about supplementary 
gas supplies with gas companies in neighboring countries -- VMG of 
Leipzig, Wintershall, and the Slovak Natural Gas Industry 
enterprise, Lomecky explained.  (Prague CTK in English 1257 GMT 18 
Feb 94 AU) 

   ESTEE LAUDER TO PROVIDE SERVICES IN PRAGUE:  The prestigious U.S. 
firm Estee Lauder will its provide services to Prague residents.  On 
the basis of a contract with Prague City Hall, the company Is 
renting commercial space in Zelezna Street for 10 years.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   JAWA TO EXPORT MOTORCYCLES TO ARGENTINA:  Jawa Tynec nad Sazavou 
has concluded a contract for the delivery of 4,500 motorcycles to 
Argentina.  This includes the delivery of 1,500 Chopper-type 
motorcycles.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   JIHLAVA FIRM TO PRODUCE OPTICAL CONNECTORS:  The Optokon Jihlava 
company, in cooperation with the Japanese companies JDS Fitel and 
Seiko Instruments, will manufacture optical connectors.  This state- 
of-the-art technology is earmarked mainly for the digitalization of 
the Czech and Slovak telephone networks.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
18 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   'MARKED' INCREASE IN PRICES IN JANUARY:  The marked increase in 
prices in January was mostly a result of an 8-percent increase in 
prices of services.  Prices of non-food products increased by 1 
percent and prices in public catering by 0.8 percent, despite the 
fact that food prices were almost stagnant, increasing by 0.1 
percent.  The average yearly inflation was 19.8 percent, and 
consumer prices rose by 10.9 percent in January compared with the 
same period last year.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 
94 p 9 AU) 

   COMPENSATION FOR VICTIMS OF 1950'S DISCRIMINATION:  Today, 
Minister of Labor and Social Affairs Jindrich Vodicka told 
journalists of the government decree approved on February 9 
providing compensation for pensioners whose pensions were reduced by 
discriminatory laws of the 1950's.  According to these laws the 
pensions of political prisoners, entrepreneurs, tradespeople, and 
their family members were reduced of taken away.  Although the 
pensions of these people were eventually brought into line, they 
never received compensation for the years during which they 
collected lower pensions.  Therefore the government chose the form 
of a lump sum payment, Vodicka said.  (Prague CTK in English 1756 
GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GAMBRINUS LEADING CZECH BEER PRODUCER IN 1993:  The Gambrinus 
brewery, part of the brewing company Plzenske Pivovary (Pilsner 
Breweries) Plzen, became the country's biggest producer and seller 
of beer last year, said the company's commercial director Mario 
Junek.  Gambrinus produced 1,359,145 hectoliters of beer and sold 
1,182,788 hectoliters.  The total production of Plzenske Pivovary 
last year was 3,063,850 hectoliters of beer.  Gambrinus's share of 
this was 44 percent.  Next came Plzensky Prazdroj with 1,149,453 
hectoliters, a 37.5 percent share.  The cheaper beer Primus, 
introduced onto the market last June, sold 405,000 hectoliters, said 
Junek.  (Prague CTK in English 1822 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH, FRENCH TRANSPORT MINISTERS DISCUSS CSA:  Czech Transport 
Minister Jan Strasky and his French Counterpart Bernard Bosson met 
on 17 February to discuss transport issues of interest to both 
countries.  Reviewing the situation in the Czech Airlines (CSA) and 
the question of the Czech state buying back some of its stock 
previously sold to Air France, the ministers agreed that a rapid 
solution must be found among the airline's three main shareholders, 
a Transport Ministry spokesman told CTK on 18 February.  The 
ministers pledged they would urge the negotiating parties' to adopt 
a constructive and accommodating attitude, the spokesman said. 
(Prague CTK in English 2023 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT PASSES BILL ON LOCAL TAXES, EXCLUDES ALCOHOL:  The 
Czech Parliament today approved an amendment to the law on local 
taxes that will adjust taxation levels on restaurant seating 
capacity, educational resorts, and fees for renting billboard space. 
According to the amendment, the taxes on restaurants and educational 
resorts will be levied only on enterprises in tourist and spa areas. 
In passing the amendment, parliament bypassed a government proposal 
for local taxes on the sale of alcoholic beverages.  According to 
the parliamentary deputies, this kind of tax does not have a raison 
d'etre in the tax system because alcoholic beverages are already 
sufficiently taxed by the consumption tax collected by the central 
government.  (Prague CTK in English 2239 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GALENA OPAVA TO BE BOUGHT BY U.S. COMPANY:  IVAX, a U.S. producer 
of medicinal drugs, will acquire the majority share of Galena Opava, 
which is one of the most important Czech pharmaceutical companies. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH BRITAIN GROWS 45 PERCENT:  Trade between Britain and 
the Czech Republic grew 45 percent, reaching over 500 million pounds 
sterling, Britain's central statistical office told CTK on Monday, 
21 February.  British firms sold the Czechs 287 million pounds worth 
of goods -- office equipment and supplies and electrical equipment 
accounting for the largest share, while Czech producers sold goods 
worth 245 million pounds in Britain.  Leading Czech goods included 
Skoda-produced cars -- 10,000 were sold in the United Kingdom last 
year -- followed by non-ferrous metal products and electrical 
machinery ana equipment.  About 2.5 million pounds worth of Czech 
beer was sold in Britain as well.  European Union import quotas have 
meant little problems for Czech exporters, British businessmen told 
CTK in London.  (Prague CTK in English 1638 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   SKODA PLZEN TO SELL TROLLEYS TO U.S. CITY:  Skoda Plzen has 
bought 47 percent of the equity of Electric Transit International, 
and through this U.S. company it will sell 61 Skoda 14-Tr trolley- 
buses to the city of Dayton, Ohio.  This information was provided by 
the Skoda spokesman in Plzen on 20 February.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 21 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA TO RECOGNIZE ONLY SOME CZECH CUSTOMS CERTIFICATES: 
Slovakia has agreed on mutual recognition of national certificates 
required for import only for goods where the identical standards are 
in effect on both sides of the Czech-Slovak border.  Slovakia thus 
rejected the Czech proposal of mutual recognition of decisions and 
certificates for all commodities regardless of differences in state 
norms.  The decision was reached at a meeting of representatives of 
both the Czech Republic and Slovakia today, led by Michal Tosovsky 
and Lubomir Sutek, chairmen of the National Offices for Technical 
Normalization, Metrology, and State Testing. 

   Regarding food products, as of April 1, the Slovak Agricultural 
and Food Inspectorate will issue a single certificate valid for 
Slovakia.  The decisions taken by the Czech authorities will form 
the basis of the issuing of the certificate.  Until 31 March, the 
Slovak customs authorities will require the same documents they 
required before 11 February, when the Slovak customs authorities 
announced that food products without a Slovak quality certificate 
would not be allowed to enter the country.  (Prague CTK in English 
2129 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECHS TO INSIST ON DOMESTIC CONTENT FOR SKODA CARS:  During the 
upcoming talks on supplements to the contract between carmaker Skoda 
of Mlada Boleslav and Volkswagen, Czech negotiators will insist that 
Skoda be not turned into a mere assembly plant, Tomas Jezek, 
chairman of the National Property Fund said today.  He added that 
the main parts of Skoda-produced vehicles, such as the motor and 
transmission, should be produced in the Czech Republic.  This was 
decided by Czech representatives at a meeting at the Ministry of 
Trade and Industry on Monday, 21 February, Jezek said.  The Czechs 
agreed on their approach and are now "well prepared for the 
negotiations," Trade and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy added. 

   An analysis of the issue, presented at Monday's meeting, clearly 
specified the developmental goals that are to be part of the 
supplements to the contract, Dlouhy said.  Volkswagen should support 
the sale of 30 percent of Skoda's shares, and help resolve 
environmental problems and matters regarding guarantees, Dlouhy 
reported.  The State-owned Prisko company, that owns 69 percent of 
Skoda's shares, will not be discussed during the forthcoming 
negotiations, Jezek stated.  The FNM's stand on Prisko could differ 
from the Ministry's only in the question of how to terminate it, he 
added.  Prisko, that was established to settle restitution and 
environmental problems and to take care of Skoda's loans and 
liabilities, was meant to be terminated at a certain point, Jezek 
said.  (Prague CTK in English 2053 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   NO TALKS 'SO FAR' ON T-72 PARTS TO IRAN:  Industry and Trade 
Minister Vladimir Dlouhy told CTK on 22 February that, so far, no 
one has discussed the possibility of exporting spare parts for 
Czech-made T-72 tanks to Iran.  The current issue of the political 
weekly RESPEKT reports that, in January, Jan Vlcek, director of the 
RDP Group arms maker consortium, wrote to Dlouhy to ask for his help 
in obtaining a license to export arms to Iran.  According to 
RESPEKT, Dlouhy sent Vlcek's letter to the Defense, Interior, and 
Foreign Ministries and is still awaiting replies before making final 
comments.  The letter also mentioned financial advantages for the 
Czech Republic in such a deal.  The project would last for five 
years and bring in about $500 million, an amount that would help 
stagnant arms makers supply components for the T-72.  This could 
also fundamentally influence the employment situation, especially in 
the Moravian region, Vlcek said in his letter.  It would also 
activate the arms industry in general and open the way to 
cooperation between Czech manufacturers and those in NATO countries. 
(Prague CTK in English 1724 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   KLAUS, TOSOVSKY DISAGREE ON KORUNA CONVERTIBILITY:  The debate on 
when the Czech koruna should become convertible has divided even 
those economists and politicians who formerly held similar views, 
MLADA FRONTA DNES Editor Petr Wawrosz writes in the weekly magazine 
REFLEX in an article called "Duel:  The Convertibility of the 
Koruna."  There is a duel between Czech Premier Vaclav Klaus, who 
does not consider full convertibility to be necessary yet, and 
National Bank Governor Josef Tosovsky, who believes that it could be 
introduced as early as next year.One thing is certain, Wawrosz says. 
Convertibility, like privatization and ttade liberalization is one 
of the basic goals of Czech reform.  Logically it ties in with the 
steps that have already been taken, and it is therefore no surprise 
that it is now beginning to receive more attention.  The 
introduction of convertibility has to precede the Czech Republic's 
entrance into the European Union, being a necessary condition of 
acceptance, without which the Czechs have no claim on a United 
Europe, he says. 

   On the other hand, Czech people and firms will be wanting to make 
more use of foreign financial institutions.  Capital will flow 
freely and, understandably, most of it will head for the most 
attractive conditions and opportunities.  Naturally, the koruna's 
exchange rate will depend much more on the rate of other currencies, 
above all the German mark and the U.S. dollar, and on stability in 
the Czech Republic and in the surrounding countries.  Speaking of 
stability inflation should be mentioned, which is higher in the 
Czech Republic than in the West.  It would be ideal, Wawrosz says, 
if inflation did not exceed 6 percent per after convertibility in 
introduced, which is a situation which can be achieved within two 
years, the magazine believes.  Greater movement of capital 
necessarily brings greater foreign competition.  If the Czechs are 
not to keep up with much greater foreign competition, convertibility 
will do more harm than good, he believes.  (Prague CTK in English 
1426 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY INFLATION 1.83 PERCENT:  Prices in the Czech Republic 
rose 1.83 percent in January.  The increase in prices for rented 
housing, petrol, and transportation accounted for 1.03 percent, 
Czech Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus said on 10 February.  (Prague CTK 
in English 2025 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   NON-GOVERNMENT ORGANIZATIONS TO RECEIVE PHARE SUPPORT:  More than 
$10 million will be set aside from the European Union's (EU) PHARE 
program to support non-government organizations in Central and 
Eastern Europe and in the states of the former Soviet Union, 
representatives of a delegation from the EU commission said 10 
February.  The project is aimed at granting support to those 
organizations that participate in the development of science and 
education through a variety of projects.  The program is divided 
into macro-and microprojects.  Macroprojects can obtain support from 
$12,000 to $165,000.  The condition is that more than one post- 
communist country and at least two non-government organizations from 
EU countries participate in them.  Microprojects are carried out 
only in one country and non-government organizations can receive 
from $3,500 to 12,000.  PHARE's support has thus far concentrated 
especially on health care, environmental protection, human rights 
and similar purposes.  Central European non-government organizations 
have thus far obtained 11 million Czech korunas ($366,000) from 
PHARE.  (Prague CTK in English 2026 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARTICIPATION IN INDIAN GAS PIPELINE PROJECT SOUGHT:  The Czech 
Republic wants to participate in the construction of an extensive 
gas pipeline network that would stretch from Iran and Oman to India 
and neighboring states, Czech Deputy Minister of Industry and Trade 
Radomir Sabela said on 10 February.  Sabela, who is accompanying 
Czech President Vaclav Havel on his current visit to India and 
Thailand, said the Czech Republic intends to enter a public tender 
to be announced by the Indian government.  The pipeline is expected 
to start operating in 1998.  If we succeed in taking part in the 
construction of the gas pipeline, it would be a big opportunity for 
Czech industry, Sabela said.  The project's value is estimated at 
several billion U.S. dollars, and a loan may be granted by the World 
Bank or the Asian Development Bank (ADB), Sabela added. 

   Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik, who is also accompanying Havel, 
said in reference to the financing of Czech investments in India 
that India had significantly multiplied its foreign currency 
reserves, which now total about $14 billion.  Moreover, a number of 
projects will probably be financed by the World Bank or the ADB. 
India could obtain also cheap long-term loans, according to 
Kocarnik.  Investments by our side, for instance through a 
consortium of banks, should not be ruled out either, Kocarnik said. 
He added that the Czech Republic is interested in becoming an ADB 
member. 

   Sabela told journalists that the construction of an oil 
derivatives pipeline in north-western India, in which Czech firms 
will participate, is expected to start by February 17 at the latest. 
The contract for building the pipeline, valued at $356 million, was 
signed by the Czech Firm Skodaexport last year.  Havel called it the 
Czech Republic's largest investment abroad.  Sabela also spoke of 
Czech-Indian cooperation in the aviation industry.  In the civilian 
area we have delivered two L-410 planes (from Let Kunovice) and 
another two are on the way, he said.  L-410 can take 17 passengers. 
The planes have been bought by an Indian private firm that is 
interested also in L-610 model planes that can take about 40 people. 
The Czech delegation is to discuss specific forms of military 
cooperation with the Indian Minister of Defense.  (CTK in English 
2037 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   INTENT OF SLOVAK FOOD REGULATIONS QUESTIONED:  Slovakia's 
decision to require certificates of quality for food products is a 
pretext for reducing food imports, National Property Fund Chairman 
Tomas Jezek said 11 February.  It is an excuse to achieve the effect 
that would be attained directly by imposing duty on the goods, Jezek 
said.  It is a move that is not allowed under the customs agreement 
between the Czech and Slovak Republics, he added.  Jezek said he 
believed the Customs Union Council would have to meet because of the 
decision.  It is a way of restricting imports without breaking the 
customs agreement, he explained.  Jezek mentioned the protection of 
domestic producers and Slovakia's clearing account deficit with the 
Czech Republic as reasons for the step.  Devaluation of the Slovak 
koruna would be a direct solution, but the Slovak Government fears 
it for political reasons, Jezek said.  A partial list of the goods 
requiring a quality certificate by either the Health Ministry or the 
Agriculture and Food Inspection Authority for imports includes beer, 
dairy products, tea, rice, most dry legumes, sunflower and olive 
oil, dried and salted fish, some spices, buckwheat and millet. 
(Prague CTK in English 2143 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAK CERTIFICATE REQUIREMENT JAMS BORDER CROSSINGS:  A total of 
12 trucks with food leaving the Czech Republic for Slovakia were not 
allowed to enter the country by the Slovak Customs Office as they 
did not have certificates from the Slovak Agriculture and Food 
Inspection Authority or the Slovak Health Ministry.  The Slovak 
Government adopted a decision with effect since February 11 whereby 
food products without a certificate for their quality would not be 
allowed to enter the country. 

   Earlier this month Slovak Finance Minister Julius Toth said that 
a solution to the current trade deficit in relation to the Czech 
Republic should be looked for elsewhere, the introduction of an 
import surcharge is as yet out of the question.  The introduction -- 
in two stages -- of special border controls for imported goods is 
being considered.  First food control should be implemented.  During 
the second stage control will be expanded to cover all sorts of 
goods.  The time period of the second stage has not yet been 
specified. 

   Some Czech-Slovak border crossings were virtually blocked to cars 
and railway carriages today.  Some drivers did not know about the 
change.  The move will largely affect Moravian exporters who supply 
the Slovak cross-border area with food every day, a local customs 
official said, adding that some of them learnt about the move only 
from the radio.  (Prague CTK in English 1836 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAK CUSTOMS MEASURE BIG MISTAKE, DLOUHY SAYS:  Thursday's 
decision of the Slovak Customs Authorities not to allow food 
products without a quality certificate to enter the country is the 
first major mistake in the functioning of the Czech-Slovak Customs 
Union, Trade and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy said 11 February. 
Dlouhy said he would ask for the Customs Union Council to be called. 
Slovakia was attempting to protect the balance of payments by 
misusing technical obstacles to trade in a situation where such 
steps were indefensible, he said.  The Czech Republic was informed 
of the measure only 24 hours before it came into effect, he said. 
Slovakia had merely carried out its formal obligations, but usually 
in similar cases the supplier is given more time to adapt to the new 
conditions, Dlouhy said.  The Customs Union Agreement allows either 
country to take such a measure if it is essential for the protection 
of life or health of people, animals or plants, he pointed out, but 
in his view this was not the case.  The measure is directed against 
all countries, not just the Czech Republic, he added.  (Prague CTK 
in English 1232 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   KLAUS ASKS MECIAR TO DROP NEW REGULATION:  Czech Prime Minister 
Vaclav Klaus telephoned Slovak Prime Minister Vladimir Meciar to ask 
Slovakia to abandon its requirement that all imported food products 
carry a quality certificate, Klaus said on 11 February today after 
the cabinet had debated the measure.  He said Meciar promised him 
the Slovak Government would seriously consider Klaus's request. 
(Prague CTK in English 1719 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH-UKRAINIAN JOINT VENTURE:  The IVEGOTOV company is a new 
Czech-Ukrainian joint venture established between Jihospol 
Strakonice and entrepreneur Alexander Dolisny.  The company will be 
engaged in trading activity and will run the Slavia chain of 
restaurants.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   MANN, HUMMEL ACQUIRES 60 PERCENT OF PAPER MILL:  Europe's largest 
producer of car filters, Mann and Hummel GmbH of Germany, has 
acquired 60 percent of Jihlavske Papirny (South Moravian Paper 
Mills) in Pribyslavice.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Feb 
94 p 6 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RATE 3.78 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  On January 31, Czech 
job centers registered 198,837 job seekers, amounting to a 3.78- 
percent unemployment rate, the highest since February 1992, Ota 
Veverka, spokesman of the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs, said 
11 February.  The lowest unemployment was as traditionally in 
Prague, at 0.36 percent, while the number of jobs offered -- 14,184 
-- was the highest.  (Prague CTK in English 1721 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   EXPORTS TO EU DOWN 22.3 PERCENT IN 1993:  Despite the favorable 
effects of the association agreement with the European Union (EU), 
Hungary's exports to the EU fell by 22.3 percent last year as 
compared to the overall 16.8 percent decline in Hungarian exports, 
figures published by the Ministry of International Economic 
Relations show.  Hungary's exports to EU countries totalled $4,145.7 
million in 1993 and the proportion of total exports going to the EU 
fell from 49.8 percent in 1992 to 46.5 percent last year.  Although 
imports from the EU grew by 6.5 percent, this was less than the 
overall 13.2 percent increase in imports.  As a result, the share of 
EU products in total Hungarian imports fell from 42.8 percent in 
1992 to 40.2 percent last year.  Portugal was the only EU member 
country to take more Hungarian exports, with a 12 percent ($0.7 
million) increase last year.  With the exception of Britain, imports 
from all EU countries increased last year.  The largest fall in 
exports was registered with Spain (down 48.5 percent to $65.3 
million) although imports from Spain rose 54.4 percent to $105.6 
million.  Imports from Ireland showed the largest increase (64.9 
percent to $26.4 million) and Hungarian exports showed the lowest 
fall (1.1 percent to $4.1 million).  Exports to Germany, Hungary's 
main trading partner, fell 20 percent to $2,376 million while 
imports rose by 4 percent to $2,713.1 million last year.  Exports to 
Italy, Hungary's second largest EU trade partner, fell 30.1 percent 
to $713.5 million while imports rose 7.5 percent to $750.3 million. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1238 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   BUSINESS TAKES OUT MORE FOREX LOANS IN 1993:  Hungarian 
businesses took more loans from abroad last year than from Hungarian 
commercial banks, allocated most of their free assets in foreign 
exchange, and did not increase forint deposits significantly, the 
latest monthly report of the Hungarian National Bank shows.  The net 
stock of credits of the business sector fell slightly last year, 
from 251.6 billion forints (HUF) to HUF 240.1 billion, although part 
of the companies' stock of loans were drawn away from banks in debt 
and credit consolidation.  In 1993 the stock of gross bank loans of 
businesses decreased by HUF 15 billion as a result of credit 
consolidation and by an additional HUF 30-42 billion in debt 
consolidation.  As a result, the real stock of gross bank loans of 
businesses increased last year by HUF 105-117 billion.  Leaving out 
the effects of credit and debt consolidation, the stock of loans 
increased by HUF 59.5 billion to HUF 763.5 billion.  Consolidation 
did not affect the stock of company foreign exchange deposits, which 
grew by the equivalent of HUF 4.5 billion last year to HUF 64.7 
billion. 

   The increase in forint terms includes a total 15 percent 
devaluation of the forint over the year.  Within the HUF 59.5 
billion increase, the stock of investment loans dropped by HUF 16.8 
billion, to HUF 115.2 billion.  Taking consolidation into account, 
the drop is around HUF 6.4-7.9 billion.  The stock of working 
capital loans increased by HUF 56.4 billion last year, as opposed to 
a HUF 19 billion drop in the previous year (without consolidation). 
The real increase, including credit and debt consolidation, was 
around HUF 92-102 billion.  The stock of net direct foreign loans of 
the business sector rose by $800 million in 1993 while the total 
stock reached HUF 1.8 billion.  Seventy percent of the total loans 
were of more than one year's maturity, 22 percent were granted by 
foreign parent companies to subsidiaries in Hungary, 49 percent were 
for less than $10 million, and 30 percent were for more than $50 
million. 

   Deposits of businesses grew by HUF 71 billion in 1993, HUF 66 
billion of which occurred in the last 10 days of the year.  HUF 63 
billion of the total increase was in the stock of foreign exchange 
deposits, although the forint devaluation must also be taken into 
account.  Within the growth of foreign exchange deposits HUF 42 
billion was the result of the privatization of MATAV.  The forint 
deposits of businesses grew by only HUF 8 billion last year. Of 
this, the stock of fixed forint deposits dropped by HUF 7 billion 
while the deposits on current accounts grew by HUF 15 billion. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1716 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMY IN 1993:  The volume of industrial production, excluding 
seasonal variations, fell by 3.7 percent in December, while retail 
sales increased by 2.6 percent, the Central Statistical Office 
reports.  Industrial producer prices rose by 0.8 percent, domestic 
producer prices by 0.4 percent and retail prices by 1.3 percent in 
December.  Industrial production showed a 4 percent increase over 
the whole of 1993, while agricultural production fell by 6 percent, 
with livestock breeding 9 percent and plant cultivation 4 percent 
down on 1992.  Energy consumption was 1 percent higher in 1993 than 
in the preceding year.  Within this, industrial energy consumption 
dropped by 1 percent, and that of households and public services 
rose by 2.7 percent.  There was a decrease in consumption of coal, 
nuclear energy, and imported electricity, but more oil and gas were 
used.  Fifty-two percent of energy resources were imported, as 
compared to 49 percent in 1992.  Following a 1.6 percent drop in 
1992, total investment in 1993 remained stable at 626 billion 
forints, according to preliminary data.  Annual consumer inflation 
last year was 22.5 percent, against 23 percent in 1992 and 35 
percent in 1991.  Both industrial producer prices and domestic 
wholesale prices rose by 11 percent in 1993, with agricultural 
producer and purchase prices going up by 25 percent, following a 9 
percent rise in 1992.  Wages increased by 18 percent last year, but 
fell in real terms by 3 to 4 percent.  Average gross salaries were 
22 percent higher and net salaries 18 percent higher than a year 
before.  The retail trade volume was about the same as in the 
previous year.  Private savings increased more than in 1992. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0720 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   BUDGET SURPLUS 8.5 BILLION FORINTS AT END OF JANUARY:  Hungary's 
state budget showed a surplus of 8.5 billion forints (HUF) at the 
end of January, the Finance Ministry announced.  Revenue amounted to 
HUF 127 billion, while expenditure stood at HUF 118.5 billion.  Net 
budget revenue from businesses amounted to HUF 25 billion, of the 
HUF 200.2 billion targeted for the whole year.  Corporate tax 
payments amounted to HUF 5.8 billion in the first month.  Customs 
duties and import-related revenue to the state budget amounted to 
more than HUF 11.6 billion at the end of January, 11.9 percent of 
the full year target.  Budget subsidies to businesses amounted to 
HUF 5.57 billion in January.  Budget revenue from consumption 
related taxes amounted to HUF 43.754 billion in the first month of 
the year.  The budget spent HUF 2.5 billion on consumer price 
subsidies.  The state budget received HUF 21.75 billion in taxes and 
other payments from individuals in the first month.  Income tax 
payments of HUF 20 billion went to the central budget in January. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1235 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   TALKS OVER EXTENSION OF JAPANESE CREDIT LINE:  Commercial banks 
have made commitments to disburse the entire 23 billion forints in 
credit granted equally by Eximbank of Japan and the Hungarian 
National Bank (MNB), although the full amount has not yet been drawn 
from the central bank.  The MNB is currently negotiating with 
Eximbank for opening up a further credit line with similar 
conditions and hopes to sign an agreement in the first half of this 
year.  The commercial banks said that there was demand for an amount 
at least equivalent to the previous credit line.  The MNB signed an 
agreement with Eximbank in December 1992 on a 13 billion Japanese 
yen credit line, which had been granted by the Japanese government 
to promote small and medium-sized Hungarian businesses.  The central 
bank in turn contributed an equal amount.  (Budapest MTI in English 
0745 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   JAPANESE BANK LENDS DM 85 MILLION TO TELECOM:  Hungarian Telecom 
(MATAV) is getting an 85 million German marks (DM) (5 billion 
forints) loan from Japan's Eximbank.  As announced in Tokyo, 
depending on changes in currency exchange rates, the sum might rise 
to 6.2 billion Japanese yen, which is about 6 billion forints.  This 
is the first large loan this banking institute, with the Japanese 
Government, has given to a Central European private firm.  The 
Hungarian Ministry of Finance guaranteed repayment underwriting the 
loan.  This is the first European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD) and Japanese Eximbank jointly funded project.  A 
general agreement was reached by the two banking institutes two 
years ago, followed by negotiations starting last April.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1729 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   FREE TRADE AGREEMENT WITH FINLAND COMES INTO FORCE:  The Finland- 
Hungary free trade agreement and the related agricultural protocol 
came into effect on 1 March.  Hungary signed agreements on the free 
trade of industrial products and bilateral protocols on agricultural 
trade with all members of the European Free Trade Association (EFTA) 
-- including Finland -- in Geneva on March 29, 1993.  Due to the 
protraction of the ratification process in the Finnish Parliament, 
the Hungarian-Finnish agreements came into effect only on 1 March. 
Hungarian-Finnish trade of industrial goods has been liberalized 
since 1974.  The new free trade agreement has extended the scope of 
duty-free commodities to some important export items of Hungarian 
agriculture, including meat and meat products, honey, fresh, frozen 
and preserved vegetables, fruit and fruit juice.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1707 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNITED STATES ORDERS -102 IKARUS BUSES:  Hungary's Ikarus Co. has 
received an order from Miami for 102 articulated buses.  The first 
30 buses will be made by the company's Budapest plant, with the rest 
to be produced and sold to America by the Budapest-based Hungarian- 
U.S. joint venture NABI (Nord American Bus Industria).  Ikarus has 
been selling buses to the United States for 15 years (since 1988) 
via Ikarus-USA, which was formerly a subsidiary of UCBC, a transport 
and small-lorry manufacturer.  The venture turned out buses suited 
to American demands -- type 400 -- with U.S. main components and a 
Hungarian chassis and body.  Over 400 buses made this way are 
currently running in Houston, San Diego, and Pittsburg.  Besides the 
United States, NABI will sell buses to Canada and Mexico.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1338 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   GASOLINE PRICES UP, DIESEL PRICES DOWN:  As of 1 March, petrol 
will cost 1 forint more and diesel oil four forints less per liter 
at pump-stations run by Hungary's oil and gas trust (MOL).  The 
petrol price rise follows oil price increases on international 
markets and the 2.6 percent devaluation of the forint on 16 
February.  The price of diesel will be lowered because MOL has extra 
stocks on hand.  MOL accounts for some 30 percent of domestic car- 
fuel supply.  Other fuel companies have not yet indicated they will 
to join MOL's rate adjustment.  However, they usually follow the 
same price policy.  (Budapest MTI in English 1205 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   COMPENSATION TO FOREIGN CITIZENS:  Of the 120 billion forints 
(HUF) nominal value of compensation coupons so far issued, foreign 
citizens have received 16.4 billion forints, the Compensation Office 
reported.  The Office estimates that the total value of compensation 
coupons to be granted to foreign citizens will eventually be HUF 21 
billion, which represents 15 percent of the total value of 
compensation coupons to be issued.  The original period for 
applications for compensation has been extended until 15 March.  The 
office estimates that the extension will involve the issue of a 
further HUF 3 billion worth of compensation coupons.  Under the 
First Law on Compensation, passed in 1991, those who lost property 
after 8 June, 1949 receive partial compensation.  The Second Law 
deals with compensation for loss of property between 1 May, 1939 and 
8 June, 1949.  The Third Law covers compensation for those 
persecuted for political reasons and this is the law under which the 
bulk of compensation to foreign citizens falls.  The largest value 
of compensation coupons (HUF 6.3 billion) has gone to Romanian 
citizens.  German citizens have received coupons worth HUF 3 
billion, and US citizens HUF 1.4 billion.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1437 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RATE 12.8 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  There were about 
9,000 more registered unemployed at the end of January than a month 
earlier, to bring the total number of people on the dole to 641,000, 
the National Labor Centre said.  The proportion between the 
unemployed and the economically active population -- that is the 
unemployment rate -- was 12.8 percent nationally.  There are major 
differences in the unemployment rate per region:  In the northern 
Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen county it is 21.1 percent, in Szabolcs-Szatmar- 
Bereg county 20.6, and in Nograd county 19.1 percent.  At the same 
time, it is 6.3 percent in Budapest, 8.8 percent in the western 
Gyor-Sopron-Moson county, and 9.3 percent in Pest county.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 0726 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   EXPORTS DOWN 16.8 PERCENT IN 1993:  Exports amounted to $8.907 
billion last year, down 16.8 percent on 1992, Minister of 
International Economic Relations Bela Kadar said.  Imports totalled 
$12.530 billion, but this sum includes $713 million worth of MiG 
fighter planes given by Russia to Hungary in partial repayment of 
trade debts accumulated in rubles before the dissolution of the 
Council for Mutual Economic Assistance (CEMA).  When the fighter 
planes are deducted, imports total $11.817 billion, 6.8 percent up 
on the previous year. 

   Government moves made last September to boost exports and improve 
the trade balance resulted in a tangible rise in exports in the 
fourth quarter of last year.  While the monthly average of exports 
in the first nine months was $716 million, it rose to $820 million 
for the last three months of the year and to $866 million in 
December.  Customs statistics showed a trade deficit of $3.623 
billion for last year, including the import of the MiG fighters. 
The trade deficit amounted to $2.910 billion, not including the 
import of MiG fighters, and to $2.280 billion when other import 
items that do not appear in the current account were deducted. 
Exports of agricultural goods and food products fell by 26.6 
percent, while exports of consumer goods fell by 20 percent.  The 
export of products manufactured on commission fell $758 million, 
exports of grain were down $384 million, and food exports were $246 
million less than in 1992.  The latter three items made up 77 
percent of the decrease in exports last year. 

   Ninety percent of the decrease in exports was in sales to 
industrialized countries.  Western Europe continued to suffer from 
the recession, with 64 to 65 percent of Hungary's exports going to 
countries like Germany, Austria, Italy, France, and the Benelux 
countries.  The currencies of all of these countries depreciated 
against the dollar last year.  Exports decreased by about 10 percent 
in volume terms when adjustments were made in connection with the 
appreciation of the dollar.  Exports to former socialist countries 
made up 26 percent of total exports last year, while imports from 
these countries made up 29 percent of the total.  Exports to the 
United States rose by 9 percent, exports to Poland were up 12 
percent, exports to Slovenia were up 30 percent, and exports to the 
Czech Republic and Slovakia were each up 2 percent.  Figures for 
trade with Poland, the Czech Republic, and Slovakia in the second 
half of 1993 had already begun to show the effect of the free trade 
agreement signed early last year that abolished customs duties and 
import quotas for 50 percent of industrial goods. 

   Imports of consumer goods from the former socialist countries 
rose by 59 percent within an overall increase of 7 percent.  This 
compares to a 2 percent rise in imports of consumer goods from 
industrialized countries.  Agricultural exports fell by $700 million 
compared to the previous year, while imports rose by $100 million. 
Half the increase was accounted for by products that were not in 
direct competition with Hungarian produce, such as tropical and 
citrus fruit.  Exports of machinery fell by 3 percent, while imports 
rose by 15.1 percent, excluding the MiG-fighter planes but including 
$150 million worth of Boeing aircraft bought by the Hungarian 
airline, MALEV.  The decline in the import of investment goods 
ceased.  (Budapest MTI in English 1159 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASED TRADE WITH VISEGRAD COUNTRIES:  Hungarian sales to 
Poland increased by 12 percent last year, with 2 percent export 
growth with the Czech Republic and Slovakia.  Hungary's sales to the 
other Visegrad states -- Czech Republic, Poland, Slovakia -- rose 
from 4 percent to 4.7 percent as a ratio of its total exports in 
1993.  In the same year, imports from these countries fell from 5.9 
percent to 4.7 percent of the total.  Thanks to Central European 
Free Trade Area (CEFTA) customs preferences, Hungary's 1993 exports 
to Poland grew by $17 million to $160 million, and included more 
buses, bus parts, instruments, and medicines than a year before. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0954 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   FORINT RATE CHANGES IN LAST 12 MONTHS:  Over the last 12 months, 
the forint lost 26.8 percent on the Swiss franc and stayed stable 
against the Spanish peseta, a Hungarian National Bank summary 
published after the 2.6 percent devaluation of the Hungarian 
currency on February 16 shows.  Accordingly, the forint lost 24 
percent on the British pound and 20 percent on the U.S. dollar in 
one year.  Its loss on the German mark, decisive for Hungarian 
foreign trade, was "merely" 15 percent, the same as against the 
Austrian schilling.  The forint lost 10.6 percent of its value 
against the Italian lira, and 6.4 percent against the Greek drachma. 
There were six forint devaluations, by a total of 17 percent, 
between February 16, 1993 and February 16, 1994.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1359 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT PLANS TO SET UP EXIMBANK:  The government proposes 
separating export-related banking and insurer's functions.  The 
cabinet decided to submit a bill on setting up the Hungarian Export- 
Import Bank Co. and the Hungarian Export Credit Insurance Co. to 
Parliament for urgent discussion.  Under the bill, Eximbank will be 
in charge of export financing and guaranteeing, with the Export 
Credit Insurance Company insuring export loans.  So far, both 
functions have been fulfilled by the Export Guarantee Insurance Co., 
whose 2 billion forints equity is to be divided between the two 
wholly state-owned joint-stock companies.  (Budapest MTI in English 
0736 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTORS PREFER HUNGARY, CZECH REPUBLIC:  Hungary and 
the Czech Republic have been the most popular East European venues 
for foreign investors since political changes in 1990, according to 
Vienna's Economic Research Institute.  The survey shows that over 
the past four years, considerably more foreign capital has entered 
these two countries than, for example, Greece, a European Union 
member.  They owe their attraction to political and economic 
stability, as well as rapid privatization of state assets.  Foreign 
investments in Hungary were worth $5 billion over the past three 
years.  Last year's privatization of 30 percent of the Hungarian 
Telecommunications Co.  (MATAV), led by Deutsche Telekom, earned the 
central budget 800 million forints.  Official figures indicate the 
Czech Republic has received $2.3 billion in foreign investment since 
the collapse of communist rule.  (Budapest MTI in English 1137 GMT 
23 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY PERSONAL SAVINGS DATA: 

             Personal Savings (in billion Forints) 

                             1993               1994 

                        Jan 1   Jan 31    Jan 1   Jan 31(x) 
Households              269.6   263.6     319.7   307.1 
Bank Deposits           582.4   598.2     694.0   702.2 
   Within Which: 
  Forint Deposit       429.8    437.4     489.4    488.6 
 Accumulated Interest  ---        4.0     ---        5.0 
  Foreign Currency     152.6    156.8     204.6    210.6 
Bank Securities        190.9    194.2     202.7    208.1 

Total                1,042.9  1,056.0   1,216.4  1,217.4 

Non-Bank Securities(xx) 87.0     87.2     116.1    126.3 
Insurance Premiums      41.3     43.3      51.0     51.0 

Total                1,171.2  1,186.5   1,383.5  1,394.7 
Personal Loans         252.3    255.1     284.0    289.0 
Net Savings            918.9    931.4   1,099.5  1,105.6 



(x) -- preliminary figures (xx) -- estimated 
Source:  Hungarian National Bank 

(Budapest MTI in English 1218 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GYOR AUDI PLANT TO MAKE 1,000 ENGINES PER DAY:  Audi engines 
assembled by Audi's wholly owned Hungarian subsidiary, Audi-Hungaria 
Motors Kf t, are currently being tested in Germany, with the company 
to begin producing 1,000 engines a day in the second half of this 
year.  Audi-Hungaria is based in Gyor (western Hungary).  The Gyor 
plant takes partly finished cylinder heads and overhead camshaf ts 
from Germany, which are then worked on further.  Other parts arrive 
ready made.  Audi is to invest a total of DM9OO million in the Gyor 
plant, with the factory expected to be turning out 2,000 to 2,500 
engines a day by 1998.  Audi will have invested DM3OO million in the 
first stage of development, which is to be completed this summer. 

   In the third stage [as received] of the project, to be carried 
out between 1996 and 1998, other engine parts will also be finished 
in the Gyor factory.  Audi has failed to find a Hungarian aluminum 
plant that is able to produce aluminum parts of the required 
quality, and Audi A.G. is now seeking a company from among its 
suppliers which is prepared to build a new plant near the Gyor 
factory.  (Budapest MTI in English 0743 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY GAS CONSUMPTION:  Gas consumption this January amounted 
to 1.35 million cubic meters, about 70,000 cubic meters down on 
January 1993 and last December, when 1.42 million cubic meters were 
used per month, the Hungarian Oil and Gas Trust (MOL) reports.  Half 
of the gas quantity used in January -- about 700,000 cubic meters -- 
were supplied by gas distributors.  Some 200,000 cubic meters 
fuelled the power stations of the Hungarian Villamos (electricity) 
Works, and over 40,000 cubic meters were used by the Budapest Gas 
Works and the chemical industry together.  Of the 1.35 million cubic 
meters, 400,000 came from stores, another 400,000 was imported, and 
550,000 produced domestically.  A year ago, domestic gas production 
was 650,000 cubic meters, imports were some 420,000 and the 
consumption of stored gas was about the same as this year. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0725 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   MALEV TO LEASE BOEING 737-300:  The board of MALEV Hungarian 
airlines decided to lease a Boeing 737-300 for three years from the 
Los Angeles-based leasing company ILFC.  The leasing contract is 
expected to be signed at the beginning of March and the initial 
three-year lease period may be extended by a further two years. 
MALEV plans to accelerate the modernization of its aircraft through 
the phasing out of Tupolevs and the leasing of more modern planes. 
MALEV's financial situation, however, does not permit it to buy new 
planes.  The MALEV extraordinary general meeting originally planned 
for 6 March will now be held on 26 March.  One of the items on the 
agenda will be the approval of a sale and lease back arrangement for 
MALEV's two Boeing 767-2O0er planes.  (Budapest MTI in English 0713 
GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FURTHER GROWTH IN NUMBER OF BUSINESSES:  There was an increase in 
the number of companies registered in January, with the number of 
incorporated businesses up from 85,638 to 87,060 from December to 
January, the latest figures from the Central Statistical Office 
(KSH) show.  Of the 1,595 companies that were registered in January, 
1,443 were new companies, while 152 were established from existing 
companies.  Ninety-two percent of the newly established companies 
were limited liabilty companies and 84 percent were companies 
employing less than 10 people.  Thirty-nine percent of the companies 
were based in Budapest. 

   In January, 173 incorporated companies ceased to operate:  Five 
of them were wound up, 66 ceased operating, and 102 were converted 
into other companies.  Bankruptcy proceedings were initiated against 
eight incorporated companies in January, bringing the total number 
of bankruptcy proceedings initiated since the beginning of 1992 to 
3,082.  Of the companies that went bankrupt, 32 percent had been 
involved in industry, 26 percent in trade and repair services, 14 
percent in construction, and 13 percent in agriculture and forestry. 
The KSH figures show that bankruptcy proceedings have been conducted 
against 2,444 companies.  In half of the cases a bankruptcy 
agreement was made.  Forty-eight percent of the companies were wound 
up and, in 2 percent of cases, the proceedings were in other ways. 
A total of 4,878 incorporated companies had been wound up by the end 
of January, 57 percent of which were limited liability companies and 
32 percent cooperatives.  Thirty percent of the companies wound up 
operated in industry, 25 percent in trade and repair services, 21 
percent in the construction industry, and 12 percent were real 
estate agents or engaged in other service areas. 

   The KSH figures showed that the following businesses were 
operating in Hungary.  The figures are based on Hungarian tax office 
(APEH) data. 
BOT 
Business                         Dec 31, 1993     Jan 31, 1994 

Incorporated Companies             85,638          87,060 
Unincorporated Businesses          98,036          99,512 
Budget and Social Security 
  Run Institutions                 14,853          14,882 
Other Non-Profit Organizations     38,493          38,523 
Self-Employed                     688,843         692,678 
EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 1354 GMT  23 Feb  94 AU) 

   DOMESTIC SECURITIES ISSUES COVERED 1993 BUDGET DEFICIT:  The 1993 
central budget closed with a deficit of 199.7 billion forints. 
Revenues totalled 939.6 billion forints and expenditures, 1,139.3 
billion.  The deficit remained under the 213.3 billion forints mark 
envisaged in the supplementary budget.  The central budget deficit 
was fully financed from the issuing of domestic securities.  The 
state spent less on expenditures related to debt, with savings in 
this field totalling 9 billion forints, mainly due to lower interest 
expenditures.  The unfavorable effect of the rise in interest rates 
at the end of 1993 could hardly be felt.  Revenue from personal 
income tax totalled 210.7 billion forints, instead of the expected 
189.5 billion forints, as taxable incomes rose at a faster pace than 
planned.  Corporate tax revenues were also somewhat higher than 
predicted.  (Budapest MTI in English 1849 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN CONSUMER PRICE INDEX SLOWS:  Consumer prices this 
January were up 3.2 percent on last December, the Central 
Statistical Office reported.  The monthly price increase last 
January was 6.8 percent.  The 12-month price index -- from January 
to January -- fell from 25.9 percent last year, to 17 percent. 
BOT 
                        1 Month                   12 Months 
                           Increase in Percentage 

                1992     1993    1994      1992      1993   1994 

January          3.2     6.8      3.2      28.2     25.9    17.0 
February         2.7     1.7               25.8     24.7 
March            1.9     0.8               24.7     23.4 
April            1.3     0.8               23.3     22.8 
May              1.5     0.4               22.6     21.3 
June             0.6     0.3               20.6     20.9 
July             0.3     0.6               20.1     21.3 
August           0.8     1.8               20.7     22.3 
September        2.4     2.9               21.7     23.0 
October          2.5     1.7               23.4     22.0 
November         1.6     0.7               22.7     21.0 
December         1.1     1.3               21.6     21.0 
EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 1158 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   COMPANIES DRAW $1.264 BILLION IN FOREIGN LOANS IN 1993: 
Hungarian companies took out direct foreign exchange loans from 
abroad to a value of $1.264 billion in 1993, Econews learned from 
the Hungarian National Bank (MNB).  Total loans stood at $2.516 
billion on December 31, 1993, while company repayments totalled $691 
million between 1990, when such lending began, and the end of last 
year, of which $441 million was repaid in 1993.  The net stock of 
direct foreign loans owed by Hungarian companies stood at $1.825 
billion at the end of last year, compared to $1.002 billion at the 
end of 1992.  Hungarian companies held valid permits from the MNB 
for direct foreign loans totalling $4.008 billion at the end of 
December as against $2.536 billion on December 31, 1992. 

   Of the total $2.279 billion loans taken out, 22 percent were in 
the form of credits to joint ventures from their foreign owners, 7 
percent carried Hungarian state guarantees, while the value of loans 
over $50 million accounted for 24 percent of the total.  Of total 
permits valid at the end of December, 37 percent were for loans with 
maturity of up to one year.  The MNB started granting permits for 
such shorter-term direct foreign loans to companies in early 1993. 
In the maximum one-year category, companies took out loans to a 
total value of 1.061 billion and repaid $528 million last year, 
bringing the net stock of such loans to $533 million at the end of 
December.  The above MNB figures do not include foreign loans 
granted either by the World Bank or under inter-governmental loan 
agreements to Hungarian companies.  The above figures cover the 
principal amounts of loans and also reflect changes in foreign 
exchange cross-rates over the period.  (Budapest MTI in English 1719 
GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK DEVALUES FORINT 2.6 PERCENT:  The Hungarian 
National Bank has decided to devalue the forint by 2.6 percent as of 
February 16.  The reason given for the devaluation was the 
improvement of the competitiveness of Hungarian exports.  The MNB 
expects exporting companies to become increasingly profitable and 
thus able to maintain existing levels of employment.  The decision 
was also prompted by changes in currency exchange rates of Hungary's 
major trade partners.  The currency basket which provides the basis 
for the forint exchange rate calculation contains the U.S. dollar 
and the German mark in equal proportions.  The dollar has continued 
to strengthen against European currencies on international money 
markets and thus the forint rate has been pulled up by the dollar as 
compared to the European countries which provide Hungary's main 
export markets.  The MNB last devalued the forint by 1 percent on 
January 3.  In 1993, the forint was devalued by 15 percent in five 
steps.  (Budapest MTI in English 1755 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PRESIDENT ON DEVALUATION:  The Hungarian forint has 
strengthened considerably, as compared to the German mark, since 
last October, which did not have justification by the internal 
processes of the economy.  "This is what necessitated the exchange 
rate correction," Hungarian National Bank Chairman Peter Akos Bod 
said on 15 February, accounting for the forint devaluation. 
According to Bod, the step will improve the situation of exporters. 
Lower indices have come about for both producer and consumer prices 
over the past months, which is why, as a consequence of the 
devaluation more than one year ago, there is less danger of 
inflation this February.  Subsequently, the national bank could 
decide in a bolder manner and on a larger-scale devaluation, Bod 
said.  (Budapest MTI in English 1810 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT HELP FOR BORSOD COUNTY STEEL INDUSTRY:  The government 
has decided on reorganizing steel production in Borsod County, 
northern Hungary.  Accordingly, the Ozd factory will produce 
electrosteel and upgrade its rolling mill, and the Diosgyor plant 
will boost the capacity of its existing electrofurnace and set up a 
second foundry.  The government will guarantee a loan of 2.1 billion 
forints ($1 equals 102 forints) for the program this year and grant 
nonrefundable support worth 3 billion forints after the industry is 
privatized.  (Budapest MTI in English 2007 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   LIVESTOCK NUMBERS FALL:  The continuous decline in livestock 
numbers invariably gives rise to anxiety, a Central Statistical 
Office report states.  According to the figures, the cattle stock 
totalled 999,000 on December 31, 1993, which is 14 percent, or 
160,000 less than in the previous year.  There were 5.001 million 
pigs at the end of last year, which is a decline of 7 percent over 
the previous year.  There are no prospects for a major rise as the 
number of breeding sows declined by an even higher degree, 14 
percent.  At the end of December, there were 1.2 million sheep, 29 
percent less than at the end of 1992.  The number of ewes declined 
by 33 percent.  Poultry numbers indicate a decline of 15 percent 
compared to the previous year.  (Budapest MTI in English 0716 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN BANKS TO FINANCE M1/M15 HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION:  Deutsche 
Bank, Commerzbank, Dresdner Bank, and KFW, the German Institution 
for Reconstruction Credit, will be involved in the financing of the 
extension of the M1 motorway and the construction of the M15, KFW 
announced.  The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development 
(EBRD) and a group of western banks lead by the EBRD and Banque 
Nationale de Paris will set up an ECU 189 million fund to finance 
part of the 40 billion forint construction project.  One third of 
the amount to go into the fund will come from the German banks, KFW 
said.  The high level of German involvement reflects the importance 
placed on the development of the M1 in German financial circles. 
The M1, which at present runs from Budapest to Gyor, will be 
extended to the Austrian border at Hegyeshalom.  This will involve 
the construction of 48km of new motorway.  The M15, a 15km spur, 
will connect the M1 with the Slovak border near Bratislava. 
Contruction is scheduled for completion by the end of 1995. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1727 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   CONTRACT SIGNED ON AUSTRIAN-HUNGARIAN GAS PIPELINE:  A contract 
was signed between the Austrian company OMV and the Hungarian oil 
and gas company (MOL RT) on the construction of a gas pipeline to 
link Baumgarten in Austria and Gyor in western Hungary. 
Construction of the 120km pipeline, to be known as Hungaria-Austria 
Gasleitung (HAG), will begin this March and is scheduled for 
completion by October 1, 1996.  The pipeline will have an annual 
capacity of 4.5 billion cubic meters and will be linked to Hungary's 
existing high-pressure gas pipeline near Gyor.  The construction of 
the pipeline will, for the first time, give Hungary access to gas 
from the West and open new markets to Western European gas producers 
and suppliers.  The pipeline will also safeguard gas supplies from 
Russia to Austria and Western Europe as gas can be delivered through 
HAG if there are any problems with existing pipelines through 
Slovakia, which are currently operating at maximum capacity.  The 
Austrian company will finance the construction of the 50km Austrian 
section of the pipeline and MOL RT the Hungarian section.  The 
precise means of financing is still uncertain and information on the 
cost of construction was not disclosed.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1447 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   CHINOIN EMPLOYEE PARTICIPATION IN FRENCH PRIVATIZATION: 
Employees of Budapest's mainly French-owned Chinoin Co. were able to 
buy shares when the mostly state-owned Elf Aquitaine petroleum group 
was privatized.  The French state held 51 percent of the petroleum 
company, a Chinoin official said.  Employees of firms belonging to 
the oil company had priority in the sale of French state stakes. 
Shares were sold for 385 francs, below the stock-exchange price of 
420 francs.  Workers at Elf member companies and subsidiaries, 
including Chinoin, could buy shares at 20 percent discount.  With 
Finance Ministry clearance, 108 Chinoin employees with hard-currency 
accounts and several French citizens working there applied to buy 
3,000 shares worth 924,000 francs.  In return for the preferences, 
they cannot sell their shares or get a dividend for three years (to 
be invested by a French fund).  Elf Aquitaine is one of the largest 
companies in France, with an annual turnover of 200 billion francs. 
It mainly produces and refines petroleum, but it also processes 
-chemicals, and is involved in medical and cosmetics production as 
Elf Sanofi.  (Budapest MTI in English 1540 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT ON PROTECTION OF WINE BRANDS COMES INTO FORCE: 
Parliament approved a resolution on the promulgation of the 
agreement signed in Brussels last November on the mutual protection 
and control of wine names, concluded between the Republic of Hungary 
and the European Union.  The agreement on origin protection is 
closely connected to the Hungary-European Union Associate Contract 
that came into force on February 1.  The agreement ensures the 
protection of 437 Hungarian geographical names and approximately 
1,500 Hungarian wine names on the markets of the European Union, 
while granting protection in Hungary for some 6,000 wine brands of 
the Union's 12 countries.  The origin protection agreement is also 
related to the agreement signed on preferential wine trade, under 
which Hungary will be able to export some 263,000 hectolitres of 
wine to the EU markets under preferential customs tariff rates by 
1998.  Meanwhile, customs tariff rates on Hungarian wines will 
decline by an annual 20 percent, while those of European wines will 
decline by just 10 percent every three years.  The agreement also 
sets down distribution elimination, within 13 years, of European- 
made wines that have brand names resembling the "Tokaji" name. 
(Budapest MTI in English 2017 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   CHANGES IN FINANCIAL LEASING ACCOUNTANCY REGULATIONS:  The 
government has modified the regulations on the reports and auditing 
of financial institutions.  This completes the regulations on 
financial leasing laid down in the banking law for accounting 
regulations.  In the future, lessees will count items utilized under 
financial leasing contracts as assets, and they will be authorised 
to account for amortisation.  Financial leasing ensures the right 
for property transfer or purchase to the lessee at the end of the 
leasing period.  According to Hungarian accounting regulations, it 
was debated whether in such leasing structure it is the leaser or 
lessee who has the right to count the item as an asset. 

   In practice, the leasers included the assets in their books and 
took them out of the books only at the end of the leasing period. 
In future, financial leasing will function as a credit, as a result 
of which the leased objects will have to be shown in the financial 
institution's books as receivables.  However, the same asset appears 
as an investment for the lessee, and must be registered in the books 
as a tangible asset (regardless of the fact that it is still owned 
by the leaser).  This regulation results in the situation that the 
lessee is able to amortize the leased asset.  A condition of 
financial leasing is that the asset must be bought by the financial 
institution on commission by the leaser.  If assets are received in 
any other way -- for instance the enforcement of mortgage right -- 
then it may be classified as operative leasing.  The earlier 
regulations continue to govern this type of transaction, which means 
that in the case of operative leasing, it is the leaser who 
registers the leased asset in his books.  As financial leasing is a 
banking activity, it may basically only be practiced by banks.  The 
license of leasing companies is only valid for operative leasing, 
and a permit from the banking supervision is neccessary for them to 
practice financial leasing.  (Budapest MTI in English 0910 GMT 15 
Feb 94 AU) 

   STATISTICS ON 1993 TOURISM:  Almost 41 million foreigners visited 
Hungary last year, 21 percent more than a year ago, the Central 
Statistical Office reported.  Half the visitors came from the former 
Yugoslav republics and Romania, mostly for purposes other than 
tourism.  The number of visitors from the former Soviet republics, 
showing the sharpest increase, was up 2.7 million.  Following 1992's 
decline, arrivals from Germany grew by 23 percent, but fewer 
visitors were from the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Poland.  Fifty- 
six percent -- 23 million people -- were tourists spending at least 
a night in Hungary.  Their number increased by 13 percent last year. 
About 12 million travellers, including over 6 million from former 
Yugoslavia, spent less than a day here.  Tourists in Hungary spent 
altogether 144 million nights, 37 percent more than the 1992 figure. 
Their average stay here was 6.3 nights, as compared to 5.2 a year 
before.  Visitors from Romania and the Commonwealth of Independent 
States stayed in Hungary longer than previously.  Canadians spent 
the longest time here, at two weeks, with the shortest time, three 
nights, being spent by former Yugoslav citizens.  Hungarians 
travelled abroad 12.1 million times, five percent less than in 1992, 
with half of them crossing the Austrian border.  Slightly more 
Hungarians left for Austria, Slovenia, Croatia, and Ukraine than a 
year before, but the number of Hungarians heading for Serbia 
plummeted by 63 percent.  (Budapest MTI in English 1227 GMT 9 Feb 94 
AU) 

   TOURISM REVENUE SURPLUS DECLINES:  The revenue surplus of tourism 
declined to a significant degree last year.  Although the latest 
figures show the situation up to the end of November only, it is 
clear that the surplus fell by some $150 million as compared to 
1992.  Officials of the Hungarian National Bank (MNB) said that 
tourism revenues totalled $1,088.8 million by November 30, 1993, 
which is a 5 percent decline as compared to the corresponding period 
of 1992.  Tourism expenditures totalled $650.2 million, which is a 
rise of 18 percent.  The surplus thus totalled $438.6 million over 
the first 11 months of 1993, as compared to $591.5 million for the 
January-November period of 1992.  (Budapest MTI in English 1100 GMT 
10 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARTICIPATION IN EUREKA PROGRAMS:  Hungarian experts are 
participating in 23 scientific research programs included in the 
international European Research Coordination Agency's (EUREKA) 
program.  The Hungarian state provided 230 million forints (approx. 
$2.3 million) in support to the programs in 1992 and 1993.  Fifteen 
Hungarian research institutes and 13 companies are participants of 
the programs, which run with a total budget of about 400 million 
European currency unit (ECU), and several hundred Hungarian 
companies are indirectly interested in the research.  The EUREKA 
scientific research and development program was set up in June 1985. 
The aim was for participating countries to increase their economic 
competitiveness and to cut back their arrears compared with the 
United States and Japan.  The major cooperation areas are 
telecommunications, environmental protection, laser technology, 
automatization, space research, transport technology, and energy 
management.  At present, more than 20 countries participate in some 
800 various EUREKA programs, under a budget of about ECU 14 billion. 

   Hungary had participated in six EUREKA research programs since 
1988, as a non-member state.  Hungarian researchers achieved 
outstanding results in three areas initiated by French scientists: 
The Eurotrack environmental cooperation, the Tor program researching 
the ozone layer, and in the Biotex program investigation the 
connection between the biosphere and the atmosphere.  In May 1992, 
Hungary was the first of the Central European countries to become a 
member of EUREKA.  Hungarian researchers participated in 10 programs 
in 1992, 15 in 1993, and are now engaged in 23 schemes.  The largest 
and most costly of these are the examination of high-capacity lasers 
in laser technology, the development of simulators of industrial 
processes that endanger the environment, the development of self- 
propelled space robots for space research, and the development of 
technologies for the maintenance and renovation of monuments. 
Hungarian experts cooperate with French, German, Italian, and 
Swedish researchers in most of the EUREKA programs.  The world's 
largest firms also participate in the 23 research schemes running 
with Hungarian participation, including the French pharmaceutic firm 
Sanofi which has stakes in Hungary, or the world telecommunications 
giant Sony.  The Hungarian government has, through competitions, 
provided 230 million forints in support to the Hungarian 
participants since May, 1992.  (Budapest MTI in English 0812 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   POLAND 

   NATIONAL CHAMBER OF COMMERCE'S FIFTH YEAR:  The National Chamber 
of Commerce (KIG) was formed in 1990 with a membership consisting of 
13 industry-commerce chambers and also of economic societies. 
Today, KIG unites over 130 such chambers of commerce, which together 
assemble about 500,000 economic units. One of the main aims of the 
organization is the promotion of the Polish economy.  (Warsaw GAZETA 
PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   TRADE WITH SAXONY:  A Polish-Saxon working group discussed the 
possibility of enlarging the scope of its cooperation.  Polish-Saxon 
trade amounted to 429 million DM in 1992, of which the Polish 
exports accounted for 227 million DM, and Polish imports 192 million 
DM.  Polish-Saxon trade constitutes a full 30 percent of the sales 
between Poland and the Germany.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I 
HANDLOWA in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF GOPLANA:  The privatization of the Goplana Sugar 
Plants in Poznan is completed.  The Poznan voivode has moved the 
property of this state enterprise to a new corporation, which is now 
known as GOPLANA S.A.  Its owners are: the State Treasury and 
Nestle, each with 47 percent of the shares, and GOPLANA employees, 
with 6 percent of the shares.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA 
in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   ENERGY COSTS NOT AS EXPENSIVE:  The price hikes planned for this 
year for energy-transfer carriers will be less than expected in the 
draft budget law by several percentage points.  The results of 
discussions between the ministries of finance and industry call for 
the price hikes to be distributed in three, relatively milder, 
stages than previously expected.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I 
HANDLOWA in Polish No 6, 9-15 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SHARES IN POLIFARB CARBOLINE:  The nominal capital of the company 
established by Polifarb Cieszyn S.A. and Carboline Co. amounts to 20 
billion zlotys and both partners will have equal shares in the new 
company. The agreement foresees an intensification of exports to 
both East and West European countries, as well as a substantial 
improvement in the quality of the anticorrosive coating produced in 
Cieszyn.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 6, 9-15 
Feb 94 p 1) 

   SHIP FOR FRANCE:  The French shipowner Luis Dreyfus commissioned 
the Gdansk Shipyards to construct the bulk cargo ship Gerard L.D., 
which recently set off on its trail run on the Baltic.  The bulk 
cargo ship has a load-carrying capacity of 165,000 tons and is able 
to carry grain, coal, ore, and cement.  In the last several years, 
the Gdansk Shipyards have built eight ships for the French 
shipowner, and lately signed yet another contract for two more bulk 
cargo ships.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 
15-21 Feb 94 p 1) 

   GERMAN COOPERATION WITH NOBILES:  The German company Herberts, a 
leading producer of automotive varnishes, has signed a letter of 
intention with the Nobiles Varnish Factory in Kujawy.  The intent is 
to open a joint venture company as soon as it is possible.  Herberts 
has about 20 firms throughout the world, and every third automobile 
in Europe uses its varnish.  The Kujawy factory was selected based 
on a high evaluation of its technical capabilities.  (Warsaw GAZETA 
PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 15-21 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SUGAR INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION:  NSZZ Rural Solidarity has prepared 
a plan for privatizing the sugar industry, which assumes the 
establishment of one holding company for the entire country in 
charge of administering all sugar plants.  In addition to the sugar 
plants, banks, foreign trade enterprises, and manufacturers of beet 
processing systems will also be able to be part of the company. 
(Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 15-21 Feb 94 p 
1) 

   FOREIGN CREDITS AVAILABLE, NOT ALWAYS USABLE:  Of the total of 
$7.25 million in foreign credits available to Poland, only $2.93 
million have been actually drawn, according to a Central Planning 
Office report.  The report says that the use of foreign credits 
could be better. The main reasons for their underutilization are 
various restrictive clauses applied by lending institutions, time- 
consuming procedures applied by the administration and banks in the 
lender countries, and a reluctance to invest on the part of Polish 
enterprises.  The report notes an increasing interest in drawing 
foreign credits since the middle of last year, suggesting an 
improvement in the financial condition of Polish firms.  So far, the 
bulk of credits has come from the World Bank, European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development, European Investment Bank, Norway, 
and Germany.  The lowest use has been made of credits provided by 
the United States and South Korea.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1846 GMT 
24 Feb 94 AU) 

   IRISH BUSINESSMEN PROBE POLISH MARKET:  A trade mission from 
Ireland ended a four-day visit to Poland on 24 February. Businessmen 
representing different sectors of the Irish economy sought to 
establish contacts with Polish producers, and were also interested 
in selling their products on the Polish market, the British Embassy 
announced.  The Irish entrepreneurs offered office equipment; 
electronic products; devices for the oil industry; water treatment 
installations; and machines for linen, jute and sisal processing, 
among other items.  The businessmen were interested in finding 
distributors for their products and also wanted to learn about 
Polish taxes, customs regulations and import quotas.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1935 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH ITALY INCREASING:  In 1993, Italian imports of Polish 
goods rose by 73 percent, while Polish imports of Italian goods 
skyrocketed by 129 percent, Trade Attache Tomasz Bartoszewicz of the 
Polish Embassy in Rome said at a press conference there. 
Bartoszewicz cited the latest sales figures of the Italian Ministry 
of Foreign Trade.  Close to fifty percent of the trade between 
Poland and Italy is carried out on a joint-venture basis, mainly 
involving the automobile industry, which as Bartoszewicz emphasized, 
should be an indicator for Italian investors.  He confirmed 
unofficial information about the interest of the Italian railways in 
cooperating with the Polish railways.  Replying to questions from 
Italian journalists, Polish ambassador to Italy Boleslaw Michalek 
announced that in the near future Poland will ask the European 
Commission to accelerate the integration process.  He also 
emphasized that since the dissolution of COMECON, Poland has been 
able to redirect her economic cooperation, evidence of which is the 
fact that in 1992 and 1993 the European Union member-states became 
Poland's main trading partners (i.e. 58 percent of all foreign 
trade).  (Warsaw PAP in English 1247 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH GDP FALLS LESS THAN ELSEWHERE IN EAST EUROPE:  The fall in 
Polish GDP was smaller than in other Central and East European 
countries in the years 1989-93, thus producing more rapid economic 
growth, labor and social policy department director at the Central 
Statistical Office Stanislawa Golinowska said at a 25 February news 
conference devoted to social conditions in that period.  The 
analyses, conducted on the initiative of UNICEF, revealed that the 
socio-economic situation in Poland and the region was characterized 
by rising unemployment and a major fall in real wages coupled with a 
disparity between the poorest and the richest, growing 
impoverishment, and an increase of pathological social processes. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1250 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN INVESTOR TO BUY 75 PERCENT STAKE IN CEMENT PLANT:  The 
German Polen Zement Beteiligungsgesellschaft company intends to buy 
a 75 percent stake in the Warta cement plant in Dzialoszyno, Sieradz 
province, the Press Office of the Privatization Ministry announced 
after an agreement to sell the package was signed in Warsaw on 25 
February.  According to this tentative agreement, the Polish 
Ministry of Environmental Protection will have to grant permission 
for the German investor to buy the stake, while the authorities of 
the state of North Rhine-Westphalia have to approve credit 
guarantees.  Twenty percent of the shares will be made available to 
the cement plant work force, while the prospective investor has 
agreed to sign a social security package which provides for 
employment guarantees for three years, the maintenance of present 
social benefits, and wage growth.  The German buyer plans to earmark 
tens of millions of marks for the plant's modernization, the 
Privatization Ministry has said.  The annual production capacity of 
Warta, employing 1,784 people, is 1.2 million tons of clinker.  The 
cement plant is in serious financial trouble after it failed to 
repay credits for modernization contracted in the 1980's.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1906 GMT 26 Feb 94 AU) 

   EUROPEAN COMMISSION HELPS POLISH AGRICULTURE:  The council of the 
Agroline program, which is financed by the European Commission, has 
decided to appropriate extra an 19 million ECU for credits for 
Polish agriculture, program director Urszula Budzich said.  The 
council agreed to open the so called "packages of credits" that are 
to be appropriated for the purchase of agricultural equipment and 
machines.  Dealers offering agricultural equipment that is produced 
in Poland, the European Union and countries that take advantage of 
the PHARE (Poland and Hungary Action for Restructuring the Economy) 
program will be involved in this action, Budzich said.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1830 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION MINISTRY RELEASES DATA FOR 1993:  According to data 
released by the Construction Market Department at the Ministry of 
Physical Planning and Construction, private construction firms 
accounted for 84 percent of the basic production of construction 
enterprises and employed almost 70 percent of the construction 
industry work force in 1993.  Investment outlays of enterprises rose 
by 18 percent in 1993 compared to the previous year, chiefly as far 
as the purchase of equipment and transport means were concerned.  In 
1993 people received keys to 85,900 apartments, 35.4 percent fewer 
than the 1992 figure.  According to Central Statistical Office data, 
707,000 persons were employed in the construction industry between 
January and September 1993.  The average monthly pay in the sector 
was 3,777,000 zlotys (around $174), and the number of unemployed 
rose from 236,000 in 1992 to 252,000 in 1993.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2103 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   URSUS TRACTOR FACTORY SIGNS DEAL WITH CREDITORS:  On 28 February, 
the Ursus tractor factory signed an agreement with 1,800 creditors 
under which the latter agreed to cancel 40 percent of the plant's 
debt exceeding 2 trillion zlotys (about $92 million).  The factory 
will pay the debt's remaining part in five years, with a one-year 
grace period, the factory's deputy financial director Wlodzimierz 
Tylman told journalists.  He explained that the factory would pay 
back its debts to about 1,000 smaller creditors within two months, 
as soon as the agreement comes into force.  From the second quarter 
of 1995 on, the factory will start paying back 90 billion zlotys 
quarterly to the creditors, including the State Treasury, which 
joined the deal.  The business plan prepared for the plant shows 
that it will be able to carry this burden, the deputy director 
assured.  The negotiations with creditors have lasted since May 1992 
and their success was determined by a good recovery program prepared 
for the factory.  The Ursus plant is now increasing its production, 
paying its current liabilities, and winning new foreign markets, 
Tylman said.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1710 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK WANTS THREE BANKS DECLARED BANKRUPT:  The president 
of the National Bank of Poland (NBP) on 28 February suspended the 
operation of two cooperative banks and the Wroclaw-based Dolnoslaski 
Bank Gospodarczy SA (Lower Silesian Economic Bank Inc.), and filed 
motions with the respective provincial courts to declare their 
bankruptcy.  During the suspension, the three banks are to deal only 
with liabilities connected with deposits, current accounts and 
refinance credit.  The NBP president also ordered the liquidation of 
the Poznan-based Merkury Bank SA through its sale to Pierwszy 
Komercyjny Bank SA (First Commercial Bank Inc.) in Lublin.  The 
Lublin-based bank is to take over all the liabilities and of 
Merkury.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1755 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RUSSIAN COMPANY TO SUPPLY CARS FOR WARSAW SUBWAY:  After several 
months of negotiations, the Kolmex Polish foreign trade enterprise 
on 28 February signed a contract with the Vagonmash firm of St. 
Petersburg for the supply of 32 coaches for the Warsaw subway 
between June and August 1994, Warsaw City Hall announced.  Payment 
for the coaches, accounting for 70 percent of the contract's value, 
will be balanced with Polish goods.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2037 GMT 
28 Feb 94 AU) 

   INFLATION SAID SCARING FOREIGN INVESTORS:  There are foreign 
investors who are willing to invest hundreds of millions of dollars 
in Poland, but they are afraid of high inflation, government 
bureaucracy, and a poor flow of information, Marc Popiolek of the 
Financial Dynamics Public Relations Agency told a press conference 
in Warsaw on 28 February, while presenting the results of an opinion 
poll answered by Europe's biggest banks and investment funds.  In 
the opinion of 16 percent of the respondents, the prospects of the 
Polish economy are exceptionally good.  Some 75 percent considered 
them good, 8 percent as not bad and only 1 percent as bad, Popiolek 
added, stressing that the latter group had never been to Poland. 
According to Popiolek, 90 percent of the respondents considered the 
political situation in Poland as stable.  "Investors complain of 
difficult access to data concerning the Polish companies listed on 
the Warsaw stock exchange," Popiolek said.  Only 5 percent receive 
this information regularly, 38 percent receive it irregularly, and 
57 percent do not get it at all."  In Popiolek's opinion, Poland has 
an advantage over the Czech Republic and Hungary of being bigger and 
having a larger population, as all investments are much more 
profitable when there is a bigger market.  Hungary is perceived in 
the west as a country in a political mess, he added.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2041 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RENOMINATION OF ZLOTY POSSIBLE NEXT YEAR, NBP PRESIDENT SAYS: NBP 
president Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz confirmed on 1 March that she 
wants the renomination of the Polish zloty to be held early next 
year.  Speaking on Radio Eska, the NBP president said that the 
postponement of the zloty renomination has also had positive 
effects, as it has given people a chance to get used to the idea. 
She added that the operation should be well-prepared, which requires 
a close cooperation of the NBP with all interested ministries and 
institutions.  She did not rule out that the NBP could allocate an 
additional 1 trillion zlotys ($46 million) to finance the budget 
deficit if the inflation rate did not exceed 20 percent in the mid- 
1994.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz said that the Polish banking system was 
facing a crisis at present caused by a faulty tax system, among 
other factors.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1021 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   WALESA, NBP PRESIDENT DISCUSS CRISIS IN BANKING:  On 1 March, 
President Lech Walesa NBP president Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz and the 
bank's first deputy president Witold Kozinski, who briefed him on 
the current crisis situation in the banking system and necessary 
measures to overcome it.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz and Walesa shared the 
view that the delay in appointing a new finance minister was 
disadvantageous for the functioning of state organs.  The president 
warned against a relaxation of the financial policy, which is a 
significant element of the success of the Polish reforms.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1231 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH, HUNGARIAN AGRICULTURAL MARKET AGENCIES COOPERATE:  On 1 
March, the head of the Polish Agricultural Market Agency Kazimierz 
Gutowski and the head of the Hungarian Office for Market Regulation 
Laszlo Rieger agreed in Warsaw to exchange current information and 
experience, the agency spokesman said.  He added that the talks 
between the two men focused on the forms, scope and sources of 
financing intervention activities on the agricultural market.  The 
two stressed that the intervention in both countries concerns, above 
all, grain, meat and diary markets, although the mechanisms fixing 
intervention prices are different.  The cooperation is to embrace 
issues related to granting credits to firms, the activities of which 
stabilize the agricultural market.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1621 GMT 
1 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK RELEASES 1993 TRADE FIGURES:  Polish exports in 
1993 amounted to $13.585 million, while imports reached $15.878 
million, according to figures released by the National Bank of 
Poland on 17 February.  This results in a trade deficit of $2.293 
million, which was the main reason for Poland's negative balance of 
payments in 1993.  Earnings from exports in 1993 were 2.9 percent 
lower than in 1992, while payments for imports were 17.7 percent 
higher.  The deficit in trade was mainly the result of a strong 
growth in the domestic economy combined with continuing recession in 
Western Europe, Poland's most important export market.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1700 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   INFLATION SLOWS, UNEMPLOYMENT GROWS:  The fall of monthly 
inflation to 1.6 perceiit was among the brightest spots in January's 
economic statistics, according to the Central Office of Planning. 
The most worrying trend was growing unemployment, which increased by 
75,000 people or 2.4 percent.  Other positive developments last 
January were a high production growth (by 9.6 percent compared to 
January, 1993) and a small budget deficit (0.5 trillion zlotys or 
about $23 million dollars).  The most important threats to economic 
growth at the present time are growing unemployment, a decline in 
the volume of bank credits available to enterprises, and an 
accelerating decline in housing construction and an increase in 
social tensions, said the planning office.  It also reported that 
real wages last January were higher by 3.6 percent compared to a 
year ago.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1733 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT REACHES 2.9 MILLION IN JANUARY:  The number of 
unemployed stood at 2.9 million in January, up 2.4 percent on the 
December figure, according to the Central Statistical Office (GUS). 
In January, the rate of unemployment was 16 percent, an increase of 
1.9 percent on December.  According to deputy labor minister Jerzy 
Szreter, the rise in unemployment probably had a seasonal character 
and should be halted in March.  However, he feared that the 
anticipated number of unemployed of 3.05 million at the end of 1994 
might become reality unless more money was allocated for active 
forms of combating unemployment.  Unemployment rose in 48 provinces 
in January, with the highest growth in Chelm (by 6.3 percent) and 
Krakow (5.3 percent) provinces.  The highest rate of unemployment 
was recorded in Koszalin province (29.3 percent) and Suwalki 
province (28.9 percent), the lowest in Krakow province (7.6 percent) 
and Warsaw province (7.9 percent).  (Warsaw PAP in English 1836 GMT 
15 Feb 94 AU) 

   FSO, GENERAL MOTORS DISCUSS COOPERATION:  The FSO car plant and 
General Motors, who have signed an agreement to produce Opel Astra 
cars in Poland, are now developing their cooperation in order to 
start the assembly of U.S. cars in Warsaw, FSO spokesman Andrzej 
Smolinski said on 17 February.  Representatives of GM, the leading 
firm in the production of car parts, Inland Fisher Guide, visited 
the Warsaw factory to discuss the details of cooperation.  Also, a 
GM delegation headed by its deputy president, David Harman, was in 
Warsaw a few days ago.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1947 GMT 17 Feb 94 
AU) 

   LOT AIRLINES REPORTS OPERATING NET FOR 1993:  For the first time 
in three years, LOT Polish Airlines has scored a net profit from its 
1993 operations.  The net profit amounts to 63 billion zlotys (about 
$3 million) and was achieved without any government subsidies.  LOT 
was losing on its domestic connections but made up for the losses 
with its European connections, especially those with Vienna, Paris 
and London.  Regular flights to and from London will most likely be 
resumed on March 28, when the summer timetable takes effect.  LOT is 
also expected to reach a final agreement on strategic cooperation 
with one of the major U.S. airlines.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2201 
GMT 19 Feb 94 AU) 

   DANISH BUSES ASSEMBLED IN KOSZALIN:  An assembly shop for Danish 
DAB buses was opened in Koszalin on 10 February.  This is the first 
DAB assembly line outside the company's main factory in Silkeborg. 
The first five buses have been bought by Koszalin city transport. 
Eight buses will be assembled during this year.  In three years 
time, 150 buses will leave the factory each year.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 201 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   CANADIAN FIRM TO ACQUIRE SHARES IN GLASS WORKS:  The Toronto- 
based International UNP Holdings Ltd. holding company will buy 53 
percent of the shares in the "Antoninek" glass works, near Poznan. 
The state treasury will keep 47 percent of shares.  Negotiations 
should be concluded in two months' time on the subject of an 
agreement on transforming "Antoninek" into a limited liability 
company.  The Canadians will invest 56 billion zlotys (about $2.6 
million) in the modernization of "Antoninek," improving the quality 
of its products and management system, and marketing.  They agreed 
that the management of the future company would be Polish.  The 300 
workers of the glass works have their jobs guaranteed for 36 months, 
the previous agreement on wages, housing and social funds will also 
be maintained.  The workers will probably have a right to buy 8 
percent of the shares in "Antoninek." (Warsaw PAP in English 1158 
GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT CHANGES BUDGET, AGREES TO HIGHER SPENDING:  On 11 
February, the government presented its own amendments to the 1994 
budget, deciding to increase budgetary revenues and expenditure by 3 
trillion zlotys ($129 million) each.  The cabinet approved the 
amendments, envisaging increased spending on science, culture and 
education.  According to the new draft budget, state revenues would 
amount to 613 trillion zlotys and expenditure to 696 trillion 
zlotys.  The budget deficit would stay the same -- 83 trillion 
zlotys. 

   Some 1.4 trillion zlotys coming from foreign assistance will go 
to the Foreign Ministry.  The Agency for Agricultural Restructuring 
and Modernization will receive 808 billion zlotys, 297 billion will 
go to the government reserve, 200 billion will go on research 
programs, the culture ministry and university education will receive 
100 billion zlotys each, regions with a high rate of unemployment 
will receive 70 billion, local government districts 27 billion, and 
the remaining 12.6 billion will go the state treasury reserve.  The 
increase in revenues is the result of higher profits of the National 
Bank of Poland, totalling 1.6 trillion zlotys and a new foreign aid 
payment from the German Government, totalling 1.4 trillion zlotys. 
The government is also expecting bigger revenues from taxes such as 
excise tax, but these would be balanced by lower revenues from 
excess wage tax.  To balance the losses the government decided to 
increase excise tax on cigarettes by 17,000 zlotys per 1,000 
cigarettes.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1307 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL-INDUSTRIAL BANK COMMENCES OPERATIONS:  The Bank 
Rolno-Przemyslowy SA (Agricultural-Industrial Bank) inaugurated its 
work on 11 February with an initial capital of 170 billion zlotys 
(about $7.82 million).  Bank President Dariusz Ledworowski told a 
news conference that the bank's main aim would be to finance 
agriculture-related industries.  The bank has no license for 
international transactions at the moment, so it will be represented 
by the bank of exports development if necessary.  Polish Foreign 
Minister Andrzej Olechowski stressed that the establishment of the 
Agricultural-Industrial Bank was the best form of assistance for the 
Polish economy granted by the European Union, as it provided 
capital, which Poland was short of.  Representative of the European 
Commission Rolf Moehler said he hoped the Bank would help organize 
an effective food-processing industry in Poland and consolidate 
Poland's links with the European Union.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2009 
GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH, GERMAN DISTRICTS SIGN COOPERATION PACT:  The union of 
municipalities in the western coastal region of Pomerania and a 
similar union on the German side, including towns in Mecklenburg- 
Vorpommern and Brandenburg, signed an agreement on cooperation in 
tourism, economy, and ecology in Szczecin on 12 February.  The 
Polish and German municipalities are going to establish a Polish- 
German trans-border organization called "Pomerania," comprising the 
regions involved and, later, also the Danish island of Bornholm and 
southern Skania in Sweden.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2102 GMT 12 Feb 
94 AU) 

   POLISH-RUSSIAN BUSINESS INFORMATION CENTER:  The "Inicjatywa" 
("Initiative") Center of Information and Business was opened on 15 
February at the Russian Center of Science and Culture to support 
Polish firms interested in investing on eastern markets and in 
cooperation with firms in the former Soviet republics.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2132 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   NEW BANK OFFERS BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES:  Scheduled for 1 March 
1994, the opening of the Bucharest office of the Romanian Inter- 
Denominational Bank [BIR] will offer new business opportunities in 
Romania.  Founded by the International Ecumenical Center, the bank 
has among its other founders representatives of all the officially 
recognized denominations in Romania, private persons and corporate 
bodies from all over the world.  "Just a few years from the fall of 
communism, this banking institution, the only one of this kind in 
the world, will tell mankind about the strategic and geographical 
place of Romania as a bond between East and West, between 
Christianity, Islam, and Judaism," said Ion Popescu, president of 
the BIR and director general of the International Ecumenical Center. 
In his view, "there are plenty of reasons to make the Romanian 
Inter-Denominational Bank a vanguard institution in Romania and a 
pleasant surprise for financial-banking circles." (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English 0940 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   PROSPECTS FOR TOURISM IN 1994:  "The privatization plans for the 
tourist industry in Romania were hampered in 1993 by financial 
blockage, which affected most of those involved in the privatization 
program and by the absence of firm legislative measures," Minister 
of Tourism Dan Matei told VOCEA ROMANIEI, the government's 
newspaper.  Nevertheless, the tourist assets that passed into 
private hands last year stood at 22 percent of the total sold to 
private entrepreneurs in Romania.  The percentage includes eight 
hotel compounds, 20 hotels, six motels, 85 lodges, 25 mountain 
lodges, and 33 restaurants, totaling 9.6 billion lei.  Sixteen 
tourist ventures were listed for privatization through sale to their 
own employees.  Another 27 joint ventures were achieved with a joint 
foreign capital contribution of $118 million and investment 
requirements of $250 million.  Local investors took over 14 joint 
ventures with a total of over 10 billion lei in capital.  The 
recently established restructuring agency gives hope for a faster 
privatization process, the minister said.  With another 52 tourist 
companies to be privatized in 1994, state ownership in the tourist 
sector will be reduced to a half by the end of this year, the same 
source reported.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in?English 1000 GMT 25 Feb 94 
                                      ? 
AU) 

   SPAIN RANKS EIGHTH AS INVESTOR IN ROMANIA:  "Spain is currently 
the eighth largest investor in Romania.  The investment totals $35 
million and belongs to important companies," Antonio Ortiz, Spanish 
ambassador to Bucharest said.  He added that the Spanish Telefonica 
company had set up a joint venture with Romtelecom for the 
development of cellular telephone communications on the Constanta- 
Bucharest-Brasov connection.  "It is an important investment and we 
hope to mark progress in step with the advance of the economic 
reform" the diplomat said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1012 GMT 
28 Feb 94) 
COOPERATION WITH LATIN AMERICAN STATES:  Talks conducted over 17- 
27 February by a delagation of the Romanian Ministry of Trade in 
several Latin American Countries have led to the signing of numerous 
cooperation contracts in such fields as car and farm machinery 
manufacturing, oil processing, iron metallurgy and transportation. 
The sides agreed on the supply of "Romanian products worth some $4.3 
million to Venezuela, such as Aro four-wheel drive cars, tractors 
and machine tools," according to Romanian Minister of Trade Cristian 
Ionescu.  The Venezuelan side showed interest in the manufacturing 
of Romanian coaches and buses and in iron ore processing.  Prospects 
exist for several joint ventures. Interest was also shown in the 
Venezuelan oil processing for which "a diagram is needed for a 
period of at least five years to ensure supply continuity and to 
cover the demands of the petrochemical industry," the Romanian 
minister said. 

   The visit to Colombia ended with the signing of a $26 million 
contract for assembly works of Aro four-wheel drive cars in that 
country, and the Colombian side showed interest in the idea of 
establishing several joint ventures in iron metallurgy, in rolling 
stock, and in chemical products and machine tools.  Under the same 
contract, some 6,000-7,000 Dacia cars are also to be supplied to 
Colombia in 1994.  The sides also agreed on the opening of a direct 
Bucharest-Bogota air route in cooperation with Colombia's Avianca 
Airlines.  Brasilia showed interest in Romanian oil and raw sugar 
and also in the purchase of Romanian Aro four-wheel drive cars, 
coaches and trucks, according to Cristian Ionescu, who also added 
that another clearing bilateral agreement was signed during the 
visit to that country.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0744 GMT 1 Mar 
94 AU) 

   FPS LEADER VIEWS PRIVATIZATION PROSPECTS:  In connection with the 
State Property Fund [FPS] privatization program for 1994, Emil Dima, 
chairman of the FPS Administration Board, said that by the end of 
1993, after only seven months of FPS actual operation, 270 companies 
had been privatized, of which there were more than 100 in December. 
Six hundred more are ready to go private, while about 250-270 are in 
the process of drawing up the required survey.  We expect some 1,900 
small companies, over 400 medium ones and 35 large companies to be 
privatized in 1994.  According to the fields of activity, 
privatization features: 280 small companies in industry, 1,036 in 
farming, 131 in the food industry, 141 in transportation, 100 in 
building, 215 in trade, and 27 in tourism.  The medium-sized 
companies to be privatized are:  Industry -- 193 companies, farming 
-- 19 companies, the food industry -- 60 companies, transportation 
-- 25 companies, building -- 42 companies, trade -- 52 companies, 
tourism -- 12 companies.  The large companies expected to go private 
this year amount to 35:  11 in industry, 18 in farming, 11 in the 
food industry, 1 in transportation, 2 in building, 1 in trade, and 1 
in tourism.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0939 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   IFABO OPENS IN BUCHAREST:  IFABO Bucharest 1994 is the first 
major technical-economic fair in Romania's capital, specialized in 
computer technology, telecommunications, and office equipment.  It 
is the result of cooperation between the Austrian Messe Wien 
company, organizer of major international fairs and congresses, 
officially represented in Romania by the Export Consult Company and 
the Bucharest Romexpo Commercial Company.  IFABO in Bucharest is the 
first of a series of specialized annual fairs in one of the most 
dynamic fields of the modern economy:  Computer technology, 
telecommunications, and office equipment.  IFABO Bucharest 1994 
meets all the world standards from a technical point of view. 
Covering 2,400 square meters, 50 companies are presenting the modern 
equipment of prominent companies in Austria, Denmark, France, 
Germany, Italy, Great Britain, the United States and others. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1045 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   MODERNIZATION OF BUCHAREST AIRPORT: Bucharest-Otopeni 
International Airport, Romania's main air gate, will soon have a 
major face lift.  Modernization is expected to affect not only the 
airport building but also the 760 hectares of runways and parking 
lots, and will be done by the Romanian-Italian Ital-Strade-CCCF 
company, winner of the 1991 tender.  Only 18 km away from the 
capital's center, Bucharest-Otopeni International Airport, built in 
the 1960s, was well regarded at the time from a technical point of 
view, as well as in terms of its traffic volume. After 1989, when 
many airlines considerably increased the number of flights to 
Bucharest, the Bucharest-Otopeni International Airport had to start 
modernization and increase its passengers and cargo volume.  Top 
technology for air traffic control and surveillance was introduced 
with repairs and modernization on the airport's runways and parking 
lots.  A new cargo area is being built, while a new wing to improve 
departure flow and a terminal for viewing airplanes are under 
construction.  The modernization of airport services, the 
improvement of specific equipment and buses, the training of staff, 
and the pleasant atmosphere all led to traffic through the 
Bucharest-Otopeni Airport increasing to some 2 million passengers in 
1993.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0811 GMT 2 Mar 94) 

   SHIPPING COMPANY SEVERELY HURT BY FRY EMBARGO:  The Danube River 
Shipping Company in Giurgiu, 150 km south of Bucharest, suffered 
losses amounting to over $7 million in 1993 because of the UN 
sanctions against Yugoslavia, company director Stan Bone told the 
press.  The company was forced to turn down several shipping 
contracts because transiting through this country has become very 
difficult and expensive, as every convoy must have a UN permit and 
must pay a substantial fee imposed by the Serbs.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English 1806 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   RESTRUCTURING OF TEXTILE, LEATHER INDUSTRIES:  Some 6-7 percent 
of the 376 state-owned companies operating in the textile and 
leatherware industries are scheduled to be closed down in 1994.  The 
decision was announced by Secretary of State Sabin Virgiliu Adrian. 
The restructuring strategy, which is to be submitted to the 
government for approval in March, provides for the growth of the 
companies own development fund by raising their profit quota.  It 
also provides for exporting enterprises to have access to low- 
interest credits, and for bonuses for companies capable of having 
local raw materials and semi-finished goods account for 70 percent 
of their export products.  The total cost of restructuring the 
state-run companies over the 1994-96 period will amount to 175 
billion lei (about $118 million), which will be raised mainly from 
internal and external credits.  For the second stage of 
restructuring, from 1996 to 2000, credits worth 70 billion lei 
(about $47 million) are envisaged.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1949 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH AFRICA, MIDDLE EAST:  In 1993 Romania's exports to 
countries in Africa and the Middle East amounted to $660.43 million 
and imports were $732.54 million, according to Constantin Soare, 
head of the Africa and Middle East Department of the Ministry of 
Trade.  Although imports outgrew exports by some $72 million dollars 
in 1993, he emphasized that there is a conspicuous trend toward 
balancing the trade deficit, despite the sharp decrease in the 
export of elaborate projects, compared with the situation before 
1989. 

   Soare mentioned that Romanian exports to that area consist mainly 
of metallurgical products, chemical fertilizers, sodium products, 
timber, cement, window-glass, plastics, electric engines and 
generators, and household items, while imports primarily consist of 
raw materials:  crude oil, phosphates, manganese ore, natural 
rubber, coffee, and so forth.  The Trade Ministry official added 
that commercial agreements were signed in 1993 with Tunisia, Zambia, 
and the United Arab Emirates and that sessions of joint cooperation 
commissions were organized with Tunisia, Zambia, Israel, Iran, the 
South-African Republic and Jordan.  Constantin Soare also said that 
negotiations went on in 1993 to ensure the repayment of Egyptian 
debts to Romania.  Debts worth some $0.253 million were retrieved 
from Guinea, through the import of cocoa beans -- an action that 
will continue in 1994 -- while a timetable was agreed with the 
Zambian authorities for negotiations on the settlement of the 
bilateral financial issues; Libya paid back debts worth $14.3 
million and Iran $22.6 million in crude oil.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0803 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT INCREASES IN JANUARY:  Romania's industrial 
output increased 1.8 percent in January 1994 compared with December 
1993 and 6.6 percent compared with January 1993, while consumer 
prices increased 4.9 percent, according to a recently released 
report.  Prices for edibles increased 3.9 percent, for non-edibles 
5.7 percent, and for services 6.1 percent.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0755 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   S. KOREAN FIRM TO MODERNIZE PRAHOVA COMMUNICATIONS:  Romanian 
Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu received Jang Ito Chung, president 
of the Korean Goldstar Information and Communication Ltd., in 
Bucharest on 21 February.  Positively assessing the results of the 
Romanian-Korean cooperation in telecommunications, the Romanian 
premier said Romania needed assistance in this important economic 
sector.  He estimated that Romanian-manufactured products under 
Goldstar license would be quite successful on the Eastern European 
markets.  A contract was signed with the Romanian Public 
Telecommunication Company on 22 February in Bucharest on updating 
the telecommunication system of Prahova County.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
English 1905 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   MACHINE-BUILDING INDUSTRY REVERSES DECLINE:  After a continuous 
decline over three years in a row, 1993 brought a positive course at 
macro-economic level as an effect of revival of certain industrial 
branches, a report of the National Statistics Board shows.  With its 
over 300,000 employees, the machine-building industry, one of the 
basic branches of Romanian industry, has contributed 1.2 percent to 
industrial growth in 1993.  The material production rose, compared 
to the 1992 level, in the tractor, truck, automobile, and all- 
terrain cars manufacturing.  Although on the rise compared to 1992 
figures, industrial production is still below the level of 1989. 
For example, the 1993 production of machines and equipment 
represents 107.2 percent compared to 1992, but merely 50.5 percent 
as compared to 1989.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0911 GMT 10 Feb 
94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC DECLINE STOPPED IN 1993:  "The results of Romanian 
industry in 1993 are better than those in the previous year, but, as 
a whole, industry is far from flourishing," Romanian Minister of 
Industries Dumitru Popescu admitted in a recent interview.  The 
constantly positive evolution of industry in 1993 as compared to 
1992 had only one merit:  That of having stopped the economic 
decline, as pledged by Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu's cabinet, 
Popescu assessed.  Industrial production in 1993 rose by 1.3 percent 
as compared to 1992, labor productivity by 8 percent, and the 
industry's share in the trade balance stood at $3.7 billion, that 
is, 80 percent of the whole.  "The elaboration of the programs for 
the restructuring of each sector and sub-sector was already 
concluded in 1993," minister Popescu said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0938 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 
   FOREIGN TRADE DEFICIT SHRANK IN 1993:  In 1993 Romania's exports 
for hard currency were worth $4,527.4 million, which means a 5.6 
percent rise over the previous year.  Imports for hard currency 
stood at $5,238.9 million recording a 3.6 percent drop as compared 
to 1992, daily TINERETUL LIBER informs.  Thus the trade deficit 
amounted to $711.5 million, which is $435.9 million less than in 
1992.  The structure of exports by main groups of goods was 
generally similar to that of the previous year:  About 95 percent 
are industrial goods, such as metallurgical products, chemicals, 
machinery and equipment, textiles, ready-made clothing, and leather 
products.  More than half of the imports were products needed to 
keep the economy running.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1632 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   MONEY SUPPLY GREW IN 1993:  The money supply in Romania rose in 
1993 by over 103 percent, reads the weekly ECONOMISTUL citing 
official reports.  In 1993 the money supply reached a high of over 
3,800 billion lei.  The memorandum on economic policies agreed with 
the IMF provides for a tight control of the money supply as one of 
the weapons included in a global anti-inflation program.  Official 
reports say that about 30 percent of the money supply is represented 
by hard currency funds held by natural persons residing in Romania. 
The bolder tendency of the recent weeks toward an increased 
liberalization of the leu's exchange rate shows an effort to curb 
the "dollarization" process of the Romanian economy, assesses 
ECONOMISTUL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1310 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   PREFERENTIAL FINANCING TO ENCOURAGE EXPORTS:  On 14 February the 
National Bank of Romania opened new preferential credit lines for 
exporters, a measure intended to stabilize the exchange rate of 
Romania's national currency.  Companies exporting a part of their 
production will be offered credit lines totalling some 40 billion 
lei, with an interest rate of 70 percent.  The preferential 
financing will further rise to several hundred billion lei, while a 
part of the costs would come to be supported by the Eximbank and the 
state budget, so that exporters will actually have to pay even lower 
interest rates, namely 50 or even 40 percent, said Romanian National 
Bank Governor Mugur Isarescu.  Preferential financing stimulates 
production, says the governor, including the export-oriented 
production, but the way to do that is not to subsidize the interests 
paid for loans, but rather that to increase the capital of the 
efficient companies. 

   The reason for that is quite simple:  Without a really positive 
interest rate, it is practically impossible to stabilize the 
exchange rate of the national currency against the dollar.  However, 
the companies do not even want to hear of more expensive loans, 
because their capital is very small, which compels them to borrow up 
to 80 percent of the money they need in order to function.  When the 
situation reverses, people will trust the leu more, daily ADEVARUL 
writes.  Actually, the process has already begun.  The Bucharest 
branch of the Romanian Commercial Bank alone is buying U.S. dollars 
from the population at a daily average rate of about $100,000.  A 
few days ago in Bucharest an exchange house sold dollars at an 
exchange rate of 1,460 lei, which is below the inter-bank rate of 
1,480 lei, an event that has not occurred since 1989.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0947 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN ENVOY VIEWS POSITIVE ECONOMIC TIES:  In an interview 
granted to daily VOCEA ROMANIEI, Anton Rossbach, Germany's 
ambassador to Bucharest assessed Romanian-German relations as "good 
and without major problems," after which he pointed out that over 
the past two years Germany was Romania's most important trade 
partner:  "In 1992, Germany covered about 11 percent of the Romanian 
total exports, being, at the same time, the major supplier, with 13 
percent, of Romanian imports.  This positive trend continued in 1993 
as well, when between January and November Germany held 14 percent 
of Romanian exports (worth $569 million) and 16 percent of its 
imports (worth $815 million).  Rossbach assessed that German 
investments in Romania could grow further if the issue of the right 
to land property were settled in favor of foreign investors. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1336 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   NATIONAL BANK BONDS RECEIVE 'BB' RATING:  The U.S. rating agency 
Standard and Poor's has given the Slovak National Bank a rating of 
BB for its public issue of bonds.  This means that Slovakia is the 
third former CEMA country -- after the Czech Republic and Hungary -- 
to achieve such a rating.  According to National Bank Governor 
Vladimir Masar, the rating confirms that the republic has managed to 
achieve macroeconomic stability.  "This is an extraordinarily 
important step from the point of view of Slovakia's incorporation 
into the international financial community," he said.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISES TO BE ESTABLISHED WITH CHINA:  The Martimex 
Martin shareholding company is ready to establish three joint 
Slovak-Chinese enterprises to assemble earth-moving and road- 
construction equipment manufactured by the ZTS Turcianske 
engineering plant in Martin.  The components will be imported into 
China and assembled there.  The Chinese capital should amount to 
roughly $2.0 million.  The annual turnover for the Slovak plants 
could amount to 300-400 million korunas (Sk).  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISE FORMED WITH GERMAN COMPANY:  Representatives 
from the German Contitech company and the Slovak Vegum Dolne 
Vestenice shareholding company signed an agreement on a joint 
venture on 15 February.  The agreement involves the establishment of 
a joint enterprise to produce sealing sections and frames.  The 
joint enterprise has basic capital of Sk57.782 million.  Pressing 
and rubber-metallic products for the automobile industry will be 
manufactured in the enterprise, which employs 400 people. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL TRADE WITH FRANCE SK13O MILLION IN 1993:  Trade in 
agricultural products between Slovakia and France in 1993 amounted 
to roughly Sk130 million.  Slovakia imports mainly fish, soya, and 
breeding livestock from France.  Slovakia mainly exports beer, hops, 
and food products to France.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   FRANCO-SLOVAK CHAMBER OF COMMERCE ESTABLISHED:  A Franco-Slovak 
Chamber of Commerce was established on 16 February.  The new 
organization plans to assist in developing relations between small 
and medium-sized companies in France and Slovakia.  It will provide 
information and documentation services as well as a consulting 
service, and will publish economic and information bulletins.  The 
Chamber is based in Bratislava.  The chairman of its administrative 
council is Vladimir Valach.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 17 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   MILLIONS OF DOLLARS DEPOSITED ABROAD ILLEGALLY:  According to 
financial experts, capital amounting to several hundred million 
dollars has been taken out of Slovakia illegally and deposited in 
banks in Austria and Germany.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 
17 Feb 94 p 12 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISE ESTABLISHED WITH AUSTRIAN COMPANY:  An Austrian 
company, Rohrig Neudorf, has entered into a joint enterprise with 
Plasmet Vrable, which is part of the former Tesla Vrable company. 
The Austrian company's involvement includes a direct investment of 
Sk1O.5 million and a subsequent investment of Sk35 million to 
purchase new equipment.  A further investment of Sk3.O million will 
be used for repairs to Plasmet's premises.  The joint enterprise 
will create 50 jobs this year.  The company will manufacture 
metallic molds.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 17 Feb 94 p 13 
AU) 

   BELGIAN FIRM ACQUIRES MAJORITY STAKE IN ZILINA FIRM:  Eurofoam, a 
subsidiary of the Belgian Rectitel company, has acquired 51 percent 
of the shares in the Zilina-based Poly company, which specializes in 
transforming polyurethane.  Eurofoam is the new name of Schaumstoff- 
Chemie Holding, a joint enterprise founded in 1992 by Rectitel and 
its Austrian partner, Greiner.  The privatized company Drevonabytok 
owes 49 percent of the shares in Poly.  Eurofoam will invest two 
million Austrian schillings in new equipment.  (Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 18 Feb 94 p 4) 

   CUSTOMS ADMINISTRATION COLLECTS SK32 BILLION IN 1993:  The 
Customs Administration collected more than Sk39.2 billion last year. 
Revenue from value-added tax amounted to more than Sk32 billion and 
the revenue from consumer taxes amounted to Sk2.1 billion.  Customs 
duties amounted to Sk4.5 billion.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 
19 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   RUSSIAN FIRM BUYS SLOVAK AIRCRAFT ENGINES:  The Russian Yakovlev 
company has decided to purchase the DV 2 aircraft engine from the 
engineering plant in Povazska Bystrica.  It will use the engine for 
its YAK-130 training aircraft, which is not only intended for the 
CIS.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 19 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   210,000 HECTARES OF LAND TILLED BY PRIVATE FARMERS:  According to 
estimates, private farmers in Slovakia till roughly 210,000 hectares 
of land.  This is 12 percent of the overall acreage.  Most people 
make their living from agriculture in the Komarno, Levice, and 
Galanta Districts and fewest in the Martin and Zilina Districts. 
(Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 21 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF SMZ JELSAVA MAGNESITE PLANT APPROVED:  The 
government has approved a privatization project for the SMZ 
magnesite plant in Jelsava.  It will be privatized by a direct sale 
to a shareholding company made up of its employees and management, 
who will own 51-percent of the shares.  Almost 88 percent of the 
plant's employees are involved in the shareholding company. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 21 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   FOREIGN CURRENCY RESERVES UPDATED:  On 15 February 1994 the 
National Bank had foreign currency reserves of $330-350 million. 
Foreign currency reserves in the banking system as a whole amounted 
to $1.75-1.8 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 22 
Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   ACADEMY OF SCIENCES ISSUES REPORT ON ECONOMY:  Following the 
breakup of Czechoslovakia, the Slovak Republic has maintained its 
level of price liberalisation and its trade relations, says a Slovak 
Academy of Sciences report commissioned by the United Nations.  The 
report, written for the UN Economic Commission for Europe, says that 
although complications are appearing in Slovakia's transformation 
process, no significant political entity sees them as a reason to 
interrupt that process.  Slovakia experienced a 3.7-percent drop in 
its gross domestic product [GDP], which the report's authors call 
"relatively favorable," as it was partly due to reduced industrial 
production responding to restricted domestic demand.  Though the 
state budget was drawn up balanced, the government closed last year 
short Sk22.6 billion ($684 million), or 6.5 percent of GDP -- one of 
the factors in "a disturbance of the inner balance of the economy," 
the report continues. 

   Slovakia's overall debt in convertible currencies rose to the 
equivalent of Sk2.9 billion at the end of 1993.  The government 
accounted for 39 percent of that, the central bank for 31 percent, 
and commercial banks and businesses for the remainder.  The 
government's net debt to Slovak banking institutions was estimated 
at Sk61 billion, and the public sector's growing indebtedness 
restricts banks and businesses and "prevents stronger support for 
restitution aims," the report says.  Slovakia's balance of payments 
is tied to the Czech Republic's because of the two countries' high 
degree of interdependence. Stopping the "unfavorable development" in 
this area -- Slovakia's clearing account deficit reached Sk5.4 
billion, the Czech National Bank reported -- will require measures 
to increase Slovakia's exports and decrease its imports with the 
Czech Republic.  (Prague CTK in English 2118 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN REPUBLIC DECLINES:  Direct foreign 
investment in Slovakia declined from $151 million in 1992 to $135 
million in 1993.  Overall foreign investment in the republic since 
November 1989 amounts to $366 million.  The largest investor is 
Austria, which has invested $87 million in 1,141 companies between 
1990 and 1993.  It was followed by Germany with $77 million in 743 
companies, the United States with $47 million in 161 companies, and 
the Czech Republic with $40 million in 666 enterprises.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 24 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   OPTIONS MARKET RECORDS SECOND HIGHEST TURNOVER:  Turnover on the 
Bratislava Options Market in the week beginning 21 February amounted 
to almost Sk96 million.  This is the second highest figure since the 
introduction of one-day futures in the middle of last year. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   REPUBLIC GRANTED CREDIT OF $33 MILLION:  National Bank Governor 
Vladimir Masar and Japan Exim Bank Executive Director Yukinori Ito 
signed an agreement in Tokyo on 28 February on providing the Slovak 
Republic with credit of $33 million.  The credit is to be used to 
support small and medium-sized businesses.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 1 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES ROSE 16.7 PERCENT IN 1993:  Consumer prices 
increased by an average of 16.7 percent in 1993, and the cost of 
living rose by 15.6 percent.  The average consumer prices index was 
113.1 for foodstuffs; 115.5 for non-foodstuffs; 127.7 in public 
catering; and 119.6 in services.  During the same period, the 
average index among white-collar workers was 115.8.  It was 113.6 
for foodstuffs, 120.8 for beverages, 115.7 for non-foodstuffs, and 
115.7 for services.  The average index among farmers was 115.7.  It 
was  114.1 for foodstuffs, 118.0 for beverages, 116.2 for non- 
foodstuffs, and 116.2 for services.  The average index among 
pensioners was 114.2.  It was 110.7 for foodstuffs, 121.0 for 
beverages, 116.5 for non-foodstuffs, and 115.7 for services.  The 
prices of agricultural products in 1993 increased by 14.6 percent 
compared with 1992 and by 27.9 percent compared with 1989.  Prices 
for plant products, including fruit and vegetables, increased by 
14.6 percent in 1993 compared with 1992 and by 35.7 percent compared 
with 1989.  Prices for animal products in 1993 increased by 10.6 
percent compared with 1992 and by 22.2 percent compared with 1989. 
Prices for industrial products in 1993 rose by 14.5 percent compared 
with December 1992 and by 17.2 percent compared with the average for 
1992.  These figures were made available by the Slovak Statistical 
Office.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 9 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   REVENUE FROM TOURISM UP 13.0 PERCENT IN 1993:  The estimated 
foreign currency revenue from tourism in 1993 increased by 13.0 
percent and amounts to $241 million.  These results, however, only 
take into consideration the revenue of businessmen registered in the 
Business Register, but not in the Tradesmen's Register.  (Bratislava 
SME in Slovak 10 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   TATRA AIR IN RED IN 1993:  The Tatra Air shareholding company was 
7.0 million korunas (Sk) in the red in 1993.  This information was 
made available by its director general, Dusan Podhorsky.  Some 6,610 
passengers traveled with the company in 1993, and 660 tons of 
freight were transported.  An analysis has indicated that the 
problem does not lie in the number of passengers, but in increased 
overhead, especially the cost of fuel and lubricants.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 11 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   TAX EVASION COMES TO SK4.4 BILLION IN 1993:  Tax evasion last 
year amounted to Sk4.4 billion.  This is double the figure for 1992. 
However, the actual amount is probably higher.  The authorities 
carried out 166,000 inspections in 1993.  Some 94,000 were oriented 
toward income tax, more than 6,500 were oriented toward value-added 
tax, and some 16,000 were oriented toward employment tax.  Most tax 
evasion involves consumer taxes, especially on alcohol and tobacco. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 11 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   INSOLVENCY CAUSES SHORTFALL IN STATE BUDGET REVENUE:  Arrears in 
income tax from legal persons amounting to Sk11.9 billion 
represented the largest shortfall in state budget revenue last year. 
Because profit taxes and employment taxes for previous years 
amounting to Sk5.7 billion were diverted to the budget, the overall 
shortfall is around Sk8.O billion.  This situation was caused mainly 
by enterprises' secondary insolvency.  The shortfall in value-added 
tax amounted to Sk3.0 billion; in consumer taxes to Sk4.7 billion; 
in income tax from physical persons to Sk2.4 billion; and in road 
taxes to Sk574 million.  Some Sk1O.4 billion less than planned was 
diverted into the insurance funds.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 11 Feb 
94 p 2 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENTS AMOUNT TO SK11 BILLION:  To date, foreign 
businessmen and investors have invested around Sk11 billion in 
Slovak enterprises.  Investments increased by Sk4.0 billion last 
year.  Capital has been invested in 5,143 organizations.  The 
investment is under Sk100,000 in three-quarters of them.  Only in 
1.6 percent of these businesses have foreign businessmen invested 
more than Sk10 million.  Almost one-quarter of investments come from 
Austria.  It is followed by Germany and the United States.  The 
Czech Republic is in fourth place with 12.9 percent.  Most capital 
was invested in the K-Mart, Volkswagen, Chemlon, and Tatransky 
Permon shareholding companies and in the Henkel-Palma, Molnlycke, 
Samsong-Calex, Ludova Banka, Kablo, Credit Bank, Hoechst-Biotika, 
and LIAZ Velky Krtis limited companies.  Most capital was 
concentrated in Bratislava, almost 59 percent, and in the Poprad, 
Hummene, Nitra, Stara Lubovna, Kosice-Environs, and Vranov nad 
Toplou districts.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 12 Feb 94 pp 1,3 
AU) 

   COMMERCIAL BANKS' CAPITAL AMOUNTS TO SK11.4 BILLION:  Apart from 
the national bank, there are 16 banks in Slovakia, 14 of which are 
authorized to conduct general banking activities.  The commercial 
banks' capital amounts to Sk11.4 billion.  They have equity of 
Sk1O.4 billion, of which Sk1.4 billion -- that is, more than 12 
percent -- comes from abroad.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 14 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK ISSUES FOREIGN CURRENCY PERMITS FOR INVESTMENTS: 
During the first nine months of 1993, the Slovak National Bank 
granted business entities more than 170 foreign currency permits 
enabling them to invest abroad.  Some Sk187.5 million korunas were 
invested in joint enterprises abroad during this period.  The Slovak 
National Bank also issued five permits for investments abroad in the 
form of shares worth Sk51 million.  Most Slovak capital is invested 
in Ukraine, the FRG, and the Czech Republic.  (Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 14 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   DROPOFF IN APARTMENT CONSTRUCTION:  The number of apartments 
under construction and completed last year declined compared with 
the previous year.  Cooperative housing construction declined most 
significantly.  According to an analysis by the Statistical Office, 
citizens prefer individual housing construction and their interest 
in modernizing apartments and in adding additions and extensions to 
houses and apartments has increased slightly.  The number of 
completed apartments fell by 14 percent last year.  Most new 
apartments were built in western and eastern Slovakia, while the 
fewest were built in Central Slovakia.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 
14 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   DOLNE VESTNICE FIRM TO COOPERATE WITH FRG COMPANY:  Preparations 
are well under way in the Vegum Dolne Vestnice shareholding company 
for a joint enterprise with the German Contitech company.  This 
year, they plan to produce foam rubber for the automobile industry 
and seals for pressure vessels worth at least Sk4O million.  The 
agreement should be signed this month and the new company should 
commence operations on 1 April.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 14 Feb 94 
p 14 AU) 
ELAG/23 March/ECONF/East Europe Division/ta 25/2007z mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-68 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-043--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  GOVERNMENT RESTRUCTURING, SUBSEQUENT APPOINTMENTS </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
In     January 1994 the Mongolian Government approved changes in the 
government structure, including the combining of ministries, merging 
of institutes, and incorporation of the MONTSAME News Agency into 
Government.  The following changes and personnel assignments in 
response to these decisions were announced in the 1 February press. 

   In mid-January 1994 major changes occurred in the structure of 
the Mongolian Government:  the Ministry of Geology and Mineral 
Resources was abolished, its functions were amalgamated with the 
Ministry of Fuel, Power and Energy, and the Ministry of Power Power, 
Geology and Mining was established.  In conjunction with these 
changes the Mongolian Government announced the appointments of D. 
Misha and D. Amgalan as deputy ministers of power, geology and 
mining at its 27 January 1994 meeting. 

   At this meeting the Government also announced the decision to 
merge the State and Social Studies Academy, Leadership Development 
Institute and the Center for the Study of State Policy and Social 
Issues and create the State Administration and Leadership 
Development Institute effective 1 February 1994.  T. Adiyaa, doctor 
of economic sciences and former head of a Leadership Development 
Institute department, was named director of the newly established 
institute.  (Ulaanbaatar ARDYN ERH in Mongolian 1 Feb 94 pp 1, 2) 

   At its 28 January 1994 meeting the Government assigned Minister 
of Defense S. Jadambaa and Minister of Finance D. Dabaasambuu the 
task of determining the managerial structure of the State Civil 
Defense Office, the Tax Administration, and the Custom 
Administration, revising and approving the wage funds and estimate 
of expenditure limitations, and appointing directors and deputy 
directors. 

   In the process of preparing an organizational diagram, the 
government decided to subordinate offices, which had requested to 
belong to the substructure of the government, to ministries and 
offices of similar orientation.  The Railroad Administration, the 
Civil Air Transportation Administration, and the Geodesy and 
Cartography Office were subordinated to the Ministry of 
Infrastructure Development, the State Social Welfare Office and the 
National Welfare Center to the Ministry of Demographic Policy and 
Labor, the Archives Administration and Detention Units 
Administration to the Ministry of Justice, and the Patent Office and 
the National Center for Standardization and Measures to the National 
Development Office.  To comply with the law, the organizations of 
the Government will no longer be designated "subordinate to the 
Government" or "subordinate to a minister." 

   Focusing on the subordination of the youth and sports 
organizations the same meeting passed a resolution to abolish the 
Committee for Youths and Sports effective 1 February 1994.  It 
assigned to Minister of Demographic Policy and Labor E. Gombojab the 
organization and operation of the Office for Youths which the 
ministry's current staff will administer.  The Minister of Health P. 
Nyamdabaa was charged with the responsibility of the Mongolian 
National Olympic Committee in line with the policy to develop sports 
as specified in Paragraph 19 of the Law Concerning the Government. 
The issuance of this resolution also called for the implementation 
of measures to improve the structure and organization of youths, 
physical culture and sports in rural areas. 

   In conjunction with the inclusion of the MONTSAME News Agency in 
the government substructure C. Erdene was appointed its general 
director. (ARDYN ERH 1 Feb 94 p 2) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CISD (703) 733-6375.) 
ENEAG/28 MAR/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/JF 28/1649Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-69 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-28MAR94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      NPC Work Report Reflects Difficulty in Reform Implementation </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              The Government Work Report delivered by Premier Li Peng at the 
recent National People's Congress (NPC) in Beijing indicates that 
despite the resolve of party reformers to push ahead with senior 
leader Deng Xiaoping's new wave of market reforms they have yet 
to make significant progress in some of the most difficult areas 
of the reform agenda--price, investment, and enterprise reform. 
Although party reformers appear to retain the edge in pushing 
forward Deng's reform agenda, they will be hard pressed to find 
solutions to China's current economic problems that do not 
conflict with market principles and that will deflect political 
pressure coming from Deng's hardline opponents. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Delivered by Li on 10 March, the work report sought to portray 
Beijing as moving ahead on the far-reaching market reforms 
prescribed by the authoritative decision of the Third Plenum last 
November.  Calling 1994 a year in which the Chinese economy has 
"continued to maintain its growth momentum" and an "important" 
year to "press ahead with reform," the report reaffirmed the 
course of comprehensive market reform charted by the plenum as 
the "general blueprint" and "program for action" for creating a 
"socialist market economic structure" (Beijing radio, 10 March). 
It went on to claim that fiscal and tax reforms, as well as 
reforms in investment, finance and foreign trade, had "in the 
main been promulgated" and are "proceeding quite smoothly." 
Modest Progress in Financial Reform 

   In an apparent effort to demonstrate concrete progress in 
fulfilling some goals of the plenum, the work report emphasized 
recent changes in the method of financing the deficit--a first 
step toward transforming the People's Bank of China (PBOC) into 
an independent central bank along Western lines--and further 
reforms of the fiscal and tax systems that reduce the burdensome 
fiscal and welfare obligations of state enterprises.  For 
example, the report declared that the government "will solve its 
deficit this year by issuing state bonds," giving "favorable 
treatment" to those who purchase them, and "will no longer make 
overdrafts from banks."  Suggesting that reformers are already 
moving ahead in this area, a 10 March report in Zhongguo Tongxun 
She, a PRC-affiliated Hong Kong-based wire service, claimed that 
the PBOC recently refused a loan to the Ministry of Finance to 
clear the national debt.  It went on to quote Politburo Standing 
Committee member and PBOC head Zhu Rongji as saying that "no bank 
should be treated as a teller or an accountant for the 
government." 

   The work report also highlighted fiscal and tax reforms that were 
introduced after the plenum to ease the market transition of 
state enterprises by reducing their enormous financial and 
welfare burden.  Echoing media commentary on tax reforms 
promulgated in January, the report declared that "beginning this 
year" the State Council will exempt state enterprises from taxes 
levied to finance energy and infrastructure projects and from the 
"budget regulatory fund."  According to Jingji Ribao on 4 
January, these financial obligations have accounted for 25 
percent of enterprises' after-tax profits.  The work report also 
pledged to "actively advance" social security reform, both to 
"ease the burden" of "social welfare projects" such as medical 
care and housing and to enable enterprises to "compete in the 
market on an equal footing."  Suggesting that the government will 
exert greater pressure on unprofitable enterprises, the report 
announced that a "special fund" will be established to 
"consolidate bankrupt enterprises" and "reset tIe their workers." 

   Slow Movement on Price, Investment Reform 

   Despite these efforts to demonstrate progress in some aspects of 
the agenda pushed forward by the reformers, the report indicated 
that at least for now they have backed away from such 
controversial and potentially destabilizing proposals as price 
and investment reform.  Apparently reflecting leadership concern 
over mounting inflationary pressures, the report took a 
considerably more cautious approach to price reform than the 
plenum last fall.  It pledged simply to "appropriately adjust"- 
-that is, to increase by administrative fiat--the prices of 
grain, cotton, and energy "this year," a move that stands in 
sharp contrast to the plenum decision's statements on price 
reform.  The decision stated that the "main tasks" in price 
reform are to further "decontrol the prices of competitive 
commodities and services" while "adjusting government-set prices" 
for only "some" prices and to "establish a mechanism in which 
prices are set mainly by the market."  The decision also called 
for other price reform measures not reiterated in the NPC report, 
such as "abolishing the double-track price system for capital 
goods as quickly as possible" and "accelerating the marketization 
of the prices of production factors." 

   Underscoring the leadership's concern that removing price 
controls now might spark social unrest, the report went on to 
warn that in carrying out price reform, officials must "consider 
the ability of enterprises and the masses to cope with the 
consequences" of reform.  In an apparent reference to the sharp 
rise in grain and edible oil prices occurring late last year in 
major urban centers, the report pointed out that "special 
attention" must be paid to "controlling increases" in the prices 
of "basic consumer products" and services that are "closely 
related to the masses' daily lives."  Similarly alluding to 
leadership worries over social discontent arising from the 
effects of price reform and fast growth, the report, and Renmin 
Ribao editorials on the NPC on 13 and 18 March, reiterated media 
slogans carried in PRC media since the first of the year warning 
that the push for "reform and development" must be balanced 
against the need for "social and political stability." 

   The report also indicated that the leadership has backed away 
from the plenum's commitment to market-based reforms in the 
investment system, at least in the short term, falling back on 
traditional socialist measures to rein in what it said was the 
current "reckless" investment in capital construction projects. 
Although giving a nod to market-based principles that restrain 
irrational enterprise investment--a major component of the 
plenum-approved reforms--the report made clear that for now the 
leadership will rely primarily on efforts to fine tune the 
existing state bureaucracy to curb excessive and unprofitable 
capital expenditure.  "This year," it said, investment reform 
will focus "mainly" on the establishment of a "National 
Development Bank"--one of several socialist style "policy- 
lending" banks mandated by the plenum to fund "major state 
construction projects according to a unified plan."  The bank, it 
explained, will "provide a steady source" of investment funds and 
"check inflation and investment expansion through the balancing 
of capital." 

   Similarly, the report reflected continued leadership reliance on 
administrative fiat to curb current investment excesses, falling 
far short of far-reaching plenum guidelines on investment outside 
the state planning sector.  The plenum decision had stated that 
"competitive project investment" should be "decided by 
enterprises themselves" on the premise that they "bear any risk 
involved" and had called for the establishment "commercial banks" 
that would provide credit for such investment and would "assume 
sole responsibility for profits and losses."  However, although 
the work report urged that "a [market] mechanism for restricting 
investment" be established by making "investors and banks 
responsible for investment risks," it went on to simply issue a 
series of administrative orders, declaring that the state "will 
not permit" investment capital to be derived from "diverting 
circulating funds or borrowing money," that new projects "must 
not begin before necessary funds are available," and that the 
state would "no longer approve the establishment of new 
development zones." 

   Apparently reflecting these pressures on the leadership to resort 
to administrative measures to stem economic overheating, the 
government has already taken several steps to control inflation 
and excessive investment.  A 1 March Renmin Ribao commentator's 
article stating that the State Planning Commission had 
promulgated new regulations to prevent price gouging was followed 
by the announcement of a nationwide "price inspection" to be 
carried out in March to "ease inflationary pressure" (China 
Daily, 8 March).  Earlier in the year, during a financial work 
conference in January, Zhu Rongji also unveiled policies that 
impose strict limits on credit and investment (Xinhua, 19 
January). 

   Difficulty in Enterprise Reform 

   Most likely reflecting these and other obstacles to more rapid 
reform, the work report implied that progress toward the 
enormously complex plenum goal of restructuring state enterprises 
into quasi-public corporations based on various types of share 
holding arrangements has not met reformers' expectations. 
Although pledging to "experiment" with new forms of enterprise 
organization as required by the plenum, the report echoed the 
cautious tone of Li Peng's remarks to a national economic work 
conference held shortly after the plenum (Xinhua, 1 December 
1993), reiterating Li's observation that enterprise reform is 
"both the focus and the difficult part of reform" and emphasizing 
that creating a "modern enterprise system" is "complicated work." 
Suggesting that the leadership has not reached a consensus on the 
specifics of the new enterprise structure, PRC media since the 
plenum have carried a steady stream of articles advocating a 
variety of positions on share holding, managing state assets, 
leasing, and related issues. 

   Implications 

   The NPC work report's reaffirmation of the ambitious market-based 
reform goals approved by the Central Committee's November plenum 
suggests that party reformers retain the political edge in 
pushing forward senior leader Deng Xiaoping's aggressive policy 
agenda.  At the same time, the report also indicates that the 
reformers have made little concrete progress in implementing this 
agenda and have resorted to traditional administrative means 
rather than market-based methods to control economic overheating. 
Inflation, unrestrained investment, and other potentially 
destabilizing consequences of the reform drive have again put the 
brakes on the pace of change and no doubt have given party 
hardliners an opportunity to challenge Deng's authority and 
restrict the pace and scope of his program.  Although pressures 
to create a more stable and productive economic system through 
fundamental market reform still appear to favor the reformers' 
position, they will be hard pressed to find solutions to China's 
current economic and social problems that are consistent with 
marketizing the economy and that will undercut criticism from 
Deng's conservative rivals. 

(AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEIPLE/JF 28/1811Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-70 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000017994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-28MAR94-DPRK-U.S.-ROK 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK Calibrates War Rhetoric, Leaves Door Ajar for Talks </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                 Pyongyang's carefully calibrated media campaign against 
Washington and Seoul over the nuclear issue seems designed to 
convey the impression that while the North Korean leadership is 
prepared to deal with the full consequences of its refusal to 
abide by the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT), it still 
hopes for a negotiated settlement of the nuclear inspection 
issue. 
                              END SUMMARY 
      A measure of rhetorical restraint was evident in a 28 March 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement, the first authoritative 
statement observed to have been carried by Pyongyang media on the 
reported U.S. plan to deploy Patriot missiles to the South 
(Pyongyang radio, 28 March).  The statement "sternly denounced" 
the prospective shipment of Patriots to South Korea, calling it a 
"dangerous" and "irrational" military action.  Seeking to refute 
the U.S. assertion that the Patriot is a defensive weapon, the 
statement contended that the topography of the Korean peninsula 
enables the missile to be used to strike any target in the North 
with a change of its "warhead" and that it could be used for a 
preemptive strike on the DPRK.  Nevertheless, the statement fell 
short of an ultimatum and warned only of unspecified "grave 
consequences" while calling on Washington to give the issue 
"profound and deliberate consideration." 

      The 28 March statement was in sharp contrast to Pyongyang's 
earlier nonauthoritative pronouncements, which the North Korean 
leadership has used for its more vituperative attacks.  The 
shrillest of these pronouncements, carried by Pyongyang radio on 
26 March, characterized the reported U.S. plan to resume Team 
Spirit and deploy the Patriot missiles as actions that are 
"dangerous in the extreme" and as moves that could bring on "a 
catastrophic crisis."  It accused Washington of "frantically" 
attempting to "isolate and crush" the DPRK.  Similarly, a 26 
March Pyongyang radio commentary described U.S. plans to deploy 
the missiles as "sinister" and charged that there is a U.S. 
contingency plan to mobilize "two marine divisions, more than 200 
warships, and over 1,600 planes" from the U.S. mainland to Korea 
in case of war, and claimed that the carrier Carl Vinson and 30 
other ships have already been deployed "near" the Korean waters. 
The commentary warned that while Pyongyang does not want war, it 
is "by no means afraid of war," and went on to liken an attempt 
to "swallow" North Korea to an attempt to "break a boulder" with 
"a rotten egg." 
      Harsh as these pronouncements may sound, the North seems to be 
holding back bigger ammunition in its rhetorical arsenal.  For 
instance, North Korean media have not been observed to repeat 
once-standard phrases such as "the U.S. imperialists are the 
sworn enemy with whom the Korean people cannot live under the 
same sky," "the Korean people will certainly make the enemy pay a 
thousand-fold for the blood shed by fellow countrymen at the 
hands of the enemy," and "shameful and humiliating defeat to the 
aggressors."  Such expressions surfaced briefly after the North 
Korean withdrawal from the NPT last year (Pyongyang radio, 17 
March 1993; KCNA, 13 May 1993). 

      Talks With U.S. Pyongyang also seems to be seeking to 
foster the impression that it is interested in somehow preserving 
dialogue with the United States.  For example, the 28 March 
Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement, by contending that the 
introduction of the Patriots would violate last June's DPRK-U.S. 
joint statement, also seemed to imply that Pyongyang still 
regards itself and Washington as bound by the statement's 
principles that have served as the basis for further Washington- 
Pyongyang dialogue.  Further signaling Pyongyang's lingering 
interest in pursuing dialogue with Washington, the spokesman's 
statement, by accusing the South Korean government of trying to 
"frustrate the DPRK-U.S. talks," intimated that resumption of the 
talks is a goal to be striven for. 

      Although Pyongyang media have begun criticizing U.S. 
Congressional and Administration leaders, such as Secretary of 
State Christopher and Secretary of Defense Perry (KCNA, 24 March; 
Pyongyang radio, 28 March), they have so far refrained from 
personal attacks on President Clinton.  For instance, KCNA on 23 
March used the proper title and name--"U.S. President Bill 
Clinton"--in criticizing the President's decisions on Team Spirit 
and the Patriots. 

      Talks With South     Pyongyang media treatment of South Korea 
since the breakup of the inter-Korean talks on 19 March also 
seemed designed to convey the impression that the North has not 
totally ruled out dialogue with Seoul.  Pyongyang media have so 
far withheld authoritative comment on South Korean Defense 
Minister Yi Pyong-tae's recent remarks suggesting that the South 
would view any attack by the North as "an opportunity" to reunify 
the nation (Seoul Chungang Ilbo, 24 March).  Moreover, the 28 
March Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement used the neutral 
term "South Korean authorities" to refer to the ROK Government. 
Although nonauthoritative pronouncements coming from the North 
have continued to refer to ROK President Kim Yong-sam as a 
"traitor" and "puppet," these pronouncements have also contained 
the less pejorative references to "the Kim Yong-sam regime" and 
"the Kim Yong-sam group" (KCNA, 25 March).  Even a statement 
attributed to the League of Socialist Youth of Korea, a youth 
organ traditionally among the most vituperative in its 
denunciations of South Korean leaders, has mixed terms such as 
"the South Korean authorities" and "the Kim Yong-sam group" with 
the "puppet clique." 

      Implications     Pyongyang media's fine-tuned campaign against 
Washington and Seoul suggests that, in spite of its recent 
hardline stance on the nuclear inspection issue, the North Korean 
regime finds it politic to convey the impression that it has not 
ruled out a negotiated settlement of the issue. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HORTON/SMB 29/0235Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-71 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-29Mar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      NATO Partnership Proposal Meets Hedged Support, Ambivalence </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              While campaigning to convince the new legislature of the value of 
Russian accession to NATO's Partnership for Peace, Russian 
government officials continue to portray the program as merely an 
interim step toward broader European security measures that will 
provide prominent status for Russia.  Influential members of the 
Duma, on the other hand, are taking a skeptical attitude, 
expressing concern that the terms of Russia's association with 
NATO will be dictated, rather than negotiated, and will harm 
Russia's security interests.  Although the Defense Ministry 
newspaper has supported joining the program, other media 
commentary across the political spectrum appears to reflect 
nationalistic fears that Russian interests will be damaged 
whether or not it joins the Partnership. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Testifying at 16-17 March Duma hearings, government officials 
promoted accession to the NATO Partnership for Peace program, 
arguing that Russia will gain influence by joining but risks 
isolation if it does not.  Yuriy Nazarkin, head of the 
coordination and interaction department of the Security Council's 
staff; Yuriy Ushakov, head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs' 
(MFA) Department for European Cooperation; and Major General 
Pavel Zolotarev from the Defense Ministry all stressed that to 
"disregard" Partnership for Peace would mean a disastrous self- 
isolation that would damage Russia's security.  Nazarkin and 
Ushakov warned that refusing to join would strengthen those who 
were pushing for NATO expansion and argued that in joining Russia 
could influence the program (Interfax, 17 March).   In 
enumerating a long list of membership advantages, Zolotarev 
contended that by joining Russia would demonstrate to the world 
its interest in collective security and "neutralize" the anti- 
Russian forces that are seeking to exclude Russia from the 
international arena (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March). 

Moscow's Mixed Signals 

   Despite this supportive testimony and Defense Minister Pavel 
Grachev's statement that Russia would join the program soon, 
other signals from the government suggest that it is unsure about 
how fast to move ahead.  After his 17 March meeting with U.S. 
Defense Secretary William Perry, Grachev told reporters that 
"groups of experts" are "already completing work" on Russia's 
membership application, adding optimistically that "we shall be 
able to join the concept by the end of the month" (ITAR-TASS, 17 
March).  More cautiously, however, First Deputy Defense Minister 
Andrey Kokoshin said it was "too early" to discuss when Russia 
would sign on to the program (Interfax, 18 March).  A 19 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article, discounting speculation that Grachev 
meant that Russia would "definitely" sign in March, cited a 
Foreign Ministry "clarification" that the signing might take 
place in late March or more likely later.  The article attributed 
the delay to the need to finish drafting the documents, "wind up 
interdepartmental consultations," and "solve a number of 
technical problems"--including who would sign, Grachev or Foreign 
Minister Andrey Kozyrev. 

   In addition, Russian President Boris Yeltsin and other senior 
officials have continued to express reservations about the 
program--particularly its implications for NATO expansion--and to 
press for movement toward alternative European security measures: 

-- In his 24 February address to the Duma, Yeltsin warned against 
any NATO expansion without Russia and made clear that, while 
Moscow supported Partnership for Peace, it viewed the program as 
a waystation to building a pan-European partnership "open to all 
states of the greater Europe" in which CSCE would take the lead 
and NATO would be relegated to a subordinate role (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 25 February). 

-- After a meeting with FRG Defense Minister Volker Ruehe in 
Berlin on 11 March, Grachev intimated that he views the program 
as only a stopgap measure until new European security structures 
emerge, touting the CSCE as the "main peace-keeping organization 
in Europe," and noting that "time will tell what the [NATO] 
structure will be like" (ITAR-TASS, 11 March).  These remarks 
echoed his suggestion to reporters on 2 February that the program 
was transitional, providing for a coordinated effort to defuse 
tensions in Europe by NATO and other countries, including Russia, 
during "an interim period following the breakup of the Warsaw 
Pact."  He also reiterated his previous warnings against the 
accession of former Warsaw Pact members and the Baltic states to 
NATO (Interfax, 2 February). 

-- Kozyrev, likewise, has continued to warn against NATO 
expansion and laud CSCE merits.  In an address to a 10 March MFA 
Foreign Policy Council session, he complained about 
"NATOcentrism" within the alliance which has led to a push for a 
"mechanical" expansion, adding that this demonstrates a "vacuum 
of strategic thought" and undermines the goal of "moving toward a 
single, Greater Europe" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, Kommersant-Daily, 
11 March).  Although Kozyrev said Russia is close to signing 
Partnership for Peace documents, he continued to argue that CSCE 
should become the core of Europe's security system.  Like 
Grachev, he hinted that collaboration within a NATO framework 
might be only temporary, saying that a "necessary historical 
period" perhaps "two to three years in length" had "opened up" to 
"elaborate and implement cooperation programs."  Similarly in a 
17 March Izvestiya article, he said that NATO was "inadequate" 
and "unsuitable" for "current purposes" and contended that while 
Partnership for Peace would provide "a partial answer" to 
security problems, it could not "be considered the pinnacle of 
achievement." 

   In a sign that not all of Yeltsin's administration share the view 
that Russia has more to gain than to lose by joining the program, 
Presidential Council adviser Andranik Migranyan, in a 15 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article titled "Why Join, If It Is Better Not 
To Join," strongly opposed Russian accession.  Claiming that 
there is no consensus on the issue within the Foreign Ministry, 
he listed numerous adverse consequences if Russia joins.  He 
contended that the program would deepen Russia's isolation and 
"sharply limit its freedom for foreign policy maneuvering." 

Doubts in the Duma 

   Many influential members of the Duma apparently remain ambivalent 
about the Partnership plan, opposing what they view as NATO's 
"dictat," and worried that a broad range of security interests 
from the competitiveness of Russia's defense industries to its 
security arrangements with other CIS countries will suffer: 

-- Former Ambassador to the United States Vladimir Lukin, a 
member of the moderately reformist Yavlinsky bloc and chairman of 
the Duma's international affairs Committee, conceded the 
Partnership idea was good, but said the "devil was in the 
details," which had been insufficiently thought through (Moscow 
radio, 17 March).  He said that Russia, "instead of trying to 
"push to the head of the line" to join,  should carefully analyze 
what should be done for a more active rapprochement with NATO and 
closely follow NATO's reorganization.  Lukin also expressed 
concern that involvement with the Partnership program could wreck 
Russia's "strategic intentions to create security structures 
within the CIS framework" (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March) 

-- Sergey Yushenkov, chairman of the Duma's defense committee and 
a Russia's Choice member, said while in Washington with a Duma 
delegation that he objected to membership on the grounds that 
"the framework agreements were drawn up without [the Duma's] 
participation and do not conform to Russia's status" and that 
NATO standardization would be "simply destructive" for Russia's 
defense industries.  He advocated instead a security alliance 
between Russia and other countries in which the guidelines would 
not be set by NATO, as in the case of Partnership for Peace, but 
would be worked out "jointly" (Interfax, 9 March; Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 18 March).  More recently, however, he appears to have 
changed his position on joining.  During the Duma hearings 
Yushenkov said he supports Russian membership, but maintains it 
should be carried out on special terms given Russia's "status as 
a nuclear power."  Like many government officials, he contended 
that the NATO program should be viewed as "the beginning of a 
path toward a common security system" (Interfax, 17 March). 

-- Konstantin Zatulin, chairman of the Duma's CIS affairs 
committee and co-chairman of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord faction, warned the MFA Foreign Policy Council session 
that Russia's participation in the "Partnership" program would 
dash its hopes [unspecified] in the "near abroad," because even 
now CIS countries were trying to "blackmail" Russia by appealing 
to the West for help (Kommersant-Daily, 11 March). 

Media Reaction 

   Russia media commentary on the Partnership for Peace program has 
reflected fears about isolation if Russia fails to join, 
suspicion that Russian interests may suffer if it does join, and 
resentment that Russia's options thus are limited.  NATO bashing 
has been a staple of procommunist newspapers like Pravda and has 
intensified in the wake of the February NATO ultimatum to the 
Bosnian Serbs, but even reformist and pro-Yeltsin newspapers 
appear ambivalent toward membership, although the Defense 
Ministry newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda, supported it: 

-- The procommunist newspaper Pravda printed a long diatribe on 
16 March by retired general Viktor Chudov, who charged that 
Partnership for Peace was designed as a cover for "peace U.S.- 
style" and "world domination."  The article, which claimed that 
planned U.S.-Russian exercises were designed to counter 
"reunification sentiments" in former Soviet republics and to 
inspire "separatists and nationalists" to "vigorous activity," 
lambasted the Defense Ministry's "top brass" for engaging in such 
exercises instead of carrying out its own war games designed to 
repel aggression "by a coalition of nuclear powers." 

-- The reformist newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, which printed the 
highly critical Migranyan article, frontpaged another article on 
15 March titled "Russia's Partnership With NATO Is A 
Misalliance."  The article maintained that Russia could have 
received better terms if it had held out longer before agreeing 
to join, claiming that there had been growing sentiment in the 
West to offer Moscow something more in line with its "great 
power" status.  Now, the article warned, Moscow confronts a new 
dilemma:  to face isolation and discrimination if it does not 
become a full member of NATO, or to place its armed forces, 
military plans, and budget under the command and control of the 
United States if it does join, since "under a long-standing 
tradition, the NATO commander in chief has always been and 
remains an American general." 

-- A 23 March article in the mass-circulation newspaper 
Komsomolskaya Pravda contended that, although Moscow had little 
choice, it would be "humiliating" for it to follow "in the wake 
of U.S. policy," "jostling for space on the margins." 
Complaining that "Washington is the banker and Russia is "forced 
to play blind," the article noted sarcastically 
that "you can judge for yourselves how far such 'partnership' can 
be called mutually beneficial and equal." 

-- A 16 February article in the usually pro-Yeltsin newspaper 
Izvestiya warned that Russia could lose its arms market in 
Eastern Europe as countries switched to NATO standards.  A 19 
March Izvestiya article admitted that the program was not popular 
in the Duma and gave minimal support to the government's campaign 
to promote it, confining its advocacy to pointing out that 
without Russia the program was "meaningless" and that Moscow had 
made clear to Secretary Perry that Russia intends to join "on its 
own terms." 

-- On 22 March, prominent Krasnaya Zvezda commentator Aleksandr 
Golts, echoing the government's line, strongly backed Partnership 
for Peace and criticized the "emotional" arguments of its 
opponents.  Claiming that the actual partnership program had 
emerged because Washington "was forced to take Moscow's tough 
stance [on NATO expansion] into consideration," Golts stressed 
that the main point in the program was that each country would 
develop its own relationship with NATO on a bilateral basis and 
that Moscow is elaborating terms "which will take maximum account 
of Russian interests."  Golts insisted that "the fears that 
Russia condemns itself to a secondary role by signing the 
partnership program scarcely hold up," while the risks that 
Russia faces if it does not join "are as clear as can be": the 
program would "acquire an unambiguously anti-Russian thrust." 

Outlook 

   While government officials support joining the NATO Partnership 
for Peace program as beneficial to Russia's security interests, 
they clearly view the program as a stop gap measure and hope it 
will foster the creation of a European security system in which 
Russia will play a major role.  Influential legislators, in 
contrast, appear more fearful that NATO affiliation will further 
marginalize rather than foster Russian influence in Europe.  This 
reaction from the legislature, coupled with the skeptical 
reaction from even the independent press, may pressure the 
government to demonstrate that it remains an equal and assertive 
player in the working out of the terms of any NATO partnership. 

(AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/DEW 29/1810Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-72 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-29Mar94-Russia-Ukr 
<H3> <TI>      Media Developments:  Russia and Ukraine No. 5 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     Special Memorandum, "Media Developments:  Russia and 
Ukraine," is a periodic series aimed at reporting and analyzing 
changes to and events affecting the Russian and Ukrainian media. 
Comments and queries regarding this series may be directed to 
Chief Analyst, ENEAG at (703) 733-6072. 

In this issue ... 

Spotlight on ... 

Russia: Sovetskaya Rossiya--Zyuganov's Mouthpiece 
Russia: RIA-Novosti Returned to Government Oversight 

Features 

Russia: Zavtra Ambivalent About Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Government Daily Tries, Fails at Independence 
Russia: Editorial Turmoil at Pravda 
Russia: Government Official Moves To Restrict Media Access 
Ukraine: Post-Postup--Attempt at a Western-Style Newspaper 

In Brief 

Russia: Vladivostok Newspapers Suspended 
Russia: Rossiyskaya Gazeta To Run Tatar Insert 

Other Publications of Interest 

Russia: Journalists Slam TV Campaign as Biased, Uninformative 
Russia: Last Minute State TV Campaign Against Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Pro-Communist Press Keeps Options Open on Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Debt Crisis Temporarily Halts State Broadcasting 
Russia: Yeltsin Restructures Media Bureaucracy 
Russia: RTV Blasts Yakovlev, Poltoranin 

   Spotlight on ... 

   Russia: Sovetskaya Rossiya--Zyuganov' s Mouthpiece 

   Summary:  The opposition newspaper Sovetskaya Rossiya has served 
as a mouthpiece for Gennadiy Zyuganov's Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation (CPRF) since at least July 1993, when the 
newspaper began publishing a regular insert, Pravda Rossii, which 
carries news of CPRF functions, official party positions, and 
commentary by party officials.  The partnership between the paper 
and the party is not surprising in view of their shared 
ideological inclinations, which involve the fusion of nationalism 
and communism.  The evolution of such a nationalist-communist 
fusion has been evident in the pages of Sovetskaya Rossiya for 
some time, and the CPRF has steadily moved in that direction 
under Zyuganov's leadership.  Moreover, the Zyuganov-Sovetskaya 
Rossiya connection pre-dates the August 1991 coup, when 
Zyuganov's attacks on CPSU reformers were printed and echoed in 
the pages of what was then the RSFSR's official communist 
newspaper. 

   Sovetskaya Rossiya began publishing Pravda Rossii on 10 July 1993 
with "Special Edition" Number 1 ("Prepared jointly with the 
Central Executive Committee of the CPRF"), but, at least for now, 
the CPRF appears only to be extending limited financing to the 
Pravda Rossii insert and not to Sovetskaya Rossiya as a whole. 
The "Special Edition" carried an announcement of the election of 
the Presidium of the Central Executive Committee of the CPRF 
(whose membership includes Central Executive Committee Chairman 
Gennadiy Zyuganov), an announcement excerpted from the CPRF 
action plan" (including a call to Muscovites to attend a mass 
meeting to protest "the course taken by the government"), news of 
CPRF regional activities, and a CPRF Central Executive Committee 
"Announcement," which called on "all patriotically inclined 
social groups," from "workers to our native private 
entrepreneurs," to "halt the collapse of Russia, to save her 
state unity."  At the 15 March CPRF Central Executive Committee 
plenum, Zyuganov chided the party for not paying sufficient 
attention to the publication of Pravda Rossii and for not 
"rendering assistance "--presumably financial--to Sovetskaya 
Rossiya (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 17 March). 

   Subsequent editions of Pravda Rossii have continued to stress 
patriotic themes, sometimes combined with a socialist-oriented 
economic line, and to highlight the activities and viewpoints of 
the CPRF.  Pravda Rossii Number 2 published the election platform 
of the CPRF in anticipation of possible early parliamentary 
elections.  The platform combined nationalistic calls for the 
preservation of the territorial integrity of the Russian 
Federation and exhortations that the "salvation and 
strengthening'' of Russia's indigenous ''spirituality'' are 
necessary conditions for the rebirth of Russia" with traditional 
communist denunciations of "the forced capitalization" of Russia 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 22 July 1993).  Virtually every edition of 
Pravda Rossii has reported on activities of local CPRF 
affiliates.  Number 3, for example, carried news from CPRF groups 
in Northern Ossetia, Ryazan, Orel, Volgograd, and Moscow 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 5 August 1993).  Number 4 carried an 
announcement proclaiming the CPRF to be the party of "state 
patriotism," whose ideology is directed toward "the salvation and 
rebirth of Russia," while simultaneously attacking "bourgeois 
liberalism."  In the same edition, the CPRF Central Executive 
Committee encouraged communists to subscribe to Sovetskaya 
Rossiya as part of its broader efforts to "spread" the CPRF line 
in "the party press" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 7 September 1993).  The 
CPRF-Zyuganov-Sovetskaya Rossiya connection was further 
illustrated in the political arena on 12 December 1993, when 
Sovetskaya Rossiya editor Valentin Chikin was elected as a deputy 
to the State Duma on the CPRF party list. 

   While remaining true to its communist origins, Sovetskaya Rossiya 
has augmented its communist ideology with a strong dose of 
Russian nationalism in recent years, including the regular 
publication of an insert entitled Rus Pravoslavnaya (Orthodox 
Russia), which frequently features articles by the nationalist 
Metropolitan Ioann of St. Petersburg.  This tilt toward 
nationalism has been evident for some time.  For example, like 
most prominent Russian newspapers, Sovetskaya Rossiya carried 
special coverage of the Russian government's commemoration of the 
first anniversary of the August 1991 coup attempt, but it used 
the opportunity to attack the "democrats" in a particularly 
nationalist vein.  According to an article published on 20 August 
1992, "A certain group among the 'democratic forces' consists of 
representatives of youth," who are "mesmerized" by "pro-American, 
anti-Russian and anti-Soviet propaganda, camouflaged as anti- 
communist."  The article maintained that these groups were 
heavily infiltrated with "agents of influence" carrying out a 
plan that had been "worked out in Washington" for the 
"destruction of the USSR, then Russia" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 20 
August 1992).  In the same issue the paper's political observer, 
Eduard Volodin (like Zyuganov, Volodin later joined the 
nationalist-communist opposition National Salvation Front, whose 
manifesto was published in the 6 October 1992 edition of 
Sovetskaya Rossiya and was signed by, among others, Volodin, 
Zyuganov, and Chikin), called the August 1991 events a loss of 
"national honor . . . and national dignity," rather than a 
liberation from "stagnation and dogmatism."  According to 
Volodin, the "democrats" in the government were conscious agents 
of "the builders of the 'New World Order, '"--an allusion to the 
United States--who were seeking "the destruction of Russia's 
international authority" as well as the "dismemberment" of the 
Russian state. 

   As Sovetskaya Rossiya embraced nationalism, so did the CPRF and 
its leading figure, Zyuganov.  Zyuganov was elected chairman of 
the CPRF Central Executive Committee by a party congress in 
February 1993.  That same party congress adopted a "Program 
Statement" that included a section called "The Fatherland in 
Danger," which urged the "consolidation of all . . . patriotic 
forces, united by the idea of saving the Fatherland."  Other 
sections of the statement side-stepped communist dogmas by 
endorsing a mixed economy (although the state sector would still 
be the "basis" of the "multisector economy") and calling for 
communist cooperation with all "patriots," including active 
members of the Orthodox Church (Pravda, 26 February 1993).  The 
extreme nationalist weekly Den subsequently endorsed Zyuganov's 
election and characterized the "majority of the delegates" to the 
congress as "not just fans of the long dead writers Marx and 
Lenin" but as "ordinary citizens" who were concerned with the 
"fate of the Fatherland" (Den, 21-27 February 1993).  Zyuganov 
himself subsequently trumpeted the nationalist-communist line in 
Sovetskaya Rossiya and actively participated in organizing and 
leading nationalist organizations.  In an article entitled "The 
Russian Question," Zyuganov called on leaders of the "patriotic 
movement" to develop an "ideology of national rebirth" as part of 
a "national liberation" strategy for Russia (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 
3 July 1993).  He called his opponents in the "democratic" camp 
"those who hate Russia," and saw the collapse of the USSR as just 
another chapter in the "thousand-year" history of efforts to 
destroy Russia.  He repeated similar charges in a front-page 
article in Sovetskaya Rossiya on 28 August 1993 entitled Derzhava 
(Great Power), which viewed the Soviet period as simply one stage 
in the development of the Russian nation and empire.  Zyuganov 
was cofounder of the Council of National-Patriotic Forces of 
Russia, organized in 1992, a cochairman of the Organizational 
Committee of the National Salvation Front from 1992 until the 
October violence in Moscow, and a cochairman of the Duma of the 
Russian National Assembly, a nationalist organization founded in 
1992 by ex-KGB General Aleksandr Sterligov. 

   Old Ties 

   The Sovetskaya Rossiya-Zyuganov connection predates the August 
1991 coup attempt, when Sovetskaya Rossiya published a series of 
Zyuganov articles and interviews attacking reform and carried 
other articles defending Zyuganov's positions.  Zyuganov fired 
his first salvo in an anti-reform barrage in Sovetskaya Rossiya 
on 20 March 1991, when he attacked Boris Yeltsin and his efforts 
to forge ties with Russia's new class of entrepreneurs, which 
Zyuganov derided as a "homegrown bourgeoisie."  He followed with 
an attack on the "architect" of perestroyka, Aleksandr Yakovlev, 
whom Zyuganov held responsible for the social and economic 
problems of the Russian Federation: "What lies in store for us- 
-the final destruction of all social connections . . . a social 
explosion?" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 7 May 1991).  A 6 June 1991 
article called the reformists "false prophets" and claimed that 
the Soviet Union had reached the "breaking point."  In a 
subsequent interview, Zyuganov lamented that the Soviet Union 
found itself on the "verge of national catastrophe" (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 25 June 1991).  Zyuganov's views, and his attack on 
Yakovlev in particular, were defended in a 22 June article by 
Volodin, in which Volodin continued the attack on reforms in 
general (Sovetskaya Rossiya 22 June 1991).  Zyuganov also signed 
the open letter, "A Word to the People," widely believed to have 
been a call to arms in anticipation of the August 1991 coup 
attempt (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 23 July 1991). 

   Russia:  RIA-Novosti Returned to Government Oversight 

   Summary:  A recent edict signed by President Boris Yeltsin ends 
almost two years of organizational turmoil within the RIA-Novosti 
news agency by placing it under the sponsorship of the Russian 
Council of Ministers and apparently returning to it a foreign 
propaganda function similar to that of its predecessor, APN.  The 
edict appears to quash the agency's own efforts in recent years 
to achieve independence from state or presidential control, but 
it is not yet clear whether its new official status will affect 
its domestic news reporting function. 

   An edict signed by Yeltsin on 23 December 1993 ordered the 
conversion of the RIA-Novosti news agency from a quasi- 
independent media organization to an agency of the Russian 
Government and also assigned to it apparent propaganda and 
analytical functions that differentiate it from the official news 
agency ITAR-TASS.  According to the edict, the transformed RIA- 
Novosti will become a "state information and analysis agency" 
whose purpose is to provide "information and analytical support 
for Russia's domestic and foreign policy and creat[e] a favorable 
image of the Russian state" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 30 December 
1993). (See Note 1)  The apparent propaganda function assigned to 
RIA-Novosti underscores its role as the successor to the old 
Soviet Novosti Press Agency (APN), whose purpose was to promote 
"mutual understanding, trust, and friendship among peoples" 
through "widespread dissemination abroad of true information" 
about the USSR and by "familiarizing" the Soviet public with the 
"life of people of foreign countries" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 
July 1993).  In addition, the 23 December edict stated that the 
Council of Ministers is to "ratify the charter" of RIA-Novosti, 
apparently an oblique way of saying that the Council of Ministers 
is the agency's new founder (sponsor), since the Russian Law on 
the Mass Media establishes that the founder "ratifies the 
editorial charter" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 8 February 1992). 
Finally, the edict guaranteed state funding for RIA-Novosti and 
granted it a number of tax breaks and official privileges. 

   (Note 1)  By contrast, a recent Yeltsin edict characterized ITAR- 
TASS as a "central state news agency" and asserted a more 
politically neutral purpose for its formal transfer to the 
government--to create the "conditions for ensuring high quality 
and timeliness in the collection and dissemination of 
information" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24 December 1993).  The impetus 
for Yeltsin's edict on ITAR-TASS appears to have been the 
dissolution of the Federal Information Center and the need to 
transfer formally its media organizations to the jurisdiction of 
the Council of Ministers. 

   The transfer of RIA-Novosti to government oversight appears to 
cap a period of restructuring in the agency that began last 
September and has included the appointment of new management.  On 
15 September Yeltsin ordered the Council of Ministers to "adopt 
the necessary measures to fully reconstitute the activity" of 
RIA-Novosti (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 18 September 1993).  Two days 
later a government decree appointed Vladimir Markov, a former 
Novosti political observer, as chairman of the agency (ITAR-TASS, 
17 September 1993; Izvestiya, 25 September 1993).  Markov 
replaced Maysarat Makharadze, whose departure from RIA-Novosti 
may be linked to the appointment of her husband, former Deputy 
Premier Valeriy Makharadze, as trade representative to Canada 
(Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 21 September 1993).  More recently, a 
government directive appointed former RIA-Novosti journalist 
Aleksandr Slabynko and Anatoliy Chebotarev as deputy chairmen of 
the agency's board (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 11 March). 

   Foreign, Domestic Information Role 

   Markov, who remains the agency's chairman, has outlined an 
ambitious program for RIA-Novosti that seeks to combine its role 
as an instrument of Russian foreign policy and as a domestic news 
agency capable of competing with ITAR-TASS and the independent 
news agency Interfax.  He has indicated his support for RIA- 
Novosti's propaganda role--though he himself reportedly does not 
use that word (Izvestiya, 25 September 1993)--saying that it was 
a "big mistake" to discard the "services" of APN in providing 
"informational support for Russia's foreign policy" and affirming 
RIA-Novosti's "duty" to ensure that "Russia has a worthy image 
abroad" (Moscow radio, 31 October 1993).  Among the tools he will 
apparently use for this purpose are the old APN methods of 
preparing articles, commentaries, photos, and television items 
for and "at the behest of" foreign media (Izvestiya, 25 September 
1993).  At the same time, he has argued that the "handful" of 
news agencies currently operating in Russia are "not enough for a 
huge country" and has said that RIA-Novosti will strive to inform 
people "at the local level about the activity of all branches of 
power."  Additionally, Markov foresees a "public relations" role 
for the agency, providing "informational assistance for our new 
political parties," possibly through the dissemination of party 
programs and announcements (Izvestiya, 25 September 1993; Moscow 
radio, 31 October 1993). 

   Organizational Turmoil 

   The transfer of RIA-Novosti to government oversight formally 
reverses an earlier Yeltsin edict that was to have merged the 
agency with the TASS state news agency.  On 22 January 1992 
Yeltsin ordered RIA-Novosti and TASS to merge into one agency, 
ITAR-TASS, although he apparently authorized some components of 
RIA-Novosti to operate independently as the RIA joint-stock 
company (see box 1).  However, for reasons that are unclear, the 
merger of the two news agencies appears never really to have 
taken effect.  On 8 January 1992 Makharadze replaced Andrey 
Vinogradov as director of RIA-Novosti under circumstances that 
one experienced journalist called "strange" but are undoubtedly 
due to her political connections (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 27, 5 
July 1992; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993) (see box 2). 
According to the journalist, the impetus for the merger had 
already "disappeared" with the ouster of former RIA-Novosti 
chairman Vinogradov (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 27, 5 July 1992). 

   Under Makharadze, RIA-Novosti continued to function--at least as 
a domestic news agency--and to enjoy some independence from state 
control, (See Note 2) but her attempts to merge the RIA joint- 
stock company with RIA-Novosti into a larger, quasi-independent 
joint-stock company ultimately failed.  In June 1992--perhaps as 
a result of Makharadze's personal connections--the Russian 
Government reportedly authorized the transfer of RIA-Novosti's 
property to the RIA joint-stock company, thus effectively 
reversing Yeltsin's January 1992 edict that had transferred RIA- 
Novosti's property to TASS and had ostensibly abolished RIA- 
Novosti (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993).  Makharadze, 
however, wanted to go a step further and to merge the RIA joint- 
stock company with RIA-Novosti into a larger joint-stock company 
with the state as the majority share holder.  She expected a 
government order to this effect by 1 August 1993 (Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, 24 July 1993), but it apparently never materialized, and 
Yeltsin's most recent edict appears to dash her plans. 

   (Note 2)  When Yeltsin created the Federal Information Center 
   (FIC) in December 1992 and appointed Poltoranin to head it, a 
provision in the edict made the FIC a cofounder (cosponsor) of 
RIA-Novosti, indicating that the agency still existed, at least 
on paper (See the FBIS Trends of 21 January 1993, pages 16-22). 
In an interview more than a year later, Poltoranin said that the 
"Russian Information Agency"--apparently meaning the joint-stock 
company--did not belong "structurally" to the FTC and that the 
FTC had "not yet considered the transfer" of RIA's sponsorship to 
the FTC (RIA, 26 May 1993). 

   Box 1 

   The Tumultuous Existence of APN-IAN-RIA-Novosti 

   February 1961.  Established as an "information organ of Soviet 
public organizations," the Novosti Press Agency (APN) formally 
came under the sponsorship of the USSR Union of Journalists, the 
USSR Union of Writers, the Soviet Society of Friendship and 
Cultural Relations With Foreign Countries, and the All-Union 
Znaniye Society, though in reality it was under the control of 
the CPSU Central Committee's ideological department, which 
appointed Novosti's top officials (Moscow Central TV, 1 August 
1990; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

   July 1990.  In an apparent response to signs that the Yeltsin-led 
RSFSR Supreme Soviet wanted to wrest control of Novosti from the 
Union Government--part of a broader battle waged by the RSFSR to 
establish its own media outlets--then-USSR President Mikhail 
Gorbachev signed an edict transforming Novosti from a public 
agency "subsidized by the state" into a "presidential, state 
agency" (Moscow Central TV, 1 August 1990).  At the same time, 
its name was changed to the Novosti Information Agency (IAN), but 
the agency's basic propaganda function reportedly remained the 
same (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

   August 1991.  In the wake of the failed coup attempt, a Yeltsin 
edict of 22 August removed IAN Director Albert Vlasov from his 
post and  transferred the agency to the jurisdiction of the RSFSR 
Ministry of the Press and Mass Media. 

   September 1991.  A decree of the RSFSR Council of Ministers 
merged IAN with the Russian Information Agency (RIA), an 
independent news agency founded six months earlier by Andrey 
Vinogradov--himself a former Novosti journalist--but the agency's 
formal status and sponsorship were unclear.  Renamed RIA-Novosti 
and headed by Vinogradov, the combined agency took legal title to 
IAN's considerable assets, including publishing houses, printing 
plants, photography labs, and television production studios as 
well as an extensive network of foreign bureaus (IAN, 30 August 
1991, 12 September 1991; Tokyo Shimbun, 25 September 1991).  The 
merger apparently caused disgruntlement among IAN staffers, who 
contended that Vinogradov's experience heading RIA's staff of 50 
reporters--all based at the time in the RSFSR and former Union 
republics--left him ill-qualified to manage the complexities of a 
worldwide news agency (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 September 1991). 

   January 1992.  In a highly controversial move that sparked 
concerns about attempts by the Russian Government to bring the 
media under tighter control, a Yeltsin edict of 22 January 
ordered the merger of RIA-Novosti and the official state news 
agency, TASS, into the newly-named ITAR-TASS.  Then-Minister for 
the Press and Mass Media Mikhail Poltoranin offered the official 
explanation that the state needed to reduce spending on the 
agencies, but an official investigation into RIA reports about a 
purported government order to partially withhold workers' wages 
allegedly leaked to it by a government source suggested high- 
level displeasure with the agency and with Vinogradov in 
particular.  The combined news agency was placed under the 
directorship of TASS's Vitaliy Ignatenko, a former Gorbachev 
spokesman who became the head of TASS in the wake of the failed 
coup. 

End Box 1 

Box 2 

   The Meteoric Rise of Maysarat Makharadze 

   According to Maysarat Makharadze, then-Minister for the Press and 
Mass Media Mikhail Poltoranin "invited" her to head RIA-Novosti 
because he liked "the fact that I had a lot of journalistic and 
industrial experience" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993), but 
this explanation seems disingenuous.  By her own account, 
Makharadze's journalism experience appears limited to provincial 
media.  She began writing for the Chechen newspaper Groznenskiy 
Rabochiy in 1959 and became a correspondent for Dagestanskaya 
Pravda within a year.  After earning a degree at Makhachkala 
University in Dagestan, she worked for unspecified regional 
newspapers and television stations until 1977.  Upon her 
husband's assignment to Udmurtiya in 1977, Maysarat Makharadze 
left journalism to work in a bottle making factory, rising 
suspiciously quickly to shop director and, ultimately, factory 
director.  As Valeriy Makharadze's political career flourished 
and brought him to Moscow, so, too, did Maysarat's.  She served 
briefly at the end of 1991 as deputy press minister under 
Poltoranin before he appointed her to head RIA-Novosti 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

End Box 2 

Features 

   Russia:  Zavtra Ambivalent About Zhirinovskiy 

   Summary:  Interviews and commentary in the ultranationalist 
weekly Zavtra--the successor to Den--following the December 
elections (through February) suggest that hard-line nationalist 
oppositionists regard the electoral success of Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy and the Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR) 
with ambivalence.  While reaction on the whole was hostile, some 
opposition figures, including Zavtra editor Aleksandr Prokhanov, 
appear to view Zhirinovskiy as a potential political ally. 

The first issue of Zavtra--now published in Vladimir--following 
the elections (No. 4, December 1993) featured a front-page 
section entitled "Nashi (Our People) in the Duma," which carried 
interviews with prominent opposition figures who had won election 
to the State Duma, including August 1991 coup plotters Anatoliy 
Lukyanov and Vasiliy Starodubtsev, as well as nationalist 
television personality Aleksandr Nevzorov.  No member of the LDPR 
was interviewed and the evaluations of the LDPR's success were 
decidedly mixed.  Nevzorov yas the most positive in his 
assessment, observing that he counted Zhirinovskiy among those he 
considered "nashi."  Lukyanov took a more ambivalent view, 
observing that the voters "did not vote so much for Zhirinovskiy 
as they did against the [Yeltsin] regime."   He maintained that 
although his own views differ from Zhirinovskiy's, the LDPR 
nevertheless "expresses the interests of those who feel that the 
Russian empire is being methodically destroyed" and that the 
government is conducting "an attack" on "the Russian [Russkiy, 
that is, ethnically Russian] people and Russian interests."  He 
also complained that ''the patriotic movement'' was not 
represented" during the elections, claiming that the government 
had deliberately blocked "patriotic" movements like Sergey 
Baburin's Russian National Union (RNU) from registering for the 
elections and had thus "cleared the road" for a Zhirinovskiy 
victory.  Lukyanov asserted that, since Zhirinovskiy had 
supported the president's efforts to pass the draft constitution, 
the "democrats" had counted on Zhirinovskiy's continued support. 
"Now they feel that the constitution can work for Zhirinovskiy as 
well," he said, alluding to the presidential aspirations of the 
LDPR leader.  In Lukyanov's view, this is why government 
supporters are currently attacking Zhirinovskiy in the press. 

   Starodubtsev, in the most negative assessment of the three, 
called Zhirinovskiy's "promises" a form of "dangerous" populism 
and termed his foreign "ambitions" a "provocation."  He added 
that if Zhirinovskiy did not seek a "clash" with the communists 
or the agrarians, he would discover that they, too, are "people 
who sincerely feel pain for Russia."  An unsigned front-page 
article in the same issue seconded Starodubtsev's negative view, 
taking up the assertion that the "democrats" had deliberately 
aided Zhirinovskiy in order to thwart the communists and 
"patriots."  The article asserted that Zhirinovskiy was incapable 
of the kind of "great power leadership" that National Salvation 
Front or RNU leaders had displayed.  The writer considered 
Zhirinovskiy a "marionette" manipulated by the Yeltsin regime. 

   Zavtra's first issue for January 1994 continued the hostile tone, 
featuring a savage attack on Zhirinovskiy by Eduard Limonov, a 
one- time member of his "shadow cabinet."  In the article, 
Limonov called Zhirinovskiy "an enemy of Russian nationalism" who 
had merely used nationalism as a vehicle for furthering his own 
personal aims.  "Is it not degrading that a former activist of 
the Jewish movement [Zhirinovskiy] . . . informs us of his plans 
to protect Russians?" he asked.  Limonov also maintained, as 
Lukyanov had in the previous issue, that Zhirinovskiy's success 
was due to the government's blocking of the registration of 
nationalist parties for the December elections. 

Zhirinovskiy Interview 

   In an interview with Zhirinovskiy published in February (No. 6), 
Zavtra editor Aleksandr Prokhanov displayed a friendly attitude 
toward the LDPR leader.  Though Prokhanov mentioned 
Zhirinovskiy's reputation as an "eccentric politician," he noted 
their shared notions concerning the "Russian idea," which 
included the conviction that the "mongrel" Russian Federation is 
"in no way Russia as such."  Taking his cue from Prokhanov, 
Zhirinovskiy contended that the future Russian Empire should 
include all the territory of the former USSR "at a minimum" and 
seconded Prokhanov's assertion concerning the just nature of the 
Russian people and empire.  Zhirinovskiy claimed that the empire 
had "uplifted" all its former subjects, raising primitive 
cultures, such as that of the Kazakhs, to "cosmic heights."  "You 
and I were not together [previously], in one party, but we think 
identically," he told Prokhanov. 

   Russia:  Government Daily Tries, Fails at Independence 

   Summary:  Rossiyskiye Vesti has renewed its government 
affiliation after a six-week experiment with independence during 
which it found the financial difficulties entailed in the loss of 
government funding too harsh to bear.  The return to government 
sponsorship places Chief Editor Valeriy Kucher in a dilemma, as 
he will likely have to rein in the editorial independence on 
which the paper had embarked or risk alienating the holders of 
the purse strings in the government. 

   On 31 December Rossiyskiye Vesti announced that it was severing 
its ties to its official sponsor, the Russian Council of 
Ministers, and becoming an independent newspaper.  The 
announcement said that the paper's journalists collective had 
decided on 29 December to terminate the relationship with the 
Council of Ministers because the Council of Ministers had failed 
to fulfill its "statutory obligations" to the editorial office, 
tried to "impede" the work of the chief editor and the paper's 
journalists, and attempted to ''get rid of'' the editor as 
unsuitable."  They also charged that the government would not 
accept" criticism from the, paper.  The announcement noted that 
the paper's status as a government publication had given it an 
unjust" image as an "obedient" publication that had an "adverse 
effect" on its standing.  It claimed that its new status would 
allow it to "perform its social role considerably more freely and 
professionally" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24, 31 December 1993).  The 
journalists based their actions on the Law on the Mass Media 
which stipulates that sponsorship reverts to a publication's 
editorial office in the event of the sponsor's reorganization, 
and noted that Russian President Boris Yeltsin had reorganized 
the Government with his 23 December edict "On the Transformation 
and Reorganization of the Council of Ministers-Government of the 
Russian Federation." 

   Following the announcement, the paper continued to publish 
regularly until 25 January, when it failed to appear.  Editorial 
information published on the back page of each issue now listed 
the Journalists' Collective of the Editorial Office as the 
"temporary" sponsor whereas before it had listed the Council of 
Ministers.  The paper reappeared on 1 February, having missed 
five regularly scheduled issues, and apologized for its "forced 
interruption."  The paper charged that its decision to assume 
sponsorship in lieu of the Council of Ministers resulted in a 
cutoff of credits to cover publishing costs (1 February).  When 
it reappeared, however, its distribution was apparently confined 
to the Moscow region until 2 March, when it published an issue 
containing an apology to regional readers who, the paper said, 
had not received their subscriptions for a month. 

   Government Ties Reestablished 

   On 12 February the paper resumed listing the government as 
sponsor, without offering an explanation, and listed the 
journalists' collective as a cosponsor.  Without mentioning the 
resumption of government sponsorship, the apology asserted simply 
that the "suspension of publication" was due to "interruptions in 
[state] budget financing."  In its New Year's message to 
subscribers, the paper had noted that in the absence of 
government financial support it would be resorting to increased 
advertising as a means of self-financing (4 January).  However, 
Russia's weak advertising market apparently made this solution 
unviable, especially on such short notice. 

  Early Signs of Rift 

   Preliminary signs of tension between Rossiyskiye Vesti's 
government affiliation and its staffers' desire to exercise 
editorial freedom appeared during the October 1993 political 
crisis between the president and the parliament.  The paper 
criticized police for rough handling of journalists attempting to 
provide coverage of the crisis, including journalists from 
opposition newspapers who attempted to cover the standoff.  The 
paper also decried Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin's decree 
putting the defunct Supreme Soviet's official newspaper, 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, under government sponsorship, as a violation 
of the law and of the rights of the paper's staffers (2 October). 
Rossiyskiye Vesti also questioned the legality of the 
occupation" by law enforcement personnel of the editorial 
offices of opposition papers Den, Sovetskaya Rossiya, and Pravda 
(6 October) and condemned as ''lawlessness'' what it called the 
extremely dangerous trend" of "closing down media without trial 
or investigation" (16 October). 

   Not long after the October events, rumors began to appear that 
efforts were underway to remove Kucher due to "differences" 
between him and Chernomyrdin over the role of the government 
press (Kommersant-Daily, 30 November).  Eight days before the 
decision to sever its relationship with the government, a 
journalists' collective meeting charged that "individual 
employees" of the Council of Ministers apparatus were "attempting 
to command" the newspaper and that high- level members of the 
apparatus had attempted to oust Kucher (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24 
December).  The paper accused the government of attempting to 
"destroy Rossiyskiye Vesti as an independent" newspaper and 
"return to the old methods of directing the press, to make it an 
obedient executor of the will of apparatus bureaucrats."  The 
paper also reported that the journalists' collective had given 
Kucher a vote of confidence. 

   Though the paper claimed that its assertion of independence was 
not an "attempt to stand in opposition" to the government and 
that it would "fairly and thoroughly" report the government's 
efforts to reform the economy (4 January), the move to 
independence had an almost immediate impact on its editorial 
line, transforming the paper from a relatively loyal defender of 
government policy to a harsh critic.  On 22 January the paper 
illustrated its new editorial latitude by publishing an 
unprecedentedly critical commentary that called the formation of 
the new cabinet "undemocratic," compared it to a Soviet-era 
cabinet, and charged that it would not represent the interests of 
the broad public.  The commentary also took aim at Economics 
Minister Aleksandr Shokhin, accusing him of trying to "reanimate 
Gosplan," the Soviet-era state planning agency.  Since its 
reacceptance of government sponsorship, no such criticisms have 
been observed. 

   Implications 

   While the return to government sponsorship has apparently eased 
the paper's financial difficulties, it does not appear to have 
solved the fundamental conflict between the journalists and the 
government.  Despite the fact that the journalists' collective 
has been made cosponsor along with the government, real control 
is probably wielded by the government via the purse.  And 
although Kucher continues to serve as chief editor, tension 
between the paper and the government is likely to remain, placing 
his continued tenure in doubt. 

   Russia:  Editorial Turmoil at Pravda 

   Summary:  After five months that featured four changes of chief 
editor, three publishing hiatuses, and a circulation decline of 
more than half, the situation at Pravda appears to have 
stabilized, at least temporarily.  Most of this turmoil seems to 
be attributable to a struggle for financial control of the 
newspaper between ousted editor Viktor Linnik, who, apparently 
backed by many of the paper's staff, wants to reestablish Russian 
control, and rival editor Aleksandr Ilin, backed by a Greek 
businessman who owns a controlling interest in the paper. 

   The latest round of troubles for Pravda began when, during the 
height of the October crisis in Moscow, the Ministry of the Press 
and Information, acting under President Boris Yeltsin's 
declaration of a state of emergency, suspended the paper's 
publication.  Following the suspension First Deputy Press 
Minister David Tsabriya, overstepping his legal authority, 
"ordered" that Pravda change its name, reregister, and replace 
Chief Editor Gennadiy Seleznev with Deputy Chief Editor Ilin. 
Ilin agreed to the ministry's terms and promised to resume 
publication of Pravda as a paper of "civilized opposition," 
echoing the language of press ministry officials in an apparent 
attempt at appeasement (Izvestiya, 16 October 1993).  Ilin 
appeared ready to assume the role of chief editor of the paper 
under the new name Put Pravdy [The Way of the Truth] when the 
paper's staff elected Linnik in his place.  Linnik also appeared 
to appease press ministry officials, stating his intention to 
turn Pravda into a voice of "civilized opposition" (Radio Rossii, 
28 October), and after a month-long hiatus, the paper reappeared 
on 2 November as Pravda, not Put Pravdy, with Linnik as chief 
editor.  The paper published normally until 19 November and then 
again disappeared from newsstands until 10 December.  The paper 
then continued to publish through 4 February, but on 5 February 
it suspended publication briefly following another election by 
the staff which, on this occasion, elected Ilin as chief editor 
(Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 8 February).  Pravda reappeared on 9 
February and has been publishing regularly since. 

   Trojan Horse in the Editorial Office?     Left orphaned after the 
dissolution of the CPSU in December 1991, Pravda eventually found 
new financial backing through a partnership with a Greek 
businessman.  In August 1992 Rossiyskaya Gazeta reported that the 
paper, having failed to find backing from Russian businessmen, 
had signed an agreement with the Greek firm Steel Light Holding, 
Ltd. and its president, Yannis Yannikos (8 August).  Yannikos and 
Pravda together formed the joint-stock company Pravda 
International, with Yannikos holding a 55 percent controlling 
interest but reportedly having "no intention of interfering in 
the newspaper's content."  A Moscow News commentary on the deal 
questioned Yannikos' credentials and the credibility of Steel 
Light Holding, Ltd. and quoted Greek journalists who called the 
deal "shady and highly suspicious" (Moscow News, 23-30 August 
1992).  The commentary alleged that Yannikos had ties to the CPSU 
and might be fronting for the party, or alternately, that he was 
simply a "petty businessman" trying to "lay his hands on 
anything" that could be "grabbed." 

   Pravda's Election Silence 

   Indications of possible troubles between the paper's chief editor 
and its Greek sponsor surfaced after the paper went silent at the 
height of the fall 1993 national election campaign.  When it 
reappeared on 10 December, just two days before the elections, 
the paper apologized to its readers for disappearing at such a 
critical moment and, without explicitly naming Yannikos or 
stating a motive, said simply that an unspecified "they" had "cut 
off" the paper's "oxygen supply"--presumably a reference to 
financial support.  The paper continued to appear into the new 
year, but the print run fluctuated from a high of 350,000 on 4 
January to a low of 120,000 on 21 January before stabilizing at 
172,934 on 9 February.  According to Linnik, from December to 
February, financial backing for publication came not from 
Yannikos but from Russian entrepreneur Konstantin Zatulin--a 
deputy from the Party of Russian Unity and Accord--and the 
Russian Communist Party (CPRF) (Moskovskiye Novosti, 6-13 
February). 

   Nationalist Challenge to Greek Ownership 

   A report in Moskovskiy Komsomolets (28 January) asserted that a 
conflict between Linnik and Yannikos started to develop following 
the October political crisis when Linnik launched a search for 
Russian sponsors.  In a 5 February Interfax report, Linnik was 
quoted as saying that most of Pravda's staff wished to see a 
"Russian corporation" as the paper's sponsor.  Meanwhile, an 
appeal appearing in the weekly Golos (15-21 February) written by 
a former Pravda journalist noted that the word "pravda is Russian 
... but by no means Greek," encouraged Yannikos to go back to 
Greece if he wishes to publish a newspaper, and called for 
sponsors who are "serious, respectable, and most importantly, our 
own Russians."  According to Ilin, Linnik's search for long-term 
domestic financial backing failed (Kommersant Daily, 10 
February).  Apparently neither Zatulin nor the CPRF were willing 
or able to give the paper such backing. 

   Linnik Ousted 

   In another round of conflict at the paper, Yannikos apparently 
engineered Linnik's removal and his replacement by Ilin.  After 
another brief publishing hiatus, which began on 4 February, the 
paper reappeared on 9 February with a "word to the reader" 
announcing that on 4 February the "work collective of the 
editorial office" had elected Ilin as the new chief editor.  The 
announcement also protested "distortions" being spread in the 
media by some Pravda staffers that the staff was caught in a 
struggle between the "advocates of a national Russian paper" and 
those willing to "sell out to foreign capital."  Indeed, the 
accounts of the situation at Pravda that appeared in Moskovskiye 
Novosti (6-13 February) and Kommersant-Daily (10 February) 
painted just such a picture.  According to these accounts, 
Seleznev, the chief editor when the deal with Yannikos was first 
struck, had sold Yannikos the controlling interest "for pennies"- 
-without consulting the collective--in exchange for promises of 
high salaries and vacations on the Greek isles.  But pay was low 
or non-existent (except for such loyalists as Ilin who reportedly 
received 130,000 rubles per month) and the only one to enjoy a 
Greek vacation was Seleznev himself.  Yannikos allegedly 
interfered in the editorial process, fired one journalist for 
writing a negative piece about an acquaintance, compiled a "black 
list" of 13 more journalists he wanted to see fired, and wished 
to "drive out" Linnik, whom he could not control because he was 
elected.  The accounts also alleged that Yannikos had withheld 
financing but promised to increase honoraria and resume financing 
publication in exchange for Linnik's removal, and that the 
election removing Linnik was conducted in violation of the 
paper's charter. 

   Staff Split, Duma May Decide Issue 

   Linnik's defeat in the election may not be the end of the 
internal conflict.  While Linnik's name no longer appears on the 
listing of the editorial staff, he reportedly has not yet 
relinquished his office (Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 8 February) and 
claims the support of "most of the staff" (Interfax, 5 February). 
Ilin has confirmed that a split among the staff continues to 
exist but played down its impact on the paper's day to day 
operations, asserting that even those workers who support Linnik 
"continue to help put out the newspaper" (Kommersant-Daily, 10 
February).  According to Kommersant-Daily (10 February) on 9 
February, unnamed Pravda representatives made a proposal to the 
State Duma to introduce a draft law forbidding "foreign control" 
over Russian media sources. 

   Implications 

   Duma action to deprive Yannikos of ownership cannot be ruled out 
in view of his heavy-handed efforts to establish editorial 
control over a paper that the many nationalist and communist 
deputies in the Duma regard as a national institution.  If 
Yannikos remains in control, draconian policies such as his 
willingness to silence Pravda, one of the leading opposition 
papers, during a critical political period may delegitimize the 
paper in the eyes of its readership and result in further 
declines in its circulation and loss of influence among 
opposition politicians. 

   Russia:  Government Official Moves To Restrict Media Access 

   Summary:  In a widely publicized move that raises questions about 
the government's commitment to openness, Vladimir Kvasov, head of 
the cabinet's apparatus, attempted to severely restrict media 
access to meetings of the Russian Government.  Although Kvasov 
subsequently asserted that the tight restrictions applied only to 
the 3 February Government meeting, he has continued to advocate 
restricting media access and shown only limited tolerance for 
public airing of official debate on contentious issues. 

   In an apparent response to widely publicized reports about his 
recent attempt to restrict media access to government meetings, 
Kvasov has attempted to portray the move as a temporary measure 
made necessary by concerns about lax procedures for accrediting 
journalists.  As initially reported by the news agencies Interfax 
and ITAR-TASS on 3 February, Kvasov issued an order barring all 
journalists except those from the newspaper Rossiyskaya Gazeta- 
-which came under the government's sponsorship after the 
dissolution of the Supreme Soviet in September--from attending 
meetings of the Russian Government "from now on."  Kvasov's order 
coincided with the 3 February Government meeting which was 
scheduled to discuss the potentially divisive issue of subsidies 
for agriculture in 1994 (ITAR-TASS, 3 February).  According to 
one report, Kvasov's move even "took the government's own press 
service by surprise" (Moscow radio, 3 February).  Defending his 
action, Kvasov said in an interview to Rossiyskaya Gazeta (8 
February)--whose staffers were not observed to challenge either 
the initial media restrictions or Kvasov's explanations--that the 
restrictions were necessary after the government's move to new 
quarters created "confusion," prompting his "verbal instruction" 
that the accreditation system for journalists "should be 
regulated." 

   Suggesting that Kvasov is still trying to restrict media access 
and defend the government's apparent preference to avoid media 
scrutiny, Kvasov has set limits on the media's access and 
justified the exceptions made for the official media.  Kvasov 
explained the preferential access extended to Rossiyskaya Gazeta 
by saying that only media outlets "accredited to us [the 
government]" should be able to attend working meetings, later 
adding that journalists from the official news agency ITAR-TASS 
would also be allowed to cover such meetings (Moscow radio, 3 
February; ITAR-TASS, 4 February).  Kvasov added that media 
accreditation in the future will depend on the agenda of the 
Government sessions, with broad access granted to general 
meetings but only ITAR-TASS and Rossiyskaya Gazeta allowed to 
cover more specialized sessions that affect the "interests of a 
narrow circle of specialists" (Moscow radio, 3 February; ITAR- 
TASS, 4 February). 

   Kvasov's arguments for restricting media access suggest that the 
government has only limited tolerance for media scrutiny and- 
-perhaps of more significance to the development of a civil 
society in Russia--is unwilling to extend to the media a role in 
fostering public debate on contentious issues.  Underscoring his 
reluctance to allow the media to report official debate on 
current issues--and thus to increase the potential for public 
opinion to exert pressure on officialdom--Kvasov stated that the 
government is "ready" to provide the media with "necessary 
materials, but only after a final decision is made on the 
discussed problems" (ITAR-TASS, 4 February).  He expounded on 
this theme in his interview to Rossiyskaya Gazeta, criticizing 
the media for reporting issues that were "still at the discussion 
stage" and claiming that this practice "disinformed society, 
destabilized the situation in the country, and cast the 
government in an unfavorable light." 

   Ukraine:  Post-Postup--Attempt at a Western-Style Newspaper 

   Summary:  Since its establishment in September 1991, the 
newspaper Post-Postup has distinguished itself by its 
comprehensive coverage of national, local, and international 
news.  Linked to a news agency of the same name, the newspaper in 
1993 began consciously to model itself after Western-style 
journalism while serving as a proponent of moderate Ukrainian 
nationalism and economic reform. 

   Post-Postup is a small-circulation (30,000), independent weekly 
based in Lviv in western Ukraine. Like other unsubsidized 
newspapers, its financial situation is rather shaky, sometimes 
leading it to suspend publication for a time (it did not publish 
at all during January 1994, although the press agency of the same 
name continued to function).  Originally a small locally-oriented 
newspaper, it was revamped in 1993 into a Western-style newspaper 
with a tabloid format.  The paper covers national, local, and 
international news in a more thorough manner than is usual in the 
Ukrainian press, which tends to be more focused on national news 
or exposes.  Post-Postup's editor, Oleksandr Kryvenko, is running 
for parliament in the March 1994 election with the Nova Khvylya 
(New Wave) bloc, a group of moderate nationalists from Lviv 
including Ihor Yukhnovskyy and Viktor Pynzenyk, who favor 
political and economic reform.  The newspaper can be 
characterized as moderately nationalist, strongly in favor of 
economic reform, and critical of Ukrainian President Leonid 
Kravchuk and the conservatives in power in Kiev.  Nevertheless, 
it does not emphasize the historical and patriotic themes of 
other Lviv papers such as Za Vilnu Ukrayinu.  The newspaper 
contains less editorializing by correspondents--although some 
remains--and more straight reporting than is typical in the 
Ukrainian press.  Unlike other independent newspapers, such as 
Nezavisimost and Vechirniy Kyyiv, it does not strongly bear the 
personal stamp of the editor.  It does not have signed front-page 
editorials or regular columns by the editor. 

   The newspaper was officially registered in September 1991 along 
with a separate press agency with the same name, which has 
correspondents in all major western Ukrainian towns and nearly 
all oblast centers.  Originally Post-Postup appeared to be aimed 
at a youth audience, publishing a great deal of satire and racy 
material to attract readership.  It focused on local material and 
national news, as is typical of most Ukrainian papers.  In 1993 
the newspaper was revamped completely, dropping the satirical and 
racy material in favor of serious reporting.  Post-Postup is 
divided into three sections: Politics (including national, 
regional, and international), Business, and Culture (including 
the arts, sports, and cultural commentary).  As might be 
expected, national politics is covered extensively.  Issues have 
featured, for example, the government's economic decrees and an 
overview of the political parties (9 December 1993), Rukh 
election tactics, and the activities of the Kuchma-Hrynyov 
election bloc (16 December 1993). 

   One of the distinguishing features of Post-Postup is its detailed 
coverage of regional politics, especially from eastern Ukraine. 
There are regular reports from Odessa, Poltava, Donetsk, and 
Kherson, as well as other cities.  The 2 December issue included 
reports on Kharkiv political groupings, while later issues 
covered Donetsk, Kherson, and Odessa politics (16 December 1993) 
as well as the election chances of various party candidates in 
Zaporizhzhya, Odessa, and the Crimea (28 February). 

   Another feature that sets Post-Postup off from other Ukrainian 
papers is its international coverage.  Usually the Ukrainian 
press limits itself to coverage of its immediate neighbors, 
primarily Russia.  While events in Russia are well covered by 
Post-Postup (the Russian elections and the success of 
ultranationalist candidate Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, etc.), other 
world events receive attention as well, for example, the Anglo- 
Irish talks, U.S. policy toward Russia (9 December 1993), Serbian 
elections, and Turkish-Israeli relations (30 December 1993). 

   Economic reporting is not neglected either.  There is wide 
coverage of business issues with a particular emphasis on the 
views and activities of private bankers and entrepreneurs. 
Government credit and exchange rates are criticized (9, 16, 23 
December 1993); private bankers give their 1994 economic 
prognoses (30 December 1993); joint venture troubles and 
privatization in Lviv are explored (9, 23 December 1993); and 
articles on computer systems and-safety are published (2, 9 
December 1993). Notably absent are old-style articles glorifying 
production or long interviews with officials giving their views 
and remedies for the current economic crisis. 

   In Brief 

   Vladivostok Newspapers Suspended 

   An ITAR-TASS item carried in the 23 March Izvestiya reports that 
the Vladivostok newspapers Bolshoy Vladivostok [Greater 
Vladivostok], Utro Rossii [Russia's Dawn], and Krasnoye Znamya 
[Red Banner] have been suspended in the wake of the ousting of 
Mayor Viktor Cherepkov.  Both Bolshoy Vladivostok and Utro Rossii 
reportedly had supported Cherepkov, while Krasnoye Znamya, 
according to ITAR-TASS, "sided with his opponents from the Kray 
administration."  Anatoliy Lyapyakin, editor of Bolshoy 
Vladivostok, together with other unnamed "human rights 
defenders," has, according to the ITAR-TASS report, "appealed to 
the U.S. Consulate General," requesting "permission to travel 
outside Russia's borders." 

   Rossiyskaya Gazeta To Run Tatar Insert 

   An 11 January Rossiyskaya Gazeta article announced that a weekly 
insert on Tatar affairs and culture will be added to the paper. 
The Tatar Berdemlek-Yedinstvo--founded jointly by Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta and the Government of the Republic of Tatarstan--will 
reportedly be the first ethnic publication to obtain nationwide 
circulation.  The publication reportedly targets ethnic Tatars 
living outside Tatarstan by featuring lessons in the Tatar 
language and articles on Tatar customs and holidays; the insert 
will be published in Russian.  Last year Tatar officials 
initiated the dubbing of Russian Television's "Vesti" news 
program into Tatar as a reflection of Tatarstan's official "state 
languages" of Russian and Tatar (Russian TV, 17 June 1993). 
According to editor-in-chief Natalya Polezhayeva, Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta is "prepared" to cooperate both with ethnic republics and 
with "other peoples"--"Ukrainians, Germans, Jews, Koreans"--who 
lack national formations in the Russian Federation. 

   Other Publications of Interest 

   Russia:  Journalists Slam TV Campaign as Biased, Uninformative 

   Even before the official television campaign got underway with 
the broadcast of the first free programming, some print 
journalists had charged that government-controlled television was 
biasing the campaign in favor of Russia's Choice by its 
continuing coverage of the official activities of many prominent 
government officials running for the legislature on the Russia's 
Choice ticket.  A front page article in the 19 November issue of 
the independent newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, for example, cited 
what it claimed were "a great multitude of examples illustrating 
Ostankino's obvious political affiliation."  According to the 
article, programs presenting Russia's Choice candidates were 
"camouflaged as being 'simply' programs." (See Note 3) 

   (Note 3)  See the FBIS Trends of 15 December 1993, pages 18-20, 
for the full text of this article. 

Russia:  Last Minute State TV Campaign Against Zhirinovskiy 

   On the eve of the 12 December legislative elections, state 
television broke with its previous policy of providing uncritical 
coverage of the contending partied by airing two programs 
attacking Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, chairman of the misnamed Liberal 
Democratic Party of Russia.  This last-minute attempt to turn 
voters against Zhirinovskiy suggests that high-level officials 
within the Russian Government had become aware of strong popular 
support for Zhirinovskiy, at least by the eve of the election. 
(See Note 4) 

(Note 4)  See the FBIS Trends of 15 December 1993, pages 57-58, 
for the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  Pro-Communist Press Keeps Options Open on Zhirinovskiy 

   Pro-communist newspapers Pravda and Sovetskaya Rossiya have 
reacted cautiously to the success of Vladimir Zhirinovskiy's 
Liberal Democratic Party (LDPR) in the party preference voting in 
the 12 December Russian legislative elections.  Perhaps in part 
out of fear of offending a disaffected electorate that they too 
are attempting to woo with their own nationalistic appeals, they 
have refrained from harsh criticism of him and have left open the 
possibility of communists cooperating with the LDPR in the new 
legislature.  At the same time, they have laid the lion's share 
of the blame for Zhirinovskiy's success on what they consider the 
misguided policies of the reformers in the government. (See Note 
5) 

(Note 5)  See the FBIS Trends of 5 January 1994, pages 8-11, for 
the full text of this article. 

Russia:  Debt Crisis Temporarily Halts State Broadcasting 

   Protesting state-owned television and radio companies' prolonged 
failure to pay for broadcasting services, Ministry of 
Communications workers struck on 10 February, disrupting 
broadcasts across much of Russia.  Although Prime Minister Viktor 
Chernomyrdin persuaded the broadcasters to end their strike the 
same day by promising to pay the debt, he hinted that the 
government may turn to privatization of some television and radio 
companies to reduce the debt problem.  The belated government 
response to the strike threat suggests that new state television 
chief Aleksandr Yakovlev, who is not a member of the cabinet, may 
not be well positioned in the government to serve as an effective 
spokesman for his sector. (See Note 6) 

(Note 6)  See the FBIS Trends of 23 February 1994, pages 18-20, 
for the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  Yeltsin Restructures Media Bureaucracy 

   Using his decree power to reorganize the media bureaucracy, 
Russian President Boris Yeltsin has consolidated his control over 
the broadcast media and attenuated the influence of the other 
branches of government and the cabinet.  At the same time he has 
taken the first step in what is likely to be a far reaching, if 
reversible, reduction of the state's role in television by giving 
a private television company access to Russia's 4th television 
channel.  The reorganization appears to signal that long-time 
close Yeltsin adviser Mikhail Poltoranin, who once shaped 
Yeltsin's media policy, no longer enjoys the President's 
confidence in this area. (See Note 7) 

(Note 7)  See the FBIS Trends of 2 March 1994, pages 11-19, for 
the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  RTV Blasts Yakovlev, Poltoranin 

   On 16 March Russian Television's primetime edition of its "Vesti" 
news program launched a scathing attack on media bigwigs, 
including Aleksandr Yakovlev, head of both the Federal Service of 
Russia for Television and Radio Broadcasting and the Ostankino 
Television and Radio Broadcasting Company, and Mikhail 
Poltoranin, head of the State Duma Committee for Information 
Policy and Communications.  Showing video of the two taking in 
the performance of an exotic dancer at a club for media elite, 
the program juxtaposed the officials' expensive and decadent 
perquisites with state television's acute shortage of operating 
funds. (See Note 8) 

(Note 8)  See the FBIS Trends of 23 March 1994, pages 28-29, for 
the full text of this article. 

(AUTHORS:  ALLENSWORTH, CRIMMINS, ELDRIDGE, NERO, O'CONNELL, 
VILLHAUER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHTEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/DEW 29/1852Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-73 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-29Mar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      NATO Partnership Proposal Meets Hedged Support, Ambivalence </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              While campaigning to convince the new legislature of the value of 
Russian accession to NATO's Partnership for Peace, Russian 
government officials continue to portray the program as merely an 
interim step toward broader European security measures that will 
provide prominent status for Russia.  Influential members of the 
Duma, on the other hand, are taking a skeptical attitude, 
expressing concern that the terms of Russia's association with 
NATO will be dictated, rather than negotiated, and will harm 
Russia's security interests.  Although the Defense Ministry 
newspaper has supported joining the program, other media 
commentary across the political spectrum appears to reflect 
nationalistic fears that Russian interests will be damaged 
whether or not it joins the Partnership. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Testifying at 16-17 March Duma hearings, government officials 
promoted accession to the NATO Partnership for Peace program, 
arguing that Russia will gain influence by joining but risks 
isolation if it does not.  Yuriy Nazarkin, head of the 
coordination and interaction department of the Security Council's 
staff; Yuriy Ushakov, head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs' 
(MFA) Department for European Cooperation; and Major General 
Pavel Zolotarev from the Defense Ministry all stressed that to 
"disregard" Partnership for Peace would mean a disastrous self- 
isolation that would damage Russia's security.  Nazarkin and 
Ushakov warned that refusing to join would strengthen those who 
were pushing for NATO expansion and argued that in joining Russia 
could influence the program (Interfax, 17 March).   In 
enumerating a long list of membership advantages, Zolotarev 
contended that by joining Russia would demonstrate to the world 
its interest in collective security and "neutralize" the anti- 
Russian forces that are seeking to exclude Russia from the 
international arena (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March). 

Moscow's Mixed Signals 

   Despite this supportive testimony and Defense Minister Pavel 
Grachev's statement that Russia would join the program soon, 
other signals from the government suggest that it is unsure about 
how fast to move ahead.  After his 17 March meeting with U.S. 
Defense Secretary William Perry, Grachev told reporters that 
"groups of experts" are "already completing work" on Russia's 
membership application, adding optimistically that "we shall be 
able to join the concept by the end of the month" (ITAR-TASS, 17 
March).  More cautiously, however, First Deputy Defense Minister 
Andrey Kokoshin said it was "too early" to discuss when Russia 
would sign on to the program (Interfax, 18 March).  A 19 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article, discounting speculation that Grachev 
meant that Russia would "definitely" sign in March, cited a 
Foreign Ministry "clarification" that the signing might take 
place in late March or more likely later.  The article attributed 
the delay to the need to finish drafting the documents, "wind up 
interdepartmental consultations," and "solve a number of 
technical problems"--including who would sign, Grachev or Foreign 
Minister Andrey Kozyrev. 

   In addition, Russian President Boris Yeltsin and other senior 
officials have continued to express reservations about the 
program--particularly its implications for NATO expansion--and to 
press for movement toward alternative European security measures: 

-- In his 24 February address to the Duma, Yeltsin warned against 
any NATO expansion without Russia and made clear that, while 
Moscow supported Partnership for Peace, it viewed the program as 
a waystation to building a pan-European partnership "open to all 
states of the greater Europe" in which CSCE would take the lead 
and NATO would be relegated to a subordinate role (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 25 February). 

-- After a meeting with FRG Defense Minister Volker Ruehe in 
Berlin on 11 March, Grachev intimated that he views the program 
as only a stopgap measure until new European security structures 
emerge, touting the CSCE as the "main peace-keeping organization 
in Europe," and noting that "time will tell what the [NATO] 
structure will be like" (ITAR-TASS, 11 March).  These remarks 
echoed his suggestion to reporters on 2 February that the program 
was transitional, providing for a coordinated effort to defuse 
tensions in Europe by NATO and other countries, including Russia, 
during "an interim period following the breakup of the Warsaw 
Pact."  He also reiterated his previous warnings against the 
accession of former Warsaw Pact members and the Baltic states to 
NATO (Interfax, 2 February). 

-- Kozyrev, likewise, has continued to warn against NATO 
expansion and laud CSCE merits.  In an address to a 10 March MFA 
Foreign Policy Council session, he complained about 
"NATOcentrism" within the alliance which has led to a push for a 
"mechanical" expansion, adding that this demonstrates a "vacuum 
of strategic thought" and undermines the goal of "moving toward a 
single, Greater Europe" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, Kommersant-Daily, 
11 March).  Although Kozyrev said Russia is close to signing 
Partnership for Peace documents, he continued to argue that CSCE 
should become the core of Europe's security system.  Like 
Grachev, he hinted that collaboration within a NATO framework 
might be only temporary, saying that a "necessary historical 
period" perhaps "two to three years in length" had "opened up" to 
"elaborate and implement cooperation programs."  Similarly in a 
17 March Izvestiya article, he said that NATO was "inadequate" 
and "unsuitable" for "current purposes" and contended that while 
Partnership for Peace would provide "a partial answer" to 
security problems, it could not "be considered the pinnacle of 
achievement." 

   In a sign that not all of Yeltsin's administration share the view 
that Russia has more to gain than to lose by joining the program, 
Presidential Council adviser Andranik Migranyan, in a 15 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article titled "Why Join, If It Is Better Not 
To Join," strongly opposed Russian accession.  Claiming that 
there is no consensus on the issue within the Foreign Ministry, 
he listed numerous adverse consequences if Russia joins.  He 
contended that the program would deepen Russia's isolation and 
"sharply limit its freedom for foreign policy maneuvering." 

Doubts in the Duma 

   Many influential members of the Duma apparently remain ambivalent 
about the Partnership plan, opposing what they view as NATO's 
"dictat," and worried that a broad range of security interests 
from the competitiveness of Russia's defense industries to its 
security arrangements with other CIS countries will suffer: 

-- Former Ambassador to the United States Vladimir Lukin, a 
member of the moderately reformist Yavlinsky bloc and chairman of 
the Duma's international affairs Committee, conceded the 
Partnership idea was good, but said the "devil was in the 
details," which had been insufficiently thought through (Moscow 
radio, 17 March).  He said that Russia, "instead of trying to 
"push to the head of the line" to join,  should carefully analyze 
what should be done for a more active rapprochement with NATO and 
closely follow NATO's reorganization.  Lukin also expressed 
concern that involvement with the Partnership program could wreck 
Russia's "strategic intentions to create security structures 
within the CIS framework" (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March) 

-- Sergey Yushenkov, chairman of the Duma's defense committee and 
a Russia's Choice member, said while in Washington with a Duma 
delegation that he objected to membership on the grounds that 
"the framework agreements were drawn up without [the Duma's] 
participation and do not conform to Russia's status" and that 
NATO standardization would be "simply destructive" for Russia's 
defense industries.  He advocated instead a security alliance 
between Russia and other countries in which the guidelines would 
not be set by NATO, as in the case of Partnership for Peace, but 
would be worked out "jointly" (Interfax, 9 March; Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 18 March).  More recently, however, he appears to have 
changed his position on joining.  During the Duma hearings 
Yushenkov said he supports Russian membership, but maintains it 
should be carried out on special terms given Russia's "status as 
a nuclear power."  Like many government officials, he contended 
that the NATO program should be viewed as "the beginning of a 
path toward a common security system" (Interfax, 17 March). 

-- Konstantin Zatulin, chairman of the Duma's CIS affairs 
committee and co-chairman of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord faction, warned the MFA Foreign Policy Council session 
that Russia's participation in the "Partnership" program would 
dash its hopes [unspecified] in the "near abroad," because even 
now CIS countries were trying to "blackmail" Russia by appealing 
to the West for help (Kommersant-Daily, 11 March). 

Media Reaction 

   Russia media commentary on the Partnership for Peace program has 
reflected fears about isolation if Russia fails to join, 
suspicion that Russian interests may suffer if it does join, and 
resentment that Russia's options thus are limited.  NATO bashing 
has been a staple of procommunist newspapers like Pravda and has 
intensified in the wake of the February NATO ultimatum to the 
Bosnian Serbs, but even reformist and pro-Yeltsin newspapers 
appear ambivalent toward membership, although the Defense 
Ministry newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda, supported it: 

-- The procommunist newspaper Pravda printed a long diatribe on 
16 March by retired general Viktor Chudov, who charged that 
Partnership for Peace was designed as a cover for "peace U.S.- 
style" and "world domination."  The article, which claimed that 
planned U.S.-Russian exercises were designed to counter 
"reunification sentiments" in former Soviet republics and to 
inspire "separatists and nationalists" to "vigorous activity," 
lambasted the Defense Ministry's "top brass" for engaging in such 
exercises instead of carrying out its own war games designed to 
repel aggression "by a coalition of nuclear powers." 

-- The reformist newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, which printed the 
highly critical Migranyan article, frontpaged another article on 
15 March titled "Russia's Partnership With NATO Is A 
Misalliance."  The article maintained that Russia could have 
received better terms if it had held out longer before agreeing 
to join, claiming that there had been growing sentiment in the 
West to offer Moscow something more in line with its "great 
power" status.  Now, the article warned, Moscow confronts a new 
dilemma:  to face isolation and discrimination if it does not 
become a full member of NATO, or to place its armed forces, 
military plans, and budget under the command and control of the 
United States if it does join, since "under a long-standing 
tradition, the NATO commander in chief has always been and 
remains an American general." 

-- A 23 March article in the mass-circulation newspaper 
Komsomolskaya Pravda contended that, although Moscow had little 
choice, it would be "humiliating" for it to follow "in the wake 
of U.S. policy," "jostling for space on the margins." 
Complaining that "Washington is the banker and Russia is "forced 
to play blind," the article noted sarcastically 
that "you can judge for yourselves how far such 'partnership' can 
be called mutually beneficial and equal." 

-- A 16 February article in the usually pro-Yeltsin newspaper 
Izvestiya warned that Russia could lose its arms market in 
Eastern Europe as countries switched to NATO standards.  A 19 
March Izvestiya article admitted that the program was not popular 
in the Duma and gave minimal support to the government's campaign 
to promote it, confining its advocacy to pointing out that 
without Russia the program was "meaningless" and that Moscow had 
made clear to Secretary Perry that Russia intends to join "on its 
own terms." 

-- On 22 March, prominent Krasnaya Zvezda commentator Aleksandr 
Golts, echoing the government's line, strongly backed Partnership 
for Peace and criticized the "emotional" arguments of its 
opponents.  Claiming that the actual partnership program had 
emerged because Washington "was forced to take Moscow's tough 
stance [on NATO expansion] into consideration," Golts stressed 
that the main point in the program was that each country would 
develop its own relationship with NATO on a bilateral basis and 
that Moscow is elaborating terms "which will take maximum account 
of Russian interests."  Golts insisted that "the fears that 
Russia condemns itself to a secondary role by signing the 
partnership program scarcely hold up," while the risks that 
Russia faces if it does not join "are as clear as can be": the 
program would "acquire an unambiguously anti-Russian thrust." 

Outlook 

   While government officials support joining the NATO Partnership 
for Peace program as beneficial to Russia's security interests, 
they clearly view the program as a stop gap measure and hope it 
will foster the creation of a European security system in which 
Russia will play a major role.  Influential legislators, in 
contrast, appear more fearful that NATO affiliation will further 
marginalize rather than foster Russian influence in Europe.  This 
reaction from the legislature, coupled with the skeptical 
reaction from even the independent press, may pressure the 
government to demonstrate that it remains an equal and assertive 
player in the working out of the terms of any NATO partnership. 

(AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/DEW 29/1810Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-74 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-29Mar94-Russia-Ukr 
<H3> <TI>      Media Developments:  Russia and Ukraine No. 5 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     Special Memorandum, "Media Developments:  Russia and 
Ukraine," is a periodic series aimed at reporting and analyzing 
changes to and events affecting the Russian and Ukrainian media. 
Comments and queries regarding this series may be directed to 
Chief Analyst, ENEAG at (703) 733-6072. 

In this issue ... 

Spotlight on ... 

Russia: Sovetskaya Rossiya--Zyuganov's Mouthpiece 
Russia: RIA-Novosti Returned to Government Oversight 

Features 

Russia: Zavtra Ambivalent About Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Government Daily Tries, Fails at Independence 
Russia: Editorial Turmoil at Pravda 
Russia: Government Official Moves To Restrict Media Access 
Ukraine: Post-Postup--Attempt at a Western-Style Newspaper 

In Brief 

Russia: Vladivostok Newspapers Suspended 
Russia: Rossiyskaya Gazeta To Run Tatar Insert 

Other Publications of Interest 

Russia: Journalists Slam TV Campaign as Biased, Uninformative 
Russia: Last Minute State TV Campaign Against Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Pro-Communist Press Keeps Options Open on Zhirinovskiy 
Russia: Debt Crisis Temporarily Halts State Broadcasting 
Russia: Yeltsin Restructures Media Bureaucracy 
Russia: RTV Blasts Yakovlev, Poltoranin 

   Spotlight on ... 

   Russia: Sovetskaya Rossiya--Zyuganov' s Mouthpiece 

   Summary:  The opposition newspaper Sovetskaya Rossiya has served 
as a mouthpiece for Gennadiy Zyuganov's Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation (CPRF) since at least July 1993, when the 
newspaper began publishing a regular insert, Pravda Rossii, which 
carries news of CPRF functions, official party positions, and 
commentary by party officials.  The partnership between the paper 
and the party is not surprising in view of their shared 
ideological inclinations, which involve the fusion of nationalism 
and communism.  The evolution of such a nationalist-communist 
fusion has been evident in the pages of Sovetskaya Rossiya for 
some time, and the CPRF has steadily moved in that direction 
under Zyuganov's leadership.  Moreover, the Zyuganov-Sovetskaya 
Rossiya connection pre-dates the August 1991 coup, when 
Zyuganov's attacks on CPSU reformers were printed and echoed in 
the pages of what was then the RSFSR's official communist 
newspaper. 

   Sovetskaya Rossiya began publishing Pravda Rossii on 10 July 1993 
with "Special Edition" Number 1 ("Prepared jointly with the 
Central Executive Committee of the CPRF"), but, at least for now, 
the CPRF appears only to be extending limited financing to the 
Pravda Rossii insert and not to Sovetskaya Rossiya as a whole. 
The "Special Edition" carried an announcement of the election of 
the Presidium of the Central Executive Committee of the CPRF 
(whose membership includes Central Executive Committee Chairman 
Gennadiy Zyuganov), an announcement excerpted from the CPRF 
action plan" (including a call to Muscovites to attend a mass 
meeting to protest "the course taken by the government"), news of 
CPRF regional activities, and a CPRF Central Executive Committee 
"Announcement," which called on "all patriotically inclined 
social groups," from "workers to our native private 
entrepreneurs," to "halt the collapse of Russia, to save her 
state unity."  At the 15 March CPRF Central Executive Committee 
plenum, Zyuganov chided the party for not paying sufficient 
attention to the publication of Pravda Rossii and for not 
"rendering assistance "--presumably financial--to Sovetskaya 
Rossiya (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 17 March). 

   Subsequent editions of Pravda Rossii have continued to stress 
patriotic themes, sometimes combined with a socialist-oriented 
economic line, and to highlight the activities and viewpoints of 
the CPRF.  Pravda Rossii Number 2 published the election platform 
of the CPRF in anticipation of possible early parliamentary 
elections.  The platform combined nationalistic calls for the 
preservation of the territorial integrity of the Russian 
Federation and exhortations that the "salvation and 
strengthening'' of Russia's indigenous ''spirituality'' are 
necessary conditions for the rebirth of Russia" with traditional 
communist denunciations of "the forced capitalization" of Russia 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 22 July 1993).  Virtually every edition of 
Pravda Rossii has reported on activities of local CPRF 
affiliates.  Number 3, for example, carried news from CPRF groups 
in Northern Ossetia, Ryazan, Orel, Volgograd, and Moscow 
(Sovetskaya Rossiya, 5 August 1993).  Number 4 carried an 
announcement proclaiming the CPRF to be the party of "state 
patriotism," whose ideology is directed toward "the salvation and 
rebirth of Russia," while simultaneously attacking "bourgeois 
liberalism."  In the same edition, the CPRF Central Executive 
Committee encouraged communists to subscribe to Sovetskaya 
Rossiya as part of its broader efforts to "spread" the CPRF line 
in "the party press" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 7 September 1993).  The 
CPRF-Zyuganov-Sovetskaya Rossiya connection was further 
illustrated in the political arena on 12 December 1993, when 
Sovetskaya Rossiya editor Valentin Chikin was elected as a deputy 
to the State Duma on the CPRF party list. 

   While remaining true to its communist origins, Sovetskaya Rossiya 
has augmented its communist ideology with a strong dose of 
Russian nationalism in recent years, including the regular 
publication of an insert entitled Rus Pravoslavnaya (Orthodox 
Russia), which frequently features articles by the nationalist 
Metropolitan Ioann of St. Petersburg.  This tilt toward 
nationalism has been evident for some time.  For example, like 
most prominent Russian newspapers, Sovetskaya Rossiya carried 
special coverage of the Russian government's commemoration of the 
first anniversary of the August 1991 coup attempt, but it used 
the opportunity to attack the "democrats" in a particularly 
nationalist vein.  According to an article published on 20 August 
1992, "A certain group among the 'democratic forces' consists of 
representatives of youth," who are "mesmerized" by "pro-American, 
anti-Russian and anti-Soviet propaganda, camouflaged as anti- 
communist."  The article maintained that these groups were 
heavily infiltrated with "agents of influence" carrying out a 
plan that had been "worked out in Washington" for the 
"destruction of the USSR, then Russia" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 20 
August 1992).  In the same issue the paper's political observer, 
Eduard Volodin (like Zyuganov, Volodin later joined the 
nationalist-communist opposition National Salvation Front, whose 
manifesto was published in the 6 October 1992 edition of 
Sovetskaya Rossiya and was signed by, among others, Volodin, 
Zyuganov, and Chikin), called the August 1991 events a loss of 
"national honor . . . and national dignity," rather than a 
liberation from "stagnation and dogmatism."  According to 
Volodin, the "democrats" in the government were conscious agents 
of "the builders of the 'New World Order, '"--an allusion to the 
United States--who were seeking "the destruction of Russia's 
international authority" as well as the "dismemberment" of the 
Russian state. 

   As Sovetskaya Rossiya embraced nationalism, so did the CPRF and 
its leading figure, Zyuganov.  Zyuganov was elected chairman of 
the CPRF Central Executive Committee by a party congress in 
February 1993.  That same party congress adopted a "Program 
Statement" that included a section called "The Fatherland in 
Danger," which urged the "consolidation of all . . . patriotic 
forces, united by the idea of saving the Fatherland."  Other 
sections of the statement side-stepped communist dogmas by 
endorsing a mixed economy (although the state sector would still 
be the "basis" of the "multisector economy") and calling for 
communist cooperation with all "patriots," including active 
members of the Orthodox Church (Pravda, 26 February 1993).  The 
extreme nationalist weekly Den subsequently endorsed Zyuganov's 
election and characterized the "majority of the delegates" to the 
congress as "not just fans of the long dead writers Marx and 
Lenin" but as "ordinary citizens" who were concerned with the 
"fate of the Fatherland" (Den, 21-27 February 1993).  Zyuganov 
himself subsequently trumpeted the nationalist-communist line in 
Sovetskaya Rossiya and actively participated in organizing and 
leading nationalist organizations.  In an article entitled "The 
Russian Question," Zyuganov called on leaders of the "patriotic 
movement" to develop an "ideology of national rebirth" as part of 
a "national liberation" strategy for Russia (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 
3 July 1993).  He called his opponents in the "democratic" camp 
"those who hate Russia," and saw the collapse of the USSR as just 
another chapter in the "thousand-year" history of efforts to 
destroy Russia.  He repeated similar charges in a front-page 
article in Sovetskaya Rossiya on 28 August 1993 entitled Derzhava 
(Great Power), which viewed the Soviet period as simply one stage 
in the development of the Russian nation and empire.  Zyuganov 
was cofounder of the Council of National-Patriotic Forces of 
Russia, organized in 1992, a cochairman of the Organizational 
Committee of the National Salvation Front from 1992 until the 
October violence in Moscow, and a cochairman of the Duma of the 
Russian National Assembly, a nationalist organization founded in 
1992 by ex-KGB General Aleksandr Sterligov. 

   Old Ties 

   The Sovetskaya Rossiya-Zyuganov connection predates the August 
1991 coup attempt, when Sovetskaya Rossiya published a series of 
Zyuganov articles and interviews attacking reform and carried 
other articles defending Zyuganov's positions.  Zyuganov fired 
his first salvo in an anti-reform barrage in Sovetskaya Rossiya 
on 20 March 1991, when he attacked Boris Yeltsin and his efforts 
to forge ties with Russia's new class of entrepreneurs, which 
Zyuganov derided as a "homegrown bourgeoisie."  He followed with 
an attack on the "architect" of perestroyka, Aleksandr Yakovlev, 
whom Zyuganov held responsible for the social and economic 
problems of the Russian Federation: "What lies in store for us- 
-the final destruction of all social connections . . . a social 
explosion?" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 7 May 1991).  A 6 June 1991 
article called the reformists "false prophets" and claimed that 
the Soviet Union had reached the "breaking point."  In a 
subsequent interview, Zyuganov lamented that the Soviet Union 
found itself on the "verge of national catastrophe" (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 25 June 1991).  Zyuganov's views, and his attack on 
Yakovlev in particular, were defended in a 22 June article by 
Volodin, in which Volodin continued the attack on reforms in 
general (Sovetskaya Rossiya 22 June 1991).  Zyuganov also signed 
the open letter, "A Word to the People," widely believed to have 
been a call to arms in anticipation of the August 1991 coup 
attempt (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 23 July 1991). 

   Russia:  RIA-Novosti Returned to Government Oversight 

   Summary:  A recent edict signed by President Boris Yeltsin ends 
almost two years of organizational turmoil within the RIA-Novosti 
news agency by placing it under the sponsorship of the Russian 
Council of Ministers and apparently returning to it a foreign 
propaganda function similar to that of its predecessor, APN.  The 
edict appears to quash the agency's own efforts in recent years 
to achieve independence from state or presidential control, but 
it is not yet clear whether its new official status will affect 
its domestic news reporting function. 

   An edict signed by Yeltsin on 23 December 1993 ordered the 
conversion of the RIA-Novosti news agency from a quasi- 
independent media organization to an agency of the Russian 
Government and also assigned to it apparent propaganda and 
analytical functions that differentiate it from the official news 
agency ITAR-TASS.  According to the edict, the transformed RIA- 
Novosti will become a "state information and analysis agency" 
whose purpose is to provide "information and analytical support 
for Russia's domestic and foreign policy and creat[e] a favorable 
image of the Russian state" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 30 December 
1993). (See Note 1)  The apparent propaganda function assigned to 
RIA-Novosti underscores its role as the successor to the old 
Soviet Novosti Press Agency (APN), whose purpose was to promote 
"mutual understanding, trust, and friendship among peoples" 
through "widespread dissemination abroad of true information" 
about the USSR and by "familiarizing" the Soviet public with the 
"life of people of foreign countries" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 
July 1993).  In addition, the 23 December edict stated that the 
Council of Ministers is to "ratify the charter" of RIA-Novosti, 
apparently an oblique way of saying that the Council of Ministers 
is the agency's new founder (sponsor), since the Russian Law on 
the Mass Media establishes that the founder "ratifies the 
editorial charter" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 8 February 1992). 
Finally, the edict guaranteed state funding for RIA-Novosti and 
granted it a number of tax breaks and official privileges. 

   (Note 1)  By contrast, a recent Yeltsin edict characterized ITAR- 
TASS as a "central state news agency" and asserted a more 
politically neutral purpose for its formal transfer to the 
government--to create the "conditions for ensuring high quality 
and timeliness in the collection and dissemination of 
information" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24 December 1993).  The impetus 
for Yeltsin's edict on ITAR-TASS appears to have been the 
dissolution of the Federal Information Center and the need to 
transfer formally its media organizations to the jurisdiction of 
the Council of Ministers. 

   The transfer of RIA-Novosti to government oversight appears to 
cap a period of restructuring in the agency that began last 
September and has included the appointment of new management.  On 
15 September Yeltsin ordered the Council of Ministers to "adopt 
the necessary measures to fully reconstitute the activity" of 
RIA-Novosti (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 18 September 1993).  Two days 
later a government decree appointed Vladimir Markov, a former 
Novosti political observer, as chairman of the agency (ITAR-TASS, 
17 September 1993; Izvestiya, 25 September 1993).  Markov 
replaced Maysarat Makharadze, whose departure from RIA-Novosti 
may be linked to the appointment of her husband, former Deputy 
Premier Valeriy Makharadze, as trade representative to Canada 
(Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 21 September 1993).  More recently, a 
government directive appointed former RIA-Novosti journalist 
Aleksandr Slabynko and Anatoliy Chebotarev as deputy chairmen of 
the agency's board (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 11 March). 

   Foreign, Domestic Information Role 

   Markov, who remains the agency's chairman, has outlined an 
ambitious program for RIA-Novosti that seeks to combine its role 
as an instrument of Russian foreign policy and as a domestic news 
agency capable of competing with ITAR-TASS and the independent 
news agency Interfax.  He has indicated his support for RIA- 
Novosti's propaganda role--though he himself reportedly does not 
use that word (Izvestiya, 25 September 1993)--saying that it was 
a "big mistake" to discard the "services" of APN in providing 
"informational support for Russia's foreign policy" and affirming 
RIA-Novosti's "duty" to ensure that "Russia has a worthy image 
abroad" (Moscow radio, 31 October 1993).  Among the tools he will 
apparently use for this purpose are the old APN methods of 
preparing articles, commentaries, photos, and television items 
for and "at the behest of" foreign media (Izvestiya, 25 September 
1993).  At the same time, he has argued that the "handful" of 
news agencies currently operating in Russia are "not enough for a 
huge country" and has said that RIA-Novosti will strive to inform 
people "at the local level about the activity of all branches of 
power."  Additionally, Markov foresees a "public relations" role 
for the agency, providing "informational assistance for our new 
political parties," possibly through the dissemination of party 
programs and announcements (Izvestiya, 25 September 1993; Moscow 
radio, 31 October 1993). 

   Organizational Turmoil 

   The transfer of RIA-Novosti to government oversight formally 
reverses an earlier Yeltsin edict that was to have merged the 
agency with the TASS state news agency.  On 22 January 1992 
Yeltsin ordered RIA-Novosti and TASS to merge into one agency, 
ITAR-TASS, although he apparently authorized some components of 
RIA-Novosti to operate independently as the RIA joint-stock 
company (see box 1).  However, for reasons that are unclear, the 
merger of the two news agencies appears never really to have 
taken effect.  On 8 January 1992 Makharadze replaced Andrey 
Vinogradov as director of RIA-Novosti under circumstances that 
one experienced journalist called "strange" but are undoubtedly 
due to her political connections (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 27, 5 
July 1992; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993) (see box 2). 
According to the journalist, the impetus for the merger had 
already "disappeared" with the ouster of former RIA-Novosti 
chairman Vinogradov (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 27, 5 July 1992). 

   Under Makharadze, RIA-Novosti continued to function--at least as 
a domestic news agency--and to enjoy some independence from state 
control, (See Note 2) but her attempts to merge the RIA joint- 
stock company with RIA-Novosti into a larger, quasi-independent 
joint-stock company ultimately failed.  In June 1992--perhaps as 
a result of Makharadze's personal connections--the Russian 
Government reportedly authorized the transfer of RIA-Novosti's 
property to the RIA joint-stock company, thus effectively 
reversing Yeltsin's January 1992 edict that had transferred RIA- 
Novosti's property to TASS and had ostensibly abolished RIA- 
Novosti (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993).  Makharadze, 
however, wanted to go a step further and to merge the RIA joint- 
stock company with RIA-Novosti into a larger joint-stock company 
with the state as the majority share holder.  She expected a 
government order to this effect by 1 August 1993 (Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, 24 July 1993), but it apparently never materialized, and 
Yeltsin's most recent edict appears to dash her plans. 

   (Note 2)  When Yeltsin created the Federal Information Center 
   (FIC) in December 1992 and appointed Poltoranin to head it, a 
provision in the edict made the FIC a cofounder (cosponsor) of 
RIA-Novosti, indicating that the agency still existed, at least 
on paper (See the FBIS Trends of 21 January 1993, pages 16-22). 
In an interview more than a year later, Poltoranin said that the 
"Russian Information Agency"--apparently meaning the joint-stock 
company--did not belong "structurally" to the FTC and that the 
FTC had "not yet considered the transfer" of RIA's sponsorship to 
the FTC (RIA, 26 May 1993). 

   Box 1 

   The Tumultuous Existence of APN-IAN-RIA-Novosti 

   February 1961.  Established as an "information organ of Soviet 
public organizations," the Novosti Press Agency (APN) formally 
came under the sponsorship of the USSR Union of Journalists, the 
USSR Union of Writers, the Soviet Society of Friendship and 
Cultural Relations With Foreign Countries, and the All-Union 
Znaniye Society, though in reality it was under the control of 
the CPSU Central Committee's ideological department, which 
appointed Novosti's top officials (Moscow Central TV, 1 August 
1990; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

   July 1990.  In an apparent response to signs that the Yeltsin-led 
RSFSR Supreme Soviet wanted to wrest control of Novosti from the 
Union Government--part of a broader battle waged by the RSFSR to 
establish its own media outlets--then-USSR President Mikhail 
Gorbachev signed an edict transforming Novosti from a public 
agency "subsidized by the state" into a "presidential, state 
agency" (Moscow Central TV, 1 August 1990).  At the same time, 
its name was changed to the Novosti Information Agency (IAN), but 
the agency's basic propaganda function reportedly remained the 
same (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

   August 1991.  In the wake of the failed coup attempt, a Yeltsin 
edict of 22 August removed IAN Director Albert Vlasov from his 
post and  transferred the agency to the jurisdiction of the RSFSR 
Ministry of the Press and Mass Media. 

   September 1991.  A decree of the RSFSR Council of Ministers 
merged IAN with the Russian Information Agency (RIA), an 
independent news agency founded six months earlier by Andrey 
Vinogradov--himself a former Novosti journalist--but the agency's 
formal status and sponsorship were unclear.  Renamed RIA-Novosti 
and headed by Vinogradov, the combined agency took legal title to 
IAN's considerable assets, including publishing houses, printing 
plants, photography labs, and television production studios as 
well as an extensive network of foreign bureaus (IAN, 30 August 
1991, 12 September 1991; Tokyo Shimbun, 25 September 1991).  The 
merger apparently caused disgruntlement among IAN staffers, who 
contended that Vinogradov's experience heading RIA's staff of 50 
reporters--all based at the time in the RSFSR and former Union 
republics--left him ill-qualified to manage the complexities of a 
worldwide news agency (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 September 1991). 

   January 1992.  In a highly controversial move that sparked 
concerns about attempts by the Russian Government to bring the 
media under tighter control, a Yeltsin edict of 22 January 
ordered the merger of RIA-Novosti and the official state news 
agency, TASS, into the newly-named ITAR-TASS.  Then-Minister for 
the Press and Mass Media Mikhail Poltoranin offered the official 
explanation that the state needed to reduce spending on the 
agencies, but an official investigation into RIA reports about a 
purported government order to partially withhold workers' wages 
allegedly leaked to it by a government source suggested high- 
level displeasure with the agency and with Vinogradov in 
particular.  The combined news agency was placed under the 
directorship of TASS's Vitaliy Ignatenko, a former Gorbachev 
spokesman who became the head of TASS in the wake of the failed 
coup. 

End Box 1 

Box 2 

   The Meteoric Rise of Maysarat Makharadze 

   According to Maysarat Makharadze, then-Minister for the Press and 
Mass Media Mikhail Poltoranin "invited" her to head RIA-Novosti 
because he liked "the fact that I had a lot of journalistic and 
industrial experience" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993), but 
this explanation seems disingenuous.  By her own account, 
Makharadze's journalism experience appears limited to provincial 
media.  She began writing for the Chechen newspaper Groznenskiy 
Rabochiy in 1959 and became a correspondent for Dagestanskaya 
Pravda within a year.  After earning a degree at Makhachkala 
University in Dagestan, she worked for unspecified regional 
newspapers and television stations until 1977.  Upon her 
husband's assignment to Udmurtiya in 1977, Maysarat Makharadze 
left journalism to work in a bottle making factory, rising 
suspiciously quickly to shop director and, ultimately, factory 
director.  As Valeriy Makharadze's political career flourished 
and brought him to Moscow, so, too, did Maysarat's.  She served 
briefly at the end of 1991 as deputy press minister under 
Poltoranin before he appointed her to head RIA-Novosti 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 24 July 1993). 

End Box 2 

Features 

   Russia:  Zavtra Ambivalent About Zhirinovskiy 

   Summary:  Interviews and commentary in the ultranationalist 
weekly Zavtra--the successor to Den--following the December 
elections (through February) suggest that hard-line nationalist 
oppositionists regard the electoral success of Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy and the Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR) 
with ambivalence.  While reaction on the whole was hostile, some 
opposition figures, including Zavtra editor Aleksandr Prokhanov, 
appear to view Zhirinovskiy as a potential political ally. 

The first issue of Zavtra--now published in Vladimir--following 
the elections (No. 4, December 1993) featured a front-page 
section entitled "Nashi (Our People) in the Duma," which carried 
interviews with prominent opposition figures who had won election 
to the State Duma, including August 1991 coup plotters Anatoliy 
Lukyanov and Vasiliy Starodubtsev, as well as nationalist 
television personality Aleksandr Nevzorov.  No member of the LDPR 
was interviewed and the evaluations of the LDPR's success were 
decidedly mixed.  Nevzorov yas the most positive in his 
assessment, observing that he counted Zhirinovskiy among those he 
considered "nashi."  Lukyanov took a more ambivalent view, 
observing that the voters "did not vote so much for Zhirinovskiy 
as they did against the [Yeltsin] regime."   He maintained that 
although his own views differ from Zhirinovskiy's, the LDPR 
nevertheless "expresses the interests of those who feel that the 
Russian empire is being methodically destroyed" and that the 
government is conducting "an attack" on "the Russian [Russkiy, 
that is, ethnically Russian] people and Russian interests."  He 
also complained that ''the patriotic movement'' was not 
represented" during the elections, claiming that the government 
had deliberately blocked "patriotic" movements like Sergey 
Baburin's Russian National Union (RNU) from registering for the 
elections and had thus "cleared the road" for a Zhirinovskiy 
victory.  Lukyanov asserted that, since Zhirinovskiy had 
supported the president's efforts to pass the draft constitution, 
the "democrats" had counted on Zhirinovskiy's continued support. 
"Now they feel that the constitution can work for Zhirinovskiy as 
well," he said, alluding to the presidential aspirations of the 
LDPR leader.  In Lukyanov's view, this is why government 
supporters are currently attacking Zhirinovskiy in the press. 

   Starodubtsev, in the most negative assessment of the three, 
called Zhirinovskiy's "promises" a form of "dangerous" populism 
and termed his foreign "ambitions" a "provocation."  He added 
that if Zhirinovskiy did not seek a "clash" with the communists 
or the agrarians, he would discover that they, too, are "people 
who sincerely feel pain for Russia."  An unsigned front-page 
article in the same issue seconded Starodubtsev's negative view, 
taking up the assertion that the "democrats" had deliberately 
aided Zhirinovskiy in order to thwart the communists and 
"patriots."  The article asserted that Zhirinovskiy was incapable 
of the kind of "great power leadership" that National Salvation 
Front or RNU leaders had displayed.  The writer considered 
Zhirinovskiy a "marionette" manipulated by the Yeltsin regime. 

   Zavtra's first issue for January 1994 continued the hostile tone, 
featuring a savage attack on Zhirinovskiy by Eduard Limonov, a 
one- time member of his "shadow cabinet."  In the article, 
Limonov called Zhirinovskiy "an enemy of Russian nationalism" who 
had merely used nationalism as a vehicle for furthering his own 
personal aims.  "Is it not degrading that a former activist of 
the Jewish movement [Zhirinovskiy] . . . informs us of his plans 
to protect Russians?" he asked.  Limonov also maintained, as 
Lukyanov had in the previous issue, that Zhirinovskiy's success 
was due to the government's blocking of the registration of 
nationalist parties for the December elections. 

Zhirinovskiy Interview 

   In an interview with Zhirinovskiy published in February (No. 6), 
Zavtra editor Aleksandr Prokhanov displayed a friendly attitude 
toward the LDPR leader.  Though Prokhanov mentioned 
Zhirinovskiy's reputation as an "eccentric politician," he noted 
their shared notions concerning the "Russian idea," which 
included the conviction that the "mongrel" Russian Federation is 
"in no way Russia as such."  Taking his cue from Prokhanov, 
Zhirinovskiy contended that the future Russian Empire should 
include all the territory of the former USSR "at a minimum" and 
seconded Prokhanov's assertion concerning the just nature of the 
Russian people and empire.  Zhirinovskiy claimed that the empire 
had "uplifted" all its former subjects, raising primitive 
cultures, such as that of the Kazakhs, to "cosmic heights."  "You 
and I were not together [previously], in one party, but we think 
identically," he told Prokhanov. 

   Russia:  Government Daily Tries, Fails at Independence 

   Summary:  Rossiyskiye Vesti has renewed its government 
affiliation after a six-week experiment with independence during 
which it found the financial difficulties entailed in the loss of 
government funding too harsh to bear.  The return to government 
sponsorship places Chief Editor Valeriy Kucher in a dilemma, as 
he will likely have to rein in the editorial independence on 
which the paper had embarked or risk alienating the holders of 
the purse strings in the government. 

   On 31 December Rossiyskiye Vesti announced that it was severing 
its ties to its official sponsor, the Russian Council of 
Ministers, and becoming an independent newspaper.  The 
announcement said that the paper's journalists collective had 
decided on 29 December to terminate the relationship with the 
Council of Ministers because the Council of Ministers had failed 
to fulfill its "statutory obligations" to the editorial office, 
tried to "impede" the work of the chief editor and the paper's 
journalists, and attempted to ''get rid of'' the editor as 
unsuitable."  They also charged that the government would not 
accept" criticism from the, paper.  The announcement noted that 
the paper's status as a government publication had given it an 
unjust" image as an "obedient" publication that had an "adverse 
effect" on its standing.  It claimed that its new status would 
allow it to "perform its social role considerably more freely and 
professionally" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24, 31 December 1993).  The 
journalists based their actions on the Law on the Mass Media 
which stipulates that sponsorship reverts to a publication's 
editorial office in the event of the sponsor's reorganization, 
and noted that Russian President Boris Yeltsin had reorganized 
the Government with his 23 December edict "On the Transformation 
and Reorganization of the Council of Ministers-Government of the 
Russian Federation." 

   Following the announcement, the paper continued to publish 
regularly until 25 January, when it failed to appear.  Editorial 
information published on the back page of each issue now listed 
the Journalists' Collective of the Editorial Office as the 
"temporary" sponsor whereas before it had listed the Council of 
Ministers.  The paper reappeared on 1 February, having missed 
five regularly scheduled issues, and apologized for its "forced 
interruption."  The paper charged that its decision to assume 
sponsorship in lieu of the Council of Ministers resulted in a 
cutoff of credits to cover publishing costs (1 February).  When 
it reappeared, however, its distribution was apparently confined 
to the Moscow region until 2 March, when it published an issue 
containing an apology to regional readers who, the paper said, 
had not received their subscriptions for a month. 

   Government Ties Reestablished 

   On 12 February the paper resumed listing the government as 
sponsor, without offering an explanation, and listed the 
journalists' collective as a cosponsor.  Without mentioning the 
resumption of government sponsorship, the apology asserted simply 
that the "suspension of publication" was due to "interruptions in 
[state] budget financing."  In its New Year's message to 
subscribers, the paper had noted that in the absence of 
government financial support it would be resorting to increased 
advertising as a means of self-financing (4 January).  However, 
Russia's weak advertising market apparently made this solution 
unviable, especially on such short notice. 

  Early Signs of Rift 

   Preliminary signs of tension between Rossiyskiye Vesti's 
government affiliation and its staffers' desire to exercise 
editorial freedom appeared during the October 1993 political 
crisis between the president and the parliament.  The paper 
criticized police for rough handling of journalists attempting to 
provide coverage of the crisis, including journalists from 
opposition newspapers who attempted to cover the standoff.  The 
paper also decried Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin's decree 
putting the defunct Supreme Soviet's official newspaper, 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, under government sponsorship, as a violation 
of the law and of the rights of the paper's staffers (2 October). 
Rossiyskiye Vesti also questioned the legality of the 
occupation" by law enforcement personnel of the editorial 
offices of opposition papers Den, Sovetskaya Rossiya, and Pravda 
(6 October) and condemned as ''lawlessness'' what it called the 
extremely dangerous trend" of "closing down media without trial 
or investigation" (16 October). 

   Not long after the October events, rumors began to appear that 
efforts were underway to remove Kucher due to "differences" 
between him and Chernomyrdin over the role of the government 
press (Kommersant-Daily, 30 November).  Eight days before the 
decision to sever its relationship with the government, a 
journalists' collective meeting charged that "individual 
employees" of the Council of Ministers apparatus were "attempting 
to command" the newspaper and that high- level members of the 
apparatus had attempted to oust Kucher (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 24 
December).  The paper accused the government of attempting to 
"destroy Rossiyskiye Vesti as an independent" newspaper and 
"return to the old methods of directing the press, to make it an 
obedient executor of the will of apparatus bureaucrats."  The 
paper also reported that the journalists' collective had given 
Kucher a vote of confidence. 

   Though the paper claimed that its assertion of independence was 
not an "attempt to stand in opposition" to the government and 
that it would "fairly and thoroughly" report the government's 
efforts to reform the economy (4 January), the move to 
independence had an almost immediate impact on its editorial 
line, transforming the paper from a relatively loyal defender of 
government policy to a harsh critic.  On 22 January the paper 
illustrated its new editorial latitude by publishing an 
unprecedentedly critical commentary that called the formation of 
the new cabinet "undemocratic," compared it to a Soviet-era 
cabinet, and charged that it would not represent the interests of 
the broad public.  The commentary also took aim at Economics 
Minister Aleksandr Shokhin, accusing him of trying to "reanimate 
Gosplan," the Soviet-era state planning agency.  Since its 
reacceptance of government sponsorship, no such criticisms have 
been observed. 

   Implications 

   While the return to government sponsorship has apparently eased 
the paper's financial difficulties, it does not appear to have 
solved the fundamental conflict between the journalists and the 
government.  Despite the fact that the journalists' collective 
has been made cosponsor along with the government, real control 
is probably wielded by the government via the purse.  And 
although Kucher continues to serve as chief editor, tension 
between the paper and the government is likely to remain, placing 
his continued tenure in doubt. 

   Russia:  Editorial Turmoil at Pravda 

   Summary:  After five months that featured four changes of chief 
editor, three publishing hiatuses, and a circulation decline of 
more than half, the situation at Pravda appears to have 
stabilized, at least temporarily.  Most of this turmoil seems to 
be attributable to a struggle for financial control of the 
newspaper between ousted editor Viktor Linnik, who, apparently 
backed by many of the paper's staff, wants to reestablish Russian 
control, and rival editor Aleksandr Ilin, backed by a Greek 
businessman who owns a controlling interest in the paper. 

   The latest round of troubles for Pravda began when, during the 
height of the October crisis in Moscow, the Ministry of the Press 
and Information, acting under President Boris Yeltsin's 
declaration of a state of emergency, suspended the paper's 
publication.  Following the suspension First Deputy Press 
Minister David Tsabriya, overstepping his legal authority, 
"ordered" that Pravda change its name, reregister, and replace 
Chief Editor Gennadiy Seleznev with Deputy Chief Editor Ilin. 
Ilin agreed to the ministry's terms and promised to resume 
publication of Pravda as a paper of "civilized opposition," 
echoing the language of press ministry officials in an apparent 
attempt at appeasement (Izvestiya, 16 October 1993).  Ilin 
appeared ready to assume the role of chief editor of the paper 
under the new name Put Pravdy [The Way of the Truth] when the 
paper's staff elected Linnik in his place.  Linnik also appeared 
to appease press ministry officials, stating his intention to 
turn Pravda into a voice of "civilized opposition" (Radio Rossii, 
28 October), and after a month-long hiatus, the paper reappeared 
on 2 November as Pravda, not Put Pravdy, with Linnik as chief 
editor.  The paper published normally until 19 November and then 
again disappeared from newsstands until 10 December.  The paper 
then continued to publish through 4 February, but on 5 February 
it suspended publication briefly following another election by 
the staff which, on this occasion, elected Ilin as chief editor 
(Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 8 February).  Pravda reappeared on 9 
February and has been publishing regularly since. 

   Trojan Horse in the Editorial Office?     Left orphaned after the 
dissolution of the CPSU in December 1991, Pravda eventually found 
new financial backing through a partnership with a Greek 
businessman.  In August 1992 Rossiyskaya Gazeta reported that the 
paper, having failed to find backing from Russian businessmen, 
had signed an agreement with the Greek firm Steel Light Holding, 
Ltd. and its president, Yannis Yannikos (8 August).  Yannikos and 
Pravda together formed the joint-stock company Pravda 
International, with Yannikos holding a 55 percent controlling 
interest but reportedly having "no intention of interfering in 
the newspaper's content."  A Moscow News commentary on the deal 
questioned Yannikos' credentials and the credibility of Steel 
Light Holding, Ltd. and quoted Greek journalists who called the 
deal "shady and highly suspicious" (Moscow News, 23-30 August 
1992).  The commentary alleged that Yannikos had ties to the CPSU 
and might be fronting for the party, or alternately, that he was 
simply a "petty businessman" trying to "lay his hands on 
anything" that could be "grabbed." 

   Pravda's Election Silence 

   Indications of possible troubles between the paper's chief editor 
and its Greek sponsor surfaced after the paper went silent at the 
height of the fall 1993 national election campaign.  When it 
reappeared on 10 December, just two days before the elections, 
the paper apologized to its readers for disappearing at such a 
critical moment and, without explicitly naming Yannikos or 
stating a motive, said simply that an unspecified "they" had "cut 
off" the paper's "oxygen supply"--presumably a reference to 
financial support.  The paper continued to appear into the new 
year, but the print run fluctuated from a high of 350,000 on 4 
January to a low of 120,000 on 21 January before stabilizing at 
172,934 on 9 February.  According to Linnik, from December to 
February, financial backing for publication came not from 
Yannikos but from Russian entrepreneur Konstantin Zatulin--a 
deputy from the Party of Russian Unity and Accord--and the 
Russian Communist Party (CPRF) (Moskovskiye Novosti, 6-13 
February). 

   Nationalist Challenge to Greek Ownership 

   A report in Moskovskiy Komsomolets (28 January) asserted that a 
conflict between Linnik and Yannikos started to develop following 
the October political crisis when Linnik launched a search for 
Russian sponsors.  In a 5 February Interfax report, Linnik was 
quoted as saying that most of Pravda's staff wished to see a 
"Russian corporation" as the paper's sponsor.  Meanwhile, an 
appeal appearing in the weekly Golos (15-21 February) written by 
a former Pravda journalist noted that the word "pravda is Russian 
... but by no means Greek," encouraged Yannikos to go back to 
Greece if he wishes to publish a newspaper, and called for 
sponsors who are "serious, respectable, and most importantly, our 
own Russians."  According to Ilin, Linnik's search for long-term 
domestic financial backing failed (Kommersant Daily, 10 
February).  Apparently neither Zatulin nor the CPRF were willing 
or able to give the paper such backing. 

   Linnik Ousted 

   In another round of conflict at the paper, Yannikos apparently 
engineered Linnik's removal and his replacement by Ilin.  After 
another brief publishing hiatus, which began on 4 February, the 
paper reappeared on 9 February with a "word to the reader" 
announcing that on 4 February the "work collective of the 
editorial office" had elected Ilin as the new chief editor.  The 
announcement also protested "distortions" being spread in the 
media by some Pravda staffers that the staff was caught in a 
struggle between the "advocates of a national Russian paper" and 
those willing to "sell out to foreign capital."  Indeed, the 
accounts of the situation at Pravda that appeared in Moskovskiye 
Novosti (6-13 February) and Kommersant-Daily (10 February) 
painted just such a picture.  According to these accounts, 
Seleznev, the chief editor when the deal with Yannikos was first 
struck, had sold Yannikos the controlling interest "for pennies"- 
-without consulting the collective--in exchange for promises of 
high salaries and vacations on the Greek isles.  But pay was low 
or non-existent (except for such loyalists as Ilin who reportedly 
received 130,000 rubles per month) and the only one to enjoy a 
Greek vacation was Seleznev himself.  Yannikos allegedly 
interfered in the editorial process, fired one journalist for 
writing a negative piece about an acquaintance, compiled a "black 
list" of 13 more journalists he wanted to see fired, and wished 
to "drive out" Linnik, whom he could not control because he was 
elected.  The accounts also alleged that Yannikos had withheld 
financing but promised to increase honoraria and resume financing 
publication in exchange for Linnik's removal, and that the 
election removing Linnik was conducted in violation of the 
paper's charter. 

   Staff Split, Duma May Decide Issue 

   Linnik's defeat in the election may not be the end of the 
internal conflict.  While Linnik's name no longer appears on the 
listing of the editorial staff, he reportedly has not yet 
relinquished his office (Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 8 February) and 
claims the support of "most of the staff" (Interfax, 5 February). 
Ilin has confirmed that a split among the staff continues to 
exist but played down its impact on the paper's day to day 
operations, asserting that even those workers who support Linnik 
"continue to help put out the newspaper" (Kommersant-Daily, 10 
February).  According to Kommersant-Daily (10 February) on 9 
February, unnamed Pravda representatives made a proposal to the 
State Duma to introduce a draft law forbidding "foreign control" 
over Russian media sources. 

   Implications 

   Duma action to deprive Yannikos of ownership cannot be ruled out 
in view of his heavy-handed efforts to establish editorial 
control over a paper that the many nationalist and communist 
deputies in the Duma regard as a national institution.  If 
Yannikos remains in control, draconian policies such as his 
willingness to silence Pravda, one of the leading opposition 
papers, during a critical political period may delegitimize the 
paper in the eyes of its readership and result in further 
declines in its circulation and loss of influence among 
opposition politicians. 

   Russia:  Government Official Moves To Restrict Media Access 

   Summary:  In a widely publicized move that raises questions about 
the government's commitment to openness, Vladimir Kvasov, head of 
the cabinet's apparatus, attempted to severely restrict media 
access to meetings of the Russian Government.  Although Kvasov 
subsequently asserted that the tight restrictions applied only to 
the 3 February Government meeting, he has continued to advocate 
restricting media access and shown only limited tolerance for 
public airing of official debate on contentious issues. 

   In an apparent response to widely publicized reports about his 
recent attempt to restrict media access to government meetings, 
Kvasov has attempted to portray the move as a temporary measure 
made necessary by concerns about lax procedures for accrediting 
journalists.  As initially reported by the news agencies Interfax 
and ITAR-TASS on 3 February, Kvasov issued an order barring all 
journalists except those from the newspaper Rossiyskaya Gazeta- 
-which came under the government's sponsorship after the 
dissolution of the Supreme Soviet in September--from attending 
meetings of the Russian Government "from now on."  Kvasov's order 
coincided with the 3 February Government meeting which was 
scheduled to discuss the potentially divisive issue of subsidies 
for agriculture in 1994 (ITAR-TASS, 3 February).  According to 
one report, Kvasov's move even "took the government's own press 
service by surprise" (Moscow radio, 3 February).  Defending his 
action, Kvasov said in an interview to Rossiyskaya Gazeta (8 
February)--whose staffers were not observed to challenge either 
the initial media restrictions or Kvasov's explanations--that the 
restrictions were necessary after the government's move to new 
quarters created "confusion," prompting his "verbal instruction" 
that the accreditation system for journalists "should be 
regulated." 

   Suggesting that Kvasov is still trying to restrict media access 
and defend the government's apparent preference to avoid media 
scrutiny, Kvasov has set limits on the media's access and 
justified the exceptions made for the official media.  Kvasov 
explained the preferential access extended to Rossiyskaya Gazeta 
by saying that only media outlets "accredited to us [the 
government]" should be able to attend working meetings, later 
adding that journalists from the official news agency ITAR-TASS 
would also be allowed to cover such meetings (Moscow radio, 3 
February; ITAR-TASS, 4 February).  Kvasov added that media 
accreditation in the future will depend on the agenda of the 
Government sessions, with broad access granted to general 
meetings but only ITAR-TASS and Rossiyskaya Gazeta allowed to 
cover more specialized sessions that affect the "interests of a 
narrow circle of specialists" (Moscow radio, 3 February; ITAR- 
TASS, 4 February). 

   Kvasov's arguments for restricting media access suggest that the 
government has only limited tolerance for media scrutiny and- 
-perhaps of more significance to the development of a civil 
society in Russia--is unwilling to extend to the media a role in 
fostering public debate on contentious issues.  Underscoring his 
reluctance to allow the media to report official debate on 
current issues--and thus to increase the potential for public 
opinion to exert pressure on officialdom--Kvasov stated that the 
government is "ready" to provide the media with "necessary 
materials, but only after a final decision is made on the 
discussed problems" (ITAR-TASS, 4 February).  He expounded on 
this theme in his interview to Rossiyskaya Gazeta, criticizing 
the media for reporting issues that were "still at the discussion 
stage" and claiming that this practice "disinformed society, 
destabilized the situation in the country, and cast the 
government in an unfavorable light." 

   Ukraine:  Post-Postup--Attempt at a Western-Style Newspaper 

   Summary:  Since its establishment in September 1991, the 
newspaper Post-Postup has distinguished itself by its 
comprehensive coverage of national, local, and international 
news.  Linked to a news agency of the same name, the newspaper in 
1993 began consciously to model itself after Western-style 
journalism while serving as a proponent of moderate Ukrainian 
nationalism and economic reform. 

   Post-Postup is a small-circulation (30,000), independent weekly 
based in Lviv in western Ukraine. Like other unsubsidized 
newspapers, its financial situation is rather shaky, sometimes 
leading it to suspend publication for a time (it did not publish 
at all during January 1994, although the press agency of the same 
name continued to function).  Originally a small locally-oriented 
newspaper, it was revamped in 1993 into a Western-style newspaper 
with a tabloid format.  The paper covers national, local, and 
international news in a more thorough manner than is usual in the 
Ukrainian press, which tends to be more focused on national news 
or exposes.  Post-Postup's editor, Oleksandr Kryvenko, is running 
for parliament in the March 1994 election with the Nova Khvylya 
(New Wave) bloc, a group of moderate nationalists from Lviv 
including Ihor Yukhnovskyy and Viktor Pynzenyk, who favor 
political and economic reform.  The newspaper can be 
characterized as moderately nationalist, strongly in favor of 
economic reform, and critical of Ukrainian President Leonid 
Kravchuk and the conservatives in power in Kiev.  Nevertheless, 
it does not emphasize the historical and patriotic themes of 
other Lviv papers such as Za Vilnu Ukrayinu.  The newspaper 
contains less editorializing by correspondents--although some 
remains--and more straight reporting than is typical in the 
Ukrainian press.  Unlike other independent newspapers, such as 
Nezavisimost and Vechirniy Kyyiv, it does not strongly bear the 
personal stamp of the editor.  It does not have signed front-page 
editorials or regular columns by the editor. 

   The newspaper was officially registered in September 1991 along 
with a separate press agency with the same name, which has 
correspondents in all major western Ukrainian towns and nearly 
all oblast centers.  Originally Post-Postup appeared to be aimed 
at a youth audience, publishing a great deal of satire and racy 
material to attract readership.  It focused on local material and 
national news, as is typical of most Ukrainian papers.  In 1993 
the newspaper was revamped completely, dropping the satirical and 
racy material in favor of serious reporting.  Post-Postup is 
divided into three sections: Politics (including national, 
regional, and international), Business, and Culture (including 
the arts, sports, and cultural commentary).  As might be 
expected, national politics is covered extensively.  Issues have 
featured, for example, the government's economic decrees and an 
overview of the political parties (9 December 1993), Rukh 
election tactics, and the activities of the Kuchma-Hrynyov 
election bloc (16 December 1993). 

   One of the distinguishing features of Post-Postup is its detailed 
coverage of regional politics, especially from eastern Ukraine. 
There are regular reports from Odessa, Poltava, Donetsk, and 
Kherson, as well as other cities.  The 2 December issue included 
reports on Kharkiv political groupings, while later issues 
covered Donetsk, Kherson, and Odessa politics (16 December 1993) 
as well as the election chances of various party candidates in 
Zaporizhzhya, Odessa, and the Crimea (28 February). 

   Another feature that sets Post-Postup off from other Ukrainian 
papers is its international coverage.  Usually the Ukrainian 
press limits itself to coverage of its immediate neighbors, 
primarily Russia.  While events in Russia are well covered by 
Post-Postup (the Russian elections and the success of 
ultranationalist candidate Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, etc.), other 
world events receive attention as well, for example, the Anglo- 
Irish talks, U.S. policy toward Russia (9 December 1993), Serbian 
elections, and Turkish-Israeli relations (30 December 1993). 

   Economic reporting is not neglected either.  There is wide 
coverage of business issues with a particular emphasis on the 
views and activities of private bankers and entrepreneurs. 
Government credit and exchange rates are criticized (9, 16, 23 
December 1993); private bankers give their 1994 economic 
prognoses (30 December 1993); joint venture troubles and 
privatization in Lviv are explored (9, 23 December 1993); and 
articles on computer systems and-safety are published (2, 9 
December 1993). Notably absent are old-style articles glorifying 
production or long interviews with officials giving their views 
and remedies for the current economic crisis. 

   In Brief 

   Vladivostok Newspapers Suspended 

   An ITAR-TASS item carried in the 23 March Izvestiya reports that 
the Vladivostok newspapers Bolshoy Vladivostok [Greater 
Vladivostok], Utro Rossii [Russia's Dawn], and Krasnoye Znamya 
[Red Banner] have been suspended in the wake of the ousting of 
Mayor Viktor Cherepkov.  Both Bolshoy Vladivostok and Utro Rossii 
reportedly had supported Cherepkov, while Krasnoye Znamya, 
according to ITAR-TASS, "sided with his opponents from the Kray 
administration."  Anatoliy Lyapyakin, editor of Bolshoy 
Vladivostok, together with other unnamed "human rights 
defenders," has, according to the ITAR-TASS report, "appealed to 
the U.S. Consulate General," requesting "permission to travel 
outside Russia's borders." 

   Rossiyskaya Gazeta To Run Tatar Insert 

   An 11 January Rossiyskaya Gazeta article announced that a weekly 
insert on Tatar affairs and culture will be added to the paper. 
The Tatar Berdemlek-Yedinstvo--founded jointly by Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta and the Government of the Republic of Tatarstan--will 
reportedly be the first ethnic publication to obtain nationwide 
circulation.  The publication reportedly targets ethnic Tatars 
living outside Tatarstan by featuring lessons in the Tatar 
language and articles on Tatar customs and holidays; the insert 
will be published in Russian.  Last year Tatar officials 
initiated the dubbing of Russian Television's "Vesti" news 
program into Tatar as a reflection of Tatarstan's official "state 
languages" of Russian and Tatar (Russian TV, 17 June 1993). 
According to editor-in-chief Natalya Polezhayeva, Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta is "prepared" to cooperate both with ethnic republics and 
with "other peoples"--"Ukrainians, Germans, Jews, Koreans"--who 
lack national formations in the Russian Federation. 

   Other Publications of Interest 

   Russia:  Journalists Slam TV Campaign as Biased, Uninformative 

   Even before the official television campaign got underway with 
the broadcast of the first free programming, some print 
journalists had charged that government-controlled television was 
biasing the campaign in favor of Russia's Choice by its 
continuing coverage of the official activities of many prominent 
government officials running for the legislature on the Russia's 
Choice ticket.  A front page article in the 19 November issue of 
the independent newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, for example, cited 
what it claimed were "a great multitude of examples illustrating 
Ostankino's obvious political affiliation."  According to the 
article, programs presenting Russia's Choice candidates were 
"camouflaged as being 'simply' programs." (See Note 3) 

   (Note 3)  See the FBIS Trends of 15 December 1993, pages 18-20, 
for the full text of this article. 

Russia:  Last Minute State TV Campaign Against Zhirinovskiy 

   On the eve of the 12 December legislative elections, state 
television broke with its previous policy of providing uncritical 
coverage of the contending partied by airing two programs 
attacking Vladimir Zhirinovskiy, chairman of the misnamed Liberal 
Democratic Party of Russia.  This last-minute attempt to turn 
voters against Zhirinovskiy suggests that high-level officials 
within the Russian Government had become aware of strong popular 
support for Zhirinovskiy, at least by the eve of the election. 
(See Note 4) 

(Note 4)  See the FBIS Trends of 15 December 1993, pages 57-58, 
for the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  Pro-Communist Press Keeps Options Open on Zhirinovskiy 

   Pro-communist newspapers Pravda and Sovetskaya Rossiya have 
reacted cautiously to the success of Vladimir Zhirinovskiy's 
Liberal Democratic Party (LDPR) in the party preference voting in 
the 12 December Russian legislative elections.  Perhaps in part 
out of fear of offending a disaffected electorate that they too 
are attempting to woo with their own nationalistic appeals, they 
have refrained from harsh criticism of him and have left open the 
possibility of communists cooperating with the LDPR in the new 
legislature.  At the same time, they have laid the lion's share 
of the blame for Zhirinovskiy's success on what they consider the 
misguided policies of the reformers in the government. (See Note 
5) 

(Note 5)  See the FBIS Trends of 5 January 1994, pages 8-11, for 
the full text of this article. 

Russia:  Debt Crisis Temporarily Halts State Broadcasting 

   Protesting state-owned television and radio companies' prolonged 
failure to pay for broadcasting services, Ministry of 
Communications workers struck on 10 February, disrupting 
broadcasts across much of Russia.  Although Prime Minister Viktor 
Chernomyrdin persuaded the broadcasters to end their strike the 
same day by promising to pay the debt, he hinted that the 
government may turn to privatization of some television and radio 
companies to reduce the debt problem.  The belated government 
response to the strike threat suggests that new state television 
chief Aleksandr Yakovlev, who is not a member of the cabinet, may 
not be well positioned in the government to serve as an effective 
spokesman for his sector. (See Note 6) 

(Note 6)  See the FBIS Trends of 23 February 1994, pages 18-20, 
for the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  Yeltsin Restructures Media Bureaucracy 

   Using his decree power to reorganize the media bureaucracy, 
Russian President Boris Yeltsin has consolidated his control over 
the broadcast media and attenuated the influence of the other 
branches of government and the cabinet.  At the same time he has 
taken the first step in what is likely to be a far reaching, if 
reversible, reduction of the state's role in television by giving 
a private television company access to Russia's 4th television 
channel.  The reorganization appears to signal that long-time 
close Yeltsin adviser Mikhail Poltoranin, who once shaped 
Yeltsin's media policy, no longer enjoys the President's 
confidence in this area. (See Note 7) 

(Note 7)  See the FBIS Trends of 2 March 1994, pages 11-19, for 
the full text of this article. 

   Russia:  RTV Blasts Yakovlev, Poltoranin 

   On 16 March Russian Television's primetime edition of its "Vesti" 
news program launched a scathing attack on media bigwigs, 
including Aleksandr Yakovlev, head of both the Federal Service of 
Russia for Television and Radio Broadcasting and the Ostankino 
Television and Radio Broadcasting Company, and Mikhail 
Poltoranin, head of the State Duma Committee for Information 
Policy and Communications.  Showing video of the two taking in 
the performance of an exotic dancer at a club for media elite, 
the program juxtaposed the officials' expensive and decadent 
perquisites with state television's acute shortage of operating 
funds. (See Note 8) 

(Note 8)  See the FBIS Trends of 23 March 1994, pages 28-29, for 
the full text of this article. 

(AUTHORS:  ALLENSWORTH, CRIMMINS, ELDRIDGE, NERO, O'CONNELL, 
VILLHAUER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHTEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/DEW 29/1852Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-75 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-29Mar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      NATO Partnership Proposal Meets Hedged Support, Ambivalence </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              While campaigning to convince the new legislature of the value of 
Russian accession to NATO's Partnership for Peace, Russian 
government officials continue to portray the program as merely an 
interim step toward broader European security measures that will 
provide prominent status for Russia.  Influential members of the 
Duma, on the other hand, are taking a skeptical attitude, 
expressing concern that the terms of Russia's association with 
NATO will be dictated, rather than negotiated, and will harm 
Russia's security interests.  Although the Defense Ministry 
newspaper has supported joining the program, other media 
commentary across the political spectrum appears to reflect 
nationalistic fears that Russian interests will be damaged 
whether or not it joins the Partnership. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Testifying at 16-17 March Duma hearings, government officials 
promoted accession to the NATO Partnership for Peace program, 
arguing that Russia will gain influence by joining but risks 
isolation if it does not.  Yuriy Nazarkin, head of the 
coordination and interaction department of the Security Council's 
staff; Yuriy Ushakov, head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs' 
(MFA) Department for European Cooperation; and Major General 
Pavel Zolotarev from the Defense Ministry all stressed that to 
"disregard" Partnership for Peace would mean a disastrous self- 
isolation that would damage Russia's security.  Nazarkin and 
Ushakov warned that refusing to join would strengthen those who 
were pushing for NATO expansion and argued that in joining Russia 
could influence the program (Interfax, 17 March).   In 
enumerating a long list of membership advantages, Zolotarev 
contended that by joining Russia would demonstrate to the world 
its interest in collective security and "neutralize" the anti- 
Russian forces that are seeking to exclude Russia from the 
international arena (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March). 

Moscow's Mixed Signals 

   Despite this supportive testimony and Defense Minister Pavel 
Grachev's statement that Russia would join the program soon, 
other signals from the government suggest that it is unsure about 
how fast to move ahead.  After his 17 March meeting with U.S. 
Defense Secretary William Perry, Grachev told reporters that 
"groups of experts" are "already completing work" on Russia's 
membership application, adding optimistically that "we shall be 
able to join the concept by the end of the month" (ITAR-TASS, 17 
March).  More cautiously, however, First Deputy Defense Minister 
Andrey Kokoshin said it was "too early" to discuss when Russia 
would sign on to the program (Interfax, 18 March).  A 19 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article, discounting speculation that Grachev 
meant that Russia would "definitely" sign in March, cited a 
Foreign Ministry "clarification" that the signing might take 
place in late March or more likely later.  The article attributed 
the delay to the need to finish drafting the documents, "wind up 
interdepartmental consultations," and "solve a number of 
technical problems"--including who would sign, Grachev or Foreign 
Minister Andrey Kozyrev. 

   In addition, Russian President Boris Yeltsin and other senior 
officials have continued to express reservations about the 
program--particularly its implications for NATO expansion--and to 
press for movement toward alternative European security measures: 

-- In his 24 February address to the Duma, Yeltsin warned against 
any NATO expansion without Russia and made clear that, while 
Moscow supported Partnership for Peace, it viewed the program as 
a waystation to building a pan-European partnership "open to all 
states of the greater Europe" in which CSCE would take the lead 
and NATO would be relegated to a subordinate role (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 25 February). 

-- After a meeting with FRG Defense Minister Volker Ruehe in 
Berlin on 11 March, Grachev intimated that he views the program 
as only a stopgap measure until new European security structures 
emerge, touting the CSCE as the "main peace-keeping organization 
in Europe," and noting that "time will tell what the [NATO] 
structure will be like" (ITAR-TASS, 11 March).  These remarks 
echoed his suggestion to reporters on 2 February that the program 
was transitional, providing for a coordinated effort to defuse 
tensions in Europe by NATO and other countries, including Russia, 
during "an interim period following the breakup of the Warsaw 
Pact."  He also reiterated his previous warnings against the 
accession of former Warsaw Pact members and the Baltic states to 
NATO (Interfax, 2 February). 

-- Kozyrev, likewise, has continued to warn against NATO 
expansion and laud CSCE merits.  In an address to a 10 March MFA 
Foreign Policy Council session, he complained about 
"NATOcentrism" within the alliance which has led to a push for a 
"mechanical" expansion, adding that this demonstrates a "vacuum 
of strategic thought" and undermines the goal of "moving toward a 
single, Greater Europe" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, Kommersant-Daily, 
11 March).  Although Kozyrev said Russia is close to signing 
Partnership for Peace documents, he continued to argue that CSCE 
should become the core of Europe's security system.  Like 
Grachev, he hinted that collaboration within a NATO framework 
might be only temporary, saying that a "necessary historical 
period" perhaps "two to three years in length" had "opened up" to 
"elaborate and implement cooperation programs."  Similarly in a 
17 March Izvestiya article, he said that NATO was "inadequate" 
and "unsuitable" for "current purposes" and contended that while 
Partnership for Peace would provide "a partial answer" to 
security problems, it could not "be considered the pinnacle of 
achievement." 

   In a sign that not all of Yeltsin's administration share the view 
that Russia has more to gain than to lose by joining the program, 
Presidential Council adviser Andranik Migranyan, in a 15 March 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta article titled "Why Join, If It Is Better Not 
To Join," strongly opposed Russian accession.  Claiming that 
there is no consensus on the issue within the Foreign Ministry, 
he listed numerous adverse consequences if Russia joins.  He 
contended that the program would deepen Russia's isolation and 
"sharply limit its freedom for foreign policy maneuvering." 

Doubts in the Duma 

   Many influential members of the Duma apparently remain ambivalent 
about the Partnership plan, opposing what they view as NATO's 
"dictat," and worried that a broad range of security interests 
from the competitiveness of Russia's defense industries to its 
security arrangements with other CIS countries will suffer: 

-- Former Ambassador to the United States Vladimir Lukin, a 
member of the moderately reformist Yavlinsky bloc and chairman of 
the Duma's international affairs Committee, conceded the 
Partnership idea was good, but said the "devil was in the 
details," which had been insufficiently thought through (Moscow 
radio, 17 March).  He said that Russia, "instead of trying to 
"push to the head of the line" to join,  should carefully analyze 
what should be done for a more active rapprochement with NATO and 
closely follow NATO's reorganization.  Lukin also expressed 
concern that involvement with the Partnership program could wreck 
Russia's "strategic intentions to create security structures 
within the CIS framework" (Krasnaya Zvezda, 18 March) 

-- Sergey Yushenkov, chairman of the Duma's defense committee and 
a Russia's Choice member, said while in Washington with a Duma 
delegation that he objected to membership on the grounds that 
"the framework agreements were drawn up without [the Duma's] 
participation and do not conform to Russia's status" and that 
NATO standardization would be "simply destructive" for Russia's 
defense industries.  He advocated instead a security alliance 
between Russia and other countries in which the guidelines would 
not be set by NATO, as in the case of Partnership for Peace, but 
would be worked out "jointly" (Interfax, 9 March; Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 18 March).  More recently, however, he appears to have 
changed his position on joining.  During the Duma hearings 
Yushenkov said he supports Russian membership, but maintains it 
should be carried out on special terms given Russia's "status as 
a nuclear power."  Like many government officials, he contended 
that the NATO program should be viewed as "the beginning of a 
path toward a common security system" (Interfax, 17 March). 

-- Konstantin Zatulin, chairman of the Duma's CIS affairs 
committee and co-chairman of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord faction, warned the MFA Foreign Policy Council session 
that Russia's participation in the "Partnership" program would 
dash its hopes [unspecified] in the "near abroad," because even 
now CIS countries were trying to "blackmail" Russia by appealing 
to the West for help (Kommersant-Daily, 11 March). 

Media Reaction 

   Russia media commentary on the Partnership for Peace program has 
reflected fears about isolation if Russia fails to join, 
suspicion that Russian interests may suffer if it does join, and 
resentment that Russia's options thus are limited.  NATO bashing 
has been a staple of procommunist newspapers like Pravda and has 
intensified in the wake of the February NATO ultimatum to the 
Bosnian Serbs, but even reformist and pro-Yeltsin newspapers 
appear ambivalent toward membership, although the Defense 
Ministry newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda, supported it: 

-- The procommunist newspaper Pravda printed a long diatribe on 
16 March by retired general Viktor Chudov, who charged that 
Partnership for Peace was designed as a cover for "peace U.S.- 
style" and "world domination."  The article, which claimed that 
planned U.S.-Russian exercises were designed to counter 
"reunification sentiments" in former Soviet republics and to 
inspire "separatists and nationalists" to "vigorous activity," 
lambasted the Defense Ministry's "top brass" for engaging in such 
exercises instead of carrying out its own war games designed to 
repel aggression "by a coalition of nuclear powers." 

-- The reformist newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, which printed the 
highly critical Migranyan article, frontpaged another article on 
15 March titled "Russia's Partnership With NATO Is A 
Misalliance."  The article maintained that Russia could have 
received better terms if it had held out longer before agreeing 
to join, claiming that there had been growing sentiment in the 
West to offer Moscow something more in line with its "great 
power" status.  Now, the article warned, Moscow confronts a new 
dilemma:  to face isolation and discrimination if it does not 
become a full member of NATO, or to place its armed forces, 
military plans, and budget under the command and control of the 
United States if it does join, since "under a long-standing 
tradition, the NATO commander in chief has always been and 
remains an American general." 

-- A 23 March article in the mass-circulation newspaper 
Komsomolskaya Pravda contended that, although Moscow had little 
choice, it would be "humiliating" for it to follow "in the wake 
of U.S. policy," "jostling for space on the margins." 
Complaining that "Washington is the banker and Russia is "forced 
to play blind," the article noted sarcastically 
that "you can judge for yourselves how far such 'partnership' can 
be called mutually beneficial and equal." 

-- A 16 February article in the usually pro-Yeltsin newspaper 
Izvestiya warned that Russia could lose its arms market in 
Eastern Europe as countries switched to NATO standards.  A 19 
March Izvestiya article admitted that the program was not popular 
in the Duma and gave minimal support to the government's campaign 
to promote it, confining its advocacy to pointing out that 
without Russia the program was "meaningless" and that Moscow had 
made clear to Secretary Perry that Russia intends to join "on its 
own terms." 

-- On 22 March, prominent Krasnaya Zvezda commentator Aleksandr 
Golts, echoing the government's line, strongly backed Partnership 
for Peace and criticized the "emotional" arguments of its 
opponents.  Claiming that the actual partnership program had 
emerged because Washington "was forced to take Moscow's tough 
stance [on NATO expansion] into consideration," Golts stressed 
that the main point in the program was that each country would 
develop its own relationship with NATO on a bilateral basis and 
that Moscow is elaborating terms "which will take maximum account 
of Russian interests."  Golts insisted that "the fears that 
Russia condemns itself to a secondary role by signing the 
partnership program scarcely hold up," while the risks that 
Russia faces if it does not join "are as clear as can be": the 
program would "acquire an unambiguously anti-Russian thrust." 

Outlook 

   While government officials support joining the NATO Partnership 
for Peace program as beneficial to Russia's security interests, 
they clearly view the program as a stop gap measure and hope it 
will foster the creation of a European security system in which 
Russia will play a major role.  Influential legislators, in 
contrast, appear more fearful that NATO affiliation will further 
marginalize rather than foster Russian influence in Europe.  This 
reaction from the legislature, coupled with the skeptical 
reaction from even the independent press, may pressure the 
government to demonstrate that it remains an equal and assertive 
player in the working out of the terms of any NATO partnership. 

(AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/DEW 29/1810Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-76 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-044--PERSIAN GULF 
<H3> <TI>      ARAB LEAGUE:  BOYCOTT COMMITTEES LEAK REPORT </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Arab     boycott offices will soon submit a report to the Arab 
League, according to a dispatch from Damascus published in the 
Kuwaiti daily AL-WATAN, alleging that the Israeli Government plans 
to take advantage of its Arab neighbors in comprehensive fashion. 
The dispatch enumerates the ways in which the plan is taking shape, 
and complains of U.S. and other governments' acquiescence to it. 

   The Kuwaiti Arabic-language daily AL-WATAN carries an article 
from Damascus on 9 March 1994 by Safwan al-Bunni which summarizes a 
report the correspondent obtained which is purportedly to be 
submitted by the offices of the Arab boycott of Israel to the Arab 
League ministerial session "next month." 

   Al-Bunni says the report reviews Israel's economy and Israeli 
moves to end the boycott.  He claims the report will aver that 
Israel is striving for "a strategic political security plan 
which will "...permit Israel, quantitatively a small, weak country, 
to be a strong, large country with the stamp of a regional great 
power."  He further quotes it as saying, "Israeli thinking is 
shifting to a superpower strategy with the goal of transforming 
itself into a regional superpower, which it would not be able to do 
without the solid start that it achieved with the implementation of 
projects described at the time as very ambitious."  The report 
states that the necessary conditions for national security are 
military power supported by economic power, according to al-Bunni, 
and also claims Israel is trying to obtain U.S. aid in currency 
instead of goods, because of its belief that this type of investment 
will enable it to experience "a second industrial revolution." 

   The report to the Arab league warns, says al-Bunni: 

   That Israel turned to the arms trade in the Eighties because of 
the tremendous profits to be gained there, which were necessary to 
continue operating its military industries. 

   That Greenpeace charged that Israel's production of methyl 
bromide for pesticides has caused 3 percent of the hole in the ozone 
layer and that its Bromine plant in the Negev Desert produces one 
third of the world's supply of this chemical. 

   That an Egyptian diplomatic document claimed that Israel "still 
continues to steal water in the occupied territories in the Syrian 
Golan, southern Lebanon, and Jordan 

   That the same Egyptian document said the Israelis are researching 
the water table near the Egyptian border and that they are planning 
to build 32 dams, "beginning at the headwaters of the Nile River in 
Ethiopia." 

   That a joint U.S.-Israeli project will enable Israel to expand in 
the Mediterranean, that Israel is intensifying its exploitation of 
Jordan and Litani River waters, and that it is also making progress 
on the proposed Mediterranean-Dead Sea canal. 

   That Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhaq Rabin has affirmed that 
"Unified Jerusalem is the capital of Israel, is not negotiable, and 
is not on the agenda of the Israeli delegation's talks with the 
Palestinian delegation."  According to al-Bunni, the report terms 
the 1982 law annexing Jerusalem and establishing it as Israel's 
capital as "the strategic guide for Israeli public policy" no matter 
which party leads the country. 

   Turning to the Arab boycott of Israel itself, Bunni says that the 
report states that the United States has attempted to break it by 
various means, citing in particular remarks in March 1993 by Edward 
Djerejian, the U.S. Assistant Secretary of State for Near East and 
South Asian Affairs, to a Congressional committee that Secretary of 
State Warren Christopher had emphatically urged the Arab governments 
to end the boycott. 

   The report also cites Jewish Agency sources on the poor prospects 
for significant immigration from the Commonwealth of Independent 
States and U.S. data on the emigration of Israelis to the United 
States over the last six years. 

   The report, Bunni says, concludes by outlining the U.S. position 
on the boycott--that ending it is a positive move that supports the 
peace process--noting that the Japanese, Korean, and German 
Governments have bowed to U.S. pressure in the last two years, 
allowing their companies to do business in Israel. 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN GULF/SOUTH 
ASIA BRANCH AT (703) 733-6518) 
ENEAG/29 Mar/POLCHF/NEASA Division/SM 30/0256Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-77 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-045--Russia 
<H3> <TI>      ECONOMIC ISSUES NO 1:  RUSSIA-BELARUS MONETARY UNION </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     central press has been publishing articles discussing the 
political, social and economic ramifications of a Russian-Belarusian 
monetary union.  Economic experts, journalists and officials are 
debating the pros and cons of such a union in articles appearing in 
a variety of sources. 

   No Consensus in Belarus 

   Belarusian Radicals Call for a Strike 

   KRASNAYA ZVEZDA published an article by Valeriy Kovalev entitled 
"An Ordinary Meeting Instead of a Strike Took Place in the 
Belarusian Capital."  Kovalev reported that a group of deputies from 
the opposition Belarusian National Front issued a statement claiming 
that a Belarusian-Russian monetary union would cause "the 
destruction of the Belarusian economy and the Belarusian state." 
The deputies called on their countrymen to engage in a "national 
liberation struggle" and to participate in a demonstration demanding 
removal of Kebich's government, dissolution of the Supreme Soviet, 
and early presidential elections.  However, only about 1,000 people 
attended the rally in Minsk's central square, which led Kovalev to 
observe that "hardly anyone will be successful in coming to power in 
Belarus under the banner of fervent Russophobia." (Moscow KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA in Russian 16 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Belarusian Deputy Favors Union 

   Henadz Kazlow, coordinator of the "Belarus" faction in the 
Supreme Soviet, in an interview responded to a question about a 
monetary union, noting that despite attempts to "foil" the agreement 
he believed "in the pragmatism of practical politicians who drafted 
this agreement," and added that "an economic union is already being 
discussed quite seriously.  There is no other way out."  (Minsk 
ZVYAZDA in Belarusian 23 Feb 94 pp 1, 3) 

   Some Belarusians and Russians Agree 

   Belarusian and Russian Enterpreneurs Appeal for Union 

   The business-oriented paper DELOVOY MIR carried on page 1 an 
"Appeal from the Russian Union of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs 
and the Belorussian (Belarusian) Scientific-Industrial Association 
to the Governments of Russia and Belorussia."  The appeal, signed by 
Russian Union chairman A.I. Volskiy and president of the Belorussian 
Association M.F. Lavrinovich, pointed out that the time is ripe for 
integrating the monetary systems of the two republics and noted that 
possible temporary expenses due to unifying the monetary systems 
are commensurably small in comparison with the benefits from 
regulating economic and cooperative ties, broadening the market and 
increasing incomes from the development of production."  The two 
organizations called upon their respective governments to "take this 
decisive and necessary step" which would benefit both "the economic 
situation and the population's standard of living." (Moscow DELOVOY 
MIR in Russian 25 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Economists Emphasize Benefits of a Monetary Union 

   The same issue of DELOVOY MIR ran an article by two candidates of 
economic science, Vladimir Safronov of Moscow and Aleksandr Yarosh 
of Minsk.  In their article, entitled "Russia and Belarus:  There 
are no Losers," they provided a number of statistics to prove that 
negative influences on either state's economy would be negligible. 
A model developed by Belarusian and Russian economists showed that 
in the former USSR Belarus provided one-tenth of all interrepublic 
imports and delivered almost one-fourth of its products to the other 
republics.  At the same time, its dependence on economic ties with 
other republics was among the highest.  If a Belarus-Russia monetary 
union also includes unified economic relations with the other 
republics, according to the model, Russian national income would 
grow 1.9 percent and Belarusian 7.9 percent.  "Thus," the economists 
stated, "the results of the calculations prove that negative 
consequences for both states are insignificant."  They concluded 
that "unification of the monetary-credit systems of Russia and 
Belarus provide more positive than negative results.  The course 
toward reintegrating Russia and Belarus and creating an economic 
union answers their long-range state interests." (Moscow DELOVOY MIR 
in Russian 25 Feb 94 p 4) 

   Bones of Contention 

   Only Premiers Can Resolve These Two Issues 

   In an article entitled "Moscow-Minsk:  Will the Ruble Zone 
Expand?,"  ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA correspondent Aleksandr Shinkin 
reported the Belarusian leadership's recognition that "the economic 
stability of the republic is scarcely possible without Russia."  He 
added that both former Supreme Council speakers Shushkevich and 
current leader of parliament Hryb "have advocated the unification of 
the monetary systems."  Shinkin cited Chernomyrdin, who "considers 
that there are two questions which can be resolved only at the level 
of the premiers of the two states."  Prices for energy and the 
exchange rate between Russian and Belarusian rubles were the two 
issues.  Quoting a Russian Ministry of Economics staffer, Shinkin 
reported that the supporters of a monetary union were divided 
between those who favored "meeting Belarus' demands halfway" while 
the other group was "insisting essentially upon a single budget." 
(Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 17 Feb 94 p 6) 

   Belarusian Demands Continue to Increase 

   On 26 February SEGODNYA published an article by Yelena 
Kolokoltseva entitled "Belorussia (Belarus) is Insisting on Cheap 
Gas from Russia."  Despite an agreement on lowering the price for a 
tonne of gas from 80 to 55 dollars, Kolokoltseva cited a Russian 
official who said that "Belorussia's appetites keep on growing." 
Belarus's demands were strengthened "by threats to impose tariffs on 
the transit of Russian energy sources through Belorussian 
territory."  Belarus's goal, Kolokoltseva stated, was "to receive 
cheap energy resources and guarantee the sale to Russia of products 
which cannot compete in Western markets."  She concluded that it is 
only Russian Central Bank chairman Viktor Gerashchenko who "can 
explain to the Russian leadership the financial consequences for the 
Russian economy of the unification of the Belorussian and Russian 
monetary systems.  The question is whether he wants to do so." 
(Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 26 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Areas of Disagreement 

   A SEGODNYA commentary by Aleksandr Bekker, entitled "Belorussia 
(Belarus) is Getting Russian Rubles but Does Not Want to Give Up 
Sovereignty," cited Deputy Russian Finance Minster Andrey Kazmin who 
identified three basic areas of disagreement between Russia and 
Belarus: Budget functions during the transition period; the status 
of Belarus' National Bank, which would lose its right of money 
emission; and prices for energy.  Bekker stated that "the course of 
negotiations in Moscow show that Belorussia is not in the mood to 
part with important attributes of national sovereignty--its own 
budget and national bank--and these aspects will probably be used by 
the Belorussian parliamentary opposition."  He added that "it is 
indicative, that even without having agreed with Russia on the size 
of the current year's budget deficit, the Belorussian parliament 
(went ahead and) allotted R2.8 trillion to its farmers for the 
sowing." (Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 1 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Kebich Remains Optimistic 

   A Valentin Zhdanko report on the 18 March closed meeting of the 
Belarusian parliament, entitled "Vyacheslav Kebich Does Not Abandon 
His Dream about Single Ruble Zone.  Belarusian Prime Minister Bets 
on Russian Parliament," appeared in SEGODNYA.  Zhdanko quoted 
Kebich's accusation that "Mr. Tulin, deputy Central Bank chairman, 
and Mr. Kazmin, deputy finance minister, and some others revised the 
documents, a procedure that has entirely distorted the original 
draft treaty that was to be signed."  Minsk rejected as unacceptable 
demands that the "two countries' budgets be merged and that the 
Belarusian National Bank be stripped of its independence." 
According to Zhdanko, however, Kebich remained optimistic and he 
cited a telephone conversation between him and Russian Prime 
Minister Chernomyrdin:  "The Russian leaders have expressed their 
political will and unequivocal desire to sign the document about 
setting up a money union as early as this month."  Zhdanko added 
that in the upcoming talks with Nikolay Gonchar, Russian Federation 
Council Financial Committee chairman, "any unification of the two 
countries' budgets or infringement on the BNB's rights will not even 
be mentioned..." (Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 19 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Disadvantages for Russia and Belarus 

   In March NOVOYE VREMYA ran an article by Yelena Vishnevskaya 
entitled "How Russia and Belorussia (Belarus) Will Combine and 
Divide Money."  Vishnevskaya cited some objections to a monetary 
union from Boris Fedorov, former Finance Minister and currently head 
of the Duma commission on monetary and credit policy.  She quoted 
Fedorov's statement that "pseudointegrated constructions cannot be 
viable" and his opinion that "nowhere and never has there been nor 
can there be a unified currency and two emission banks." 
Vishnevskaya then went on to refute some of Fedorov's assertions, 
stating, among other things, that "the National Bank of Belorussia 
does not have the right of currency emission."  However, she 
admitted that a monetary union might be disadvantageous for Russia, 
citing a one-trillion ruble price tag for settling Belorussia's 
debts to Russian energy suppliers.  She concluded that "in the 
future the expenditures can be justified--in an inviolable union oil 
and gas extracting enterprises can be erected precisely on 
Belorussian territory while relying on raw materials from Russia. 
If Russia wants to change from a raw material appendage of the 
Western economy into an exporter of at least semi-finished products 
it must build plants on its own territory, but this is not cheaper 
than including Belorussia in the ruble monetary system." (Moscow 
NOVOYE VREMYA in Russian No 10, (signed to press 5 Mar 94) pp 12-13) 

   Monetary Union May Cost Belarus Too Much 
   IZVESTIYA correspondent Aleksandr Starikevich and economist 
Nikodim Dubalevich described what Belarus might lose from a monetary 
union in an article entitled "Unification of Monetary Systems is 
Dangerous for Belarus Too."  The authors pointed out that those in 
favor of monetary unification foresee two basic benefits--lower 
prices for Russian raw materials, specifically energy, and lower 
prices for Belarusian products and thus greater sales in Russia. 
But, the authors said,  "there is no economic or political 
substantiation for these two hopes."  The problem arises in 
determining the exchange rate, where an exchange rate of one to one 
means in practice a revaluation of the Belarusian ruble in relation 
to the Russian ruble and, as a consequence, a sharp increase in the 
prices of Belarusian output....In addition, the unification of 
monetary systems means the loss of some state sovereignty."  The 
authors claimed that "this step is based not on economic but on 
political considerations"  and accused the Kebich government of 
being unable to work independently and using monetary union as "its 
only salvation...." (Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 11 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Fedorov Says Russia Will Pay For Union 

   Former Russian Finance Minister and current Duma Deputy Boris 
Fedorov expressed his opinion about a monetary union in an IZVESTIYA 
article entitled "Cart Before the Horse: Merging the Belarusian and 
Russian Monetary Systems."  Fedorov called the merger of the two 
currencies a "mutant" which would be unlikely to survive for even a 
short while because "the compatibility necessary between the 
economic and political systems is lacking."  He added that they, 
meaning the political leaders of both countries, "intend to carry 
out the merger at Russians' expense" because the terms demanded by 
the Belarusians "will ultimately cause inflation to rise."  Fedorov 
believed that political reunification must come before economic 
unification.  Any price that must be paid then "will be a conscious 
price paid for the reunification of fraternal peoples, which will 
ultimately also yield economic results." (Moscow IZVESTIYA in 
Russian 15 Mar 94 p 2) 

(AUTHOR:  ENGELBERG.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
POLITICAL/ECONOMIC BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6376.) 
ENEAG/29 MAR/ECONF/RUSSIA DIVISION/SM 30/0314Z MAR 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-78 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   31 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-30MAR94-JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      Shipbuilders Seek Coexistence With ROK Counterparts </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Confronted     by a significant expansion of South Korean 
shipbuilding  capacity, Japanese shipbuilders are reportedly 
opting to coexist, rather than compete, with South Korean 
shipbuilders through technological cooperation and division of 
labor.  According to the 16 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japanese 
shipbuilders are seeking to expand cooperative relationships with 
the South Korean shipbuilding industry, which surpassed Japan in 
1993 in the tonnage of shipbuilding orders received.  The 
Japanese firms' current overtures--coming on the heels of a 
recent deal between Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and South Korea's 
Samsung Heavy Industries--reportedly mark a ''major change" in the 
business strategy of Japanese shipbuilding companies.  In the 
past they had sought to dissuade South Korean shipbuilders from 
increasing production capacity in order to avoid a worldwide 
plunge in ship prices.  Now, with capital investment by South 
Korean shipbuilders having increased to a level that even 
Japanese shipbuilders cannot match, Japanese companies have 
reportedly decided to adopt a new strategy to cooperate and share 
work, rather than compete with their South Korean counterparts. 
   According to Nihon Keizai Shimbun, the strategy of the leading 
Japanese shipbuilding firms is now focused on forming an 
international shipbuilding consortium.  To this end, the paper 
reported,  Ishikawajima-Harima Heavy Industries (IHI) has asked 
Samsung to join a group composed of IHI, Sumitomo Heavy 
Industries and an Italian shipbuilder to participate in the bid 
for a fifth Liquefied Natural Gas (LNG) tanker for the Korean Gas 
Corporation.  The paper also reported that IHI hopes Samsung's 
participation will increase the group's heretofore low chance of 
winning the bid.  In return, IHI has offered Samsung 
technological assistance in building LNG tankers, it added. 
   (AUTHOR:  INNES.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/CB 30/1521z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-79 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   31 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-30Mar94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Agrarian Lobby Moves To Block Food Imports </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                           Announcing a sharp swing away from its dependence on imported 
food in recent years, the Russian government, prompted by the 
agrarian lobby's desire to protect farms from foreign 
competition, has declared it will import no grain in 1994 and has 
slapped import duties on most other food products.  The moves 
were made despite a poor grain harvest in 1993 and an expected 
further decline this year and provoked outcry by the mayors of 
Moscow and St. Petersburg, whose constituents face higher food 
prices and possible future shortages as a result of the cutoff of 
their large-scale food imports.  But the moves were accompanied 
by reformist measures seeking, for example, to reduce the state's 
role in agriculture in order to develop private marketing 
channels. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Russian President Boris Yeltsin told reporters on 9 March that 
"for the first time in three or four decades, Russia will not 
import grain, linen or wool this year" and "we have enough grain 
to last us until the new harvest'' (ITAR-TASS, 9 March).  He told 
Interfax (9 March) that he had made this decision after talking 
to Deputy Premier for agriculture Aleksandr Zaveryukha that 
morning, and on 12 March Zaveryukha publicly applauded Yeltsin's 
statement and said that his own calculations showed that there is 
sufficient food and no grain need be purchased abroad (Russian 
TV, 12 March).  In a further move against food imports, Premier 
Viktor Chernomyrdin on 10 March signed a decree ordering 
imposition of duties on many types of food imports, including 
fish, shellfish, milk, potatoes, vegetables, and apples, although 
not on grain (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 18 March).  Previously, most 
foods were imported duty free (Interfax, 16 March). 
   Reaction 
   The import duties brought an outcry, especially from big city 
leaders who had been trying to prevent this move for weeks. 
Moscow Mayor Yuriy Luzhkov in mid-January had written an open 
letter to Chernomyrdin complaining that some members of the 
cabinet were trying to push through a plan to "protect the 
interests of Russian agricultural producer5?? by eliminating 
federal food stocks, introducing high customs duties on imported 
food, and abolishing subsidies for foreign food prices.  He 
argued that by raising prices for foreign foods the duties would 
enrich Russian farmers at the expense of Russian consumers, 
pointing out that foreign sugar sells for 600 rubles a kilo 
whereas Russian sugar costs 900 rubles (ITAR-TASS, 17 January; 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 18 January).  After the 10 March decree, the 
mayors of Moscow and St. Petersburg and the head of the 
Yekaterinburg Administration sent Yeltsin an appeal protesting 
the increase of import duties (Krasnaya Zvezda, 22 March). 
Luzhkov on the television program Itogi on 20 March assailed the 
increases, which he attributed to Zaveryukha, and said he had 
gone to Chernomyrdin to complain and try to defend the interests 
of cities.  Izvestiya reported on 22 March that Moscow's food 
suppliers ''immediately jacked up prices'' after import duties were 
raised, especially for livestock products. 
   Zaveryukha and Agriculture Minister Viktor Khlystun held a news 
conference on 22 March to defend the decision, arguing that 
Russia can feed itself, but an influx of foreign food is hurting 
Russian farming.  They complained that Moscow and St. Petersburg 
consumed 70 percent imported food and ignored Russian-produced 
food (Russian TV, 22 March).  Zaveryukha complained that imported 
food ''has started to flood in from abroad via various commercial 
structures'' and that big city leaders, primarily in Moscow and 
St. Petersburg, prefer imported foods to Russian foods (Selskaya 
Zhizn, 24 March).  In a 24 March Rossiyskaya Gazeta interview he 
argued that ''we have plentiful supplies of our own food products'' 
and therefore food prices will not rise.  As an example of how 
imports have damaged domestic agriculture, he complained that 
last year's importation of large amounts of dried milk had cut 
demand for milk in Moscow and disrupted Russian milk production. 
He said that "unless the chaotic situation with imported 
products--which are often of poor quality--is stopped, entire 
sectors in our own country, such as livestock raising, poultry 
farming, and flax growing, are doomed to disappear" (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 24 March). 
   Food Supplies 
   Zaveryukha has long talked of cutting or ending imports, and in 
fact, imports had been reduced to 10.4 million tons in 1993--the 
lowest in 15 years (Interfax, 14 January) and down from 25.5 
million in 1992 (Interfax, 20 January).  Zaveryukha had told a 
press conference in early March that Russia will export 3-4 
million tons of grain this year (Interfax, 2 March).  He recently 
argued that Russia has enough grain reserves to last until 
October when the new harvest comes in and may actually be able to 
export 2 million tons (Interfax, 16 March).  Aleksandr Kudelya, 
first vice president of Roskhleboprodukt (the company that buys 
grain for the government), at the beginning of this year 
contended that farms really have more grain than they admit and 
indicated that Roskhleboprodukt has already contracted with 
farmers for 32 million tons and has actually bought 26 million 
tons of this, compared to 25 million tons actually bought in 1992 
(Interfax, 14 January). 
   Despite this optimism, the decision to end imports is clearly not 
based on increased production, since last year's harvest was not 
very high and domestic production this year is expected to be 
much worse.  Khlystun has forecast a grain harvest of only 89 
million tons for 1994 (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 17 March)--far below 
the 99 million tons produced in 1993 (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 11 
March), reflecting dim prospects for 1994 as farmers continue to 
experience financial difficulties in buying fuel, equipment, and 
seed.  Others assert that even predictions of 89 million tons are 
far too optimistic and that Russia will run out of grain, 
pointing out, for example, that fall planting of winter grain was 
down 20 percent from 1992 (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 23 March).  An 
Agriculture and Food Ministry official, speaking before Yeltsin 
and Zaveryukha announced that there would be no imports, said the 
country will need 113.9 million tons of grain (28 million for 
food, 28 million for seed, and about 62 million for fodder) and 
will have to import 13-14 million tons this year (Interfax, 17 
February). 
   Zaveryukha's optimism seems based largely on reduced demand, 
especially for livestock fodder, rather than increased 
production, and he has said that his calculations show that 
Russia has enough fodder grain this year (Selskaya Zhizn, 29 
January).  Much of Russia's grain has traditionally been used to 
feed livestock--more than in other countries--and much of the 
imported grain is precisely fodder grain.  Under the pressure of 
higher grain prices and limited grain supplies, livestock herds 
have been cut recently, reducing the amount of grain going to 
fodder and cutting grain consumption markedly.  An agricultural 
institute estimated that grain consumption by livestock has 
fallen from 70 million tons in 1988 to 56 million tons in 1993 
(Interfax, 14 January).  Roskhleboprodukt President Leonid 
Cheshinskiy recently said that the lower import needs were based 
on lower fodder consumption since the number of hogs had fallen 
36 percent since 1992 and cattle and poultry 19 percent 
(Interfax, 23 March).  Kudelya said that last fall's freeing of 
bread prices had led to a 15 percent drop in its consumption 
(Interfax, 14 January), discouraging human consumption as well as 
feeding cheap bread to animals.  Ironically, the reduction of 
livestock herds now seems to be treated as a positive step- 
-reducing wasteful use of grain--even though in the past cutting 
herds because of fodder shortages was viewed as a major setback 
to agriculture, reducing meat and dairy production for years to 
come and setting back efforts to improve the Russian diet. 
   Zaveryukha has also raised the idea that demand will be reduced 
by cutting the state's role in procurement.  He argued that a new 
procurement system being introduced will decrease the number of 
consumers dependent on the federal food fund and make more of 
them depend on regional food funds and non-government markets 
(Selskaya Zhizn, 29 January).  He has also claimed that federal 
food reserves would be reduced this year and would cover fewer 
areas, and that wholesale markets would form "the basis of stable 
food provision'' (Interfax, 2 February).  An edict ''On 
Liberalizing the Grain Market in Russia'' adopted by Yeltsin on 24 
December formed a federal grain fund and regional funds and 
announced that the federal and regional governments would no 
longer require mandatory deliveries from farms (Sobraniye Aktov 
Prezidenta i Pravitelstva Rossiyskoy Federatsii, 27 December 
1993; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 15 January).  The state set a target of 
only 10-11 million tons for its 1994 federal grain fund (10 
million, according to Interfax, 14 January 1994; 10.7, according 
to Russian TV, 16 March; and 11 million, according to Cheshinskiy 
in the 23 March Rossiyskaya Gazeta).  A 23 March Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta article called the decree on liberalizing the grain market 
"essentially aimed at considerably reducing state purchases of 
grain for the federal fund" and creating competition in the grain 
market by privatizing grain procurement centers and creating 
grain markets.  Reducing the federal food fund would directly 
allow a cut in imports because this fund is largely formed from 
imported grain (Interfax, 17 February). 
   Despite Zaveryukha's assertions, however, the new procurement 
system does not seem likely to bring a drastic reduction of state 
grain needs compared to last year since most of its features had 
already been introduced last year.  The government had also 
established separate federal and regional food funds in 1993, 
with the federal fund only covering the military, Moscow and St. 
Petersburg (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 16 February 1993) and had set 
federal reserves at only 11.8 million tons for 1993--as against 
about 30 million in previous years (Interfax, 2 March 1993).  The 
federal fund actually bought 11.5 million tons in 1993 (Interfax, 
14 January)--not much more than this year's target.  Total needs- 
-including regional as well as federal--may be not much smaller 
than the 30-some million purchased in most past years.  Interfax 
on 20 January said that present federal and regional funds 
comprised 27 million tons. 
   Financial Aid 
   Zaveryukha's drive against food imports is part of his campaign 
to rescue the ailing farm sector by increasing government 
financial aid.  He stated at a February Ministry of Agriculture 
and Food meeting that the main thing this year is to prevent 
''disintegration'' of Russian farming and ''preserve Russia's food 
independence" and that farms are counting on financial support in 
a new government decree on the agroindustrial complex and on 
introduction of customs duties on imports (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 18 
February).  Zaveryukha appeared to achieve considerable success 
recently in protecting agricultural interests by pushing through 
cabinet approval of a decree "On Functioning of the 
Agroindustrial Complex in 1994?' that orders the government to pay 
farms for the products they sold to the state in 1993, to allow 
farms to postpone payment of their debts, and to retain existing 
state subsidies for equipment, parts, fuel, and fertilizer. 
According to the Agriculture and Food Ministry, the decree, 
approved by the cabinet on 3 February, was to cost the government 
14 trillion rubles, but according to critics, its cost would more 
likely be 34 trillion, and this big sum from an already hard- 
pressed budget caused a big political uproar. 
   Even after the cabinet decision, controversy over the decree's 
financial aid to agriculture continued, and Chernomyrdin delayed 
signing it, alarming agrarian lobbyists.  Zaveryukha assured the 
Agriculture and Food Ministry on 15 February that the premier 
would soon sign the decree (Segodnya, 17 February), but 39 
worried Agrarian Party Duma deputies visited Chernomyrdin on 18 
February to urge him to sign, and Chairman Aleksandr Nazarchuk of 
the Duma's Committee on Agrarian Matters afterward announced the 
premier would sign it before the 25 February cabinet discussion 
of the budget (Segodnya, 19 February), presumably to nail down 
agriculture's allocations before final decisions on the budget. 
   When finally signed, the controversial decree, now titled "On 
Economic Conditions for Functioning of the Agroindustrial Complex 
of the Russian Federation in 1994," did include big financial aid 
for farms but less than the draft approved on 3 February. 
Chernomyrdin signed it on 23 February, and it was published in 
the 26 February Selskaya Zhizn and 28 February Sobraniye.  Like 
the earlier version the cabinet approved on 3 February, the final 
decree ordered paying off of 1993 state debts to farms and 
subsidizing of farms' purchase of electricity, fuel, fertilizer, 
equipment, and seed, but, according to Nazarchuk, it provided for 
considerably less funding for spring sowing and other items 
(Segodnya, 24 February).  Zaveryukha portrayed the decree as a 
"victory for agrarians," although he admitted that he was ??not 
entirely satisfied?? with it (Trud, 26 February), and he insisted 
it will provide enough to finance spring sowing (Interfax, 24 
February).  Later, farmers complained that banking and finance 
officials are dragging their feet in distributing the funds 
allotted for the 1994 spring sowing, leaving farmers without the 
needed financial help at this critical time (Selskaya Zhizn, 24 
March).  It is still unclear whether the amounts promised to 
agriculture by the decree conform to the draft budget's 
allocations. 
   Prospects 
   Zaveryukha's moves to bar imports, accepted by Chernomyrdin and 
Yeltsin, seem prompted more by the desire to protect Russian 
farmers than by the prospect of satisfactory food supplies.  It 
may, however, give needed incentives to farms and help restore 
proper domestic production by making the government and others 
buy from farmers rather than seek food abroad.  Moreover, the 23 
February agroindustrial complex decree, in addition to 
protectionist and subsidy aspects, appears to contain reform 
features.  It ordered creation of a network of "food markets'' and 
agromarketing services'' as "alternative channels" for selling 
grain, helping create free market conditions for farmers and 
following up on Yeltsin's 24 December edict that abolished 
mandatory deliveries and ordered other steps to create a freer 
market for food.  But little has been seen yet about the new 
system of private markets and regional food funds, and it is not 
clear how well it will ensure supplies. 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 30/1602z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-80 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000018994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   31 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-30MAR94-DPRK-ROK-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      North Sharpens Rhetoric on 'Patriot' Missiles </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Reflecting     a hardening of its opposition to the prospective 
introduction of Patriot missiles in South Korea, North Korea has 
staged a "mass rally" and sharpened its rhetoric against Seoul 
and Washington.  At the 29 March rally in Pyongyang--the first 
such rally Pyongyang media have reported being staged against 
deployment of the missiles--the main speaker, a city People's 
Committee functionary, characterized current tension on the 
peninsula as such that a "nuclear war" could be touched off "by 
accident."  He went on to warn that if the United States and the 
South "challenge" the DPRK, it will "punish them hundreds and 
thousand times"(Pyongyang radio, 29 March)--a departure from 
Pyongyang's heretofore cautious pronouncements that went no 
further than to promise unspecified "countermeasures."  Like the 
speaker at the rally, an authoritative Nodong Sinmun 
commentator's article on 29 March also pledged to "deal a 
thousand-fold retaliatory blow" if the South unleashed a war 
against the North "in league with outside forces" (KCNA, 29 
March).  In a similar vein, KCNA on 30 March, commenting on the 
"increased [U.S.] military threat to the North," ominously warned 
Washington that "if one likes fire he is bound to get burnt." 
   Pyongyang has balanced its harsher rhetoric on the Patriot issue 
with indirect appeals for resumption of negotiations with 
Washington.  Thus, a KCNA report on 29 March claiming that 
foreign leaders are calling for a peaceful resolution of the 
nuclear issue cited the Malaysian prime minister as saying that 
the Korean nuclear issue "should be resolved through 
negotiations" and not "by means of pressure."  It portrayed the 
Congolese prime minister as similarly prescribing "dialogue and 
negotiation" for the issue.  The report also cited the Senegalese 
prime minister as ''expressing hope'' that the issue will be 
resolved through "DPRK-U.S. talks." 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HORTON/CB 30/1928z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-81 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   31 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-30MAR94-JAPAN-DPRK 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Divided Over Possible Sanctions Against DPRK </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                           The Japanese Government appears to be sharply divided over 
whether to support economic sanctions against North Korea if the 
United Nations decides to impose them.  Securing the backing of 
some members of the coalition for sanctions could require 
considerable effort and could divert the coalition's attention 
from other issues, such as easing trade frictions with the United 
States. 
                                  END SUMMARY 
   Prime Minister Hosokawa, perhaps reflecting the tensions within 
his government, has recently sent out increasingly conflicting 
signals about Japan's position on possible economic sanctions 
against North Korea.  Hosokawa most frequently has been reported 
as making somewhat guarded statements that have been interpreted 
in the Japanese press as meaning that Japan would support 
sanctions if the United Nations votes to impose them.  For 
example, during Hosokawa's news conference with President Clinton 
on 11 February, he stated that if the UN imposes sanctions "Japan 
will do as much as it can within the limits of its constitution" 
(NHK Television, 11 February).  At a 20 March news conference in 
Beijing, he made a similar statement, saying that "as a general 
rule . . . Japan for its part will also have to take responsible 
action" if the UN imposes sanctions.  Unnamed Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs (MOFA) officials quoted Hosokawa as telling Korean 
President Kim Yong-sam on 25 March during Kim's visit to Japan 
that if sanctions were imposed, Japan would take "responsible" 
measures within the limits of its constitution. 
   During his news conference with Kim on 26 March, however, 
Hosokawa appeared to be more non-committal.  He refused to answer 
a South Korean reporter's question about how Japan would react to 
any imposition of sanctions, arguing that it would be pointless 
to answer since the UN Security Council had not yet discussed the 
issue.  While saying that he thought it was "very important" for 
the international community to "indicate its solid attitude 
toward North Korea," he added that it was also "important to 
leave the door open for dialogue with North Korea" --a position 
that is also taken by some members of the ruling coalition who 
oppose sanctions. 
   Hosokawa's ambivalent public stance may represent an effort to 
avoid exacerbating tensions within his government over the 
sanctions issue.  Judging from statements in the Japanese media, 
the ruling coalition is sharply divided over whether Japan should 
support sanctions.  On one side there appears to be a group of 
coalition members around Shinseito Secretary General Ichiro 
Ozawa, who appears to believe that Japan should support sanctions 
as part of an effort to play a larger international political 
role.   The 23 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted Ozawa, widely 
considered as the most influential politician in the coalition, 
as stating that Japan should "cooperate" with the United Nations 
on the issue.  The 23 March Mainichi Shimbun also reported that 
Ozawa strongly backs sanctions, although the quotes it cited were 
more ambivalent.  According to the paper, on 22 March Ozawa said 
that Japan "has to act according to the principles of our 
constitution, which seeks world peace through the United Nations 
and preserves our country's peace, security, and existence."  He 
added that if Japan did not act in accordance with this 
principle, "the international community will not trust Japan." 
   Opposition to Sanctions 
   In contrast to Ozawa's position, there appears to be strong 
opposition to, or reservations about, sanctions within several 
parties in the coalition.  The strongest opposition reportedly 
comes from the Social Democratic Party of Japan (SDPJ), which has 
long been sympathetic to North Korea.  Outlining the party's 
position at a 22 March news conference, SDPJ Chairman Tomiichi 
Murayama reportedly argued that Japan should "do everything we 
can to reach a settlement [of the North Korean nuclear issue] 
through consultations, rather than through immediate sanctions" 
(Mainichi Shimbun, 23 March).  The 28 March Yomiuri Shimbun 
quoted the party's secretary general, Wataru Kubo, as stating 
that the party favored "a policy of dialogue" with North Korea 
because it feared that Pyongyang might respond to sanctions with 
acts of terrorism and because the party did not believe that 
sanctions would be successful in forcing North Korea to accept 
nuclear inspections.  Moreover, in an apparent effort to explore 
all avenues to a negotiated settlement of the DPRK nuclear issue, 
the party, according to the 24 March Mainichi Shimbun, decided on 
24 March to send a mission led by its vice chairman, Issei Inoue, 
to China for 3 days beginning 1 April to press Beijing to use 
China's influence with North Korea to get Pyongyang back to the 
negotiating table. 
   Despite its leadership's public opposition to sanctions, the SDPJ 
itself may in fact be divided over how to respond if the rest of 
the ruling coalition decides to support any possible sanctions. 
Judging by statements the Japanese press has attributed to 
various party leaders, some senior members of the party are 
apparently arguing that the SDPJ should back any government 
decision to support sanctions rather than risk breaking up the 
ruling coalition by continuing to oppose them.  For example, the 
26 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted an unidentified SDPJ leader 
as stating that despite the SDPJ's long relationship with the 
DPRK, "as one of the coalition partners, the SDPJ is in the 
position of shoring up the coalition government." 
In addition to the opposition within the SDPJ, some leaders in 
other coalition parties who were once involved in efforts to 
normalize Japan's relations with the DPRK as members of the 
Liberal Democratic Party appear to have reservations about 
imposing sanctions.  The 23 March issues of both Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun and Mainichi Shimbun reported that some members of the 
Shinseito and the Sakigake--the party headed by Chief Cabinet 
Secretary Masayoshi Takemura--were opposed to sanctions. 
   Wavering Within MOFA 
   Coalition members who argue that Japan should support sanctions 
appear to have some backing within the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs (MOFA), which evidently fears that Japan will damage its 
international credibility if it fails to support sanctions 
imposed by the United Nations.  MOFA has also been pressing for a 
permanent seat for Japan on the UN Security Council, and may fear 
that failure to support sanctions imposed by the UN would damage 
Japan's chances of attaining this goal.  A 24 March Kyodo report 
quoted MOFA Administrative Vice Minister Kunihiko Saito as 
telling a meeting of defense experts and businessmen that Japan 
would change its laws if necessary in order to support any 
economic sanctions imposed upon North Korea by the UN.  "Japan," 
Kyodo quoted Saito as saying, "will be remembered as an 
irresponsible country in the future" if it fails to support any 
UN sanctions on North Korea. 
   MOFA supporters of sanctions, however, have wavered in their 
public commitment to any UN moves in this direction, suggesting 
that they would prefer initially that the UN take a low-key 
approach to the North Korean nuclear issue.  For example, 
Administrative Vice Minister Saito on 28 March reportedly told a 
news conference that Japan was prepared to back a Chinese 
proposal that the Security Council issue a nonbinding statement 
urging North Korea to accept full nuclear inspections.  Kyodo 
quoted Saito as saying that the international community's "aim is 
to make North Korea change its policy, not to take punitive 
action." 
   Business Community Ambivalence 
   The apparent lack of widespread public--especially business- 
-support for a strong Japanese stance on sanctions may complicate 
the resolution of differences within the coalition.  For example, 
Gaishi Hiraiwa, the chairman of Japan's largest business 
organization the Keidanren [Federation of Economic 
Organizations], reportedly told a news conference on 24 March 
that he believed the international community should exhaust all 
possibilities for a negotiated solution to the North Korean 
nuclear issue before considering sanctions.  "As much as 
possible," the 24 March Mainichi Shimbun quoted him as saying, 
"it is necessary not to carry out sanctions and isolate North 
Korea." 
   Measures to Resolve Differences 
   The coalition and MOFA appear to be taking some tentative 
measures to resolve the differences within the government over 
the sanctions issue and come up with a unified government stance. 
These measures are evidently just in their initial stages, 
however, and progress is likely to be slow.  According to the 28 
March Yomiuri Shimbun, the SDPJ decided at a 24 March meeting of 
its central executive committee to undertake a study of how the 
party should handle the sanctions issue--a move possibly designed 
to help resolve the differences between the SDPJ's policy and 
that of the rest of the coalition.  In addition, according to the 
24 March Nihon Keizai Shimbun, MOFA has established a task force 
to consider how Japan will deal with issues surrounding economic 
sanctions against North Korea if the UN imposes them. 
   The work of this task force, however, will probably be slowed by 
apparent divisions within the government over how to handle some 
of the issues it is considering.  One of these issues is how to 
stop remittances to North Korea from ethnic Koreans living in 
Japan.  According to the 27 March Asahi Shimbun, the Ministry of 
Finance is examining various ways to restrict these remittances. 
The paper reported, however, that some government officials are 
opposed to some of the measures under considerations--such as 
refusing reentry permits to North Korean residents of Japan who 
visit North Korea and limiting the amount of money carried out of 
the country by travellers to the DPRK--because they might be 
perceived as discriminating against and violating the rights of 
Japanese residents of North Korean ancestry.  According to the 23 
March Nihon Keizai Shimbun, some officials are also arguing that 
it will be impossible to stop remittances that are sent to the 
DPRK through third countries such as China. 
   Outlook 
   If the UN imposes sanctions against North Korea, the Japanese 
Government will probably support them in order to preserve its 
relationships with the United States and South Korea and avoid 
damaging its chances of winning a permanent seat on the Security 
Council.  Getting the SDPJ to go along with such a position, 
however, will almost certainly take considerable time and effort, 
which, in turn, would probably divert the attention of the 
government from such pressing issues as resolving the current 
economic tensions with the United States. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6096.) 
EAG/HORTON/CB 30/2142z Mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-82 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000019194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   31 March 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-30MAR94-EGYPT 
<H3> <TI>      Possible Electoral Change Further Strains Islamic Alliance </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                            Already tense relations between the illegal but largely tolerated 
Muslim Brotherhood (MB) and its electoral ally the Socialist 
Labor Party (SLP) have been further strained by reports that the 
Egyptian government is considering a new change in the law 
governing parliamentary elections.  While an official decision on 
changing the law is evidently still far off, the MB has evinced 
concern that such a change would benefit the SLP to the 
Brotherhood's detriment. 

                         END SUMMARY 

   Over the past few months, both Egypt's state-owned and opposition 
newspapers have published reports that the ruling National 
Democratic Party (NDP) is contemplating yet another change in the 
parliamentary election system, presumably to take effect prior to 
the elections expected to occur at the expiration of the current 
People's Assembly term in late 1995.  According to the reports 
and news commentaries, the change being considered would restore 
in some form the recently abolished proportional representation 
party list system, which was introduced by President Husni 
Mubarak in 1984.  Under that system, the banned Muslim 
Brotherhood could enter candidates only if legal parties 
integrated them in their lists.  The party list system was 
abolished prior to the 1990 parliamentary elections, after the 
Constitutional Court ruled that it did not give independent 
candidates sufficient opportunity to compete; it was replaced by 
a system based on individual candidacies (see Note 1).  According 
to the government-owned daily Al-Ahram, the government's interest 
in restoring the old system is largely motivated by its concern 
to rein in independent-minded NDP deputies by ensuring that they 
are beholden to the party (Al-Ahram international edition, 30 
March). 
   (Note 1) The Brotherhood--together with its SLP ally and two 
other parties--nonetheless opted to boycott the 1990 elections in 
protest against what they claimed was the absence of guarantees 
for free and honest elections. 
   Minister of People's Assembly and Consultative Council Affairs 
Muhammad Zaki Abu-'Amir appeared to confirm in February that the 
government is seriously considering restoring the party slate 
system with modifications that would bring it into compliance 
with the 1990 court ruling.  In comments reported by the weekly 
Al-Akhbar Al-Yawm, Abu-'Amir denied that he knew of any official 
inclination to change the system.  He added, however, that the 
government's "economic liberalization policy will force a return 
to the proportional system," because individual candidacies are 
more susceptible to the "influence of money."  The same report 
quoted Fawziyah 'Abd-al-Sattar, head of parliament's Legislative 
Committee, as saying that a compromise might be found in which 
half the seats in every district are reserved for independents 
and the other half for party slates (5 February). 
   One suggested modification to the electoral system--lowering the 
threshold for parliamentary representation--would theoretically 
enable the SLP to contest the next People's Assembly elections 
without having to rely on its Muslim Brotherhood allies.  Deputy 
Prime Minister and NDP Secretary General Yusuf Wali reportedly 
told SLP officials that restoring the proportional list system 
might also involve a lowering of the threshold for parliamentary 
representation from 8 percent of the vote that a party was 
required to win under the old system to 4 percent (Al-Ahram 
international edition, 5 January).  It was that threshold that 
forced the SLP into its "Islamic Alliance" with the Brotherhood 
and a smaller party--the Liberals--in 1987 (see Note 2). 
Accordingly, lowering the threshold would make the SLP less 
dependent on the MB and would diminish MB opportunities to 
contest parliamentary seats independently, through the individual 
candidacies of organization members. 
   (Note 2) The SLP fell just short of the threshold when it 
contested the previous elections of 1984 on its own. 
   To the extent that the projected change could serve to undermine 
the MB-SLP alliance and damage MB chances in coming elections, it 
would be consistent with government attempts in the past couple 
of years to marginalize the organization through legislative 
action: 
   --In February 1993, the People's Assembly passed a law aimed at 
turning back MB advances in professional syndicates by 
invalidating elections that fail to draw fifty percent of the 
eligible voters (Uktubar, 28 February 1993). 
   --In December 1992, an amendment to the law governing political 
parties was passed, banning all political activities by 
organizations seeking party status that have not yet been legally 
recognized (Al-Ahram, 19 December 1992).  That legislation 
followed rumors--evidently encouraged by NDP officials to 
intimidate the SLP and the Brotherhood--that the government was 
considering a bill to ban any alliance with an illegal 
organization. 

   Rising Tensions in Islamic Alliance 

   Concern over the possible electoral change has been an evident 
factor in recent tensions between MB and SLP leaders.  Those 
relations have been particularly strained by the SLP's decision 
to engage in discussions with NDP officials on the "national 
dialogue"--which President Mubarak called for last November (see 
Note 3)--without MB representatives, despite the fact that the 
MB, along with most other opposition parties, signed a statement 
conditionally agreeing to participate in the dialogue (text of 
statement published in Al-Wafd, 7 December 1993).  It was in a 
meeting with the SLP on the national dialogue that NDP Secretary 
General Wali reportedly indicated official openness to restoring 
the party list election system and lowering the threshold for 
representation.  The dispute over participation in the dialogue 
broke out into the open last January with public bickering in the 
pages of the semiweekly SLP organ and MB mouthpiece Al-Sha'b, as 
well as the international edition of Al-Ahram.  Although 
differences between leaders of the two groups have occasionally 
been expressed publicly in the past, such open bickering is 
extremely unusual, particularly in the Islamic Alliance's own 
paper. 
   (Note 3) Mubarak invited "all the democratic forces in Egypt," 
including not only the political parties but "all of Egypt's 
thinkers and individuals, regardless of their affiliation," to 
join in a national dialogue that would "contribute toward 
drafting a sound scientific outlook for Egypt during the 21st 
century" (Cairo radio, 11 November 1993).  More recently, Mubarak 
said he would call for the dialogue to take place in April (MENA, 
20 March).  Prime Minister 'Atif Sidqi asserted in an interview 
that "only the legitimate forces will take part" in the dialogue 
and that "the Muslim Brotherhood is an illegitimate and illegal 
force" (Al-Musawwar, 4 February).  But neither Sidqi nor his 
interviewer referred to press reports that the MB might 
participate in the dialogue at some point through the 
professional syndicates under its control. 
   MB official Ma'mun al-Hudaybi used the organization's regular 
column in Al-Sha'b to attack the SLP together with four other 
opposition parties for allegedly agreeing to engage in the 
dialogue under reported government conditions that would exclude, 
at least initially, the MB and other parties (11 January).  He 
devoted a separate box in the same column to chastising SLP 
Secretary General 'Adil Husayn for his account in the paper's 
previous issue of his meeting with NDP officials.  Alluding, 
inter alia, to Husayn's report that the SLP representatives said 
they would "welcome" discussion of a change to the proportional 
list system as a topic of the "national dialogue," al-Hudaybi 
accused Husayn of flouting MB interests at the meeting "in the 
knowledge that your party leans toward agreement to the party 
list [electoral system] and that the political forces, foremost 
the MB, will be unable to participate in those elections if this 
is realized" (11 January). 
   Responding to al-Hudaybi's remarks, Husayn objected to much of 
the criticism directed at him; but he made no effort to deny al- 
Hudaybi's allegation that the SLP supported a return to the 
proportional party list system (Al-Sha'b, 14 January).  (For a 
summary of the exchange, see box.) 
   Subsequent public bickering has brought to the surface other 
objects of longstanding tension between elements of the MB and 
SLP--tension that could increase if the government decides to 
restore the proportional party list system.  Most notably, MB 
domination of the most prominent professional syndicates has 
evidently bred some resentment on the part of some SLP officials. 
Thus, SLP Assistant Secretary General and Secretary for 
Organization Affairs 'Abd-al-Hamid Barakat was quoted as 
complaining that "the Brotherhood is working on monopolizing" the 
syndicates throughout the country and "not opening the door to 
participation by members of the party, except to a minimal degree 
that does not meet the party's aspirations."  He asserted that 
the Brothers "view these syndicates as their legitimate party, as 
they have no legal presence" as an organization and thus believe 
"that the [Socialist] Labor Party may not compete with them in 
their party."  This dispute, Barakat was quoted as saying, "has 
had a clear impact on the course of the alliance as it now 
stands" (Al-Ahram international edition, 15 January). 

   Heading Toward a Break? 

   The strains within the Islamic Alliance have led to open 
suggestions from SLP officials of ending the partnership; but it 
is unclear how much of the discussion is simply posturing or, if 
it is serious, whether it reflects the views of a significant 
sector of the party's leadership.  Naji al-Shihabi, an assistant 
secretary general of the SLP and member of its Executive Bureau, 
was quoted in the press as claiming that a consensus was reached 
at a recent Bureau meeting in support of his proposal to end the 
alliance.  He added, however, that it was agreed to wait until 
the thousands of elected local councils in Egypt are dissolved- 
-presumably as a result of an eventual court decision striking 
down that electoral system on the same basis that the 
parliamentary electoral system was earlier struck down (see Note 
4).  Noting that Alliance candidates won control over a number of 
these local councils in the elections of November 1992, al- 
Shihabi said the delay in ending the alliance would serve to 
prevent "a weakening of the members of the party in these 
councils" (Al-Ahram international edition, 8 January).  While 
indicating that no firm decision has been made to abandon the 
Islamic Alliance, the SLP's Barakat, in his subsequent comments 
to Al-Ahram, implied that the party would be ready to break with 
the MB when the local councils are dissolved, unless the latter 
is ready to meet tough demands from the SLP.  He was quoted as 
saying that "the existence of the local councils call for the 
continuation of the alliance in view of their division between 
the MB and Labor [Party]," adding that "should there be a 
decision dissolving the local councils, the matter will be 
reviewed" and certain understandings would have to be worked out 
before the alliance is renewed. 
   (Note 4) The issue is awaiting a ruling by the Constitutional 
Court, to which it was referred immediately following the 1992 
local council elections (Al-Wafd, 4 November 1992). 
   Consistent with the SLP leaders' expression of a commitment to 
maintaining the Islamic Alliance at least until the local 
councils are dissolved, the open bickering between the MB and SLP 
ended in late January and al-Shihabi himself has made clear that 
party leaders unhappy with the alliance are not yet ready to burn 
their bridges with the MB.  Most recently, al-Shihabi was cited 
as saying that his party is already "preparing for the 
possibility of a change in the election law to the unconditional 
proportional list system" --presumably referring to the absence of 
any threshold for representation--and that his party might form a 
"unified slate" that would include elements of both the MB and 
the [secular leftist] Nasirites (Al-Ahram international edition, 
19 March).  However, highlighting the potential for further 
discord, at least some within the MB leadership have reportedly 
opposed cooperation with Nasirites (Rose Al-Yusuf, 31 May 1993, 
Al-Yasar, February 1994)--anathema to many Brothers who recall 
the long years (mid-1950s to 1970) of brutal oppression of MB 
leaders by the late President Jamal 'Abd-al-Nasir and abhor the 
Nasirites' secular orientation. 
   Complicating any assessment of prospects for the continuation of 
the alliance--even following a change in the electoral law--are 
the conflicting indications of the extent to which the MB has 
succeeded in taking control of the SLP party structure. 
Officials from both groups--but particularly the MB--often stress 
that they remain separate organizations.  For example, al-Hudaybi 
was quoted as claiming that "there has never been a merger 
between the Brothers and the [Socialist Labor] party or a taking 
over of the party by the MB."  Moreover, he pointed to what he 
claimed was SLP support for the regimes of Iraq's Saddam Husayn 
and Libya's Mu'ammar al-Qadhdhafi--regimes which the MB strongly 
opposes--as evidence of their separate identities (Al-Ahram 
international edition, 22 January).  The very ability of the SLP 
to participate in the dialogue with NDP officials over MB 
objections appears to confirm al-Hudaybi's claims.  Nonetheless, 
the SLP's Barakat acknowledged in his mid-January statements to 
Al-Ahram that "there did take place a certain merger of the 
organizational structures [of the two parties] in some areas," 
saying that it is "necessary to make this clarification publicly" 
and that "there is no embarrassment in that."  In addition, the 
state-owned but relatively independent anti-fundamentalist weekly 
Rose Al-Yusuf claimed in a detailed report on SLP internal 
elections that, while the SLP leadership has attempted in some 
respects to curb the MB's influence in the party, the Brothers 
were increasingly taking over leadership positions in the SLP 
organizational structure.  It claimed that "many" MB members 
"have spread throughout the party institutions" and that 28 of 
them had become members of the party's 45-member Executive Bureau 
(31 May 1993). 

   Implications 

   While the government's contemplation of a reversion to the 
proportional party slate system may be motivated largely by an 
interest in strengthening discipline among the NDP deputies, it 
may also be driven in part by a desire to drive a wedge in the 
Islamic Alliance and thus limit the organization's potential 
advances in the next elections.  While such a change, if it 
materializes, might ultimately be extremely modest in light of 
constitutional constraints, Al-Hudaybi's expressed concern 
suggests that the Brotherhood itself assumes that it can only be 
hurt by the change--notwithstanding indications of growing MB 
domination of the SLP structure.  The MB probably also fears that 
if the government is considering restoring a party slate system 
for parliamentary elections, it may also be determined not to 
abandon entirely the current party slate system governing local 
council elections--even in the face of the expected court ruling 
against the current system. 

   BOX 

   Brotherhood and SLP Leaders Exchange Bitter Words 

   In his 11 January article, al-Hudaybi expressed astonishment at 
the reported agreement by five opposition political parties, 
including the SLP, to engage in a "national dialogue" with the 
ruling NDP that would exclude, at least initially, MB 
representatives as well as other parties and political 
organizations.  "We say clearly that these six parties do not 
represent anyone but themselves," he asserted.  In a separate 
box, he sharply criticized 'Adil Husayn for his 7 January account 
of a meeting on the national dialogue between the SLP and the 
NDP, accusing Husayn of ignoring MB interests.  Although Husayn's 
account stressed the SLP's insistence on political reform, al- 
Hudaybi noted accurately:  "You repeatedly said that the elections 
should be held with the participation of what you called the 
legal parties.  You did not say one word about the need to 
recognize other political forces, notably the MB."  Claiming that 
the SLP would not have reached the People's Assembly through the 
elections of 1987 without its MB partners, al-Hudaybi asserted 
that their joint campaign slogan--"Islam is the Solution"--was 
"originally an MB slogan." 
   Responding to al-Hudaybi, Husayn took issue with both the 
substance and tone of his criticisms, claiming that "those who do 
not wish for the good fortune of the Islamic Alliance were 
gladdened by what you published."  He claimed that, by signing 
the joint opposition statement welcoming the national dialogue, 
the MB had agreed to allow itself to be represented initially by 
the SLP.  (According to its text, that statement asserted that 
the dialogue "must be conducted, at least during its first phase, 
among the parties and political forces through their leaders or 
accredited representatives"--a point stressed by Husayn.)  Husayn 
took particular objection to al-Hudaybi's claim that the slogan 
"Islam is the Solution" was taken from the MB, saying "it is the 
slogan of Muslims everywhere and in every age" and that the SLP 
had used it prior to the formation of the Islamic Alliance. 
Expressing objection to the "tone" of the article from "beginning 
to end," Husayn concluded:  "The enemies of Islam are lying in 
wait for its proponents and concocting plots and sedition.  We 
must be wary and vigilant....I pray that God will clear up 
the differences between you and me according to righteousness. 
May this chapter be closed." 
   END BOX 
(AUTHOR: BROWN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
cs 31/0003z mar 

</TEXT>

</DOC>


